(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“See the original story at RollingStone.com.”
“...the series unearthed...”
“He walks in there and does a lyric about J Lo from one of his songs The West audition is just one of the many surprises American Idol is promising in its farewell season which will both crown a new victor as well as look back at all the talents...”
““And up walked Kim and Kanye—Kim pregnant and Kanye enthusiastic and ready to go in there.”
“News of the surprise audition.”
““We were in San Francisco, and they said, ‘We’ve got a contestant that’s just going to jump into the line,’” Ryan Seacrest told E!”
“West his Golden Ticket to Hollywood Week whether the rapper actually takes part in the next round remains to be seen...”
“I just really believe in him Before launching into the audition West tells the judges specifically Jennifer Lopez he chose Gold Digger because it has one of the judges names in it After wrapping up the a cappella rendition the judges don t even need to deliberate before quickly handing...”
“I didn’t give any advice on singing, rapping.”
“I always wanted to rap and no one really believed in me, so I wanted to try some things out, ya know?” Kim Kardashian, watching the audition on a monitor alongside Ryan Seacrest, tells the Idol host, “I’m not really nervous because I do really believe in him.”


"Look at the original" RollingStone.com Website. "
__ Series unearthed... "
"He came in and sang a song about Luo Guancong in one of his songs." Western audition "is just one of the many surprises made by" American Idol "in the farewell season. American Idol will not only crown the new winner, but also review all of its talents..."
"Jin and Jin Yan'er are pregnant. Jin Yan'er goes up enthusiastically and is ready to go in."
"Surprise audition news."
"We were in San Francisco and they said, 'we have a contestant to join the team,'" Ryan Seacrest told e! "
"West won the gold medal of Hollywood week. It remains to be seen whether the rapper will really take part in the next round..."
"I really believe him. Before the audition, West told the judges that he chose the gold digger, because after the a-unaccompanied chorus performance, the judges didn't even need to think about it carefully before they could hand it in quickly..."
"I didn't give any advice on singing or rap."
"I've always wanted to rap, and no one really believed me, so I wanted to try something, you know? Kim Kardashian watched the audition on the monitor with Ryan Seacrest. He told the idol host, "I'm not really nervous because I really believe him."



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At the time, an unnamed source told Hollywood Life that Craig didn't want to be seen as a "poor victimized woman."”
“Twitter user @rosechocglam also expressed disdain that Thompson had rarely — if ever — acknowledged his son Prince on social media, "but was happy to pose for a pregnancy announcement with Khloe."”
“They were worried that Khloe would end up heartbroken."”
“"It took a while for the family to accept Tristan.”
“There were several concerns, including that he is another basketball player and also that his ex was pregnant," an unnamed source told People.”
“Read more: Khloe Kardashian says she didn't know Tristan Thompson was in a relationship with Jordan Craig when they started dating"When Khloe first started dating Tristan, her family questioned if it was a good idea.”
“Craig was six months pregnant at the time.”
“ Vest: @AzurraDubai A post shared by ℐℴ ℛđƴ.ℭ (@alleyesonjordyc) on Nov 30, 2016 at 4:21pm PST Nov 30, 2016 at 4:21pm PSTThompson and Khloe stepped out as a couple in September 2016 and even went on vacation together.”
“Going to miss my bump..but the best is yet to come!”
“She said her suspicions were confirmed when she saw paparazzi photos of him and Kardashian together, according to the documents.”


"At that time, an anonymous source told Hollywood life that Craig didn't want to be seen as a 'poor victim woman'," he said
Twitter user @ rosechocglam also disdained Thompson for rarely admitting his son Prince on social media, "but I'm happy to pose with Khloe to announce pregnancy."
"They were worried that Chloe would eventually break his heart."
"It took some time for the family to accept Tristan."
"There are several issues of concern, including that he is another basketball player and that his ex girlfriend is pregnant," a source told people on condition of anonymity
"Read more: Khloe Kardashian said that when they started dating, she didn't know Tristan Thompson had a relationship with Jordan Craig." when Khloe first started dating Tristan, her family questioned whether it was a good idea
"Craig was six months pregnant."
"Vest: @ azurradubai, one by one
"To miss my bumps But the best is yet to come
"The documents show that her suspicions were confirmed when she saw the paparazzi photo of him with Kardashian."



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“How Gwen Came Between Shelton & ‘The Voice’ ExecsBlake Wants Out!”
“How Gwen Came Between Shelton & ‘The Voice’ Execs Season 14 may be the country singer's last on the show.”
“Season 14 of NBC’s hit singing reality competition show The Voice starts in only a few weeks, and there is already bad blood between veteran judge Blake Shelton and network executives.”
“In fact, as RadarOnline.com previously reported, the country singer may be leaving the show after this year!”
“And according to production insider – all the drama started with Shelton’s lady love, Gwen Stefani!”
“As Radar readers know, Shelton, 41 – who has won 6 of the 13 seasons to date – started dating Stefani while the two starred alongside each other on season 9.”
“Although it was hush-hush at the time due to the fact that they were each going through nasty divorces, Stefani returned as a coach for season 12 – and revealed on-air that her and Shelton were a full on couple!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"How did Gwen get between Sheldon and the voice? Axelblake wanted to get out!"
"How Gwen stood out between Sheldon and the voice's 14th season Executive may be the country singer's last time on the show."
With season 14 of NBC's hit reality show the voice just weeks away, there has been a rift between senior judge Blake Shelton and network executives
"In fact RadarOnline.com The website previously reported that the country singer might leave the show after this year! "
According to inside production, all the plots start with Sheldon's mistress Gwen Stephanie
As readers of radar magazine know, Sheldon, 41, has won six of his 13 seasons. He started dating Stephanie, and they played side by side in season 9
"Despite the fact that both sides had a bad divorce and everyone kept a low profile, Stephanie went back to season 12 as a coach - and revealed on the radio that she and Sheldon were a couple in love!"



**Something goes wrong**
“"You can't say she doesn't feel emotion for her husband," Cobb says.”
“Samir Hussein / Getty ImagesKate and William rarely kiss in public, and this cheek kiss would be a rare exception — except that Kate doesn't actually touch her lips to William's face.”
“3.”
“"Gentle touches, playful moments, and sincere smiles show that they enjoy each other’s company and have fun together."”
“You let them know that they’re important to you," Cobb says.”
“Through touch you connect with your partner.”
“That said, touching doesn't necessarily happen between any two people: "There's a level of familiarity, comfort, and likability in touch.”
“(December 2017)Despite the recent hoopla surrounding this exchange, it isn't *really* about affection or romance, according to Cobb, who sees tapping as a way to signal, "Hey, we can both relate," in lighthearted situations.”
“When Kate Tapped William's KneeKate taps William’s knee during a filmed interview.”
“2.”


"You can't say she has no feelings for her husband," Cobb said
"Samir Hussain and William rarely kiss in public, and this cheek kiss will be a rare exception - only Kate doesn't actually touch William's face with her lips."
_3._
"Gentle touch, playful moments and sincere smile show that they like each other's company and are happy together."
"You let them know that they are important to you," Cobb said
"Through contact, you build a connection with your partner."
In other words, contact does not necessarily occur between any two people: "there is a certain degree of familiarity, comfort and loveliness in contact."
"(December 2017) Cobb believes that despite the recent uproar surrounding this exchange, it's not really about emotion or romance. He sees eavesdropping as a way to send out a" Hey, we can all get along "signal in a relaxed and pleasant situation
"When Kate patted William on the knee, Kate patted William on the knee in the interview."
_2._



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There was no truth to either of those stories, and the same goes for this latest one.”
“We also called out the outlet's sister publication, OK!, for wrongly reporting that Alves was upset about McConaughey being an "absentee dad."”
“Gossip Cop previously corrected Star for falsely claiming that Alves and McConaughey were fighting nonstop.”
“Unfortunately, we&'re not surprised that the tabloid would publish this phony story.”
“We're told the claim otherwise is "completely inaccurate."”
“But Gossip Cop checked in with a reliable source close to Alves, who exclusively assures us she never flipped out on any reporters, and it's "not in her character" to do so.”
“She even threatened to walk out if Matthew's name was brought up again."”
“The outlet's dubious insider adds, "Eventually, Camila just lost it.”
“A so-called "source" tells the magazine, "Camila is normally so sweet and gracious, but you could tell she got annoyed when every single interview inevitably became about him."”
“According to Star, Alves recently participated in a number of interviews to promote her new partnership with Target, but journalists were more interested in her famous husband.”


"Neither of these stories is true, and so is the latest one."
"We also called the sister magazine of the store, OK! Because of the false report that Alves was upset that mcconagall was "absent dad"
"The gossip police have corrected the star's false claim that Alves and McConnell are fighting incessantly."
"Unfortunately, we are not surprised that the tabloids will publish this false story."
"We were told that otherwise the statement was" totally inaccurate "
But gossip police reported a reliable source close to Alves, who assured us that she had never been angry with any reporters and that it was "not her character" to do so
"She even threatened to leave if Matthew's name was mentioned again."
An insider at the store added: "in the end, Camilla lost it."
A so-called "source" told the magazine, "Camilla is usually so sweet and kind, but you can see that when every interview inevitably becomes a topic about him, she is very angry."
"According to the star, Alves recently took part in some interviews to promote her new partnership with target, but reporters are more interested in her famous husband."



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Kumail Nanjiani (@kumailn) August 23, 2017Click inside to read more tweets…”
“His IQ is so low!”
“What an unhinged racist bully...”
“...josh groban joshgroban August 23 2017 trump u pathetic piece of human waste god will never forgive u neither will AMERICA u lying sack of shit fuck u and ur paid crowd ROSIE Rosie August 23 2017 Not watching the rally but I am confident this is an accurate tweet...”
“He's insane.”
“This speech is insane.”
“He's sick.”
“Read what celebs are saying about the speech below.”
““I strongly condemn neo-Nazis, white Supremacists and the KKK.”Trump also went through all three of his statements, but he omitted the “both sides” comments when reading the statements to the Arizona crowd.”
“And tonight, this entire arena stands united against the thugs who perpetrate hatred and violence,” Trump said.”


"- kumail nanjiani (@ kumailn) August 23, 2017 click inside to read more microblogs..."
"His IQ is too low!"
"What a crazy racist bully..."
__ Trump, you miserable scum, God will never forgive you, and the United States will never forgive you for lying. Fuck you and your paying crowd Rosie. Rosie didn't watch the rally on August 23, 2017, but I believe it's an accurate tweet... "
"He's crazy."
"This speech is crazy."
"He's sick."
"Read the famous people's opinions on the following speech."
"I strongly condemn the Neo Nazis, the white supremacists and the KKK party." Trump also reviewed all three of his statements, but he ignored the comments of "both sides" when he read them to the people of Arizona
"Tonight, the whole arena is united against those thugs who create hatred and violence," trump said



Number  6
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The comment continued, "Lmao y'all trippin' fam, money can get you a new face but not a nicer personality which these two girls need."”
“In response to the post, one Instagram user wrote, "2 fake bitches sitting in a tree, first comes the nose job, then comes the lips, oh and don't forget the built in cheeks [face with tears of joy emoji]."”
“Over the weekend, Instagram account @ballahadid posted a pic of Kendall and Bella, asking followers, "Kenny or Bella?"”
“The 21-year-old supermodel has fired back at a hater on social media after the Instagram troll called her and pal Kendall Jenner "fake bitches."”
“Don't mess with Bella Hadid.”


The review went on: "I think all of you will like it. Money can give you a new face, but it's not the better personality these two girls need."
One instagram user wrote in response: "two fake bitches sitting in a tree, first nose shaping, then lips, oh, don't forget the built-in cheek (with tears of joy on the face),"
Last weekend, instagram account @ ballahadid released a photo of Kendall and Bella, asking fans, "Kenny or Bella?"
The 21-year-old supermodel attacked a hater on social media after calling her and her friend Kendall Jenner "fake bitches" on instagram
"Leave Bella Hadid alone."



**Something goes wrong**
“"I don’t think it’s necessary and I just feel like it’s unfair, things aren’t truthful."”
“...could be the perfect opportunity for her to set the record straight...”
“Caitlyn touched down in London town last week to promote her to promote her juicy new autobiography The Secrets Of My Life she even popped by the This Morning studios and many are speculating whether she had a secret meeting...”
“...with Celebrity Big Brother bosses...”
“Sources have told the Daily Star: "The bookers are really keen to have Caitlyn in the house.”
“"They know she’d be TV gold so they’re prepared to break the bank for her.”
“The world has been fascinated by Caitlyn’s story and getting her would push ratings through the roof."”
“Well, they're not wrong there.”
“Caitlyn is no stranger to reality telly she s starred in Keeping Up With The Kardashians since forevs and even had her own show I Am Cait and after proof that the Kardashian Jenner family feud is still rife this...”
“She even recently revealed that she hasn't spoken to Kim Kardashian in a 'very long time'.”


"I don't think it's necessary. I just think it's unfair. It's not true."
__︹ It might be a great opportunity for her to clarify the facts... "
"Caitlin arrived in London last week to promote her interesting new autobiography the secret of my life. She even broke the news in her studio this morning. Many people are wondering whether she has a secret meeting..."
__ With big brother and boss of Celebrity... "
"The subscriber really wants Caitlin in," a source told the Daily Star
"They know she's going to be a TV star, so they're ready to spend money on her."
"The whole world is fascinated by the story of Caitlin, and getting her will make the audience ratings soar."
"Well, they're not wrong."
"Caitlin is no stranger to reality shows. She has starred in" keep up with Kardashian "since freves, and even has her own show" I'm Katie ". After proving that the discord between Kardashian Jenner's family is still prevalent this year..."
"She even recently revealed that she had not spoken to Kim Kardashian for a long time."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: ****Inside Donald J. Trump's Inauguration Ball with Caitlyn Jenner, Rick Perry and Tony Soprano's Former GirlfriendSee What's Trending in W Video:”
“Kim Kardashian says that while she hasn't talked to Caitlyn Jenner for a few weeks ever since news of the contents of the book began to surface in advance of its release, as is standard for any high-profile celebrity memoir, she will always love her.”
“A new controversy is absolutely tearing the Kardashian clan apart.”
“The source of that controversy also just so happens to be available for purchase at your nearest seller of fine books.”
“It's Caitlyn Jenner's new memoir, and select Kardashian can't help but keeping talking about how very, very controversial it is.”
“The Secrets of My Life comes out almost two years after Jenner revealed she was indeed transgender and has undergone a process to confirm her gender (it's co-written by Buzz Bissinger, the famed sportswriters who also wrote the Caitlyn Jenner cover story for Vanity Fair).”
“It details Jenner's experience struggling with her gender identity in private while living as a sports hero, an icon of American masculinity and then, of course, her very public transition.”
“Of course, Jenner's reality TV trailblazing family is mentioned throughout, and they clearly are very, very upset with it and don't care how many members of the book-buying public happen to know about it.”
“During an appearance that airs today on Ellen one of America s highest rated daytime talk shows Kardashian klan lynchpin Kim discussed her displeasure with parts of the book that happens to have a suggested retail price of 30 but is available to buy now from several online and bricks...”
“...and motor retailers...”


Related reports: * * * watch the trend in W video at the inaugural ball held by Donald J. trump with the ex girlfriends of Caitlin Jenner, Rick Perry and Tony Soprano:
"Kim Kardashian says she hasn't talked to Caitlin Jenner for weeks since the book's content began to surface before its release, which is the standard of any celebrity memoir, but she will always love her."
"A new debate is definitely tearing up the Kardashian family."
"The source of this controversy can also be found in the nearest boutique bookstore."
"This is Caitlin Jenner's new memoir, and choosing Kardashian can't help talking about how controversial it is."
"After Jenner revealed that he was indeed transgender and had gone through a process of gender identification, the secret of my life came to light almost two years later (co authored by the famous sports writer buzz Bissinger, who also wrote the cover story of katerine Jenner for Vanity Fair)
"The book details Jenna's experience as a sports hero, a symbol of American masculinity, fighting against her gender identity in private and, of course, her transformation in public."
"Of course, Jenner's reality show pioneers have been mentioned all along, and they are obviously very, very dissatisfied with it, and they don't care how many book buyers happen to know about it."
"Today on Ellen, one of the most watched daytime talk shows in the United States, Kardashian Klan lynchpin Kim talked about her dissatisfaction with the book, some of which are recommended to retail for 30 pounds, but now available online and in bricks..."
__ And auto retailers... "



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLife reached out to Rob and Sienna’s reps for comment.”
“The Remember Me actor ended up falling in love with Twigs’ music, and the couple introduced the two of them.”
“News in 2014 that Rob, Sienna and her now ex-fiancé Tom Sturridge all went to the singer’s concert together.”
“A source told E!”
“This would definitely be an interesting match though considering Sienna is the one who set the Twilight star up with his ex-fiancée FKA twigs.”
“While promoting their film, The Lost City Of Z at the Berlin International Film Festival in Feb. 2017, the pair looked comfortable together while posing for photos and grabbing dinner together.”
“Rob and Sienna have always seemed pretty close.”
““All of their mutual friends think Rob and Sienna would be a good match,” the insider said.”
“As for the pair’s friends, they reportedly think that these two would work really well together.”
““Now that they’re both single, the door is open for them to give this a real shot,” the source continued.”


"Hollywood Life contacted representatives of rob and Sienna for advice."
"I remember my actor finally fell in love with twig's music, and the couple introduced them."
"In 2014, it was reported that rob, Siena and her ex fiance Tom Sturridge all went to the singer's concert together."
"A source told me!"
"It's definitely an interesting game, although considering Siena who set up the Twilight star with his ex fiance FKA twig."
"When they promoted their film" lost Z City "at the Berlin International Film Festival in February 2017, the two of them seemed very comfortable when they took photos together and had dinner together."
"Rob and Sienna always seem to be close."
"All of their mutual friends think rob and Siena will be a good couple," the person familiar with the matter said
"As for the two's friends, it is reported that they think the two will cooperate very well."
"Since they are all single, the door is open for them to give this a real opportunity," the source continued



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was with Kristen on the set most days and seemed to have fun."”
“Now I've realized who I am!'”
“Pattinson and Kristen dated for almost five years before calling it quits in 2013.”
“In an interview with The Sunday Times, Stewart said, "I didn't talk about my first relationships that went public because I wanted things that are mine to be mine.”
“I hated it that details of my life were being turned into a commodity and peddled around the world."”
“Revealing that the public was the "enemy", the Personal Shopper actress shared how difficult it was to date Pattinson, and how it helped her come out openly.”
“The 26-year-old said, "If it didn't seem like a relevant topic, like something that needed help, I would have kept my life private forever.”
“But then I can't walk outside holding somebody's hand, as I'm followed everywhere. "”
“"When I was dating Rob, the public was the enemy, and that is no way to live.”
“[Coming out] wasn't this grand statement, 'I was so confused!”


"She spent most of her time on set with Christine and seemed very happy."
"Now I realize who I am!"
"Pattinson and Christine dated for nearly five years and then announced their separation in 2013."
"I didn't talk about my first public relationship because I wanted what belonged to me to be mine," Stewart told the Sunday Times
"I hate the fact that the details of my life are turned into commodities and sold all over the world."
The private shopping star revealed that the public was her "enemy" and shared with everyone how difficult it was to date Pattinson and how she could help her make a public appearance
"If it's not a related topic, like something in need of help, I'll keep my life secret forever," the 26 year old said
"But I can't go out with other people's hands because there are people following me everywhere."
"When I dated rob, the public was the enemy, and there was no way to survive."
"(comes out) it's not a grand statement," I'm so confused! "



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Take a look at some of their reactions, below:”
“...wasn t here for his comments...”
“Things took another awkward turn when he switched topics touching on the widespread Harvey Weinstein scandal he added Weinstein f d with me by trying to have me star in the worst movies of all time Needless to say Twitter...”
“Two people got kicked out."”
“There were many boos and many women who were telling him he was a sexist pig.”
“His comments didn't sit well with a few of his fans as another attendee added, "I've seen him before and he was hysterical, but this wasn't funny at all... Nobody was laughing.”
“...to false rape allegations...”
“One patron who attended the gig spoke with the publication and added more context to the reports saying that Rock joked that he would need a crew of witnesses surrounding him at all times to prevent him from falling victim...”
“According to Page Six, during his performance at the Comedy Cellar, Rock explained that he refused to hire women because "they cry rape because they want money."”
“Chris Rock reportedly upset a significant group of his fan base as he allegedly made comments joking about sexual harassment in one of his recent stand-up performances.”


Here are some of their reactions:
__ Not to comment... "
"Another awkward twist happened when he talked about the Harvey Weinstein scandal, he connected Weinstein with me and tried to get me to play the worst movie ever - needless to say twitter..."
"Two people were kicked out."
"There were a lot of boos and women telling him that he was a sexist pig."
Another participant added: "his comments didn't appeal to some of his fans, I've met him before and he's hysterical, but it's not funny at all... No one laughs
"False rape charges"
"A sponsor of the concert talked to the magazine and added more content to the report, saying that rock joked that he needed a group of witnesses around him at any time in case he became a victim..."
According to page 6, in the comedy cellar, Locke explained that he refused to hire women because "they cry and rape because they want money."
"It's reported that Chris Locke made some jokes about sexual harassment during a recent stand up show, which upset his fans."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“The structure is so advanced that even military personal have not yet used this technology.”Are you surprised Kim Kardashian and Kanye West have decide to install a panic room in their house?”
“Once they get into the room they will be safe and can call help.”
““It is one of the most advanced in the world.”
““If something bad happens they cannot rely on others for protection and want to be in charge of their own destiny, which is why they installed the panic room,” the source revealed to Naughty Gossip.”
“The ritzy star stopped wearing jewelry, became somewhat of a recluse and changed her lifestyle all to focus more on her family rather than on her prized bling.”
“As RadarOnline.com readers know, Kim Kardashian, 33, previously opened up about her anxiety and trauma after her robbery.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Voice in the comments below."
"This structure is so advanced that even soldiers have not used this technology." Are you surprised that Kim Kardashian and Kanye West decided to install an emergency room in their home? "
"Once they enter the room, they are safe and can call for help."
"It's one of the most advanced machines in the world."
"If something bad happens, they can't rely on others to protect themselves and want to control their own destiny. That's why they install panic rooms," the source told mischievous gossip
"The luxury star no longer wears jewelry, has become a bit reclusive, has changed her way of life, all in order to pay more attention to her family rather than her precious jewelry."
"As RadarOnline.com Readers of the website know that Kim Kardashian, 33, had previously disclosed her anxiety and trauma after the robbery. "



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The family time comes less than a week after reports surfaced that Mariah and Bryan Tanaka had broken up after less than a year of dating.”
“"#moments #rocandroe #easter #family @nickcannon."”
“"Easter with #demkids," she shared with her followers.”
“In a new photo posted on the "Obsessed" singer's Instagram, fans witnessed Monroe and Moroccan have some fun while painting Easter eggs with mom and dad.”
“On the night before the Easter Bunny arrived into town, Mariah Carey and Nick Cannon came together for a special celebration with their kids.”
“A post shared by Mariah Carey (@mariahcarey) on Apr 15, 2017 at 3:48pm PDTThe Easter holiday is already bringing families together.”


"Family time less than a week ago, it was reported that Maria and Brian Tanaka broke up less than a year after dating."
"# moment # rocandero # Easter # family @ nickcannon."
She shared with her followers "Easter with demkuid"
In a new photo released on instagram, the "obsessed" singer, fans witness the fun of Monroe and Moroccans painting easter eggs with their parents
"The night before the Easter Bunny came to town, Maria Kelly and Nick Cannon took part in a special celebration with their children."
"Mariah Carey (@ MariahCarey) posted a post at 3:48 p.m. on April 15, 2017. The Easter holiday has brought families together."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He will be remembered so well and with so much love.”Image zoom Credit: Silver Screen Collection/Hulton Archive/Getty Images...”
“You will never be forgotten.”Ashley Campbell, the superstar’s daughter and fellow recording artist, said that she was “heartbroken.” “I owe him everything I am, and everything I ever will be,” she tweeted.”
“May you rest in peace my friend.”
““Thank you Glen Campbell,” Charlie Daniels Band’s titular frontman tweeted, “for sharing your talent with us for so many years.”
“1 country hits — EW rounded up his most startling musical moments — as well as his family and many friends in the entertainment industry.”
“He leaves behind over 50 studio albums, dozens of songs that crossed over onto the pop charts, and five No.”
“Glen Campbell, the country music legend and original “Rhinestone Cowboy,” died Tuesday at age 81 after suffering from Alzheimer’s disease for several years.”


"He will be remembered and loved." Image zooming credit: screen collection / Helton archives / Getty pictures
"You will never be forgotten." Ashley Campbell, the superstar's daughter and the same recording artist, said she was "heartbroken." "I owe him everything I have and everything I'm going to be," she tweeted
"Rest in peace, my friend."
"Thanks to glen Campbell," Charlie Daniels' nominal leader tweeted, "you've been sharing your talent with us all these years."
"One of the country's top songs - ew has his most shocking musical moments - as well as his family and many friends in the entertainment industry."
"He left more than 50 studio albums, dozens of songs on the pop charts, and five more."
Glen Campbell, country music legend and author of the original rhinestone cowboy, died of Alzheimer's disease on Tuesday at the age of 81



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“The source added, “After the scare he and his wife hardly shared a consummated marriage!”Source: BACKGRIDWhat are your thoughts on these new details?”
“...lacking in the bedroom...”
“Source BACKGRID And then when she told him to stop talking to her she ended up finding cell phone conversations he was having with the other woman and Christine blew a gasket Article continues below advertisement Source BACKGRID On top of that Ben who survived prostate cancer in 2014 was...”
“...before...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source BACKGRID His wife Christine was not amused by her husband s mid life infatuation and the couple fought constantly about it especially in recent months because Ben stayed in touch with the gal and claimed he was only mentoring her We ve all heard that...”
“'” the source said.”
“Source: BACKGRID“Ben became quite taken with her and was often heard bragging about how talented the woman was and he gushed that she was ‘definitely going places!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDThough Ben has never been accused of cheating on Christine, a source tells Radar he was getting a little too close to a female friend he met while working and could not stop talking about her, which didn’t go over well at home.”
“According to RadarOnline however, that is far from reality.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"After the panic, he and his wife hardly had a perfect marriage together," the source added! "Source: backgrid, what do you think of these new details?"
__ There's no... "In the bedroom
"When she told him not to talk to her again, she found him talking to another woman on his mobile phone. Christina blew up an article under the advertisement, based on Ben, who survived from prostate cancer in 2014. The source background is..."
__ Before... "
"The article continues in the following advertisement source: backgrid. His wife, Christine, is not interested in her husband's middle-aged infatuation. The couple have been quarreling about it, especially in recent months, because Ben keeps in touch with the girl and claims that he is only guiding her. We have all heard about it..."
"The source said
"Source: backgrid" was fascinated by her, and often heard her boast about how talented this woman is. He kept on saying that she "is sure to be outstanding!"
Backgrid was never accused of cheating Christine, but a source told radar that he was a little too close to a female friend he knew at work to stop talking about her, which was not very popular at home
"However, according to ladaroni, this is far from reality."



**Something goes wrong**
“Jen has her hopes up of a possible reconciliation with Brad since she and her ex started talking again,' the source said.”
“'Jen is crushed after hearing the rumors that Brad has been talking to a beautiful, Angelina Jolie-lookalike, MIT professor.”
“They met again in 2010 on the set of Wanderlust, which Jennifer starred in opposite Paul Rudd.”
“Jennifer told PopSugar she thought Justin was the 'nicest person in the world'.”
“They met for the first time on the set of Tropic Thunder in 2007.”
“The couple tied the knot on August 5, 2015.”
“Although rumors are swirling about both parties moving on following their February 2018 announcement that they separated in late 2017, they haven't made moves to divorce just yet and may not.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux marriedJennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux are still married.”
“Here's what you need to know.”
“Need a breakdown of this sordid love triangle?”


"Since Jennifer and her ex started talking again, she's hopeful of a possible reconciliation with Brad," the source said
"Jane was very sad to hear that Brad had been talking to a beautiful MIT professor who looked like Angelina Jolie."
In 2010, they met again in "vagabond" starring Jennifer and Paul Rudd
"Jennifer told popsug that she thought Justin was" the best person in the world. "
"They met for the first time in 2007 on the set of tropical thunder."
"The couple got married on August 5, 2015."
"Although the two sides announced their separation at the end of 2017 in February 2018, rumors continued that they would continue to divorce, they have not yet divorced and may not."
"Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru are married. Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru are still married."
"That's what you need to know."
"Need to break this dirty love triangle?"



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But here are the pictures that have had people on Twitter and Instagram (including fans on her page) speculating as of late:”
“Only the star really knows.”
“Or, as the source claims, it could be a temporary health change.”
“There’s nothing wrong with that.”
“And as my friend said, she could just be trying to start new fashion trends that include more belts, denim and loose tanks.”
“But, she knows she’ll be back to her regular self soon enough.”We don’t 100 percent believe that Ri Ri is pregnant ourselves.”
“The speculation is tough for Rihanna.”
“She has something going on, but it’s private.”
““Rihanna isn’t pregnant, sorry to disappoint everyone, but, nope.”
“?”Well, an alleged “Rihanna insider” told HollywoodLife.com that the rumors aren’t true.”


"But here are some pictures, which have been speculated on Twitter and instagram (including her fans) recently:
"Only stars know."
"Or, as the source said, it could be a temporary health change."
"It's no problem."
"As my friend said, she's probably just trying to create new trends, including more belts, jeans and tank tops."
"But she knows that she will soon return to her normal self." we don't believe that Lily is pregnant. _
"It's a hard guess for Rihanna."
"She has something to do, but it's personal."
"Rihanna is not pregnant. I'm sorry to disappoint you, but she is not."
"? a so-called" Rihanna insider "told me that the Hollywood Life rumors were not true."



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’re a good balance.””
““I’ve taught him to be a bit more calm or cautious.”
““He’s taught me to have more of an opinion,” Kim admitted.”
““And I think it’s important that in all couples, the mom gives the husband as much attention as the kids.”Kim and Kanye started dating in April 2012 before tying the knot in 2014 and they are still the perfect match for each other.”
“My time is spread really thin,” Kim explained.”
““I don’t think I could handle more than [four kids].”
““But they’re ignoring all reason and going with their impulse here.”While Kim and Kanye have yet to comment on the possibility of adding to their family so soon, the KKW Beauty star did tell Elle‘s April issue that a fourth baby would be her last.”
““A lot of people think it’s crazy, since their marriage is hardly in the ideal place and they’re already struggling to cope with the demands of three kids,” the source said.”
“Radar Online reported that this could be something that actually tears them apart since their relationship isn’t in the greatest place at the moment.”
“Although Kim and Kanye are ready for a fourth child — hopefully another son if Kanye had it his way — some close friends don’t think it’s such a good idea.”


"We have a good balance."
"I taught him to be calm or cautious."
"He taught me more ideas," Kim admitted
"I think it's important for a mother to pay equal attention to her husband and children in all couples." Kim and Kanye started dating in April 2012 and then got married in 2014. They are still perfect partners for each other
"I really don't have much time," Kim explained
"I don't think I can handle more than (four children),"
"But they ignore all the reasons and go with their impulses here." Although Kim and Kanye haven't commented on the possibility of joining their family so soon, the kkw beauty star did tell Elle's April magazine that her fourth child would be her last
"A lot of people think it's crazy because their marriage is hard to be in the ideal place and they're already trying to cope with the demands of three children," the source said
"Radar online reports that this may be a thing that breaks them up, because their relationship is not at its best right now."
"Although Kim Jong Il and Kanye are ready to have a fourth child - if Kanye has a way, he hopes to have another son - some close friends think it's not a good idea."



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she’d be a good coach?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Christina would ever go to American Idol?”
“The show is also eyeing alums like Chris Daughtry, Fantasia and Carrie Underwood for the reboot, which will premiere in the first half of 2018.”
“No American Idol judges have been confirmed just yet, although HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY heard that Katy Perry is very close to signing a deal.”
“So far, the fourth coach who will join Kelly, Adam and Blake on season 14 has not been announced.”
“After that, the powerful singer took some time off to work on her own music, and since J.Hud, Adam Levine, Blake Shelton and Miley Cyrus have already been confirmed for the upcoming season 13, we know she won’t be back then, either.”
“She returned for seasons 5, 8 and, finally, season 10, when her contestant, Alisan Porter, was named the winner.”
“Idol is very much ready to make the move and hopes Christina bites.”Christina was one of the original coaches on The Voice, and served on the first three seasons before taking a break during season 4.”
““They are looking to pay Christina a lot and sell the fact to her that The Voice has forgotten about her.”
““ABC is ready to make a serious offer to steal Christina from The Voice,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Do you think she would be a good coach?"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Christina will go to American Idol?"
"The show has also attracted alumni such as Chris Daughtry, Fantasia and Carrie Underwood in the hope that they will be able to restart the show, which will premiere in the first half of 2018."
"The judge of American Idol has not been confirmed yet, but he only heard that Katie Perry is going to sign the agreement soon."
"So far, the fourth coach to join Kelly, Adam and Blake in the 14th season has not been announced
"After that, the powerful singer took some time to write her own music, and since J. hard, Adam Levin, Blake Sheldon and Millie Cyrus have been confirmed to be released in season 13, we know she won't come back."
She came back in the fifth, eighth and tenth seasons, and her contestant Alison Porter was named the champion
"American idol is ready. I hope Christina will succeed." Christina was one of the first dubbing coaches, coaching for the first three seasons before the fourth quarter break
"They want to give Christina a lot of money and sell her the fact that the voice has forgotten her."
"ABC is going to make a serious proposal to steal Christina from the voice," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off below!”
“Will he stick it out in New York, or return to his roots in Los Angeles?”
“Yes, we're talking about Ryan here.”
“The former American Idol host needs to spend a lot of time New York City in order to keep up with his co-hosting duties on the morning talk show... and he ain't pleased about it.”
“According to Radar, life in the Big Apple is not all it has cracked up to be for Ryan, and he allegedly yearns for the weekend so he can hope across the country to Los Angeles.”
““Ryan is miserable,” the insider dishes, adding that relocating to the New York City has been “the biggest mistake of his life.”Yikes.”
“There's even word the 42-year-old has become a recluse, despite being invited to some of the most exclusive parties in town.”
““He hasn’t embraced the city and hasn’t been going out to the restaurants or parties,” the insider continues.”
““He’s invited to almost every event every night and doesn’t go!”Living in New York City would be a dream for most, but Ryan has been known as someone who likes the sunny weather of Los Angeles.”
““He’s such an LA guy and is finding NYC tough.”


"Listen to the voice below!"
"Will he stick to it in New York or return to Los Angeles?"
"Yes, we're talking about Ryan."
"The former American Idol host needs to spend a lot of time in New York City to keep up with his co hosting role on the morning talk show... He's not satisfied with that. "
"According to radar, the life of big apple is not what Ryan said. It is said that he is eager for the weekend so that he can hope people from all over the country can go to Los Angeles."
"Poor Ryan," said a person familiar with the matter, adding that moving to New York City was "the biggest mistake of his life."
"There's even news that the 42 year old has become a hermit, even though he's been invited to some of the town's top parties."
"He didn't embrace the city or go to restaurants or parties," the person familiar with the matter continued
"He's invited to all kinds of activities almost every night, no! "Living in New York is a dream for most people, but Ryan has always been regarded as someone who likes the sunny weather in Los Angeles."
"He's from Los Angeles and finds new york hard to deal with."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Take a look at the house in the gallery below...”
“According to the source they want Meghan’s mum to move into the guest house so she can have the run of the place when they’re in the UK.”
“The couple want to spend time in Malibu because it means that Meghan can see her family and friends a lot.”
“Oh and not only are they splashing the cash by buying it, they also intend on spend an extra $1 million to decorate it to their own taste!”
“‘It’s everything Harry and Meghan could want – and it’s perfect for when they have kids,’ a source told the publication.”
“Are you able?”
“The house includes eight bedrooms, eight bathrooms, a swimming pool, a hot tub, a home cinema, koi ponds, waterfalls, oh, and it’s very own private beach.”
“So what comes with that price tag?”
“The house is currently on sale on Sotheby’s International Reality for a massive $16 million or around €13 million!”
“According to New Idea, the couple will spend at least four months in the US and have ‘fallen in love’ with the Italian-style 8-bedroom property which has an ocean view.”


"Look at the house in the gallery below..."
"According to sources, they want Megan's mother to move into the hotel so that she can run the place when she is in the UK."
"The couple want to spend some time in Malibu because it means Megan can see her family and friends often."
"Oh, they're not only paying for it, they're going to spend an extra million dollars to decorate it to suit their taste!"
"It's everything Harry and Megan want - it's the perfect choice for them when they have children," a source told the magazine
"Can you do it?"
"The house includes eight bedrooms, eight bathrooms, a swimming pool, a hot tub, a home theater, a koi pool, a waterfall and, oh, its own private beach."
"What's the matter with this price tag?"
"The house is currently on sale at Sotheby's international reality for about 16 million dollars or 13 million euros!"
"According to the new idea, the couple will spend at least four months in the United States and" fall in love "with the Italian style 8-bedroom property with a sea view."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It doesn't even faze me."”
“"If somebody tells me about it, then I'm like, 'oh whatever.'”
“I don't read it," the Standing Strong author explained.”
“"I guess I've been doing it so long now that I'm just used to it and it just goes in one ear and out the other.”
“As to whether or not the speculation bothers her, Teresa said she tries her best not to pay any attention to it.”
“"They don't even have one picture of me with anyone else except my girlfriends, my dad and my daughters."”
“"I was with my father and four daughters," Teresa continued when addressing her family vacation.”
“She is an amazing divorce attorney so if you are getting divorced, she's the person to call."”
“"I basically did that to promote my friend.”
“News.”


"I'm not worried at all."
"If someone told me about it, I would say," Oh, whatever. "
"I haven't read it," explained the stable writer
"I think I've been doing it for so long. I'm just used to it. It just goes in one ear and goes out the other."
"As to whether the speculation bothered her, Theresa said she tried to ignore it."
"Apart from my girlfriend, dad and daughter, they don't even have a picture of me with other people."
"I'm with my father and four daughters," Teresa continued of her family holiday
"She's a great divorce lawyer, so if you want a divorce, she's the one who calls."
"I'm basically doing this to promote my friends."
"News."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At least in the first year, Trump can tell voters that he is governing over a robust economy.”
“But politically these distinctions don’t matter.”
“By definition, the “base” of a president’s support is the part of the electorate that is so passionate about the victor on election day that it takes immense problems and a long time to shake their support.”
“Most presidents, including Richard Nixon, don’t lose their base.”
“In a look at Watergate, Iran-Contra, and the Monica Lewinsky scandals, Julia Azari, Perry Bacon Jr., and Harry Enten found that the party base remained loyal to the president until the very end.”
“Using the base is still with him standard is a little like saying that in a bad season the 30 year NFL season ticket holder who never misses a game who hosts a massive tailgate party every Sunday who owns every piece of team paraphernalia sold at the team store...”
“...and who spends most of the non working day checking his or her smartphone to see the latest injury report still loves his or her team...”
“There are much better ways through which to evaluate the president that offer us a better understanding of how Trump has performed thus far.”
“What are some ways in which Trump can claim that the critics have been wrong?”
“In terms of using executive power to pursue his policy agenda, the president has a pretty stellar record.”


"At least in the first year, trump can tell voters that he is running a strong economy."
"But politically, these differences don't matter."
"By definition, the 'Foundation' of presidential support is that voters are so enthusiastic about the winners on election day that it takes huge problems and a long time to shake their support."
"Most presidents, including Richard Nixon, will not lose their foundation."
"Looking at the Watergate scandal, the Iranian anti-government organization and the Monica Lewinsky scandal, Julia Azari, Perry bacon and Harry enten find that the foundation of this party has been loyal to the president until the end."
"Using base is still his standard is a bit like saying that in a bad season, 30-year NFL season ticket holders who never miss a game, who host a large-scale tail gate party every Sunday, who own every team item for sale in the team store..."
__︹ Those who spend most of their off-duty days checking their smartphones to see the latest injury reports still love their team.... "
"There's a better way to evaluate the president and give us a better understanding of Trump's performance to date."
"What is Trump's way to claim that his critics are wrong?"
"The president has a remarkable record of using executive power to pursue his policy agenda."



**Something goes wrong**
““I’m sure she was terrified her career could be over!” But just days later, Blake happily declared his babe “can hear now.””
“She lost her hearing and landed in a hospital.”
““It happened so suddenly.”
““She had a head cold, and the pressure in the cabin blew her eardrum out,” says a source.”
“The mom of three’s nightmare turned terrifyingly real on an April 25 flight from L.A. to Las Vegas, where she was to singat the Keep Memory Alive’s Power of Love gala.”
“...treated the singer...”
“Her beau and fellow coach Blake Shelton praised his platinum blond gal pal as tough Loud music or singing could cause further damage and lead to partial or permanent deafness says New York internist Dr Stuart Fischer who has not...”
“But The Sweet Escape singer insisted on belting out a tune on The Voice just a week later.”
“Docs ordered the Voice coach not to sing or travel by plane after her career-threatening health crisis.”
“Pop songbird Gwen Stefani could end up deaf and wreck her fabulous singing careerby performing too soon after rupturing her eardrum, say experts.”


"I'm sure she's afraid her career will end! But just a few days later, Blake happily announced that his baby "can hear it now."
"She lost her hearing and was admitted to the hospital."
"It happened so suddenly."
"She had a cold and the pressure in the cabin blew her eardrums out," a source said
"The nightmare of the mother of three turned into a terrifying reality on the April 25 flight from Los Angeles to Las Vegas, where she will sing" the power of love to remember. "
__ Treat singers... "
New York physician Dr Stuart Fischer said: "her boyfriend and coach colleague black Shelton praised his blonde girlfriend for saying loud music or singing could cause further damage and lead to partial or permanent deafness."
"But just a week later, the sweet prison break singer insisted on singing a song in her voice."
"After her career threatened her health, the doctor ordered the voice coach not to sing or travel by air."
Pop singer Gwen Stephanie may lose her hearing and ruin her wonderful singing career if she performs too early after the rupture of her eardrum, experts say



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“With most this feuding being rumored, it’s still difficult to say.”
“She even reportedly fought with Prince Charles when he needed support after Princess Diana’s death and was met with a cold shoulder.”
“Then there was the years-long feud she had with Princess Diana.”
“There was bickering with her sister, Princess Margaret when the queen refused her sister’s proposal to marry a divorced man.”
“Rumors of royal feuds with Queen Elizabeth go back for years.”
“The queen’s most notorious feuds?”
“Next: And what about HRH?”
“And it has never been a secret that Kate doesn’t get along with her cousin-in-law, Princess Beatrice.”
“Plenty of reports have surfaced claiming that Kate and Camilla were at odds because Camilla tried to keep her from marrying Prince William.”


"Check out the memo on Facebook!"
"As this dispute is mostly hearsay, it's hard to say now."
"It is reported that after Princess Diana died, Prince Charles needed support. When she was given a cold reception, she even had a dispute with Prince Charles."
"Later, she had years of grudges with Princess Diana."
The queen refused her sister's proposal to a divorced man, so she had a quarrel with her sister Princess Margaret
"Rumours of a feud between the royal family and Queen Elizabeth can be traced back many years."
"The Queen's most infamous feud?"
"Next: what about HRH?"
"It's never a secret that Kate doesn't get along well with her cousin Princess Beatrice."
"There are a lot of reports that Kate and Camilla are at odds because Camilla is trying to prevent her from marrying Prince William."



**Something goes wrong**
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The couple welcomed their third child in January, but according to an article in the […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Has Katherine Heigl ’s mom been causing problems in her marriage to Josh Kelley after moving in to help out with their newborn baby boy?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"The couple had their third child in January, but according to ]An article in a magazine IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police has the truth."
Did Katherine Hagel's mother bring trouble to her marriage to Josh Kelly after she moved in to help look after their new baby



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Closes TwitterNever watches her movies again — Nate Inman (@StreetsofCberry) September 8, 2017Hollywood's ..Jennifer Lawrence has stated this Hurricane season is because we voted for Trump .. WOW.I guess "IF" HRC had won /we wld b OK — Howdy Doodie (@StumpJumper6868) September 8, 2017”
““You know, you’re watching these hurricanes now, and it’s really hard, especially while promoting this movie, not to feel Mother Nature’s rage and wrath,” Lawrence said.”
“Lawrence, who is promoting her new drama Mother!, appeared on British network Channel 4, where she discussed topics ranging from the movie to the gender pay gap and Mr Trump.”
““It’s scary,” the actress responded to the interviewer’s assertion that there was “an end-of-days feeling” across the world and especially in the US.”
““You know, it’s this new language that’s forming.”
“I don’t even recognise it.”
“It s also scary to know that climate change is due to human activity and we continue to ignore it and the only voice that we really have is through voting And you have voted very recently as a country the reporter noted to which Lawrence replied that it was...”
“...really startling Mr Trump was elected...”
“She then suggested the recent hurricanes devastating Texas and nearing Florida may have been prompted by Mr Trump winning the presidency.”
“Lawrence later said the conversation topics of Mr Trump and US politics were “really polarising and upsetting.”“You know, I’ve heard things and seen things on TV in my own country that devastate me and make me sick, and it’s just really confusing,” she said.”


"Twitter doesn't watch her movies anymore - nate Inman (@ streetsofcberry) September 8, 2017 Hollywood... Jennifer Lawrence said this hurricane season is because we voted for trump.".. Wow. I guess "if" HRC wins / we'll be fine - Hello, doodie (@ stumpjumper6868) September 8, 2017 "
"You know, it's hard not to feel the anger and anger of mother nature when you're watching these hurricanes, especially when you're promoting this movie," Lawrence said
"Lawrence, she's promoting her new play mother! Appearing on British network channel 4, she discussed topics ranging from movies to gender wage gap and Mr. trump
"It's terrible," the actress said in response to the interviewer, "there's a sense of doomsday all over the world, especially in the United States."
"You know, it's this new language that's taking shape."
"I don't recognize it."
"Knowing that climate change is caused by human activities, we continue to ignore it. The only voice we really have is through voting. You recently voted as a country. The reporter noticed that Lawrence replied that this is..."
__︹ It's amazing that trump was elected... "
"She then hinted that the recent hurricane destruction of Texas and proximity to Florida may be the reason trump won the presidency."
"Lawrence later said that the topic of Trump's talk with American politics was" really polarized and disturbing. " "You know, what I heard and saw on TV in my own country shocked me, disgusted me, and really confused me," she said



**Something goes wrong**
“Be sure to sign up for our weekly celebrity pregnancy newsletter so you don't miss a single bump!”
“From maxi dresses to sensational frocks, Simpson looked positively radiant in her attire and set a great example for moms-to-be who are still eager to be fashionistas!”
“Simpson has made a big impact in the world of fashion as a designer and showed off a variety of great pregnancy clothes throughout her first pregnancy.”
“Now that's she's officially expecting, Simpson – who received $3 million to act as a celebrity spokeswoman – will no longer be following a Weight Watcher's diet.”
“The Texas-born star announced her first pregnancy in similar bold fashion back in October 2011, posting a photograph of herself in head-to-toe bandaging with the caption declaring, "It's true – I'm going to be a mummy!"”
“Simpson wrote on Dec. 25 on Twitter, along with an adorable photo of her seven-month-old daughter with the phrase, "Big Sis," written in sand in front of her.”
“"Merry Christmas from my family to yours!"”
“Simpson, who appeared on the hit reality show, "Newlyweds," with former husband Nick Lachey as well as "The Dukes of Hazzard," gave birth to the couple's first child, Maxwell Drew Johnson, in May 2012.”
“Last month it was pure speculation, but now congratulations are officially in order for singer Jessica Simpson and her ex-NFL fiance Eric Johnson, who are expecting their second baby!”


"Be sure to sign up for our weekly celebrity pregnancy newsletter so you don't miss a lump!"
"From long skirts to sexy dresses, Simpson's clothes look very glamorous and set a good example for expectant mothers who are still eager to become fashion talents!"
"Simpson has made a huge impact in the fashion world as a designer. She showed all kinds of great maternity clothes during her first pregnancy."
"Now that's what she's officially looking forward to, Simpson - she's won $3 million as a celebrity spokesperson - will no longer follow the diet of dieters."
The Texas born star announced her first pregnancy in an equally bold way in October 2011, posting a head to toe bandaged photo that said, "it's true - I'm going to be a mummy!"
Simpson tweeted on December 25 that she also attached a lovely picture of her 7-month-old daughter with her "big sister" written on the sand in front of her
"Merry Christmas to your family!"
"Simpson appeared on the popular reality show newlyweds with his ex husband Nick Lachy and Duke hazard. He gave birth to the couple's first child, Maxwell drew Johnson, in May 2012."
"Last month it was pure speculation, but now officially congratulations to singer Jessica Simpson and her ex NFL fiance Eric Johnson for their second child



**Something goes wrong**
“I think Brad is very, very handsome.””
“Not quite for life, you know.”When the host asked if she’d like to hook up with someone as genetically blessed as the Fight Club actor, Hudson enthusiastically responded: “Yes!”
““That was the craziest rumor of all time,” Hudson explained on Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen’s Tuesday, November 7, episode of rumors she was dating Pitt following his split from Angelina Jolie.”
““There’s nothing true to that.”
“As a matter of fact.”
“I hadn’t actually seen him in, like, four years.”However, the actress, who is currently dating Danny Fujikawa, wasn’t exactly bothered by the false reports.”
““It was kind of an awesome rumor,” she said.”
““I kind of liked it.”
“I was like, ‘OK, fine.”
“We’re having twins!’”Amid the rumors circulating in January, Hudson’s brother Oliver took to Instagram to joke about the faux romance.”


"I think Brad is very, very handsome."
When the host asked her if she would like to associate with someone as talented as a fight club actor, Hudson enthusiastically replied, "yes!"
"It's the craziest rumor of all time," Hudson explained on "watch" that Andy Cohen was dating Pete after breaking up with Angelina Jolie on Tuesday, November 7
"Nothing is true."
"In fact."
"I haven't seen him in four years." However, the actress, who is dating Fujikawa, is not bothered by these false reports
"It's a terrible rumor," she said
"I kind of like it."
"I said," OK, good. "
"We're going to have twins! "In January there were rumors that Hudson's brother Oliver was joking about the fake romance on instagram."



**Something goes wrong**
“Judging by her reaction, Lawrence seems perfectly fine being single with her housewives.”
“...the Kardashians star Scott Disick...”
“In an appearance on Bravo’s Watch What Happens Live, Lawrence not only got to hang out with two of her favorite housewives, but she finally cleared up one of the few unverified, false rumors about her that she was actually O.K.”
“...with.”
“So, is Jennifer Lawrence secretly dating Brad Pitt?”
““No, I’ve met him once in like 2013, so it was very random,” she said.”
““But, I also wasn’t like, in a huge hurry to debunk it.”Since his separation from Angelina Jolie in September 2016, Brad Pitt has been rumored to be dating everyone from the average Los Angeles civilian to Lawrence, but he’s yet to confirm anything about his personal life.”
“Lawrence was, however, in an actual relationship with Mother!”
“...director Darren Aronofsky.”
“In her Vanity Fair cover story she confirmed that while they may no longer be dating, she still considers him a friend and creative partner.”


"From her reaction, Lawrence and her housewife seem to be single very well."
__ Kardashian star Scott Disick... "
"In what happened at Bravo's observation scene, Lawrence was not only with two of her favorite housewives, but she finally cleared one of the few unsubstantiated false rumors that she was actually OK."
__ "And"
"So, is Jennifer Lawrence on a secret date with Brad Pitt?"
"No, I met him once in 2013, so it was casual," she said
"But I don't like it. I'm in a hurry to expose it." Since Brad Pitt broke up with Angelina Jolie in September 2016, there have been rumors that he dated everyone, from ordinary Los Angeles civilians to Lawrence, but he has yet to confirm anything about his private life
"However, Lawrence's relationship with his mother is real!"
__ Directed by Darren Aronofsky. "
"In the vanity fair cover story, she confirms that although they may no longer date, she still considers him a friend and creative partner."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let’s see how they like it.”
“Any idiot holidaymaker who chooses to attend such a cruel, outdated spectacle deserves to be gored, then set alight.”
“I opened each missive alone, left them on the kitchen table, and that was that.”
“That’s how I got my O-level and then my A-level results.”
“You know, a white, oblong thing with your name on the front and popped through your letterbox.”
“Whatever happened to that silent ceremony of opening an envelope delivered in the post?”
“They were hugged hard by harried parents who bribed them to do well with a promise of a weekend at the Leeds Festival, and who are now worried about highs of a different nature.”
“Then we had the horror last week that is 16-year-olds receiving their GCSE results: tiny Justin Biebers and Ariana Grandes, all in their bright sportswear and high ponytails, acting as though they were in a Netflix mini-series.”
“First, we had the A-level lot, dissolving into public puddles about their triumphs or despair (a pointless exercise, given universities are now hoovering up anyone with an E in woodwork).”
“...then broadcast to the nation on every news bulletin with all the gravitas and hoo hah of a General Election...”


"Let's see if they like it or not."
"Any idiot vacationer who chooses to participate in such a cruel and outdated event should be stabbed to death and then ignited."
"I open every letter by myself, put them on the kitchen table, and that's it."
"That's how I got grades O and a."
"You know, a white rectangle with your name in front of it pops out of your mailbox."
"What happened to the silent ceremony of opening the mail envelope?"
"They're hugged by fidgety parents, they bribe them to have a good weekend at Leeds, and now they're worried about another kind of climax."
"Last week, the 16-year-old received GCSE results, which made us feel terrible: Justin biebers Jr. and Arianna Grandes Jr., both wearing bright sportswear and high ponytail, behave as if they were in the Netflix mini series."
"First of all, we got an A-level score and integrated their victory or despair into the public quagmire (this is a meaningless exercise, because the university is now enrolling any e students majoring in wood products."
__︹ And then broadcast the solemnity and Huha of the general election to the whole country in every news bulletin. "



**Something goes wrong**
“...related lyrics...”
“Mandy has met Abel and thinks he is respectful in person but she doesn t think he s a good influence on Selena another source revealed before adding that Selena s mom didn t approve of his dirty and drug...”
“While Selena and The Weeknd have been supporting each other, her mom is reportedly not a fan of the "Starboy" hitmaker dating her daughter, who just completed a stint in rehab late last year.”
“The 2017 Billboard Music Awards will take place at the T-Mobile Arena in Las Vegas on May 21.”
“Selena is nominated for Top Social Artist alongside Justin, who will also compete against The Weeknd in the Top Male Artist category.”
“She's afraid of being herself around Abel if Justin is nearby because she doesn't want to hurt her ex."”
“"Selena's happier than ever," a source tells Life & Style, "But she doesn't want to rub it in Justin's face.”
“The "Hands to Myself" hitmaker doesn't want to meet Justin while she's with her new beau The Weeknd.”
“Apr 26, 2017AceShowbiz - Selena Gomez is reportedly worrying about unavoidable run-in with her ex-boyfriend Justin Bieber at the upcoming 2017 Billboard Music Awards.”
“CelebrityThe 'Hands to Myself' hitmaker reportedly doesn't want to run into her ex-boyfriend while she's with her new beau The Weeknd.”


__ Related lyrics... "
"Mandy met Abel and thought he was a respected person, but she didn't think he was a good influence on Selena. Another source revealed before adding that Selena's mother didn't approve of his dirty and drugs..."
"Although Serena and weeknd have been supporting each other, it is reported that her mother does not like the star boy killer who is dating her daughter, who just spent some time in a drug treatment center at the end of last year."
"The 2017 Billboard Music Awards will be held on May 21 at the T-Mobile arena in Las Vegas."
"Serena and Justin have been nominated as top social artists, and Justin will compete with this week's top male artist category."
"If Justin is around, she's afraid of being around Abe because she doesn't want to hurt her predecessor."
"Selena is happier than ever," a source told life & style, "but she doesn't want to touch it in Justin's face."
"My hand" killer doesn't want to see Justin when she's with her new boyfriend
"April 26, 2017 aceshowbiz - Selena Gomez is reported to be worried about an inevitable conflict with her ex boyfriend Justin Bieber at the upcoming Billboard Music Awards in 2017."
"Fortunately, it's said that this' kiss my hand 'killer doesn't want to meet her ex on weekends with her new boyfriend."



**Something goes wrong**
“'”Luckily, everything turned out just fine in the end.”
“Now as we’re just about to get to the Maldives she’s going to find out I have a ring in this box and it’s going to ruin the surprise and I’ll have to get on my knees in the airport.”
““He was feeling really bummed and stressed out.”
““I was on tour with him and he’d gotten sick,” Teigen later revealed to Cosmo.”
“We would talk on the phone, and I started to fall in love with how engaging and witty and funny she is.”However, Legend apparently had a brief lapse of judgement and tried to break up with Teigen at some point in this time period.”
““[At the beginning of our relationship] we were texting a lot, and I started to see her sense of humor.”
““I fell in love with her over the phone because she is good with those 140 characters,” Legend joked to ET in 2016.”
“I was just happy to be with him.”The Mini Break-UpAfter spending some time texting and talking on the phone, Teigen joined Legend on tour early in their relationship.”
“Never once did I ask, ‘What are we?’ Marriage was never my goal, because I’ve never been very traditional.”
““The worst thing you can do is try to lock someone like that down early on, then have them think, ‘There’s so much more out there.’ I played it cool for a long time.”


"Fortunately, in the end, everything was fine."
"Now we are going to Maldives, and she will find a ring in my box, which will ruin the surprise. I can only kneel in the airport."
"He was really depressed and under a lot of pressure."
"I toured with him and he was sick," tigan later revealed to Kosmo
"We'll talk on the phone and I'm beginning to fall in love with how charming, witty and funny she is." However, the legend clearly has a short-term misjudgment and tries to break up with tygan at some time in this period
We texted a lot and I started to see her sense of humor
"I fell in love with her on the phone because she was good at these 140 words," legend joked to ET in 2016
"I'm happy to be with him." After the breakup took a while texting and calling, tegan joined in the early romance of their relationship
"I never asked," what are we? "? "Marriage has never been my goal, because I've never been very traditional."
"The worst thing you can do is lock people up early and make them think, 'there's so much out there.' I've been calm for a long time



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, are you happy that Brad’s spending the holidays with his kids?”
“He gets to spend Christmas with his kids, and he’s making sure it’s their best one yet.”
“He’s ready to spoil them rotten!”
“It’s a Christmas miracle!”
“There were doubts that Brad Pitt, 52, would even be able to spend the holidays with his beloved children considering his tough custody proceedings with ex Angelina Jolie, 41, but it’s finally happening!”
“Brad’s taking his second chance to give his kids the world for Christmas.”
““He doesn’t see anything wrong with spoiling the kids a little bit this Christmas,” a source told OK!”
“...magazine.”
“That includes getting six trees (one for each kid) and a sleigh full of presents.”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, are you happy Brad is on holiday with his children?"
"He can spend Christmas with his children and he wants to make sure it's their best Christmas so far."
"He's going to spoil them!"
"It's the miracle of Christmas!"
"Considering Brad Pitt's difficult custody lawsuit with former Angelina Jolie, 41, people doubt whether Brad Pitt, 52, is able to spend his holidays with his beloved children, but it happened at last!"
"Brad is using his second chance to give his children a world of Christmas."
A source told OK: "he thinks there's nothing wrong with spoiling children a little bit this Christmas."! "
__ Magazine. "
"Including six trees (one for each child) and a sled full of gifts."



**Something goes wrong**
“More on Gossip Cop:"The Bachelor" recap: Arie Luyendyk says au revoir to Krystal in ParisRobert Pattinson travels with a guitar, shotgun and pony in "Damsel" clipAngelina Jolie and Brad Pitt did NOT split over kids' education despite report...”
“And maybe they'll finally guess correctly, but it will have nothing to do with solid reporting or sources.”
“The claim comes from the HollywoodLife, a site that has previously published fake news stories alleging they're already engaged, were getting engaged on Christmas, had a "secret wedding," were eloping, and may "never get married" at all.”
“The blog has also falsely reported a couple of times that Shelton and Stefani have split up.”
“@gwenstefani /InstagramBasically, the outlet throws everything against the wall, hoping something will stick.”
“And wedged inside its Jenga-like tower of lies, the site contends it's learned its supposed information from sources "close" to the couple.”
“But based on how frequently off-base the blog is, it's clear many of these articles are just fabrications.”
“On the heels of Shelton, Stefani and her kids looking like a happy family at the Super Bowl, the aptly nicknamed HollywoodLies maintains Shelton is taking their "relationship to the next step."”
“The often discredited site asserts a "source close" to Shelton leaked that his "team" has gone to "shop for jewelry" for him.”
“A so-called "insider" is quoted as saying, "One of Blake's assistants was spotted visiting and shopping with a private jeweler in Beverly Hills this week."”


More about gossip police: "Bachelor" review: Ali luyandick says goodbye Cristo travels in Paris Robert Pattinson with guitar, shotgun and pony in "teenage girl" clip Angelina Julie and Brad Pitt did not split despite the report
"Maybe they will guess right in the end, but it has nothing to do with reliable reports or sources."
"This statement comes from the website of Hollywood life, which has previously released false news, claiming that they have been engaged, engaged at Christmas, had a 'Secret Wedding', eloped, and may never get married at all."
"Blogs have also lied several times about Sheldon and Stephanie breaking up."
"@ gwenstefani / instagram basically, stores throw everything on the wall in the hope that something will stick."
The website claims it got the information from sources "close to" the couple
"But according to the frequency of the blog's dropouts, it's clear that many of these articles are just fabrications."
After Sheldon, Stephanie and her children looked like a happy family at the super bowl, the aptly nicknamed Hollywood stars insisted that Sheldon was taking their "relationship to the next step."
The often discredited website claims that a source close to Sheldon disclosed that Sheldon's "team" had "bought jewelry" for him
The report quoted a so-called "insider" as saying, "one of Blake's assistants was found this week visiting and shopping with a private jeweler at Beverly Hills."



**Something goes wrong**
“Whenever split rumors do make the rounds, they just leave it to their reps to deny.”
“2017 that The Crown actress Vanessa Kirby was marrying yes marrying her Mission Impossible Fallout co star...”
“The Mission Impossible star has kept sort of a low profile with his relationships after splitting from his ex-wife, Katie Holmes, in 2012.”
“Therefore, because he isn’t jumping on couches and declaring his love for anyone, some tabloids have decided to make up stories about him being romantically involved with other Hollywood A-listers.”
“Now, it’s time to separate fact from fiction and bust those rumors about who Cruise has dated.”
“Angelina JolieIn March 2017, the National Enquirer published a bogus report that the actor was dating Angelina Jolie.”
“The publication claimed that the two stars met to talk about the film they were working on together, however, we know that they never did a movie together so that part isn’t true.”
“The outlet went on to claim that Jolie was enjoying making her ex, Brad Pitt, jealous about the romance.”
“But Gossip Cop reported that there’s no truth to that, which makes sense since Jolie told People that dating is the furthest thing from her mind and something she doesn’t plan on doing for a long time.”
“Jane FondaAfter appearing together at Comic-Con in Las Vegas in spring 2018 to promote their movies, the site New Idea falsely reported that Cruise was seeing Jane Fonda.”


"Whenever there is a rumor of division, they leave it to their representatives to deny it."
"Crown actress Vanessa Kirby is getting married in 2017. Yes, she is married to her" impossible dust "partner..."
"The impossible star has been keeping a low profile in his relationship since breaking up with his ex-wife Katie Holmes in 2012."
"So, because he didn't jump on the sofa and didn't show his love to anyone, some tabloids decided to make up stories about his romantic relationship with other Hollywood stars."
"Now, it's time to separate fact from fiction and break the rumors about who cruise is dating."
"Angelina Jolie in March 2017, the national inquirer published a false report that the actor was dating Angelina Jolie."
"The magazine claimed that the two stars met to talk about the film they were working on. However, we know that they have never made a film together, so that part is not true."
"The media went on to claim that Julie likes to make her ex girlfriend Brad Pitt jealous of the relationship."
"But gossip police reports that it doesn't make sense because Julie tells people that dating is the furthest thing from her and she doesn't plan to do it for a long time."
"After Jane Fonda appeared together in Las Vegas in the spring of 2018 to promote their film, new idea lied that cruise had seen Jane Fonda."



**Something goes wrong**
“Season 14 of The Voice is currently in the home stretch, with the semifinal round scheduled to air Monday (May 14).”
“The longtime friends seemed more than excited to compete not only against each other in the upcoming season, but also against fellow coaches Adam Levine and Blake Shelton, who have reprised their roles each season since the show began.”
“Hudson first lead "Team JHud" in season 13, but left the following season along with coach Miley Cyrus, making way for the return of Alicia Keys and Clarkson's debut.”
“The two powerhouse vocalists rose to fame thanks to their runs on early Idol seasons, and now they're ready to share their singing competition expertise for a second time around on The Voice this fall.”
“Season 15 of The Voice will feature twice the American Idol power, thanks to the just-announced returns of coaches Kelly Clarkson and Jennifer Hudson.”


"Voice" Season 14 is currently at home and the semi-final is scheduled to air on Monday (May 14)
"The old friends seem very excited to compete not only with each other in the coming season, but also with Adam Levin and Blake Shelton, who have been playing their roles again every season since the start of the show
Hudson led Jude for the first time in season 13, but left with coach Miley Cyrus next season to make way for Alicia case's return and Clarkson's debut
"The two powerful singers have made their mark in the early seasons of idol, and now they are ready to share their singing competition expertise for the second time in the autumn's" voice of man. "
"With the just announced return of coaches Kelly Clarkson and Jennifer Hudson," voice "season 15 will feature twice the power of American Idol."



**Something goes wrong**
“If you liked the article, kindly share it with your friends, groups and family members RelatedCommentscomments...”
“Even at the age of 94, she is indeed in great health.”
“The reports say Queen Elizabeth has made a royal announcement and officially marked Prince William and his wife, Kate, as the next King and Queen Consort of England.”
“If this news is true, it will indeed come as a big shock.”
“It will be, by all means, a big Royal Family shake-up.”
“Furthermore, this would mean that Queen Elizabeth’s eldest son, Prince Charles, would have been officially taken over in the British monarchy’s line of succession.”
“It is a very well known fact that Prince William and Duchess Kate are the future.”
“The Queen has put in 68 years of hard work for making sure that the House of Windsor survives.”
“Now, she sees Prince William and Kate as having that energy and star quality to do the job.”
“Our Queen will always do what is best for the long-term health of the monarchy”.”


"If you like this article, please share comments with your friends, groups and family members..."
"Even at 94, she's really healthy."
"Queen Elizabeth has issued a royal statement and officially declared Prince William and his wife Kate the next king and queen of Britain," the report said
"If the news is true, it will really have a big impact."
"In any case, it will be a royal reshuffle."
In addition, it will mean that Prince Charles, the eldest son of Queen Elizabeth, will be formally taken over the succession of the British monarchy
"As we all know, Prince William and Duchess Kate are the future."
"The queen has worked hard for 68 years to ensure the survival of the Windsor family."
"Now, she thinks Prince William and Kate have enough energy and star quality to do the job."
"Our queen will always do the best for the long-term health of the monarchy."



**Something goes wrong**
“That’s what parents do!” Be sure to check out all the recent pics of Caitlyn and Sophia in our gallery above!”
“Yes, it’s on the other side of the world… But I would’ve gone to the moon and back to share in the joy of my darling son & his beautiful bride getting married!”
“Along with posting a Nihi Sumba Resort, Linda wrote in the caption, “This is the beautiful location where @brodyjenner & @kaitlynn got married!”
“Recently, Caitlyn was shaded by her ex Linda Thompson for missing Brody Jenner‘s wedding.”
“...a complete fabrication...”
“Fame has destroyed Cait s relationship with her grown children and she s not letting that happen again if she and Sophia adopt We reached out to Caitlyn s rep who has denied Radar Online s report and called it...”
““Cait’s made it clear to Sophia she doesn’t want the baby to have anything to do with television or reality TV.”
“...her prom dress the source went on to say...”
“Cait s considering it Sophia has always wanted to be a mother and raise a little girl and have the opportunity to do fun girly things like get her hair and nails done with her and take her shopping for...”
““Sophia loves children and has been giving Cait little hints that she’s interested in a baby.”


"That's what parents do! "Be sure to see all the latest photos of Caitlin and Sophia in our gallery above!"
"Yes, it's on the other side of the world But I will go to the moon and come back to share the joy of my dear son's marriage to his beautiful bride
While posting the nihi Sumba resort, Linda wrote in the title: "this is@ brodyjenner&@kaitlynn A beautiful place to get married
"Recently, Caitlin was hoodwinked by her ex girlfriend Linda Thompson for missing Brody Jenner's wedding."
__ Totally fabricated... "
"Fame ruined the relationship between Caitlin and her adult children. If she and Sophia adopted Caitlin, she would not let this happen again. We contacted Caitlin's representative, who denied the report of radar online and called it...."
"Kate has made it clear to Sophia that she doesn't want her children to have anything to do with TV or reality shows."
__ Her prom dress source went on to say
"Katie thinks Sophia has always wanted to be a mother, raise a little girl, and have the opportunity to do some interesting girl things, such as fixing her hair and nails, taking her shopping..."
"Sophia likes children and has been suggesting that Kate is interested in them."



**Something goes wrong**
“Considering Mariah, Nick and the twins recently made an adorable appearance at the 2018 Kids’ Choice Awards, it makes total sense that Mariah’s ex would be on hand to see her say “I Do” again.”
“Mariah would love to get married in May at the Grand Wailea Resort in Maui the insider told OK where she and Bryan first went public with their romance Mariah and Bryan struck up a relationship in late 2016 with Mariah low key confirming the romance in February 2017 by...”
“The iconic singer reportedly popped the question to her bae, Bryan Tanaka, and the two are busy planning their big day!”
“Did Mariah Carey, 47, have a vision of love when looking at boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, 34, one that left her feeling all sorts of emotions?”
“After deciding that she just can’t let go of this hunk, Mariah reportedly decided to make it happen – an engagement, that is!”
““Word is Mariah took matters into her own hands,” a source tells OK!”
“...magazine, “It was an unusual proposal but it did the trick.”
“She wrote a song about how she wanted Bryan to be her husband and she performed it for him while wearing a sexy, glitzy gown.”
“Then she explained that she’s ready for them to make their relationship official.”Bryan gave a “hearty yes,” as the insider says, “He couldn’t believe his luck!” It appears Bryan also thinks he and Mariah belong together, and he always wants to be her baby.”
“These two aren’t waiting around for one sweet day to tie the knot.”


"Considering that Maria, Nick and the twins recently made a lovely appearance at the 2018 children's Choice Awards, Maria's ex boyfriend will see her at the scene and say" I do. "
"Maria is eager to get married in May at the grand Willa resort in Maui. The person familiar with the matter told OK that she and Bryan had disclosed their love affair for the first time. Maria and Bryan established a relationship with Maria at the end of 2016 and confirmed the relationship in a low-key way in February 2017 by..."
According to reports, the idol singer asked her BAE, Bryan Tanaka, about their big day
"When Mariah Carey, 47, looks at her 34 year old boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, does she have a vision of love that makes her feel all kinds of emotions?"
According to reports, after deciding not to let go of the big man, Maria decided to make it come true - engagement, that's it! "
"It's said that Maria is in her own hands," a source told OK
__ Magazine, "it was an unusual proposal, but it worked
"She wrote a song that said she wanted Brian to be her husband, and she performed it for him in a sexy, gorgeous dress."
"Then she explained that she was ready to formalize their relationship." Brian said "sincerely agree," as people familiar with the matter said, "he can't believe his luck! "Brian seems to think that he and Maria belong together. He always wants to be her child."
"These two are not waiting for a sweet day to get married."



**Something goes wrong**
“Can’t wait to watch her grow.”Meanwhile, Khloé is seven months pregnant with her first child, a boy, with her boyfriend, Tristan Thompson.”
““To be honest, I don’t talk to them anymore.”
“In a new interview, the pregnant reality star said that having a baby won’t mend her estranged relationship with Caitlyn Jenner.”
““I don’t think that affects anything with Caitlyn,” Kardashian, 33, told Ross King on the U.K. morning show Lorraine on Thursday, February 8.”
““[Things are] just as they are.”Jenner’s relationship with the Kardashian family has been rocky since the Olympian, 68, revealed her identity as a transgender woman in April 2015.”
“Two years later, the estrangement worsened after the release of Jenner’s memoir, The Secrets of My Life, in which she claimed that ex-wife Kris Jenner — who is Kardashian’s mother — was not supportive of her transition.”
“(Kris and Caitlyn, formerly Bruce, were married from 1991 to 2015 and share daughters Kendall, 22, and Kylie, 20.)”
“Caitlyn opened up about the family feud in November.”
““It’s been a little bit tough over the last couple of years on the Kardashian side,” she admitted while speaking to students at Cambridge Union in England at the time.”
“Kim, I haven’t talked to in a year.”


"Can't wait to see her grow up." Meanwhile, heloe is pregnant with her first child, a boy, and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson, who is seven months pregnant
"To be honest, I'll never talk to them again."
"In a new interview, the pregnant reality TV star said having a baby didn't repair her estranged relationship with Caitlin Jenner."
"I don't think it's going to affect Caitlin," Kardashian, 33, told Ross king on the UK morning show on Thursday, February 8.
"[the thing is] Jenna's relationship with the Kardashian family has been unstable since the 68 year old Olympia revealed her identity as a transgender woman in April 2015."
"Two years later, after the publication of Jenner's memoir, the secret of my life, the estrangement further worsened, in which she claimed that her ex-wife Chris Jenner, Kardashian's mother, did not support her transformation."
(Chris and Caitlin, formerly Bruce, married from 1991 to 2015 and have daughter Kendall, 22, and Kelly, 20.)
"Caitlin opened up the family feud in November."
"It's been a bit difficult for Kardashian over the past few years," she admitted, speaking to students at the Cambridge Union
"Kim, I haven't spoken for a year."



**Something goes wrong**
“...daughter Bryn...”
“Of course anyone following Frankel on Snapchat would know the 46 year old Skinnygirl mogul was just joking around as her she s been showing off her bob on the social media site while skiing with her 6 year old...”
“...their friends year round...”
“No, most stars save their jokes until April Fool’s Day.”
“And this year, Hollywood upped their game — with shocking haircuts, major announcements and one scary on-set prank.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Star Trek star George Takei kicked things off, announcing in the early minutes of Saturday that he was planning a run for Congress in 2018 — targeting California’s 22nd District so he can take on Republican Devin Nunes.”
“Takei told The Daily Buzz that he wanted to take a bigger stand in politics.”
““With what is going on now in the country, I couldn’t stand by any longer merely as a citizen,” Takei said.”
““I knew I had to take a bigger stand.”


__ My daughter, Brian... "
"Of course, anyone who follows Frankel on snapchat will know that the 46 year old lean meat tycoon is only joking because she has been showing off her Bob on social networking sites while skiing with her 6-year-old..."
__ They are friends all year round. "
"No, most stars keep their jokes until April Fool's day."
"This year, Hollywood has stepped up their game - shockingly haircut, big announcement, and a terrible live prank."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Star Trek star George Takei announced earlier on Saturday that he plans to run for Congress in 2018 - targeting California's 22nd District, so he can face Republican Devin Nunes
"Takei told the daily mail that he wanted to take a bigger political stance."
"I can't just stand by and watch what's happening in China now as a citizen," Takei said
"I know I have to take a bigger position."



**Something goes wrong**
“It was even reported by the Huffington Post that despite the possibility that the U.S would go into war "Jennifer Aniston Pregnant" was still searched more than "are we at war" on Google.”
“Since 1999 there have been more than 55 published articles about her being pregnant both in and outside the U.S.”
“...her on Friends and she began dating Brad Pitt...”
“MORE JENNIFER ANISTON S AND JUSTIN THEROUX S DOG CUSTODY BATTLE It seems like no one has been reported pregnant more times than Jen The earliest reports date back to 1999 back when the world first fell in love with...”
“The world is obsessed with her having a baby!”
“And compared to other celebs, nobody has been more publicly pressured than Jennifer Aniston.”
“While "normal" people are pressured by friends and family to get pregnant, celebrities are pressured by the whole world.”
“Not all women want to have children, and that's perfectly OK.”


The Huffington Post even reported that despite the possibility of war in the United States, the number of Google searches for "Jennifer Aniston pregnant" is still more than "are we at war?"
"Since 1999, more than 55 articles about her pregnancy have been published in the United States and abroad."
__ She was with her friends and started dating Brad Pitt... "
"More dog custody fights between Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus. It seems that no one is more pregnant than Jennifer Aniston. The earliest reports can be traced back to 1999, when the world first fell in love with..."
"The whole world is crazy about her having children!"
"Compared with other celebrities, no one is under more public pressure than Jennifer Aniston."
"Although 'normal people' are under pressure from friends and family, celebrities are under pressure from all over the world."
"Not all women want to have children, it doesn't matter at all."



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest Teen Mom news subscribe to our podcast ‘Teen Mom Time’ below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
““And nothing hides a bump better than a muumuu dress.”Affleck shares children Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6, with estranged wife Garner.”
““People suspect the sense of urgency is because Lindsay’s pregnant,” the source confessed.”
“The Justice League star also has been sucking up to Shookus’ five-year-old daughter for good measure.”
““He’s already asked Jen [Garner] to watch the kids while he’s away.”Affleck recently took the big step of meeting his girlfriend’s parents in Santa Monica.”
““Ben’s talking luau, leis and Hawaiian shirts,” the source said about any upcoming nuptial plans.”
“A return visit for a secret wedding could be next.”


"For the latest news about teenage moms, please subscribe to the podcast" the age of teenage moms "!"
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Nothing hides a lump more than a muumuu dress." Affleck and his separated wife, Ghana, raise their children: Violet, 12, Serafina, 9, and Samuel, 6
"People suspect this sense of urgency is because Lindsay is pregnant," the source admitted
"The star of the Justice League has also been courting shokus's 5-year-old daughter."
"He's already asked Jan (Ghana) to look after the children while he's away." Alfred recently took a big step by meeting his girlfriend's parents in Santa Monica
"Ben is talking about Roo, leice and Hawaiian shirts," the source said of any upcoming wedding plans
"Next may be a return visit to the secret wedding."



Number  45
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“What must it be like to have your marriage and divorce, your relationship with your parents and kids, your sagging backside and ballooning thighs, dissected by millions of strangers who think they know you?”
“If that can be forgotten about someone whose claim to fame is just that he scribbles in newspapers, how much more easily is it forgotten about those who live in the klieg lights of real fame?”
“To the degree I think about her at all, it’s usually as a laugh line.”
“Barbra Streisand does not suffer in the comparison.”
“Suffice it to say, Gladys Knight’s legacy is safe from her encroachment.”
“She’s a presence at the edge of consciousness, more famous for being pretty and showing skin and sowing scandal than for any intrinsic quality of her singing.”
“I don’t listen to her music or watch her videos.”
“Britney Spears doesn’t get a lot of air time in my internal monologue.”
“Blaming you would be hypocritical.”
“As I said, I can’t blame you if you laugh.”


"Your marriage and divorce, your relationship with parents and children, your drooping back and bulging thighs, dissected by millions of strangers who thought they knew you, what would that look like?"
"If people can forget the people who claim to be famous for just scribbling in the newspapers, how easily can those who live in the light of real fame be forgotten?"
"In terms of how much I miss her, it's usually a joke."
"By contrast, Barbara Streisand is not in pain."
"It can be said that Gladys Knight's legacy will not be infringed upon by her."
"She's a person on the edge of consciousness, better known for her beauty, skin exposure and scandals than for any inherent quality of her singing."
"I don't listen to her music or watch her videos."
"Britney Spears doesn't have much time in my inner monologue."
"It's hypocritical to blame you."
"Like I said, I can't blame you for laughing."



**Something goes wrong**
“But Affleck’s colorful tattoo was just a “work in progress” that happened shortly after his divorce from Garner.”
“...https://t.co/BunOmknDh6 — Lindsay (@PinotGrigioPls) December 10, 2015Fans got a first glimpses of Ben Affleck’s tattoo back in July, but some assumed it was a “tramp stamp” for his role in Live By Night.”
“Fat and skin has been trimmed from both above and below the eyes, and it’s so starkly different that he might as well be Kenny Rogers.”So, is Ben Affleck’s new look for the sake of his role?”
““Again, it’s a case of too much work where only a little was needed.”
“He’s had so much put in that his eyebrows look jacked up and he’s just downed 50 cups of coffee.”
““A small amount of Botox fills your wrinkles and makes you look relaxed and well rested.”
“He’s had the entire upper third of his face worked on, and the result is he looks more like Jack Nicholson’s Joker than Batman.”Dr. Back then added that Affleck may have gotten Botox on his eyes.”
“In fact, he doesn’t look like himself at all!”
““He looks different — but he doesn’t look better.”
“But different doesn’t necessarily mean it’s a good thing.”


"But Affleck's colorful tattoos are just a 'work in progress' that happened shortly after his divorce from Ghana."
_... https://t.co/BunOmknDh6- Lindsay (@ Pinot grigiopls) December 10, 2015 fans saw Ben Affleck's tattoo for the first time in July, but some thought it was his "Tramp stamp" in nightlife
"The fat and skin above and below his eyes have been cut off. It's a big difference. He's not as good as Kenny Rogers." So, is Ben Affleck's new look for his character? "
"Again, it's a situation where there's too much work, just a little bit."
"He ate so much that his eyebrows stood up and he had just had 50 cups of coffee."
"A small amount of Botox can fill your wrinkles, make you look relaxed and have a good rest."
"He had surgery on the top third of his whole face, and he looked more like Jack Nicholson's clown than Batman." The doctor at the time added that Affleck's eyes might have been injected with Botox. "
"In fact, he doesn't look like himself at all!"
"He looks different, but he doesn't look good."
"But the difference doesn't necessarily mean it's a good thing."



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s all that they want.’For the full story see this weeks issue of New Idea - out now!”
“Reverend Swadley revealed to our source that it was clear Jen loved seeing Brad’s family again, spending long days talking and laughing for the first time since their 2005 divorce.”
“It’s believed the loved-up stars had flown to Missouri because Jen was desperate to reconnect with Brad’s mum, Jane, who she’d developed a very close bond with throughout the time of their first marriage.”
“During the seven-day visit, it’s been revealed that Jane orchestrated a meeting with the family priest Reverend Swadley – hoping it would be the gentle push Brad and Jen would need to make their reignited relationship official once again.”
“‘Reverend Swadley met Jen recently at a family function that Brad’s mum, Jane, threw at their family home in Missouri,’ a close friend of the pastor’s told New Idea exclusively.”
“Jen accompanied Brad home on the trip and attended church services with the family as well as joining Brad at meetings at the now retired reverend s home who Brad reconnected with after he decided to find himself and renew...”
“...his faith following his split from Ange...”
“He remarked at how at ease Jen was with his family who clearly adore her and how everyone said how much she s been missed and how happy they all were to have her back in Brad s and their...”
“...lives The source goes on to reveal that Reverend Swadley spoke at length with Brad and Jen about getting married as soon as possible in Missouri in a small ceremony with just local friends and family present...”
“Reverend Swadley revealed how in love Brad and Jen were and how they planned to officially wed as soon as their divorces were finalised with him agreeing to conduct the ceremony and welcome them both back into the church the...”


"That's exactly what they want." For a complete story, see the new ideas magazine this week
Pastor swadley revealed to our sources that Jane obviously likes to see Brad's family again, and for the first time since their divorce in 2005, she spent a lot of time talking and laughing
"It is believed that the reason why these popular stars flew to Missouri was that Jan was eager to reestablish contact with Brad's mother Jane, who had a very close relationship with Brad's mother throughout their first marriage."
"During the seven day visit, it was revealed that Jane arranged a meeting with the family pastor, Reverend swadley - hoping that this was the gentle push Brad and Jane needed to formalize their re established relationship."
"Pastor swadley recently met Jen at a family party held by Brad's mother Jane at her Missouri home," one of the pastor's friends said in an exclusive interview with new ideas
"Jane accompanies Brad home, attends church services with her family, and has a meeting with Brad at the now retired pastor's home. Brad decides to find himself and renew his contract, and then contacts him again..."
__ His faith after breaking up with Angie... "
"He said how comfortable Jen was with his family, they obviously adored her, everyone said how much she missed her, and they were happy that she could come back to Brad and their..."
__︹ Life sources continue to reveal that Reverend swadley and Brad and Jane held a small wedding in Missouri, with only local friends and family present... "
"Pastor swadley revealed how Brad and Jan fell in love. They planned to get married as soon as the divorce was over. He agreed to host the wedding and welcome them back to church..."



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“It will be the first time in a long time that they ve all been in the same room together so it s likely to be bittersweet The report goes on to say that Brad has always liked to spoil his children so Angelina softened to the idea of him...”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will set their differences aside, as a new report claims the exes have agreed to spend Christmas TOGETHER with the kids.”
“This may just be the best news we’ve heard all day!”
“Despite going through a bitter divorce, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will reportedly spend Christmas TOGETHER for the sake of their six children — Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
“Isn’t that great?!”
““They’re not getting back together, but that doesn’t mean they can’t celebrate as a family,” a source told OK!”
“Magazine.”
“...playing Santa on Christmas morning...”
“HollywoodLifers, do YOU think Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie should spend Christmas together with the kids?”


"Tell us next!"
"It's going to be the first time in a long time that they're in the same room together, so it's probably a bittersweet story," he said, adding that Brad has always liked to spoil his children, so Angelina softened his mind... "
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will shelve their differences because a new report says the two predecessors have agreed to spend Christmas with their children."
"That's probably the best news we've heard today!"
Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are reported to be spending Christmas together for their six children, 16-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox, despite a painful divorce
"Isn't that good?"
"They won't get back together, but that doesn't mean they can't celebrate as a family," a source told OK
"Magazine."
__ Play Santa on Christmas morning... "
"Hollywood stars, do you think Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie should spend Christmas with the kids?"



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brad said in a statement following the divorce: "I am very saddened by this, but what matters most now is the wellbeing of our kids."”
“She will not be commenting, and asks that the family be given its privacy at this time."”
“The source continued: "These claims are exaggerated and fabricated.”
“It is claimed Brad began arguing with his wife on the flight from Europe to LA, and when their 15-year-old Maddox jumped up to defend her, he allegedly "lunged" at his son.”
“(Image: Getty)The actor is accused of being "wasted" and "screaming" while in the air with his partner and their children.”
“Sources close to the World War Z star told Mirror Celeb: "He [Brad] is a very caring and attentive father and it's sad that people are continuing these smears, which only hurt the children and the entire family."”
“The FBI said they are "continuing to gather facts" regarding the claims, while Brad is said to be "cooperating fully".”
“...divorce...”
“She had threatened divorce in the past but he did not think she would file this time Image FameFlynet uk com Image Fameflynet Hollywood star Brad is at the centre of claims he clashed with one of his kids on board a private plane days before his wife filed for...”
“He didn’t have a lawyer or anything.”


"I feel very sad about it, but the most important thing now is the happiness of our children," Brad said in a statement after the divorce
"She won't comment and ask for the privacy of the family at this time."
"These claims are exaggerated and fabricated," the source added
Brad is said to have started arguing with his wife on a flight from Europe to Los Angeles. When their 15-year-old Maddox jumped up to defend his wife, he was said to "pounce" on his son
(photo: Getty) the actor was accused of "wasting" and "screaming" in the air with his partner and their children
A source close to the World War II star told the mirror celebrity: "he (Brad) is a very considerate and careful father. It's sad that people continue to discredit him, which will only hurt the children and the whole family."
The FBI said they were "continuing to collect facts," while Brad said they were "fully cooperating."
__ Divorce... "
"She has threatened divorce in the past, but he doesn't think she will submit a picture of fame flynet UK this time. Fame flynet Hollywood star Brad is the center of the claim. He clashed with one of his children on a private plane. A few days ago, his wife applied..."
"He doesn't have a lawyer or anything."



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, are you sad to hear that Harry is not with Tess anymore?”
“Just one day after Harry Styles’ stepfather Robin Twist reportedly passed away, a new report has surfaced that his food blogger girlfriend Tess Ward broke up with him!”
“Our hearts are shattered for Harry Styles, 23!”
“His beautiful new girlfriend Tess Ward allegedly broke up with him, according to a report form The Sun on June 21.”
“Their source claims that Tess called off the relationship because she realized she still had feelings for her ex after splitting from him to date Harry and has apologized to him for her romance with the singer Just one month...”
“...into her romance with the One Direction front man she allegedly ran back into her exes arms...”
““It will take a while for Tess to build back his trust but they have been getting on as normal.”
“She was in London this week and met her ex straight away — they’ve been inseparable since.” Poor Harry!”
“See pics of the blonde food blogger, here.”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, are you sad to hear that Harry is no longer with Tess?"
Just one day after Harry stiles' stepfather, Robin twist, was reported to have died, a new report emerged that his food blog girlfriend, Tess ward, had broken up with him
"Harry stiles, 23, breaks our hearts!"
His beautiful new girlfriend, Tess ward, is said to have broken up with him, the Sun reported on June 21
"Their source said that Tess cancelled the relationship because she realized that she still had feelings for her ex boyfriend after breaking up with him and apologized to him for her only one month relationship with the singer..."
__ She fell in love with her ex boyfriend in one direction. It's said that she went back to her ex boyfriend's arms again... "
"It will take Tess some time to regain his trust, but their relationship has always been normal."
"This week in London, she met her ex - girlfriend all of a sudden - and they've been together ever since." Poor Harry
"Look at the photo of the blonde beauty food blogger, here."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even worse, he can't stand being accused of something he hasn’t done!"”
“The source claims, "Everyone's kind of gotten used to Eva shunning the limelight, but no one ever thought for a moment she'd skip the Oscars - especially when Ryan was nominated for a once-in-a-lifetime accolade.”
“May 30, 2017AceShowbiz - Are Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes separating?”
“Rumor has it, the "La La Land" actor and the "2 Fast 2 Furious" actress have been living separate lives for months following the arrival of their second daughter last year.”
“"They're past the point of caring now.”
“The biggest sign it's over is the fact that Eva and Ryan don't even bother to argue anymore.”
“The only thing they do agree on is the fact that none of their needs are being met!"”
“...says the source.”
“According to a source, Ryan and Eva's relationship broke up after he chose to celebrate Mother's Day with his mom, Donna, rather than Eva.”
“Their relationship has reportedly been toxic behind closed doors for quite a long time now.”


"What's worse, he can't stand being accused of what he didn't do!"
"Everyone is used to EVA avoiding the spotlight, but no one expected her to skip the Oscars - especially when Ryan is nominated for the once in a lifetime award," the source said
"Did aceshowbiz Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes separate on May 30, 2017?"
"It is said that the hero of laladi and the heroine of two quick two angry have been separated for several months since the arrival of their second daughter last year."
"They don't need to care now."
"The biggest sign that it's all over is that EVA and Ryan don't even bother arguing anymore."
"The only thing they can agree on is that none of their needs can be met!"
__︹ The source said
"According to a source, Ryan's relationship with EVA broke down after he chose to celebrate Mother's day with his mother Donna instead of EVA."
"It is reported that their relationship has been poisoned secretly for quite a long time."



Number  52
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pic.twitter.com/U98IwhwdDn — David Wain (@davidwain) October 30, 2017Paul Manafort at this moment pic.twitter.com/lqdAp8NWRw — Ike Barinholtz (@ikebarinholtz) October 30, 2017For his part, Trump continues to deny any wrongdoing and instead has suggested that Hillary Clinton’s campaign colluded with Russia.”
“— Mia Farrow (@MiaFarrow) October 30, 2017I called this a year and half ago.”
“Naturally, this produced a deluge of reactions online from notable individuals.”
“Though not normally directly involved with politics, those in Hollywood have never been shy about sharing their opinions on relevant headline-grabbing news.”
“So in addition to the political pundits on news networks such as CNN and Fox, those in the entertainment industry have taken to Twitter to speak out on the Manafort story.”
“This includes James Gunn, Rob Reiner, Rosie O’Donnel, Alyssa Milano and more.”
“Specifically Manafort and business associate Rick Gates have been indicted on 12 counts which include conspiracy against the U S conspiracy to launder money unregistered agent of a foreign principal false and misleading statements related to the U S Foreign Agents Registration Act false statements and seven counts of failure...”
“...to file reports of foreign bank and financial accounts...”
“However, none of these charges are directly related to the Trump campaign as of yet.”
“Per the New York Times, the FBI has been investigating Manafort long before he was hired by Trump for suspicion of tax violations and money laundering.”


_... pic.twitter.com/U98IwhwdDn -David Wayne (@ davidwain) October 30, 2017 Paul manafort right now pic.twitter.com/lqdAp8NWRw -Ike barinholtz (@ ikebarinholtz) on October 30, 2017, trump continued to deny any misconduct, instead suggesting that Hillary Clinton's campaign team was colluding with Russia. "
"- Mia Farrow (@ Mia Farrow) October 30, 2017, I called this a year and a half ago."
"Naturally, this has aroused the reaction of many celebrities on the Internet."
"Although people in Hollywood are usually not directly involved in politics, they are never shy of expressing their views on relevant headlines."
"As a result, in addition to political experts on news networks such as CNN and fox, people in the entertainment industry have also commented on the story of manafort on twitter."
"This includes James Gunn, Rob Reiner, Rosie O'Donnell, Eliza Milano and so on."
"In particular, manafort and business partner Rick gates were charged with 12 counts, including conspiracy to launder money in the United States, false and misleading statements made by unregistered foreign principal agents, false statements related to the foreign agent registration act of the United States, and seven failed charges..."
__︹ Submit reports on foreign banks and financial accounts... "
"So far, however, none of these charges have had a direct bearing on Trump's campaign."
"According to the New York Times, the FBI had been investigating manafort long before he was hired by trump for suspected tax violations and money laundering."



Number  53
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...fire her as her manager...”
“Kendall Jenner towers over Kim Kardashian as they dress in high fashion USA ONLY Meanwhile Kim is allegedly also furious with her mother Kris for helping to turn Kylie into the younger hotter version of her and has threatened to...”
“...apparent than ever given the sales of her new app in comparison to her sisters...”
“Kylie Jenner Tyga Step Out In NYC As aging and pregnant Kim becomes more desperate both to hold on to the spotlight and to take credit for Kylie s success she has allegedly begun to demand that Kylie pay her...”
“...for stealing her style...”
“"Kim is fed up with how much money Kylie is making by mimicking her," an insider told Life & Style.”
“"She says she's entitled to at least 30 percent of those earnings."”
“Kim Kardashian stuns in all white curvy look while walking with Khloe and fan chaos in the streets of Armenia But the defiant younger sibling has no plans to pay up.”
“"Kylie insists she won't give Kim a penny," the source said, adding that she "is not going to back down without a fight."”
“INF Kylie Jenner Wearing All White In Soho Kim reportedly feels that Kylie s fame is costing her money and that the 18 year old has stolen her entire look from head to toe and is booking jobs that otherwise...”


__ To fire her as a manager... "
"Kendall Jenner is high on Kim Kardashian's head because they are wearing the exclusive high-end fashion of the United States. At the same time, Kim Kardashian is said to be angry that her mother, Chris, helped Kylie become a younger and sexier version, and threatened to... "
__ It's obviously more than ever to consider the sale of her new app compared to her sister... "
"Kylie Jenner tyga left New York. As she grew older and became pregnant, Kim became more and more desperate. She wanted to seize the spotlight and win honor for her success. It is said that she has started to ask Kelly to pay her..."
__ Because I stole her style... "
"Kim is fed up with how much Kelly earns by imitating her," a person familiar with the matter told life & style
"She said she was entitled to at least 30 percent of that income."
"Kim Kardashian was stunned by the white curvilinear shape of his body as he walked along the Armenian streets with Khloe and fan chaos, but this defiant brother is not going to pay for it."
"Kelly insists she won't give Kim a cent," the source said, adding that she "won't flinch without a fight."
"It's reported that Kelly Jenner was dressed in all white at SOHO Kim. She felt that Kelly's fame was making her pay. At 18, she stole her whole look from head to toe and was booking a job, otherwise..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Because once a housewife, always a housewife.”
““He loved drinking and partying.”
“...with dating specifically with a man she plays tennis with...”
“That s not what our relationship was like she said adding that the reruns play constantly in the U K I m walking down the street and someone s like Oh my God I just saw you trying on a prom dress She also said that her mother is dabbling...”
““You want to think that it’s like a home movie, but it’s not.”
“...stepfather...”
“Maybe I won t be here when you come back but go Shapiro who now lives in London while she works on her master s degree admits that she can t watch old episodes of Real Housewives which showed her as 14 year old struggling to get close to her...”
““It was this time last year that we were told he wasn’t gonna make it another week, and he pushed us and he said, ‘Go to the party.”
“This was the highlight of his year,” she said.”
“Shapiro reflected on last year’s luncheon, when her stepfather was still struggling with cancer, but encouraged her and her mother to party on.”


"Because I used to be a housewife, and I will always be a housewife."
"He likes drinking and parties."
__ Dating a man who plays tennis with her... "
"Our relationship is not like this, she also said, the rebroadcast of Britain is constant, I walk on the street, some people say, oh my God, I just saw you trying on the prom dress, she also said that her mother is dabbling in..."
"You want to think of it as a family movie, but it's not."
__ Stepfather... "
"Maybe I won't be here when you come back, but Shapiro, who now lives in London for her master's degree, admits that she can't watch the old series of Real Housewives, which shows that she was trying to get close to her when she was 14..."
"This time last year, we were told that he couldn't do it in a week. He pushed us and said," go to the party. "
"It's the highlight of his year," she said
Shapiro recalled last year's luncheon, when her stepfather was still fighting cancer, but encouraged her and her mother to continue the party



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Problem solved, right?”
““He doesn’t like being surrounded by industry people like Miley does,” this insider explains.”
“The engaged couple is squabbling about where to live, as In Touch has learned.”
““Miley is happy staying put in Malibu, but Liam wants to raise a family in Australia,” a source tells In Touch in the issue currently on newsstands.”
““They’re fighting nonstop.”Apparently, the 28-year-old Hunger Games heartthrob covets his family members’ life Down Under.”
“His brother Chris Hemsworth and Chris’s wife, Elsa Pataky, are currently renovating their home in Byron Bay, a beachside town in New South Wales.”
““He sees how much happier his brother Chris is since putting down roots there,” the source adds.”
““Liam’s parents and extended family are all there.”Liam apparently isn’t as dazzled by Tinseltown as his fiancée is.”
“As much as Miley may share Liam’s love for Australia, her whole life is in California.”
“They should just split their time between the two continents.”


"The problem is solved, isn't it?"
"He doesn't like to be surrounded by people in the industry like Miley," the insider explained
"The engaged couple are arguing about where to live, as contact magazine knows."
"Miley is happy to be in Malibu, but Liam wants to support his family in Australia," a source told contact magazine, which is currently on the newsstand
"They're fighting all the time." Apparently, the 28 year old hunger game enthusiast covets his family's life
"His brother Chris Hemsworth and Chris's wife Elsa Pataki are currently renovating their home in Byron Bay, a small seaside town in New South Wales."
"He saw how happy his brother Chris has been since he took root there," the source added
"Liam's parents and the extended family are here." Obviously, Liam is not as fascinated by Silton as his fiancee
"Although Miley loves Australia as much as Liam, she's been in California all her life."
"They should divide the time between the two continents."



Number  56
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Social media in-match use limited to 120 images.”
“No video emulation.”
“MILAN, ITALY - JANUARY 09: Zlatan Ibrahimovic of A.C. Milan passes the ball during the Serie A match between AC Milan and Torino FC at Stadio Giuseppe Meazza on January 09, 2021 in Milan, Italy.”
“© Michael Donald / eyevine Contact eyevine for more information about using this image: T: +44 (0) 20 8709 8709 E: info@eyevine.com http:///www.eyevine.comWho are the most improved teams in European football?”
“EXCLUSIVE TEXT ACCOMPANIES / AVAILABLE FOR THIS PORTRAIT.”
“Photographed on his vineyard in Tuscany, 31/08/09.”
“Rossi scores Italy's first goal in the 57th minute.”
“Result Italy 3 -- 1 West Germany.”
“Attendance: 90,000.”
“The final was played on 11th July in the Estadio Santiago Bernabeu, Madrid.”


"Social media is limited to 120 images in the game."
"No video simulation."
Milan, Italy - January 9: Milan, Italy, January 9, 2021, Milan's Ibrahimovic passes the ball during the Serie A match between AC Milan and Torino at the Giuseppe miyaza stadium
"? Michael Donald / eyevine for more information about using this image, please contact eyevine:T :+44锛0锛20 8709 8709  E:info@eyevine.comhttp Address:/// www.eyevine.com Who is the fastest growing team in European football
"This portrait comes with / provides exclusive text."
"Taken in a vineyard in Tuscany, August 31, 2009."
"Rossi scored Italy's first goal in the 57th minute
"As a result, Italy led West Germany 3-1
"Attendance: 90000."
The final was held in the capital of Madrid, Bernabeu, on July 11



Number  57
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Perhaps more permanently at this rate.”
“"Priyanka is a really good fit into the Jonas family."”
“"Nick loves doing things together with his brother Joe and Sophie, and the four of them love to hangout," the source said.”
“They've also become tight with Joe Jonas and his fiancée Sophie Turner, who they spent Fourth of July with publicly.”
“"They are enjoying getting to know each other, but are definitely still inseparable since going public with their relationship."”
“"They aren't in a rush to the altar anytime soon," the source said.”
“...that "Priyanka and Nick are still very serious," but also that they aren't about to pull a Justin Bieber-Hailey Baldwin and get engaged.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"At this rate, maybe longer."
"Priyanka suits the Jonas well."
"Nick likes to work with his brothers Joe and Sophie, and the four of them like to play together," the source said
"They are also close to Jonas and his fiancee, Sophie Turner, who were publicly with them on July 4."
"They like to get to know each other very much, but they must be inseparable from each other since their public love affair."
"They won't rush to the altar soon," the source said
__︹ Priyanka and Nick are serious, "but they won't get engaged to Justin Bieber Haley Baldwin, either



Number  58
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Brad Pitt’s mum ‘so happy’ he’s back in touch with Jennifer Aniston as pair have ‘secret meeting’”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“It comes as he apparently also enjoyed a ‘secret meeting’ with ex-wife Jennifer Aniston, following her split with Justin Theroux.”
“There’s so much to unpack here.”
“Anyway, according to Entertainment Tonight, Brad has been dating women ‘not in the public eye’ as he tried to keep his private life just that.”
“A source explained to the website He s very private about who he s seeing but he does continue to casually date Angelina and Brad announced their shock separation in 2016 Picture Matt Sayles Invision AP File The insider told Entertainment Tonight the father of six Shiloh 11 Maddox 16”
“Vivienne nine Zahara 13 Pax 14 and Knox nine has made changes in his life since he and Ange parted ways...”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘When they first split he spent a lot of time at home and was often very down about what was going on.”
“He was a homebody for many months, but in the last month or two, he’s been going out more,’ they said.”
“‘He enjoys going out to eat with close friends.’Sounds like a blast.”


"More: Brad Pitt's mother is" very happy "that he has contacted Jennifer Aniston again because of their" secret meeting. "
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"After he broke up with his ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston, he obviously liked to meet her in secret."
"There's too much to open here."
"Anyway, according to entertainment tonight, Brad has been dating women, but" out of the public eye "because he has been trying to keep his private life
"A source explained to the website that he was very secretive about the people he met, but he did continue to date casually. Angelina and Brad announced a shocking picture of their separation in 2016. Matt sels, an associated press source, told entertainment that Shiloh 11 Maddox 16, the father of six children tonight
"Vivienne nine Zahara 13 Pax 14 and Knox nine changed his life after he and ange parted ways..."
"When they broke up for the first time, he stayed at home for a long time and was often frustrated by what happened."
"He's been at home for months, but in the last month or two, he's gone out more often," they said
"He likes to eat out with close friends." It sounds exciting



Number  59
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what’s the best birthday present you’ve ever received?”
“Fans freaked and posted the videos to Twitter and it was clear she is a-okay with the world knowing she’s with Joe.”
“She had her arm around him while singing along to Ed’s smash “Thinking Out Loud” and was spotted hugging her boyfriend during other songs in the set.”
“The next night she performed at London’s Jingle Ball and Tay was spotted out in the audience with Joe during pal Ed Sheeran‘s set.”
“See pics of Taylor’s epic 2017, here.”
“She has a more private way to come and go from the place so it was a BIG DEAL that she finally was photographed showing PDA with him.”
“The “Ready For It” singer allowed herself to be photographed holding hands with Joe as they headed into her NYC pad’s front entrance on Dec. 9.”
“After a year of dating on the down-low, Taylor has slowly been allowing herself to be seen out in public with Joe.”
“...pancakes normally found at her favorite restaurant in Nashville...”
“Joe has ordered dozens of red roses for their suite several bottles of champagne and he is having a private chef who will cook them dinner and recreate one of her favorite dishes as part of their meal sweet potato...”


"Holly bugs, what's the best birthday present you've ever received?"
"The fans were terrified and sent these videos to twitter, and it's obvious that she knows that it's OK for the world to be with Joe."
"She hugged him and sang along with ED's think aloud. In other songs on the set, she was found hugging her boyfriend."
"The next night, she performed at the jingle ball in London, and in the setting of her friend ed Sheeran, ty and Joe appeared in the audience together."
"Here's a picture of Tyler's epic 2017."
"She has a more private way to come and go to the place, so it's a big problem that she was finally photographed with his show on the PDA."
On December 9, the "ready to go" singer allowed people to take pictures of her and Joe walking hand in hand into the front door of her New York apartment
"After a year of low-key dating, Taylor slowly allowed himself and Joe to appear in public together."
__ Pancakes usually found in her favorite Nashville restaurant... "
"Joe ordered dozens of red roses and a few bottles of champagne for their suite. He invited a private chef to cook dinner for them, and in their dinner, he cooked her favorite dish, sweet potato..."



Number  60
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Because it’s something that is unpredictable, so it’s a good way to have a safe give and take.””
““If you teach children to be gentle with these animals, they’re not going to feel so protective and intimidated.”
“Amanda Seyfried was a pet parent...”
“The Mamma Mia!”
“Here We Go Again star adopted her beloved dog Finn from Best Friends Animal Society.”
“The pair have been an “it couple” in the pet world, working to raise awareness about all the shelter animals in need of loving homes.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 8-year-old rescue pooch and his famous mom, 32, have done so much good for animals in need that Seyfried was recently recognized at the Best Friends Animal Society’s 3rd Annual New York City Gala to Save Them All.”
“The actress received the save them all spotlight award at the Gala on Tuesday in recognition of her work toward making America no-kill across all its animal shelters by 2025.”
“Image zoom Credit Ben Gabbe Getty He s sad he couldn t be here tonight but I didn t think it was a good idea to drag him across the country just for one evening Seyfried told PEOPLE at the event about why her canine companion wasn t by her...”


"Because it's unpredictable, it's a good way to make a safe trade-off."
"If you teach children to be gentle with these animals, they won't feel so protective and afraid."
"Amanda Seyfried is a pet parent..."
"Mamma Mia!"
"Again, the star adopted her beloved dog Finn from a good friend of the animal society."
"This couple has always been an it couple in the pet industry, working to raise people's awareness of all shelter animals that need a loving home."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The 8-year-old rescue dog and his famous 32 year old mother have done a lot of good things for animals in need, and Seyfried was recently recognized as saving all animals at the Third New York City annual event of the best friends animal society."
"The actress won the" save all animals "Spotlight award at the party on Tuesday for her efforts to keep all animal shelters in the United States from dying by 2025."
"Ben gabbe Getty, he's very sad that he can't be here tonight, but I think it's not a good idea to drag him all over the country for just one night. Seyfried told people at the event why her dog companion wasn't with her..."



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Nominations went to Casey Affleck for “Manchester by the Sea,” Andrew Garfield for “Hacksaw Ridge,” Ryan Gosling for “La La Land,” Viggo Mortensen for “Captain Fantastic,” and Denzel Washington for “Fences.””
“It would have been Hanks’ sixth nomination in the category, which he won for “Forrest Gump” and “Philadelphia.”Hanks was viewed as something of a longshot for a nomination for “Sully,” which was a box office success.”
“Chesley Sullenberger in Clint Eastwood’s biographic action-drama “Sully,” about how Sullenberger successfully landing a disabled jet airplane on the Hudson River in 2009.”
“Hanks was listed incorrectly as one of the nominees for best actor for his role as Capt.”
“Foster Jenkins Bening was incorrectly listed in the same category for the comedy drama 20th Century Women It would have been her fifth nomination...”
“Adams was thought to be a shoo in but may have seen her support eroded by also being in contention for Nocturnal Animals The actual nominees were Isabelle Huppert for Elle Ruth Negga for Loving Natalie Portman for Jackie Emma Stone for La La Land and Meryl Streep for Florence...”
“We apologize to the Academy, press, and fans for any confusion.”Adams was inadvertently named one of the nominees for best actress for her work as linguist Louise Banks in Denis Villeneuve’s sci-fi film “Arrival.” It would have been her sixth Oscar nomination.”
“ABC quickly identified and corrected the errors.”
““The nominees announced by the Academy on Twitter were accurate.”
““This morning, in an attempt to release breaking news as announced, ABC Digital briefly posted inaccurate nomination information on the Oscar.com website,” ABC said in a statement.”


Kathy Affleck was nominated for "Manchester by the sea," Andrew Garfield for "hacksaw ridge," Ruian Gosling for "Lala Di," Viggo Mortensen for "Captain magic," and Denzel Washington for "fence."
It will be the sixth time Hanks has been nominated for the award, with "Forrest Gump" and "Philadelphia.". Hanks is seen as "Sally" has little hope of being nominated, and "Sally" has made a great success at the box office
Chesley sullenberg in Clint Eastwood's action play Sally tells how sullenberg landed a disabled jet on the Hudson River in 2009
"Hanks was wrongly named one of the best actor nominees for playing captain."
"Foster Jenkins bening is wrongly included in the same category as the comedy women of the 20th century, which will be her fifth nomination..."
"Adams is considered a winner, but may have seen her support weakened in the night animal competition as well. The actual nominations are Isabel Huppert for ailus negga, Natalie Portman for Jackie, Emma stone for Laran and Meryl Streep for Florence..."
Adams, who plays linguist Louise banks in Denis Villeneuve's science fiction film arrival, was inadvertently nominated as one of the best actress. It will be her sixth Oscar nomination
"ABC quickly discovered and corrected the mistakes."
"The Academy's Twitter nominations are accurate."
"This morning, ABC digital briefly posted inaccurate nominations on its website in order to release the breaking news of the announcement," the Oscars website ABC said in a statement



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...from the back end."”
“Several minutes later, the president re-posted the message, with slight tweakings: he added CBS and ABC to the roster of 'fake news' outlets, and removed the 'SICK!'”
“The message was deleted shortly after its posting, but numerous users screengrabbed the tweet for posterity.”
“SICK!'”
“It is the enemy of the American people.”
“'The FAKE NEWS media,' he wrote, citing The New York Times, CNN, and NBC News, among others,'is not my enemy.”
“The Daily Beast: "Trump: Media Is ‘Enemy of the American People’ " — "President Trump on Friday afternoon tweeted, then deleted an outwardly hostile message calling various media outlets the people’s real enemy.”
“Sulzberger acknowledged the meeting, which he says the president requested, after Trump violated their off-the-record agreement by not only tweeting about the meeting more than a week later, but also mischaracterizing what they talked about."”
“(@monacharenEPPC)From The Reading ListNew York Magazine: "NYT Publisher Attempts, Fails to Reason With Trump Over Media Attacks" — "A private attempt by New York Times publisher A.G. Sulzberger to reason with President Trump over his attacks on the media went about as well as anyone could have expected.”
“Author of "Sex Matters: How Modern Feminism Lost Touch With Science, Love, and Common Sense."”


__ From the back end. "
A few minutes later, Obama reissued the news and made some fine adjustments: he added CBS and ABC to the list of "fake news" and deleted the word "sick."
"The message was deleted soon after it was released, but many users intercepted it for future generations."
"Sick!"
"It's the enemy of the American people."
"Fake news media are not my enemy," he wrote, quoting the New York Times, CNN and NBC
Daily Beast: "trump: the media is the 'enemy of the American people'" -- President trump tweeted on Friday afternoon, then deleted a message of hostility, saying that the media are the real enemies of the people
"After trump violated their private agreement, not only tweeted about the meeting more than a week later, but also mistakenly described what they were talking about, Sulzberg admitted the meeting, saying it was requested by the president."
"(@ monachareneeppc) is from the reading list of New York Magazine:" the publisher of the New York Times tried to reason with trump on the issue of media attack "- A.G. Sulzberger, the publisher of the New York Times, privately tried to reason with trump on the issue of President Trump's media attack, and the result was unexpected."
Sex matters: how modern feminism loses contact with science, love and common sense



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Eagle-eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping that they could “maybe start over again …but this time it means forever.” Sadly for these fans, the only way they can see Bella and Edward back together is in the pages of Stephenie Meyer’s books.”
“...where they can be friendly when they see each other in public...”
“Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson reunited and got ‘Twilight’ fans buzzing, but we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned if these two exes are getting back together or not.”
“For one moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan was once again a couple and all was right in the world for Twilight fans.”
“Ex-lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily-Rose Depp’s 19th birthday party on June 1.”
“However, don’t expect their love to rise from the grave.”
““There’s no chance of any kind of romantic reconciliation for Rob and Kristen,” a source close to Rob EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““That ship has well and truly sailed, and way too much has passed between them to ever reunite in that way.”
“Plus Kristen is really happy with Stella Maxwell they have an amazing relationship While there s no chance that RPatz and KStew will date again it s not all bad as the source tells HollywoodLife com that Rob thinks it s great that they ve finally got to a place...”
“Rob would love to see more of Kristen he still cares for her deep down and probably always will she was his first real love As for Kristen she feels a little awkward when she sees Rob because she still carries a lot of guilt from how their romance ended...”


Sharp eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping they could "start over But this time it means forever. " Sadly, for these fans, the only way to see Bella and Edward reunite is on Stephanie Meyer's page
__ They will be very friendly when they meet in public... "
"Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson are reunited and fans are cheering for twilight, but we've got exclusive information on whether the two ex girlfriends will get back together."
"For a moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan became a couple again, and for Twilight fans, everything was fine in the world."
On June 1, former lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily Rose Depp's 19th birthday party
"But don't expect their love to come back from the grave."
"For Rob and Christine, there is no possibility of any kind of romantic reconciliation," a source close to rob told Hollywood life
"The ship really sailed well. There was so much traffic between them that they could never reunite like this again."
"Plus Christine is really happy to have an amazing relationship with Stella Maxwell, and without the opportunity, rpatz and kstew will date again, which is not all bad news. The source told Hollywood website that rob thought it was great that they finally got to a place..."
"Rob wants to see more Christine. He still cares about her. Maybe she will always be his first love. As for Christine, when she sees rob, she feels a little embarrassed, because she is still full of guilt about their romantic ending..."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““It’s no wonder she’s threatened.”We pay for juicy info!”
“Gwyneth has seen a few pretenders, but this is by far the most competitive,” the source confessed.”
““Camila is working herself into the ground revamping everything and has sunk a ton of her and Matthew’s cash into this project.”
“But Alves ambitions could eat into Paltrow’s profits.”
“It was recently valued at $250 million dollars.”
“What started as a weekly newsletter blossomed into a web site, magazine, and pop up store.”
““And the people she’s targeting are Goop’s target audience and even clients.”Paltrow launched Goop as a “lifestyle brand” in September 2008.”
“...create a community in our sisterhood Camila s site has been given a posh makeover catering to the rich and famous the insider revealed...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"No wonder she was threatened." We pay for interesting information! "
"Gwyneth has seen some camouflagers, but it's the most competitive so far," the source admitted
"Camilla is working hard to fix everything. She and Matthew are spending a lot of money on this project."
"But Alves's ambition could erode Paltrow's profits."
"Recently estimated at $250 million."
It started as a weekly newsletter, then developed into websites, magazines and pop-up stores
"And she's targeting goop's target audience, even its customers." Paltrow launched goop as a "lifestyle brand" in September 2008
__ Creating a community in our sister Camilla's website has been given a luxury makeover to cater to the rich and celebrities with insider revelations... "



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In April, the Love, Simon star shared a photo of a sticky-note message written by Samuel that unmistakably read, “I Love Farts.””
“...three...”
“She will continue to support him because it benefits the kids Image zoom Credit Randy Shropshire Getty Jennifer Garner RELATED VIDEO Jennifer Garner and Kids Visit Ben Affleck in Hawaii for Easter Weekend Since joining social media Garner has given the occasional glimpse into her life as a mom of...”
““As long as Ben keeps working on himself, Jen is happy.”
““The kids love when they all spend time together,” a source previously told PEOPLE.”
“But despite their 2015 split and subsequent April 2017 divorce filing, Garner, 46, and Affleck, 45, have maintained an amicable relationship for the sake of their children.”
“...was not present during the parade...”
“Image zoom Credit MEGA Jennifer Garner with her kids Samuel and Seraphina Image zoom Credit Splash News Jennifer Garner with her son Samuel Image zoom Credit Splash News Jennifer Garner with her kids Samuel and Seraphina Image zoom Credit Splash News Jennifer Garner with her kids Samuel and Seraphina Affleck...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


In April, the love, Simon star shared a photo of a note written by Samuel that clearly said, "I love farting."
__ Three... "
"She will continue to support him because it's good for the children's image." randishrop County, Getty, Jennifer Garner Related videos. Jennifer Garner and the children visit Ben Affleck's Easter weekend in Hawaii, because joining social media, garner occasionally lets people see her life as a mother... "
"As long as Ben keeps working hard, Jane will be happy."
"Kids like to be together," one source told people earlier
"But despite their separation in 2015 and subsequent divorce filing in April 2017, Ghana, 46, and Affleck, 45, have maintained a friendly relationship for their children."
__︹ Not at the parade... "
"Image zooming credit big Jennifer Garner and her children Samuel and Serafina image zooming credit splash news Jennifer Garner and her son Samuel image zooming credit splash news Jennifer Garner and her children Samuel and Serafina image zooming credit splash news Jennifer Garner and her children Samuel and Serafina Affleck..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us your thoughts and responses in the comments section below!”
“Loved it as much as us?!”
“Britney Spears just blew our minds with INSANE performances of “Work B*tch” and “Toxic” for New Year’s Eve!”
“Head here for all the details!”
“What better way to ring in the New Year than with Britney Spears in Las Vegas!?”
“Uhhh…nothing!”
“Everyone’s favorite pop star took the stage at the Axis Theater on the Vegas Strip to delivering a rousing performance of “Work B*tch” and we have to say — Brit Brit has never looked better!”
“The 36-year-old songstress brought out some fiery attitude while decked out in thigh-high boots and loads of sequins (not to mention a heart on her booty)!”
“Did we mention that her dance moves were completely sensational?!”
“Later, she returned for a seductive performance of her classic hit “Toxic,” which involved the pop star doing some flying!”


"Please let us know your thoughts and answers in the comments section below!"
"Love it as much as we do?"
Britney Spears surprised us with her crazy performance of "workaholic" and "poison" on New Year's Eve
"Come here for all the details!"
"What better way to be in Las Vegas with Britney Spears in the new year?"! "
"Well Nothing
"Everyone's favorite pop star came on stage at the axis theater on Las Vegas Avenue and put on an exciting" B * tch work. "We have to say - Brit Brit has never looked so good!"
"The 36 year old singer showed some hot gestures in high boots and lots of sequins (not to mention a heart in her booty),!"
"Did we mention that her dance steps were wonderful?"
Later, she came back to take part in the seduction performance of her classic hit TV series poison, including the pop star's flying performance



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image credit: FAMEFLYNET PICTURESIf You Want More Hot Celeb Dirty Laundry News Then Please Like Us On Facebook and Follow Us On Twitter!”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.”
“Her two and a half year relationship with Matthew Rutler appears to be solid and happy, but Star magazine claims that this is only smoke and mirrors.”
“A source reveals, “Their relationship is convenient.”
“It was always casual very on and off and not something Christina saw a future in The magazine further alleges that Aguilera is ready for a new man and that she s already on the prowl for a replacement Aguilera s temporary departure from The Voice signaled a massive change...”
“...in her career...”
“Not only did she regain the humungous success she once had, but she also built a completely new fan base from scratch.”
“Aguilera has also been steadfast in her romantic affairs, but there’s still an opportunity for artistic ambition to give her relationship with Rutler a death blow.”
“This is, however, highly unlikely.”
“The source continues, “Christina plans on being ‘officially’ single by the time she begins promoting her new album and tour.”


If you want to learn more about celebrity dirty clothes, please follow us on Facebook, follow us on twitter
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below."
"Her two-and-a-half-year relationship with Matthew rutler seems solid and happy, but star magazine claims that it's just groundless."
"Their relationship is very convenient," a source said
"It's always casual and intermittent. What Christina sees in the magazine is not the future. She further claims that aquilella is ready to meet a new man. She is already looking for a replacement. Aquilella's voice of temporary departure marks a huge change..."
__ In her career
"She not only regained her great success, but also built a new fan base from scratch."
"Aguilera is also very firm in her romantic relationship, but there is still an opportunity for her artistic ambition to make her relationship with routler suffer a fatal blow."
"However, this is highly unlikely."
"The source continues," Christina plans to become 'officially' single when she starts promoting her new album and tour



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Theroux can next be seen on the big screen in the mystery thriller The Girl On The Train due out on October 5 in the UK and on October 7 in the US.”
“Two months later, the Horrible Bosses actress commented on the piece in Vanity Fair: 'There's a sensitivity chip that's missing.'”
“The 47-year-old and her 45-year-old husband left a stylish restaurant called The Smile in Manhattan's NoHo neighbourhood.”
“She was seen clasping his hand.”
“Their evening together comes five days after Angelina Jolie filed for divorce from Aniston's ex-husband Brad Pitt.”
“The Man I Love On Saturday Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux enjoyed a dinner date in New York City One Hand One Heart The pair were spotted clasping each other s hands as they arrived A Time For Love The loving wife put a hand on her husband s shoulder...”
“...as they trod the pavement Smile Their destination was the restaurant The Smile in the NoHo neighbourhood of Manhattan The Friends alumna kept her outfit New York chic tucking her black tank top into loose black slacks she cinched with a black belt to accent her trim waist...”
“A gleaming gold pendant dangled from her neck, and she completed the look with black ankle-strap stilettos and a black Chanel purse.”
“Meanwhile, the Mulholland Drive actor had pulled midnight blue anorak vest over a Prussian blue hoodie.”
“His hair slicked upward and back, he wore a pair of faded grey jeans and what looked like grey boots.”


"Next, in the mystery thriller" the girl on the train ", which will be released in the UK on October 5 and the US on October 7, people can see Cyrus on the big screen."
"Two months later, the terrible boss actress commented on Vanity Fair:" a sensitive chip has been lost. "
"At 47, she and her 45 year old husband left a trendy restaurant in Manhattan's Nojo called smile."
"She was seen clasping his hand."
"Five days after Angelina Jolie and Aniston's ex husband Brad Pitt filed for divorce, they were together."
"On Saturday, the man I love, Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus, had a dinner date in New York. They had one hand and one heart. The couple were found holding each other's hands tightly because they reached the moment of love. The lovely wife put her hand on her husband's shoulder..."
__ As they walk on the sidewalk and smile, their destination is the restaurant, smiling friends in Manhattan's Noho neighborhood, alumni keep her dress New York chic, tuck her black vest into loose black trousers, and she fastens it with a black belt to emphasize her slender waist... "
With a glittering gold pendant around her neck, she completed the whole design with Black Ankle stilettos and a black chanel purse
"At the same time, the malholland driver wore a midnight blue Arnold vest on a Prussian Blue Hoodie."
His hair was combed up and down, and he was wearing faded grey jeans and grey boots



**Something goes wrong**
“We’ll have to wait and see, but we do know they’d make an adorable couple!”
“Will this be the moment they take their relationship to the next level, or will they fizzle out?”
“The 28-year-old Vampire Diaries star was recently spotted spending time with a newly single Orlando Bloom.”
“Nina and Orlando have been romantically linked multiple times in the past — and according to sources, they’re “having fun together.”MORE: Kylie Jenner Seemingly Confirms Tyga Breakup, Shows up Alone at Coachella 2017“They’ve known each other for a while,” a source told People magazine.”
““Recently they’ve been hanging out as more than friends.”
“It’s super casual.”But Nina’s rep denies that there’s anything romantic going on between the two actors.”
““Nina and Orlando are just friends.”
“They have the same representation and friends in common, and often end up in the same social group.”
“That’s all it is.”This isn’t the first time Nina and Orlando sparked dating rumors.”
“In 2014, the two were spotted making out and dancing at a Comic-Con party.”


"We can only wait and see, but we know they will become a lovely couple!"
"Is this a time for them to take the relationship to a new level, or will they fail?"
"The 28 year old vampire diaries star was recently found with a new single Orlando Bloom
"Nina and Orlando have been in love many times in the past - according to sources, they" had a good time together. ". More information: Kelly Jenner seems to confirm TEGA's breakup, appearing alone in cochella in 2017, "they've known each other for a while," a source told people
"These days they're not just friends."
"Too casual." But Nina's agent denied there was any romance between the two actors
"Nina and Orlando are just friends."
"They have the same representativeness and common friends, and often end up in the same social group."
"That's all." It's not the first time Nina and Orlando have been linked
"In 2014, it was found that they were dancing at a cartoon party."



Number  70
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
__︹ In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  71
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A source told PEOPLE at the time of their trip, “They were lovey-dovey.”And in May, Swift and Alwyn stopped by The Flask, a pub in London.”
“In July, the couple jetted off to Turks and Caicos, where they splashed and snorkeled in the ocean and held hands on the beach.”
“Swift and Alwyn, who dated for months before news of their relationship broke in May 2017, have been spotted spending quality time together as of late.”
“Swift liked the photo.”
“WATCH: Taylor Swift’s Friends Think Joe Alwyn Could Be “The One”Alwyn has since posted a picture from the set of his upcoming film The Favourite with Nicholas Hoult, Emma Stone, and others.”
“In his picture, he also stood solo, wearing a grey shirt, black shorts, a cap, and sandals.”
“Also, not even remotely tour related, but today I met a cactus.”As it turns out, Alwyn, 27, posted a picture of the same cactus on the same day, captioning his snapshot with only the corresponding emoji.”
“And it starts TOMORROW.”
“Swift — who wore a long black dress and shades for the occasion — wrote, “Fact: I’ve never been more excited about a tour than I am about this one.”
“On May 8, Swift, 28, posted a picture of herself in front of a huge cactus.”


One source told people that when they travel, "they are lovely pigeons." In May, swift and Alvin stopped by the flask in a London pub
In July, the couple flew to the Turks and Caicos Islands, where they splashed, snorkeled and held hands on the beach
"Swift and Alvin dated for several months before the news of their relationship came out in May 2017, and recently it was discovered that they had a good time together."
"Swift likes this picture."
Observation: Taylor Swift's friends thought that Joe Alvin might be "the" Alvin, and then posted a set photo of his upcoming movie "the most popular man" to take a group photo with Nicholas Holt, Emma stone and others
In his photo, he is still standing alone, wearing a gray shirt, black shorts, hat and sandals
"Also, it's not even about tourism, but today I met a cactus." It turns out that 27 year old Alvin posted a picture of the same cactus on the same day, adding only the corresponding emoticons to his snapshot
"Tomorrow."
Swift, who attended the event in a long black dress and sunglasses, wrote: "in fact, I've never been as excited as this trip."
"On May 8, swift, 28, posted a picture of himself in front of a giant cactus."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“She’s so smart, and such a great girl, and she’ll figure it out.”For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”
““I’m not in that relationship or in that situation, so I really trust Khloé.”
““I think you just have to be there for your kid and follow their lead,” the momager said.”
“She also told Us on Friday, June 8, that she stands by her daughter’s decision to stay with the power forward.”
“Kardashian has remained in Cleveland since giving birth to their daughter, but her mom, Kris Jenner, told Us earlier this month that the Revenge Body host is due to move back to L.A. very soon.”
“As Us Weekly exclusively reported, the new mom has put her boyfriend’s infidelity in the past and a source told us they are “fully back together,” despite the fact that he cheated on her with at least five women while she was pregnant.”
““This is what you’re gonna look like, Savas,” Kardashian told her workout buddy of the six-pack abs depicted on the cake.”
“Both the Good American designer and Thompson shared videos on their Instagram Stories of Savas being presented with a birthday cake decorated with a shirtless photo of him, while another video posted on Instagram showed them standing together at the celebration.”
“News reports that Kardashian threw the party for their friend at the Marble Room and the group of about a dozen people celebrated over dinner in a private room.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"She's smart. She's a great girl. She'll find out." To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube! "
"I'm not that kind of relationship, I'm not that kind of situation, so I really trust khlo 茅."
"I think you just have to stay with your children and follow them," mom said
"She also told us on Friday, June 8 that she insisted on her daughter's decision to stay at power forward
"Kardashian has been in Cleveland since she gave birth to her daughter, but her mother, Kris Jenner, told us earlier this month that the host of revenge will soon move back to Los Angeles."
"As the US weekly exclusive reported, the new mother put her boyfriend's infidelity in the past, and a source told us that they were" completely reunited "even though he cheated her with at least five women during her pregnancy."
"That's what you look like, Savas," Kardashian told her six pack partner on the cake
"Both the great American designer and Thompson shared on instagram a video of Savas's birthday cake decorated with photos of him shirtless, while another video released on instagram showed them standing together to celebrate."
"According to the news report, Kardashian had a party for their friends in the marble room and a dozen people had dinner together in a private room to celebrate."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementBlake Shelton says that Gwen Stefani saved his life and she is all he cares about, and since they aren’t shy about sharing their romance on social media, it’s likely that when they do get engaged they won’t keep it a secret.”
“Going through devastating breakups at the same time is what initially brought the two close together, as they leaned on each other to get through their heartbreak.”
“A “source” claims that the mom of three started to panic about her future with the country superstar and her insecurities got the best of her.”
“Is the couple on the verge of a split?”
“The insider says that Stefani and Shelton were planning a country wedding in Oklahoma, but she decided to not go through with it because she was “unnerved” by Shelton’s student-teacher relationship with Chloe Kohanski, the most recent winner of The Voice.”
“The tabloid story also claims that Shelton has tried to convince Stefani that she is the only woman for him, but she feels like she loves him more than he loves her.”
“Another alleged problem is that the Sweet Escape singer doesn’t want to relocate to Oklahoma, plus they have conflicting schedules and different personalities.”
“But, could any of this be close to the truth?”
“Could an insider really know all of this and then dish it out to a tabloid?”
“According to Gossip Cop, absolutely not.”


"Blake Sheldon says Gwen Stephanie saved his life. She's the only person he cares about. Since they're not shy about sharing their relationship on social media, they probably won't keep it a secret when they're engaged."
"Experiencing a devastating breakup at the same time is the reason why they got so close at first, because they lived together through heartbreak."
A "source" said the mother of three was beginning to panic about her future and the country superstar's, and her sense of insecurity dominated her
"Is this couple about to break up?"
According to people familiar with the matter, Stephanie and Sheldon planned a rural wedding in Oklahoma, but decided not to attend because Sheldon's teacher-student relationship with Chloe kohanski, the recent winner, made her feel "uneasy."
"The tabloid report also said that Sheldon tried to convince Stefani that she was his only woman, but she felt that she loved him more than he loved her."
"Another alleged problem is that this sweet prison break singer doesn't want to move to Oklahoma, and their schedules are contradictory and their personalities are different."
"But is it possible that these are close to the truth?"
"Does an insider really know all this and tell it to a tabloid?"
"According to the gossip police, absolutely not."



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cooper is back as SkySeyfried plays Sophie once again...”
““I think he has the same kind of issues that I would have if we were hanging out with his ex-girlfriend from long ago,” she told The Mirror.”
“Here We Go Again FREE now and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“The pair fell in love after appearing in the first movie together, back in 2008.”
“Their relationship didn’t last, and Seyfried is now happily married to Tom Sadoski - with whom she has a child.”


"Cooper is back, and Skye fried is playing Sophie again..."
"I think he'll have the same problem with my ex girlfriend a long time ago," she told the mirror
"Now that we're free again, we won't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"They fell in love after their first movie together in 2008."
"Their relationship didn't last, and Seyfried is now happily married to Tom Sadowski - she has a child with him."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Avengers: Infinity War releases on April 27.”
“Good luck finding another Avenger named Chris.” Oh, Thor had also replied to Ben Affleck, saying, “Sorry mate not my fault!”
“Marvel vs DC: It’s on!”
“Thor Odinson, who also goes by the name of Chris Hemsworth, has ‘threatened’ not to come on TV host Jimmy Kimmel’s show after latter revealed himself for the treacherous person he is, someone who sides with team Batman.”
“Chris Hemsworth also challenged Jimmy Kimmel to find “another Avenger named Chris.” It seems Kimmel, a mortal and surely not a superhero, is stuck in this altercation of superheroes and he had to choose sides.”
“It all started with Ben Affleck, who plays Batman in DC’s film universe, and when he quoted a ‘news’ report stating that Matt Damon has replaced Ben Affleck with Chris Hemsworth as his new best friend.”
“Is there going to be a battle between the God of Thunder and the Dark Knight?”
“Affleck said to Hemsworth that he can have Damon, and that he is team Jimmy Kimmel ‘anyways’.”
““Hey @chrishemsworth, you can have him!”
“I’m Team @JimmyKimmel anyways,” he said.”


Avenger: Infinite War will be released on April 27
"Good luck finding another Avenger named Chris." Oh, and Thor said to Ben Affleck, "I'm sorry, man, it's not my fault!"
"Miracle vs. Washington: Here we go!"
"Thor odinson, also known as Chris Hemsworth, has" threatened "not to be on TV host Jimmy Kimmel's show because the latter revealed that he is a perfidious man, a man on Batman's side."
Chris Hemsworth also challenged Jimmy Kimmel to find "Chris the other avenger.". It seems that Kimmel, a mortal, of course not a superhero, has fallen into a superhero quarrel, and he has to choose his own position
"It all started with Ben Affleck, who played Batman in the Washington film universe, when he quoted a 'news' report that Matt Damon had replaced Ben Affleck with Chris Hemsworth as his new friend."
"Will there be a battle between Thor and the dark knight?"
"Affleck told Hemsworth that he could have Damon and that he was Jimmy Kimmel's" anyway. "
"Hey @ Chris Hemsworth, you can have him!"
"I'm on Jimmy Kimmel's team anyway," he said



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He’ll just order lemon water or a cup of green tea!” a source confided.”
“But they told Radar the funnyman simply won’t EAT!”
“...meals with them...”
“Another worried friend said He s putting nothing else in his body and he s starting to look like a prisoner of war Although his reps deny the story the star s pals have tried to coax him into having...”
““ALL he does is paint and drink detox juices for days at a time!"”
“The 56-year-old star has been “hiding out in his L.A. art studio,” the spy dished.”
“Pals of the star fear “Cathriona’s death and the brutal battles with her family have taken a toll,” the source spilled.”
“Click through to see the frightening photos of Carrey's drastic weight loss.”
“Jim was cleared of wrongdoing , but his personal demons continue to torture him.”
“Following the 2015 overdose death of his former girlfriend , the rubber-faced comic was eaten alive by stress over lawsuits from her family.”


"He just needs lemonade or green tea!"! "A source said
"But they told radar that comedians don't eat at all!"
__ Eat with them... "
"Another worried friend said that he didn't put anything in his body, and he began to look like a prisoner of war, although his representative denied the story of the star's friends trying to cajole him..."
"All he does is paint and drink detoxification juice for several days in a row!"
The 56 year old star has been "hiding in an art studio in Los Angeles," the spy said
"The star's friends fear" that Catherine's death and her brutal fight with her family have caused damage, "the source said
"Click to see the horror photos of Kerry's massive weight loss."
Jim is ruled out of lawlessness, but his personal demons are still tormenting him
"After his ex girlfriend died of drug overdose in 2015, the rubber faced comedian was eaten alive by the lawsuit pressure of his family."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — are you surprised North is reportedly not responding well to her little sister?”
“After all, North is older now and the baby is a girl, which Nori had reportedly been wanting all along.”
“HL learned exclusively she’s having a hard time adjusting & is desperate for attention.”
“It seems like North West, 4, only JUST got used to her little brother Saint West, 2, and now she already has another younger sibling in the fam!”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, and Kanye West, 40, welcomed their third child, a little girl, on Jan. 15 via surrogate, and while the two couldn’t be happier about having another daughter, Nori is apparently not very pleased.”
“We’ve heard the youngster loves her new sister, but is having a tough time accepting that she’s no longer the only daughter in the house.”
“On top of that, the new baby is obviously getting all of her parents’ attention right now.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of the Kardashian-Wests.”
“HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““ North had a hard time adjusting to Saint’s arrival and now she is also having difficulty with so much attention being placed on her new sister.” Let’s keep in mind though that North is just a child, and change is difficult for ANYONE.”


"Tell us, Hollywood stars - are you surprised that North didn't react well to her sister?"
"After all, north is old now, the child is a girl, and it's reported that nori has always wanted this."
"It's hard for her to adapt and she's very eager for attention."
"It seems that the 4-year-old northwest just adapted to his 2-year-old brother, St. West, and now he has another brother at home!"
"Kim Kardashian, 37, and Kanye West, 40, welcomed their third child, a little girl, through a surrogate mother on January 15. Although they are very happy to have another daughter, nori is obviously not very happy."
"We heard that the young man loved her new sister very much, but it was hard to accept that she was no longer the only daughter in the family."
"In addition, the new baby is now clearly getting all the attention of her parents."
"Click here to see lovely photos of the Kardashian West couple."
"Exclusive to Hollywood life."
"It's hard for north to adapt to the arrival of the saints, and now it's hard for her to focus so much on her new sister." Let's remember that north is just a child and it's hard for anyone to change



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“— kesha (@KeshaRose) August 14, 2017Back in February 2016, Swift showed her support for Kesha with her checkbook.”
“On Monday morning the Praying singer tweeted a message of support for Swift after former DJ David Mueller filed a lawsuit accusing her of fabricating a story that he groped her during a meet and greet in Denver Colorado in 2013 which he claims led to him being fired and...”
“...unable to get another job in his field...”
“A judge threw out Mueller's lawsuit against Swift on Friday, while her countersuit against the former radio personality, in the amount of $1 for assault and battery, still stands, and will be deliberated by a judge on Monday.”
“MORE: Nelly Furtado Supports Taylor Swift, Says She's Had Uncomfortable Encounters With Radio Staff"[Taylor Swift], I support you always, and especially right now and admire your strength and fearlessness," Kesha wrote.”
“"Truth is always the answer."”
“.”
“@taylorswift13 i support you always, and especially right now and admire your strength and fearlessness.”
“...truth is always the answer.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"- Kesha (@ kesharose) returned to February 2016 on August 14, 2017, swift showed her support for Kesha with a checkbook."
"On Monday morning, the prayer singer tweeted a message in support of swift, after former DJ David Mueller filed a lawsuit accusing swift of fabricating a story that he fondled at a meeting in Denver Colorado in 2013, claiming that it led to Swift's dismissal..."
__ Can't find another job in his field... "
"The judge dismissed Mueller's lawsuit against swift on Friday, while her counterclaim against the former radio celebrity, the $1 assault and assault, is still valid and will be considered by the judge on Monday."
"More: Nelly fortado supports Taylor Swift, saying she had an unpleasant experience with the radio staff" [Taylor Swift], and I've always supported you, especially now, and I admire your strength and fearlessness, "Kesha wrote
"The truth is always the answer."
_._
"@ Taylor swift13 I have always supported you, especially now, I admire your strength and fearlessness."
__︹ The truth is always the answer



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
““She also wants to spend more time with her friends before they all pass on.”And she hasn’t totally given up on acting.”
“Inside 95-Year-Old Betty White's Bucket List The 'Golden Girls' star is ready to travel the world — and release a tell-all book.”
“Betty White is planning to quit TV acting at 95 to check items off her bucket list!”
“RadarOnline.com can reveal the surprising things the TV legend, who won Emmys playing Sue Ann Nivens on The Mary Tyler Moore Show and Rose Nylund on The Golden Girls, still plans to accomplish before hitting 100 — including Broadway theater, wild adventures and even romance!”
“After the cancellation of her TV series Hot in Cleveland in 2014, White’s telling pals she’s closing up shop.”
““She feels she can live to 100 and has other things she wants to do with her life,” a friend says.”
“Topping her list is travel.”
“Instead of visiting cushy resorts, she’s planning on a real adventure.”
““Betty says she wants to go on an African safari,” reveals her pal.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"She also wants to spend more time with her friends before they all die." She hasn't given up acting completely
"In the bucket list of 95 year old Betty White, the 'golden girl' star is going to travel around the world - and publish a book about everything."
"Betty White is going to quit TV at the age of 95 and check all the items on her wish list!"
_ RadarOnline.com The TV legend, who won the Emmy for Sue Ann Nevins in the Mary Taylor Moore Show and rose Nylund in the golden girl, still plans to accomplish some amazing things before entering the top 100 - Broadway theater, wild adventure and even romance
"In 2014, after the cancellation of White's TV series hot in Cleveland, she told her friends that she was going to close down."
A friend said, "she thinks she can live to be 100 years old and wants to do other things with her life."
"Her favorite is tourism."
"Instead of going to a relaxing resort, she planned a real adventure."
"Betty said she wanted to travel to Africa," her friend revealed



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WENN”
“Hit the flip for the latest scantily clad pics of Kylie.”
“Nobody is off limits in this family riiiight?”
“...never thought Blac Chyna and Rob would be a thing...”
“To make matters even worse Tristan s not exactly known for being Mr Fidelity Tristan dumped his pregnant girlfriend for Khloe so it s certainly in his nature to cheat Seems like a pretty unlikely story but then again we...”
““If he made a move on her she’d totally go there,” warned the source, adding the situation could become explosive quite quickly, especially since Kardashian, 32, and Thompson’s relationship has hit some major speed bumps.”
““She’s got it bad for Tristan and has even told friends that he’s way too hot for Khloe,” said the insider.”
“We’ve heard some pretty skanky stories about Kylie that have included some of her sister’s exes, but the new reports say that this time around Kylie’s really got it bad.”
“The insider points out that in the past she’s managed to grow cozy with Kendall’s guys, Kourtney’s ex, Scott Disick, and Kim’s husband, Kanye West.”
“...first time Jenner 19 has gone after one of her sister s love interests...”


"Wen"
"Click to turn the page to see Kelly's latest photo of exposed clothes."
"No one at home is forbidden?"
__ Never thought Blake chener and rob would be the same thing... "
"What's worse, Tristan is not famous for Mr. fidelity. Tristan left his pregnant girlfriend to Chloe, so his inborn deception seems to be an unlikely story, but after all, we..."
"If he does anything to her, she will definitely go," the source warned, warning that the situation could soon become explosive, especially when the relationship between Kardashian, 32, and Thompson has experienced some major slowdown
"She was very bad to Tristan and even told friends that he was too hot for Chloe," the person familiar with the matter said
"We've heard some bad stories about Kelly, including some of her sister's predecessors, but new reports say Kelly is really bad this time."
"The person pointed out that in the past, she managed to get along well with Kendall's staff, Courtney's ex girlfriend Scott Disick and Kim's husband Kanye West."
__ Jenna, 19, pursued a love hobby of her sister for the first time



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“She’s crazy about him!”Source: AKM-GSIDo you think Kanye should worry about Kim’s obsession with Tony?”
“Kim thinks Tony’s ‘God’ and literally hung off every word.”
““She was like a star-struck Beatles fan.”
“Source: AKM-GSIIt looks Kanye’s huge ego is in trouble because of Tony.”
““Kanye was so embarrassed and pissed about it – he’s never seen her like this,” continued the source.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: AKM-GSIApparently Kanye did not like the situation at all.”
“She’s read all his books and watched all his motivational videos, but nothing could prepare her for the man in person.”Source: AKM-GSI“Kim’s had such a mad crush on Tony for so long she actually started welling up in tears,” the source added.”
“...that “Kim’s a life-long fan of Tony.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: AKM-GSIAn insider dished to OK!”


"Voice in the comments below."
"She's crazy about him! "Source: AKM gsido do you think Kanye should worry about Kim's obsession with Tony?"
"Kim thinks Tony is' God 'and hangs up every word."
"She's like a Beatles fan."
"Source: AKM gsiit looks like Kanye's great self is in trouble because of Tony."
"Kanye is very embarrassed and angry about this - he has never seen her like this," the source continued
"The article continues with the following advertising source: AKM gsiapparently Kanye doesn't like this at all."
"She read all his books and watched all his inspirational videos, but nothing prepared her for this man." Source: akm-gsi "Kim was so crazy about Tony for so long that she started to cry," the source added
"Kim is a lifelong fan of Tony"
The following continues the article advertisement source: the AKM gsian inside story explodes may



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s so much fun.” Aw!”
““He of course would love to be a father of his own but he is also a little scared about doing it as well.”
“Find out here why he’s not forcing things!”
“Blake Shelton, 41, has gushed about being a “stepdad” to Gwen Stefani‘s, 48, three sons countless times.”
“He’s made it clear that he not only fell in love with Gwen over two years ago, but he also fell hard for her children — and it shows too!”
“But that doesn’t mean the country crooner isn’t game to have a baby of his own with Gwen.”
“In fact, Blake would reportedly “love” to become a biological father.”
“So what’s holding him back?”
“He’s apparently leaving it all up to Gwen!”
“Click here to see pics of Gwen and Blake’s relationship milestones.”


"It's so interesting." Ah
"He wants to be his own father, of course, but he's a little afraid of doing the same."
"Look why he didn't force me!"
"Blake Shelton, 41, keeps on saying that he is the 'stepfather' of Gwen Stefani's three sons, 48."
"He made it clear that not only did he fall in love with Gwen two years ago, but he also fell deeply in love with her children - and that's what he said!"
"But that doesn't mean the country singer doesn't want to have children with Gwen."
"In fact, it is reported that Blake will" love "to become his own father."
"So what hindered him?"
"He obviously left it all to Gwen!"
"Click here to see a photo of Gwen and black's relationship milestone."



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pink"Speak to a Girl," Tim McGraw & Faith HillMusician of the YearJerry Douglas (Dobro)Paul Franklin (Steel Guitar)Dann Huff (Guitar)Mac McAnally (Guitar) -- WINNERDerek Wells (Guitar)”
“Rhiannon Giddens"Setting the World on Fire," Kenny Chesney feat.”
“Maren Morris"Funny How Time Slips Away," Glen Campbell with Willie Nelson -- WINNER"Kill A Word," Eric Church feat.”
“Lambert Vocal Group of the Year Lady Antebellum Little Big Town WINNER Old Dominion Rascal Flatts Zac Brown Band Musical Event of the Year Craving You Thomas Rhett feat...”
“Antebellum The Nashville Sound Jason Isbell and the 400 Unit The Weight of These Wings Miranda Lambert Song of the Year Better Man Little Big Town WINNER Blue Ain t Your Color Keith Urban Body Like A Back Road Sam Hunt Dirt On My Boots Jon Pardi Tin Man Miranda...”
“Better Man Little Big Town Blue Ain t Your Color Keith Urban WINNER Body Like A Back Road Sam Hunt Dirt On My Boots Jon Pardi Tin Man Miranda Lambert Album of the Year The Breaker Little Big Town From A Room Volume 1 Chris Stapleton WINNER Heart Break Lady...”
“Maren Morris Craving You Miranda Lambert Vice Brothers Osborne It Ain t My Fault WINNER Vocal Duo of the Year Dan Shay Florida Georgia Line LOCASH Maddie Tae Brothers Osborne WINNER Entertainer of the Year Garth Brooks WINNER Luke Bryan Eric Church Chris Stapleton Keith Urban Single of the Year...”
“...of the Year Little Big Town Better Man Keith Urban Blue Ain t Your Color Thomas Rhett feat...”
“Female Vocalist of the Year Kelsea Ballerini Miranda Lambert WINNER Reba McEntire Maren Morris Carrie Underwood Male Vocalist of the Year Dierks Bentley Eric Church Thomas Rhett Chris Stapleton WINNER Keith Urban New Artist of the Year Luke Combs Old Dominion Jon Pardi WINNER Brett Young Lauren Alaina Music Video...”


"Pink" said to a girl, "Tim McGraw and Faith Hill musician of the year Jerry Douglas (Dobro) Paul Franklin (steel guitar) Dan harf (guitar) Mike McNally (guitar) - wennard rexwells (guitar)"
"Giddens lit the world," says Kenny Chesney
"Marlene Morris" funny time goes by, "Glen Campbell and Willie Nelson - the winner" kill a word, "Eric church feat."
"Lambert vocal group of the year women's pre war town champion old Dominic hooligan fratzzak brown band music event of the year yearning for you Thomas Rhett feat..."
"Pre war Nashville voice Jason isbel and 400 units of weight these wings Miranda Lambert song of the year better man small town champion blue is not your color Keith city body is like a back door Sam Hunter clay my boots Jon padisi Miranda..."
"Better people small town blue is not your color Keith City champion's body is like a back door Sam hunt my boots on the dirt Jon padisi Miranda Lambert's annual album from a room break small town Volume 1 christepton champion heartbroken lady..."
"Marlene Morris yearns for you, Miranda Lambert, deputy brother Osborne. It's not my fault to win the best vocal duet of the year danshey Florida Georgia line Lucas madity brothers Osborne artist of the year Garth Brooks award Luke Bryan Eric church Chris Stapleton Keith city single of the year..."
__ This year's good guy in town Keith city blue is not your color Thomas Rhett's feat... "
"Female singer of the year Kelsey Ballerini Miranda Lambert winner Reba McColl Marlene Morris Carrie Underwood male singer of the year Dirks Bentley Eric church Thomas reed Chris Stapleton winner Keith Urban Best New Artist of the year Luke cooms old Dominic Jon paddy winner Brett young Lauren Alena music video... "



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Selena’s song “Fetish?” Do you love it as much as Taylor does?”
“Sadly we’re probably going to have to wait until early 2018 for new music from Tay, but at least we’ve got Sel’s new jams in the meantime!”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how they stay connected despite their distance.”
“She’s baaaack!”
“Taylor Swift 27 has been MIA for nearly all of 2017 but she came out of her self imposed hiatus to congratulate pal Selena Gomez 24 on her dreamy new single Fetish In her first Instagram post in over two months she shared Sultry pop magic from this dreamy almost...”
“...birthday girl along with the pic from the single s art...”
“Even though the ladies don’t see much of each other these days, they find ways to stay connected.”
““Taylor has Selena’s back 100% they will always be besties.”
“But life has a way of putting distance between even the best of friends.”
“Truth is, Taylor and Selena don’t talk as much as they would like to, but the longtime friends are still close and give each other advice all the time,” a music industry source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


Holly bug, what do you think of Serena's song "fetishism"? "Do you like it as much as Taylor?"
"Unfortunately, we may have to wait until early 2018 to receive tye's new music, but at least we also received Searle's new album!"
"We provided exclusive details about how they kept in touch, despite the distance."
"She's bayak!"
"Taylor Swift, 27, was MIA almost all the time in 2017, but she stepped out of her imposed intermission. In her first instagram post in more than two months, she congratulated pal Selena Gomez 24 on her dreamy new single fetishism, and she shared this dreamy almost..."
__ Birthday girl and single s art photos... "
"Although women don't see much now, they still try to keep in touch."
"Tyler supports Serena 100 percent and they will always be good friends."
"But there's a way in life that even the best friend can keep a distance."
"The fact is that Tyler and Selena are not as much as they want to say, but the old friends are still very close and have been giving advice to each other," a person in the music industry told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



**Something goes wrong**
““They started telling friends a few weeks ago,” said the source.”
““Kylie is very happy.”BABY ON BOARD — SEPTEMBER 2017In September, multiple sources told PEOPLE the Kylie Lip Kit creator was pregnant with her first child.”
““They also talked a lot.”
“Later, the couple headed to Boston’s Theater District where Scott made an appearance at Bijou nightclub“He was definitely looking for something intimate,” one club-goer told PEOPLE.”
“Located just outside Boston in the town of Waltham, Bentley was celebrating their annual Spring Day, which always included a big a concert on campus featuring Scott.”
“A SHOW OF SUPPORT — APRIL 2017Jenner headed to Bentley University outside Boston to support her beau.”
“Once he got back, they definitely looked like a couple, cuddled up next to each other among her friends,” said the onlooker, who attended the game and spotted Jenner kissing Scott’s neck.”
“...courtside club anxiously waiting for him to come back to her...”
“According to an onlooker at the Houston Rockets vs Oklahoma City Thunder game where Scott performed before tip off the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and the hip hop artist were spotted holding hands and definitely looked like a couple During his performance Kylie was hiding in the Rockets...”
“PACKING ON PDA — APRIL 2017Image zoom Credit: Bob Levey/GettyA few weeks after hanging out at Coachella together, the couple seemed to make their love official by getting cuddly at an NBA playoff game in Houston, Texas.”


"They started telling friends a few weeks ago," the source said
"Kelly is very happy." Baby on board, -2017, September, September, a number of sources told people that Kylie's Lipstick maker was pregnant with her first child.
"They talked a lot, too."
"Later, the couple went to the theater district of Boston, and Scott showed up at the bijo nightclub," a frequent nightclub guest told people. "He must be looking for something intimate."
Bentley, in Waltham, a suburb of Boston, is celebrating their annual spring day, when there is always a big campus concert attended by Scott
"Support - in April 2017, Jenna went to Bentley university outside Boston to support her boyfriend."
"When he came back, they looked absolutely like a couple, hugging each other among her friends," bystanders said. He took part in the competition and found Jenna kissing Scott on the neck
__ The stadium club is anxiously waiting for him to come back to her... "
"According to a bystander in the Houston Rockets Oklahoma thunder game, Scott performed" keep up with Kardashian "before receiving the report, and the hip-hop artist was found holding hands. During the performance, Kelly must be hiding in the Rockets like a couple..."
"Package on PDA - April 2017 photo zooming credit: after Bob Levi / gaitia played together in cochella for a few weeks, the couple seemed to express their love by embracing at the NBA playoffs in Houston, Texas."



**Something goes wrong**
“Forgive me for the mild eyeroll I popped when it was brought up as if we’re all blood members of a secret cult.””
““It was never some exclusive club or secret society, but a wide circle of people, some of whom I know, and some who I’ve never met, like most wide groups of friends.”
“She also expounded on the flaws of describing Swift’s group of friends as a “squad.” “I’ve always found people’s perception of this ‘squad’ idea frustrating in the past,” she wrote.”
“For one, Lorde noted that while some had thought she was referencing Swift as an “idol,” she was really just referring to David Bowie and Patti Smith, who she’d mentioned earlier in the interview.”
“...recent years and isn t calling her idols for advice...”
“All of them Lorde did however take the opportunity to elaborate on the initial quote she gave in her interview where she seemed to say that she doesn t hang out much with the famous friends she s made in...”
“I want to say one more time that Taylor has been there for me in all my dark and light moments these past five years.”
“… Really sh–ty to wake up to headlines about whether or not you’ve jumped ship on someone you deeply respect and ride for.”
““I love her very much.”
““Taylor is a dear friend,” she wrote.”


"Excuse me, when I mentioned it, I gave a little wink as if we were all members of a secret cult."
"It's never been an exclusive club or secret society, it's a wide circle of people I know, some I've never met, just like most of my friends."
She also described the flaw in describing Swift's group of friends as a "team.". "In the past, the perception of this' team 'concept has always been frustrating," she wrote
"First of all, Lord pointed out that although some people thought she was referring to swift as an 'Idol', in fact she was referring only to David Bowie and Patty Smith, whom she mentioned earlier in the interview."
__ In recent years, I didn't call her idol for advice... "
"However, all of these people took the opportunity to elaborate on her initial quotation in the interview. She seemed to say that she didn't spend much time with her famous friends..."
"I want to say again that Taylor has been with me in the dark and the light of the last five years."
__ I'm really glad to wake up on the headlines and see if you've jumped on someone you respect and support. "
"I love her very much."
"Taylor is a good friend of mine," she wrote



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch the moment he saves Meghan from falling over at family wedding...”
“Princess Michael previously hinted that the apartment will be free for new residents some day telling Tatler back in 2014 that Prince William and Kate have a lovely big apartment next to the Gloucesters who I think will leave their...”
“...to replace the roof...”
“The Duke and Duchess of Gloucester currently reside in the 21-bedroom home, which is located right next door to Prince William and Kate, who live in Apartment 1A.”
“According to the annual Sovereign Grant report: "The existing roof required complete renewal after years of patch repairs, evidence of batten decay and structural defects in some chimneys."”
“The couple are rumoured to move into a new apartment at Kensington Palace It has been reported that upon announcing their engagement in 2017 the Duke and Duchess of Gloucester offered to give up their home and will be moving...”
“...to the Queen s former secretary s former home although they remained in the apartment for the 11 months the renovations were taking place and a palace spokesperson confirmed that the pair still live in Apartment 1 and that is...”
“...continuing to be the case...”
“...enormous apartment because their children have gone...”
“VIDEO: Prince Harry to the rescue!”


"Watching him save Megan at the family wedding..."
"Princess Michael has previously hinted that this apartment will be open to new residents for free one day. As early as 2014, she told tattler that Prince William and Kate have a lovely big apartment next to the Gloucesters. I think they will leave them..."
__ Replace the roof... "
The Duke and Duchess of Gloucester currently live in the 21 bedroom flat, next door to Prince William and Kate, where they live in apartment 1a
According to the annual sovereign funding report, "after years of repair, evidence of rotten wood strips and structural defects in some chimneys, the existing roof needs to be completely renovated."
"It is rumored that the couple will move into a new flat at Kensington Palace. According to reports, after the Duke of Gloucester and his wife announced their engagement in 2017, they proposed to give up their house and move... "
__︹ Going to the former residence of the Queen's former Secretary, although they have been in the apartment for 11 months, they are in the process of renovation. A palace spokesman confirmed that they are still living in apartment 1, that is... "
__ Continue with this... "
__ Huge apartments, because their children are gone... "
Video: Prince Harry to rescue



**Something goes wrong**
“Check out the BTS clips and the NSFW “Needed Me” video below.”
“The features also show Rihanna riding a motorcycle and, of course, chilling in her see-through gown.”
“The new skill comes in handy during the climax of the “Needed Me” video, in which she catches a body in a strip club.”
“Rihanna released a pair of behind-the-scenes videos today (April 25), and Part 2 features her learning how to shoot a gun.”
““Needed Me,” which dropped on 4/20, follows that trend to a T, with a key difference being how the ANTI songstress had to go through some extra training to pull the video off.”
“Strippers, nudity, and violence have been common motifs in Rihanna’s recent visuals.”


"Please check out the BTS clip and the nsfw" need me "video below."
"These close ups also show Rihanna riding a motorcycle and, of course, wearing a transparent robe is creepy."
In the climax of the "need me" video, new techniques come in handy as she catches a body in a strip club
"Rihanna released a pair of behind the scenes videos today (April 25). The second part is that she learns how to shoot."
"Need me" was released on April 20, following this trend to the T-class. The key difference is how the female singer completes the video with extra training
"Strippers, nudity and violence are common themes in Rihanna's recent works."



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: MEGADid this vacation also include them getting MARRIED?”
“Did Kourtney Kardashian and Younes Bendjima just get married during their vacation in Rome?”
“The mother-of-three just posted a major wedding photo on her Instagram stories Tuesday.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAThe two were spotted hand in hand while vacationing in Rome this week.”
“Source: MEGAKourtney showed off her assets in a black bra and baggy green pants, while Younes looked relaxed in his t-shirt and jeans combo.”
“Don't forget about her Fendi purse that she was carrying, as it was sort of hard to miss!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGADinner was also on the menu during their beautiful vacation, as they were seen feasting it up with one another on Tuesday.”
“Kourtney has been sharing photos from her trip all over social media, which included a major wedding snap that was a "blink and you miss it" kind of thing on her Instagram stories.”
“Source: MEGADo you think wedding bells are in the future for Kourtney and Younes?”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Source: Megan, does this holiday also include their marriage?"
Did Courtney Kardashian and yones benjima get married on holiday in Rome? "
"The mother of three just released an important wedding photo on instagram on Tuesday."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: Mega, the two were found holding hands while vacationing in Rome this week."
"Source: megacourtney shows off her assets in a black bra and baggy green pants, while younes looks relaxed in his T-shirt and jeans combination."
"Don't forget the findy purse she has with her, because it's hard to miss!"
The article continues below. Source: megadiner was also on the menu during their beautiful holiday, because they were seen eating and drinking together on Tuesday
"Coultney has been sharing her travel photos on social media, including an important wedding snapshot, in her instagram story, a 'blink, you missed' or something."
"Source: Megane, do you think the wedding bells of Courtney and yones will ring in the future?"



**Something goes wrong**
“The spy shared: “It’s all about spending quality time together, but still giving each other space during the workday.”AdvertisementThe best of luck to DeGeneres and de Rossi.”
“That’s why they’ve been seen out and about more together lately.”The very pricey therapy sessions have led to the following conclusion, for a relationship to work the two parties should know when to take part in the same activities and when to give each other breathing room.”
“The two are going on the therapist-recommended date nights as part of a last-ditch effort to save their troubled union.”The insider elaborated: “Part of their therapy is to go on more date nights.”
“According to a spy with links to the “Coneheads” star: “After eight years of marriage, Ellen DeGeneres and Portia de Rossi are dating again.”
“The host of “Ellen DeGeneres Show” and “The Night We Called It a Day” star are also going on date nights to reconnect and discover why they fell in love in the first place.”
“Despite the rumors, the pair is determined to stick together like glue and have been going through therapy to make it work.”
“Other allegations that hounded the power couple included fights over children and de Rossi dreamed of motherhood while DeGeneres was not interested.”
“Some rumors claimed that de Rossi was jealous of her wife’s fame and wealth.”
“The honeymoon did not last very long, head spinning scandals have plagued DeGeneres and de Rossi’s relationship.”
“The ceremony was attended by the biggest names in Hollywood and by their four dogs and three cats.”


"It's all about having a good time together, but still giving each other space on weekdays," the spy shared Good luck to DeGeneres and de Rossi
"That's why they've been hanging out a lot lately." Very expensive treatment leads to the following conclusion: in order for a relationship to work properly, both parties should know when to participate in the same activities and when to give each other breathing space
"The two are having a date night recommended by a therapist as part of a final effort to save their troubled marriage." "Part of their treatment is to continue more date nights," the person explained
"Eight years after their marriage, Ellen DeGeneres and Portia de Rossi are dating again," according to a spy linked to the owl star
The hosts and stars of the "Ellen DeGeneres Show" and "the night we call it the day" will also get back in touch on date night and find out why they fell in love
"Despite the rumors, the two are determined to stick together like glue and have been receiving treatment to make it work."
"Other charges against the powerful couple include fighting for their children. De Rossi dreams of being a mother, but DeGeneres is not interested in it."
"There is a rumor that de Rossi is jealous of her wife's fame and fortune."
"Honeymoon did not last long, dizzy scandal has been plagued by the relationship between DeGeneres and de Rossi
"The ceremony was attended by Hollywood celebrities, their four dogs and three cats."



**Something goes wrong**
““She can’t take it anymore.””
““Kim is tired of covering for him and putting out fires that he keeps creating,” added the insider.”
“With two young children and an infant at home, it’s just gotten out of hand.”
“While the KKW Beauty mogul was willing to put up with Kanye’s antics then, she’s had enough.”
“John Legend and wife Chrissy Teigen both unfollowed Kanye in the wake of his “MAGA” tweets, Pedestrian reports, as did Harry Styles, Kendrick Lamar, Rihanna, Teyana Taylor, and Travis Scott.”
“In fact, Kim didn’t just risk family, but friends too!”
“Even after her sisters Kylie, Khloé, and Kourtney all unfollowed Kanye on Twitter for his Trump-loving rant, she defended him.”
““He doesn’t believe Kim is always there for him.”Despite the 40-year-old’s reservations about his wife’s support, Kim has been on Team Kanye since the beginning — making his claims all the more outlandish.”
“In fact, he “disagrees and blames ‘selfish’ Kim for their issues,” noted the source.”
““She accuses Kanye of being selfish.” Kanye definitely doesn’t see things that way.”


"She can't stand it."
"Kim Jong Il is tired of covering for him and putting out the fires he keeps making," the person familiar with the matter added
"With two children and a baby in the family, it's out of control."
"Although kkw was willing to put up with Kanye's antics at that time, she had enough."
"Neither John Legend nor his wife, Chrissy Teigen, followed Kanye's" Maga "tweets and pedestrian reports, nor did Harry stiles, Kendrick Lamar, Rihanna, Tiana Taylor and Travis Scott."
"In fact, Kim risks not only his family, but also his friends!"
"Even if her sisters Kelly, Heroe and Courtney all tweeted to defend Kanye's bluster, she defended him."
"He doesn't believe Kim Jong Il will always support him." Despite the 40 year old's reservations about his wife's support, Kim joined the Kanye team from the beginning, which makes his story even more bizarre
"In fact, he" disagreed and accused 'selfish' Kim of their problems, "the source noted
"She accused Kanye of being selfish." Kanye won't see things that way. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Their split, admits a Pitt source, “came down to differences in lifestyle and parenting.”For much more on Jolie and Pitt’s bitter split, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now.”
“Jolie filed for divorce on September 19 and requested full physical custody of the children.”
“For years the parents of Maddox 15 Pax 12 Zahara 11 Shiloh 10 and 8 year old twins Knox and Vivienne shuttled between their 1 000 acre estate Château Miraval in France a compound in L A s Los Feliz neighborhood a mansion in New Orleans French Quarter a New...”
“York City penthouse and wherever the actors happened to be working...”
“As Jolie explained to NBC News in 2011, “I’m trying to raise [the children] to … really live a truly global [life].”Pitt, 52, grew to resent the peripatetic existence.”
“As far back as 2009, a source told Us at the time, Pitt wanted to enroll the kids in one school in New Orleans, while Jolie preferred homeschooling to allow them to continue their travels.”
““Brad wants them to have a normal upbringing and worries that they’ll come out spoiled, elitist and not grounded,” the source said at the time.”
““But Angie feels they should be ‘children of the world.’ They argue about it all the time: heated, screaming fights.”In a 2012 interview, the Oscar-winner, 41, acknowledged Pitt was the tougher parent of the two.”
““Brad’s had to play bad cop more often,” she said.”
“But according to a Jolie friend, Pitt was too strict for his wife’s liking.”


One of Pete's sources admitted that their breakup "was ultimately a difference in lifestyle and parenting." For more information about Julie and Pitt's painful breakup, see the new issue of American weekly, which is now in the stands
"Julie filed for divorce on September 19 and asked for full physical custody of her child."
"Over the years, the parents of Maddox, 15, 12 Zahara, 11 Shiloh, 10-year-old and 8-year-old twins Knox and Vivian have been shuttling through their 1000 acre French Chateau miraval, a courtyard in Los Angeles Los Feliz community, and the French Quarter of New Orleans A mansion and a new... "
"The attic of York and the place where the actors work..."
"As Julie explained to NBC news in 2011," I'm trying to raise [the children] Live a truly global life. " Pitt, 52, began to feel dissatisfied with the wandering life
"Back in 2009, a source told us that at that time, Pete wanted his children to go to a school in New Orleans, while Julie preferred to go to school at home and let them continue to travel."
"Brad wants them to have a normal growth environment and worries that they will be spoiled by the elite rather than down-to-earth," the source said at the time
"But Angie thinks they should be" children of the world. ". They've been arguing about this: a fierce, screaming argument. " In an interview in 2012, the 41 year old Oscar winner admitted that Pitt was the tougher parent of the two
"Brad had to play bad cop a lot," she said
"But according to a friend of Julie's, Pete is too strict with his wife."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Swift went to the Met Gala, the night she and Hiddleston hit it off, alone.”
“In the released song the lyric is I ve got a boyfriend He s older than us He s in the club doing I don t know what which led some to believe the line was about Calvin Harris DJ who s 33 or Tom Hiddleston British actor 36 the...”
“...last boyfriend Swift was with before getting with Alwyn she dated Hiddleston immediately after Harris...”
“But in a new behind-the-scenes, making of the song video that AT&T released today, Swift sings her original lyrics for the song.”
“She toys with the I ve got a boyfriend line for a bit and during one song writing session seems keen on this lyric which leads into the You re so gorgeous chorus I ve got a boyfriend he s older than us I haven t seen him in a...”
“...couple of months I go through phases when it comes to love I m nothing that you want but I must say you re so gorgeous Watch it at the 3 00 mark This content is imported from YouTube...”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“At first glance, this could suggest the ex Swift is singing about is Harris; the two spent a lot of their relationship apart because of Swift touring for 1989 and Harris playing DJ gigs around the world.”
“But Swift dated Hiddleston right before being seen for the first time with Alwyn in October 2016.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Swift went to the met alone, and that night she hit it off with sidleston."
"The lyrics in this song are that I have a boyfriend who is older than us, what he does in the club, I don't know, which leads some people to believe that this sentence is about Calvin Harris DJ who is 33 years old or Tom sidleston, British actor 36..."
__ Last boyfriend Swift was with Alvin, and she dated sidleston after Harris
"But in the song video released by at & T today, swift sang her original lyrics for the song."
"She played with the lines of one of my boyfriends for a while. At a song writing meeting, she seemed to be very interested in the lyrics. This song led to the" you are so gorgeous "chorus. I have a boyfriend, who is older than us. I am in a school
"In the past few months, I have experienced the stage of love. I am not anything you want, but I must say you are too beautiful. At 3 o'clock, this content was imported from YouTube..."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"At first glance, it may mean that former swift sang Harris; thanks to Swift's 1989 tour and Harris's DJ concerts around the world, the two spent a lot of time emotionally."
"But swift dated sidleston before meeting Alvin for the first time in October 2016."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo: AOL”
“She by no means look “skeletal,” and there is nothing “shocking” about the photos.”
“No remaining baby weight was apparent in her now stick-thin frame,” the outlet continues, noting, “George too seemed off, as he flashed a shocked, cold look at the cameras while walking with his wife.”
“The duo seemed to want to avoid attention as they left the court.”You think?”
“Like most famous couples, the Clooneys don’t like being followed by paparazzi.”
“It’s no wonder George appeared unhappy.”
“As for his wife, there was nothing “odd” about her appearance, despite the online publication using that description twice.”
“While this story is written as if Clooney only gave birth just a few “weeks” ago, the twins actually arrived on June 6, nearly 12 weeks ago.”
“That’s more than just a few.”
“And at nearly three months post-partum, it is not unreasonable that the attorney is back to her normally slim frame.”


"Photo: AOL"
"She's not 'skinny' at all, and there's nothing 'shocking' about her photos."
"I can't see the weight of a baby in her thin body now," the media continued. "When George and his wife were walking, he flashed a shocked and cold look in front of the camera and looked uncomfortable."
"When they leave the field, they seem to want to avoid attention What do you think? "
"Like most famous couples, the clooneys don't like being followed by paparazzi."
"No wonder George looks unhappy."
As for his wife, there's nothing "strange" about her appearance, although online publications have used that description twice
"Although the story looks like Clooney gave birth only a few weeks ago, the twins were actually born on June 6, nearly 12 weeks ago."
"There are more than a few."
"And in the postpartum nearly three months, the lawyer returned to the usual slim figure, this is not unreasonable."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Send him your good thoughts in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyDo you think Yeezy can power through?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyThe frequent Jay-Z collaborator revealed that he was diagnosed with a mental condition when he was 39-years old but has claimed it as a "superpower" rather than a disability.”
““Kim is tired of having to cover Kanye’s tracks and the family thinks that he may have relapsed again, or is headed for another relapse.”
“...said that Kim is sick and tired of this seemingly never ending cycle...”
“He is constantly blaming his mom s death and while the family tries to be understanding they are all tired of him using Donda s death as a reason for him to go off the rails again Source Getty Even though she always sticks by her man the source also...”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyAccording to RadarOnline Kim is worried about his sketchy behavior and a source close to her family said "Whenever anything arises that makes Kanye reflect back on Donda’s death, he gets all weird and Kim is just sick of it.”
“She died November, 10, 2007.”
“The rapper's previous meltdown occurred by the ninth anniversary of his mother's actual death day.”
“Source: GettyKanye had his first mental breakdown in November 2016 in his trainer's house, only two months after Kim was robbed in Paris.”


"Express your good ideas to him in the comments below!"
"Source: gettydo you think yeezy can power through? Do you think yeezy can make it? "
The article continues from the following source: Getty's frequent collaborators with Jay-Z revealed that he was diagnosed with a mental illness at the age of 39, but he claimed it was a "super ability" rather than a disability
"Kim is tired of covering up Kanye's whereabouts, and his family thinks he may have relapsed, or is heading for another relapse."
__︹ Kim is tired of this seemingly endless cycle... "
"He's been blaming his mother's death, and the family are trying to understand that they're tired of him using Dongda's death as the source of his cheating again, even though she always insists that her man's source is also..."
According to radaronline, Kim is worried about his reckless behavior. A source close to her family said: "whenever something happens that reminds Kanye of donda's death, he becomes very strange. Kim is just tired of it."
"She died on November 10, 2007."
"The rapper's previous collapse occurred on the ninth anniversary of his mother's actual death."
"Source: in November 2016, gertikani had his first mental breakdown at the coach's home, two months after king was robbed in Paris."



Number  96
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I have a very dry, British sense of humor and I enjoy to send myself up," she said.”
“The most recent exciting place she'd led the photographers to was Toys R Us.”
“News that August, though by then she was fully aware of just how welcome they were in town.”
“"We think L.A. has got so many really famous people, so we just kind of see ourselves as 'David and Victoria from London.'”
“So, we were completely shocked and overwhelmed, but everybody was so nice.”
“We got to the airport and everyone was saying, 'Welcome to America,' 'welcome home.'”
“You turn up in England and they just tell you to get back on a plane and get out of there...so we're very, very excited."”
“She said it would only be a matter of time before the paparazzi figured out "we're actually quite boring, we don't do that much.”
“We just hang out at home with our kids and keep ourselves to ourselves."”
“Victoria had also told W that she planned to "try and smile more for America," but that hadn't come to pass (and never would).”


"I have a very dry British sense of humor and I like to send myself up," she said
"The most exciting place she's taken photographers to recently is Toys R US."
"It was August news, but by then she was fully aware of how popular they were in the city."
"We think there are so many real celebrities in Los Angeles that we see ourselves as' David and Victoria of London '," he said
"So we were completely shocked and overwhelmed, but everyone was fine."
"When we got to the airport, everyone was saying," welcome to America. "Welcome home."
"You show up in England and they just tell you to get back on the plane and get out of there So we're very, very excited. "
"Sooner or later, she said, the paparazzi will find out," we're really bored. We don't do that much. "
"We're just at home with the kids, alone."
Victoria also told w that she planned to "smile more for America," but that didn't happen (and never will happen)



Number  97
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Beyoncé and Kim should bury the hatchet and be friends?”
““Kim’s really hurt by the way Beyoncé has treated her, even before Kanye and Jay fell out Beyoncé was always cold towards her, and Kim can’t work out why.”
“...but it seems the feeling is one-sided.”
“HollywoodLife.com has the EXCLUSIVE details on how Kim really feels about her tense relationship with the singer.”
“If we made a list of celebrities we wanted to be friends with, Beyoncé would probably take the top spot.”
“But we obviously can’t all be close with the 36-year-old goddess — not even high-profile celebrities like Kim Kardashian, 37, can get into her inner circle.”
“In fact, even though their husbands JAY-Z, 47, and Kanye West, 40, have a feud going on between them, Kim apparently still feels pretty upset that the singer won’t give her the time of day.”
““Kim would love to be friends with Beyoncé, she’s never had a problem with her, in fact she’s always looked up to her and thinks she is amazing,” a source close to the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
“She went out of her way to be nice to Beyoncé and she really wanted to be friends, but it was clear that Beyoncé didn’t feel the same way.” Ouch?!”
“Sorry Kim, but friendship might be permanently off the table.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Beyonce and Kim should be friends?"
"The way Beyonce treated her really hurt Kim. Even before Kanye fell out with Jay Chou, Beyonce was always cold to her, and Kim didn't know why."
__︹ But this feeling seems to be one-sided. "
"Hollywood life has exclusive details about Kim's real feelings about her tense relationship with the singer."
"If we make a list of celebrities we want to be friends with, Beyonce may be at the top of the list."
"But obviously we can't all get close to the 36 year old Goddess - even celebrities like Kim Kardashian, 37, can't get into her inner circle."
"In fact, despite the feud between their husband, Jay-Z, 47, and Kanye West, 40, Kim is clearly upset that the singer doesn't give her time."
A source close to the star of "keep up with Kardashian" told reporters exclusively: "Kim wants to make friends with Beyonce. She has never had any problems with Beyonce. In fact, she always respects her and thinks she is great." Hollywood life. "
"She is especially nice to Beyonce. She really wants to be a friend, but obviously Beyonce feels different." Ouch! "
"I'm sorry, Kim. Friendship may never be on the table."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Ilya S. Savenok/Getty Images]”
““[Katie Holmes] signed a clause in her quickie divorce settlement that prevents her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, like talking about him or Scientology, or publicly dating another man for five years after the divorce,” the source claimed.”
“For the last several months, Katie Holmes and her rumored boyfriend, Jamie Foxx, whom she’s been linked to since 2013, have been facing rumors of possible pregnancies, but so far, nothing has come of the reports.”
“While Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx continue to stay silent about their alleged romance despite being seen together regularly throughout North America, rumors have continued to swirl in regard to their future plans.”
“In the latest report, a source claimed Foxx might actually be planning to adopt the 10-year-old daughter of Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise, Suri Cruise, as his own.”
“Although the idea may make sense to some, especially considering Tom Cruise has reportedly been estranged from the child for the past couple of years, Gossip Cop has shot down the false report, confirming that Foxx has no plans to become Suri’s legal guardian.”
““The reporting is completely false,” Foxx’s rep told the outlet of the story.”
“Katie Holmes has not yet responded to the story.”
“Katie Holmes And Jamie Foxx Are Facing Wedding Rumors Reports Of A Tom Cruise Feud https t co Alz4uol58q Inquisitr News theinquisitr October 2 2016 Katie Holmes was married to Tom Cruise from 2006 until 2012 and while the couple does have a child together they have not appeared to...”
“...have had any contact since their split and the reason behind Cruise s absence in Suri s life has not been explained...”


"[Ilya s.savenok/getty images selected pictures]"
"(Katie Holmes) signed a clause in her express divorce agreement to prevent her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, such as talking about him or Scientology, or dating another man publicly for five years after the divorce," the source said
"In the past few months, Katie Holmes and her rumored boyfriend Jamie Foxx have been facing rumors of a possible pregnancy, but so far, no news has come out."
"Although Katie Holmes and Jamie fox are often seen together all over North America, they remain silent about the so-called love affair, and rumors about their future plans continue."
"In the latest report, a source claimed that fox may actually plan to adopt Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise's 10-year-old daughter Suri cruise as her own child."
"Although this idea may make sense to some people, especially considering that Tom Cruise has been reported to have alienated his children for the past few years, the scandal police have refuted this false report and confirmed that fox has no plans to become Suri's legal guardian."
"The report is totally false," a representative of Foxx told reporters
"Katie Holmes has not responded to this."
"Katie Holmes and Jamie fox are facing rumors about Tom Cruise's discord at their wedding. According to a survey conducted on October 2, 2016, Katie Holmes married Tom Cruise from 2006 to 2012. Although the couple did have a child together, they didn't seem to..."
__︹ They had any contact after their breakup. The reason why cruise was absent from Suri's life has not been explained yet. "



**Something goes wrong**
“AdvertisementMandy Teefey, Selena’s mom, was even reportedly hospitalized after having an argument about it with her daughter.”
“As you may know by now, Selena’s family, her mother, in particular, is heartbroken about her decision to take Justin back.”
“But despite the fact that their unexpected reunion generally made fans very happy, not everyone was all for it.”
“So sweet!”
“When the clock strikes midnight on New Year’s Eve, she wants to be with her man, wherever that may be, so she can feel Bieber’s arms around her and get a sweet kiss from him as 2018 begins,’ the insider added.”
“‘She’s happy they found their way back to each other this year and Selena’s never felt better about her future with Justin.”
“After a rocky year, and a lot of family drama surrounding Christmas, Selena’s eager to spend her New Year’s Eve with Justin,’ one source close to the singer claims.”
“‘Selena has one wish for the New Year’s Eve plans and that’s to get a romantic kiss from Justin at midnight.”
“That being said, is there really a more significant way to celebrate their fateful reunion than locking lips as a new year – that they are hopefully going to spend together – is born?”
“After showing the entire world that after years of straying from one another their love was still strong enough to bring them back together, the pair has been doing better than ever.”


"It's reported that Serena's mother, Mandy teevey, was even hospitalized because of a dispute with her daughter."
"You may already know by now that Selena's family, especially her mother, are sad about her decision to take Justin back."
"However, although their unexpected reunion usually makes fans very happy, not everyone agrees."
"Great!"
"When the clock strikes midnight on New Year's Eve, she wants to be with her man, wherever it may be, so that she can feel Bieber's arm around her and get a sweet kiss from him at the beginning of 2018," the person said
"She's very happy that they can get back together this year. Selena has never felt better about herself and Justin's future."
Serena is eager to spend New Year's Eve with Justin after a tough year and a series of family farces around Christmas, according to a person familiar with the matter
"Serena has a wish for new year's Eve, that is to get Justin's romantic kiss at midnight."
"Then again, is there a more important way to celebrate their reunion than to close your lips? They want to spend a new year together
"To show the world that, after years of isolation, their love is still strong enough to bring them back together, and they are doing better than ever before."



**Something goes wrong**
““Britney and Kevin wanted to settle… The trial that was coming up was for permanent custody.”
“...without going to trial...”
““This is my best work ever.”Britney said she is working with talented people who are helping her take her songs up a level.”
““I’m writing every day, right here at the piano in this living room,” Brit told OK!”
“Britney also provided an update on her new album, the follow up to last year’s “Blackout,” which will be out in “the next six to nine months,” the pop star said.”
“I’m sure the boys will be like big brothers to Maddie,” Britney told the mag.”
“It will be the first time the cousins meet.”
““She’s going to come out here for the kids’ birthdays.”
“Britney said Jamie Lynn will be bringing baby Maddie to Los Angeles soon, allowing the newborn to finally meet her cousins – Sean Preston, and Jayden James.”
“OK, we’re happy now!”Click HERE to view a gallery of Britney Spears photos.”


"Britney and Kevin want to make up The coming trial is permanent custody. "
__ No trial... "
"This is my best work ever." Britney says she is working with talented people who help her take her songs to the next level
"I write every day, right in front of the piano in this living room," Britt told OK
"Britney also provided updates on her new album, a sequel to last year's blackout, which will be released" in the next six to nine months, "the pop star said
"I believe the kids will be like Mardi's big brother," Britney told the magazine
"It's going to be the first time cousins meet."
"She's coming out to celebrate the children's birthday."
"Britney Spears said that Jamie Lynn will soon bring her baby Marty to Los Angeles, so that the new-born Marty will finally meet her cousins, Sean Preston and Jaden James."
"Well, we're happy now! "Click here to view Britney's photo gallery."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They tried it.””
“The photo shows Jenner, who routinely flaunts her bare midriff in crop tops and shows off her lean figure, showcasing what some thought was a bump.”
“According to Kendall Jenner, she isn’t!”
“The model has responded to speculation that she’s pregnant in the funniest — and most relatable — way possible.”
“Jenner retweeted an article questioning whether not she was expecting on Saturday, December 30, and hilariously wrote, “i just like bagels ok!!”
“!”i just like bagels ok!!!”
“...https://t.co/4IxM9ECLOs — Kendall (@KendallJenner) December 31, 2017As previously reported, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star posted a bathroom selfie on Friday, December 29, wearing a black-and-white polka dot dress.”
“The 22-year-old model captioned the selfie “loner life” with an alien emoji.”
“The photo sent fans into a frenzy as they wondered whether or not she was the fourth woman in her famous family to be expecting.”
“It’s the season of good food, good wine and good company… honestly.”One fan simply commented, “You don’t even look ‘preggers’ smh.”


"They tried."
"This photo shows Jenna often showing off her bald middle hip, her thin figure, and what some people think of as bulges."
"According to Kendall Jenner, she's not!"
"The model responded to speculation that she was pregnant, and the way she was pregnant was probably the funniest and most relevant."
Jenna forwarded an article questioning whether she would be pregnant on Saturday, December 30, and jokingly wrote, "I only like bagels, OK!"
"!" I only like bagels, OK!! "
_... https://t.co/4IxM9ECLOs Company Kendall Jenner December 31, 2017 as previously reported, the "keep up with Kardashian" star released a bathroom self portrait on December 29 (Friday), wearing a black and white polka dot dress
The 22-year-old model made the title of her selfie "a lonely life" with alien expressions
"This picture has caused fans' enthusiasm, because they want to know if she is the fourth pregnant woman in her family."
"It's a season of good food, good wine and good friends To be honest, "one fan commented simply," you don't even have the expression of a pregnant person. "



**Something goes wrong**
“This article originally appeared in the New York Post...”
“...on a number of occasions she dressed as a woman in front of Kris 61”
““We fall in love quickly (we marry after seven months),” Caitlyn, 67, writes in an excerpt published by People.”
“Since let s not kid ourselves everyone wants to know Kris and I have good and frequent sex at the beginning The New York Post reports that Caitlyn who underwent gender reassignment surgery in January describes the sex as imbued...”
“...with love but admits she wasn t entirely comfortable with the act...”
““I tell Kris about my gender issues before I make love to her.”
“This will always be a subject of dispute between us,” Caitlyn laments.”
“She insists that she was taken by surprise by my ultimate transition to Caitlyn which obviously means in her mind that she did not know enough While Kris appeared to be shocked by the transition the former Olympian says that...”
“Caitlyn also claims she had 36B-cup breasts, due to hormone therapy, when she met Kris in 1990.”
“...female lover and is open to exploring sex with a man once surgery is complete...”


"This article was originally published in the New York Post..."
__ Several times she dressed up as a woman in front of Chris 61
Caitlin, 67, wrote in an excerpt published in people magazine: "we soon fell in love (we got married seven months later)
"Since we don't delude ourselves, everyone wants to know that Chris and I have a good and frequent sex life at the beginning, the New York Post reported that Caitlin who underwent sex change surgery in January described sex as full of..."
__ With love, but she admitted that she was not completely satisfied with this behavior... "
"Before I have sex with Chris, I'll tell her about my gender."
Caitlin sighed: "it's always a topic of debate between us."
"Her insistence that I finally turned into Caitlin surprised her, which obviously meant that in her mind, she didn't know enough, and Chris seemed shocked by the change," the former Olympian said
Caitlin also claimed that she had 36 B cups on her chest when she met Chris in 1990 due to hormone therapy
__︹ Female lovers, once the operation is completed, are willing to explore sexual relations with men... "



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Jennifer At WAR With 'The Voice' Execs For Using Show To Promote Her Own Company!”
“Hudson 'knows she’s not coming back & doesn’t give a f**k,’ says a source.”
“Former ‘Dream Girl’ Jennifer Hudson has become an absolute nightmare for executives at NBC’s The Voice!”
“And now as Hudson 36 prepares to battle it out with coaches Miley Cyrus 24 Adam Levine 38 and Blake Shelton 41 in hopes of winning season 13 RadarOnline com has exclusively learned that she is ALSO at war with her bosses after being told that she is not welcomed...”
“...back...”
““The higher-ups at NBC told Jennifer that she needs to stop using The Voice platform to promote and plug JHud Productions,” a source close to production revealed.”
“But instead of following her bosses orders, Hudson fired back with a shocking Instagram post – plugging her production company while clearly seated in her judges chair on The Voice!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"Jennifer is at war with the voice executives for using the show to promote her company!"
"Hudson knows she won't come back and doesn't care," a source said
"Former" dream girl "Jennifer Hudson has become a nightmare for NBC's" the voice "executives
"Now Hudson 36 is ready to fight against coaches Millie Cyrus 24, Adam Levin 38 and Blake Sheldon 41, hoping to win the 13th season championship. Ladaron has learned exclusively that she is also fighting with the boss after being told that she is not popular..."
__ Back up... "
"NBC executives told Jennifer that she needed to stop using the voice platform to promote and plug in jhud production," a source close to the production department said
But instead of following his boss's orders, Hudson posted a shocking post on instagram. He clearly sat on his voice in the jury, but blocked his own production company! "



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meghan and Harry can have public display of affection in public while William and Kate tend not to...”
“"They can be a bit more modern and affectionate."”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Speaking with the Express.co.uk, Tracey Cox, a body language and relationships expert and TV presenter, suggested the Duke and Duchess of Sussex are both the “star” in the relationship.”
“Ms Cox said: “There is something about them that is very similar.”
““Same approach to the world, they both like to have a bit of fun, they very quickly settled in to the appropriate level of affection.”


"Megan and Harry can show their love in public, but William and Kate often don't..."
"They can be more modern, more intimate."
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Speaking to that woman, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex are the" stars "of the relationship, suggests Tracey Cox, a body language and relationships expert and TV presenter at the express company
"There's something very similar about them," Ms. Cox said
"The same way of life, they all like to have a little fun, they soon settle down to the appropriate level of family."



**Something goes wrong**
“Which is good, because while there are occasional exceptions (Jay and Bey, Posh and Becks), there's generally only room for one superstar as big as Gaga in a marriage.”
“"Gaga and Christian are planning to wed in Italy this summer," a source exclusively tells the tabloid.”
“The couple has yet to confirm those claims, but it looks more and more like they're letting their silence do the talking.”
“Gaga has never been shy about refuting inaccurate reports about her private life, so it seems she has no problem with the public believing that she's soon to be married.”
“And she certainly didn't seem shy about rocking a massive oval-shaped pink diamond on her commitment finger at this year's Grammys.”
“So either she really said yes, or she's just messing with her Little Monster's minds at this point.”
“As best we can tell, Gaga's breakup with Taylor Kinney and the ensuing media circus left a lasting mark on the singer, and this time around, she's keeping a much tighter lid on her prenuptial preparations.”
“Of course, no one as obsessed-over as Gaga can really keep a secret for very long.”
“So perhaps it should come as no surprise that Life & Style claims to have uncovered the mystery of where and when Gaga and Carino are planning to tie the knot.”
“"It will be an over-the-top affair combined with classic Italian traditions."”


"It's good, because although there are exceptions (Jay and bay, bosh and Beck), there's usually only one superstar like Gaga in a marriage."
"Gaga and Christian plan to get married in Italy this summer," an exclusive source told the tabloid
"The couple haven't confirmed these claims yet, but it seems that they are more and more likely to let silence speak."
"Gaga is never shy of refuting inaccurate reports about her private life, so she seems to have no problem with the public believing that she is about to get married."
"At this year's Grammy Awards, she fingered a huge Oval Pink Diamond, which she didn't seem shy about."
"So either she did, or she's just playing with her little monster."
"As far as we know, Gaga's breakup with Taylor Kinney and the media circus that followed left a lasting impression on the singer, and this time, she was much more secretive about her preparations for marriage."
"Of course, no one can be as obsessed with a secret as Gaga, and really keep it for a long time."
"So it's no surprise that life & Style announced when and where Gaga and Carino plan to get married."
"It's going to be a top-level event that combines Italian tradition."



**Something goes wrong**
“And it’s messy as hell.”
“They’re happening.”
“Sienna had a smaller, supporting role in The Lost City of Z, which Brad produced.”
“He attended the LA premiere in April, and spent time with the cast at the premiere and the post-premiere dinner.”
“It was at this dinner that Sienna and Brad allegedly were “heavily enjoying each other’s company” and “talking to each other all night,” according to Page Six’s witness.”
“Sienna predictably gave a non-denial denial (“I’m not going to even dignify it with a response.”
“It’s predictable and silly”) and Brad’s people called the story false.”
“But guess what?”
“Brad was in Glastonbury over the weekend, and he apparently spent a lot of time with Sienna.”
“Where there’s smoke, etc.”


"It's a mess."
"They're happening."
"Siena played a minor supporting role in Brad's lost Z city."
"He attended the Los Angeles Premiere in April and spent time with the actors at the premiere and the dinner after the premiere."
According to witnesses on page 6, Siena and Brad were said to have "enjoyed each other's company" and "talked all night" at the dinner
"Sienna gave an undeniable answer as expected (" I'm not even going to use a response to make it look dignified. "
"It's predictable, stupid.") Brad's people said the story was fake
"Guess what?"
"Brad was in Glastonbury at the weekend and he obviously spent a lot of time with Siena."
"Places with smoke, etc"



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I can continue to do my job as a writer and a director, work directly with doctors to ensure my disease is controlled, and feel the support of millions when I am let down by my own body.”
“And yet I am one of the lucky ones.”
“Even with my attempts to add bling to the item, it was a shocking reminder of what this illness can do (and of the fact that denying birth control isn’t just misogynistic but also deeply biased against people who are disabled by the disease).”
“I had to use a walker after the operation.”
“Despite my access to remarkable doctors, oral contraceptives and even alternative treatments, my disease progressed to the point that I needed surgery, from which it has taken several months to heal.”
“Between 1998 and last week, I’ve been to the emergency room over 50 times with endometriosis-related pain (this makes for some very cozy relationships with fun nurses, but it’s not a particularly sustainable or amusing life plan).”
“If the Trump administration and Republicans in Congress succeed in stripping funding from Planned Parenthood and giving employers carte blanche to deny women necessary medication under murky notions of moral disdain, all paths to health and wellness will disappear for a huge swath of Americans.”
“More women in this country are prescribed oral contraception for medical reasons than for pregnancy prevention.”
“Low-income women who may not have access to expensive surgeries or other more advanced endometriosis treatments will be hit the hardest because they are the most reliant on oral contraceptives to manage their condition.”
“Birth control pills can cost up to $50 a month without insurance, and in a 2010 survey, a third of female voters said they’d had trouble paying for them at some point.”


"I can continue to work as a writer and director, working directly with doctors to make sure my disease is under control, and I can feel the support of millions of people when my body disappoints me."
"But I'm one of the lucky ones."
"Even if I try to add bling to this project, it's a shocking reminder of what the disease can do (and the fact that refusing birth control is not only female aversion, but also a serious prejudice against those disabled by the disease."
"I had to use a walker after the operation."
"Although I had access to excellent doctors, oral contraceptives and other treatments, my condition developed to the point where I needed surgery, and it took me months to recover from that."
"From 1998 to last week, I went to the emergency room more than 50 times for endometriosis related pain (which made me have some very comfortable relationships with interesting nurses, but it's not a particularly sustainable or interesting life plan."
"If the trump administration and the Republicans in Congress succeed in divesting money from family planning and, under the vague concept of moral contempt, allow employers to refuse the necessary medical treatment for women, then for a large number of Americans, all the roads to health will disappear."
"In this country, more women are prescribed oral contraceptives for medical reasons than to prevent pregnancy."
"Low income women who may not be able to receive expensive surgery or other more advanced treatment for endometriosis will be the hardest hit because they rely most on oral contraceptives to control their condition."
"Contraceptives can cost as much as $50 a month without insurance, and in a 2010 survey, a third of female voters said they had trouble paying for them at some point."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“... Yeah, we don't take time to do that [make sure the relationship is real] in Hollywood anymore.'”
“Because once that camera touches you, [it's out].”
“'I feel like this... if there's somebody that you're dating, the worst thing you can do is let that [points at camera] touch you.”
“Getty ImagesSpeaking previously about keeping his relationships out of the spotlight, he told ET: 'I like to stay quiet, you know, with anyone that dating; that I'm really, really dating.”
“Takes us right back to the royal wedding...Holmes also helped the actor celebrated his recent 50th, and the duo were seen arriving together at Paramount Pictures for his party.”
“Holmes, 38, and Foxx, 50, looked very happy together - and just look at the way the actress is gazing at her boyfriend.”
“Getty ImagesThe pair have avoided attending events where they might be photographed together, but did sit next to each other at at Clive Davis’s Pre-Grammy Awards Gala earlier this year in January.”
“The very private couple have been dating since 2013, after they were spotted dancing together at the Hamptons a year after the Dawson Creek star's highly-publicised separation from Tom Cruise.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"... yes, in Hollywood we don't have to spend any more time doing this (making sure the relationship is real)."
"Because once that camera touches you, [it disappears]."
"I think... If someone dates you, the worst thing you can do is to let him touch you
"Getty Images talked about keeping your relationship out of the spotlight before telling et: 'you know, I like to keep quiet with anyone I date; I'm really, really dating.'
"Take us back to the royal wedding Sherlock Holmes also helped the actor celebrate his latest 50th birthday, and they were seen coming to Paramount Pictures' party together
"Sherlock Holmes, 38, and fox, 50, look happy together - just look at the way the actress looks at her boyfriend."
Getty pictures avoided the possibility of a group photo, but they did sit together before Clive Davis' Grammy Awards in January
"This very private couple has been dating since 2013, and a year after Dawson Creek star and Tom Cruise broke up, they were found dancing together in Hampton."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Pamela Chelin contributed to this report.”
“Alleging libel per se and false light invasion of privacy, Shelton’s lawsuit sought damages “not to be less than” $2 million.”
“Shelton is not in rehab and has no plans to go to rehab, which Bauer would have known had it bothered to contact any of Mr. Shelton’s representatives prior to publication of its misleading Rehab Story,” the lawsuit read.”
““Mr.”
“Also Read: Blake Shelton Denies He Peed on a Mailbox in New Court FilingShelton’s complaint noted that the singer was prepared to let the first story, that he cheated on Lambert go, but then the rehab story was published.”
“...read...”
“Shelton filed suit against Bauer Publishing Company and Bauer Media Group in October 2015 over two articles that In Touch published claiming that Shelton had cheated on his former wife Miranda Lambert and that he was heading to rehab after hitting rock bottom Blake Shelton has had enough the lawsuit...”
“Also Read: Blake Shelton Gave 'Apparent False Testimony' in Tabloid Lawsuit, Court Papers AssertWhile the terms of the settlement were not disclosed, the stipulation notes that each party will be responsible for its own costs and attorneys’ fees.”
“A stipulation for dismissal filed in federal court in California on Thursday notes that all parties have agreed to dismiss the suit with prejudice, meaning that it cannot be filed again later.”
“Shelton and Bauer have settled the lawsuit that the country singer and “The Voice” coach filed against the publisher, according to court papers obtained by TheWrap.”


"Pamela chelin contributed to this report."
Sheldon's lawsuit, accusing defamation itself and false light of privacy violations, seeks compensation of "no less than" two million dollars
"Sheldon is not in rehab, and there is no plan to go to rehab. If Bauer had bothered to contact any of Sheldon's representatives before his misleading story was published, Bauer would have known for a long time," the lawsuit said
"Sir."
"Read at the same time: Blake Sheldon denies that he peed in the mailbox of the new court. The singer was prepared to tell the first story that he cheated Lambert, but later the recovery story was published."
__ Read... "
"Sheldon filed a lawsuit against Bauer publishing company and Bauer media group in October 2015, because touch published two articles claiming that Sheldon cheated his ex-wife Miranda Lambert, and he went to the rehab center after falling to the bottom. Black Sheldon has had enough of the lawsuit..."
"It can also be understood that Blake Shelton provided" obviously false testimony "in the tabloid lawsuit, and the court documents asserted that although the settlement clause was not disclosed, the provisions stated that the parties would bear their own costs and attorney's fees."
A ruling filed in California federal court on Thursday said all parties agreed to dismiss the case in a biased way, which means no further action can be taken
According to court documents obtained by the wrap, Sheldon and Bauer have settled lawsuits filed by country singers and "the voice" coaches against publishers



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She thinks he’s doing more damage to their empire than good.””
““She doesn’t want Kanye putting himself out there like he’s doing because it’s ruining his brand and her family’s image.”
“The 40-year-old rapper went on a bizarre rant about philosophy, “the psychological zombie effect,” and his love for Donald Trump.”
“He even shared photos of himself wearing a “Make America Great Again” hat.”
“But things took a turn for the worse when Kanye suggested that 400 years of slavery was a choice during a TMZ interview, and now Kim Kardashian is at “her breaking point.” According to Life & Style, the mother-of-three wants a divorce after Kanye’s latest outburts.”
“However, it looks like there’s still one person who’s welcoming him with open arms — and that’s Caitlyn Jenner.”
““Kanye’s been staying at Cait’s the past few nights,” an insider exclusively tells In Touch.”
““She’s literally the only woman in the Kardashian clan who’s showing him major love as he expresses his political views.”
“She understands him.”
“She gets him.”


"She thinks he did more harm than good to their empire."
"She didn't want Kanye to put herself out like he did, because it would ruin his brand and the image of her family."
"The 40 year old rapper made a bizarre rant about philosophy, the psychological zombie effect and his love for Donald Trump."
He even shared photos of himself wearing the "make America great again" hat
But things got worse when Kanye said in an interview with TMZ that 400 years of slavery was a choice, and now Kim Kardashian has reached "her tipping point.". The mother of three wants a divorce after Kanye's latest outburst, according to life and fashion magazine
"But there seems to be another person who welcomes him with open arms - Caitlin Jenner."
"Kanye has been staying at Kate's for the past few nights," an insider told in touch exclusively
"She is the only woman in the Kardashian family to show her love to Kardashian when she expresses her political views."
"She understands him."
"She's got him."



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See Now: Famous Actors Who Turned Down Iconic Movie Roles...”
“To see their response, check out the video clip below.”
“Days ago, Stewart and Maxwell were caught together at the airport were photographers for X17 Online questioned the couple about their potential plans to get married.”
“In photos from their outing, Stewart was seen in a white t-shirt and ripped black jeans while her girlfriend sported a black crop top with a matching leather jacket and pants.”
“According to the report, Stewart and Maxwell are currently in town for Haute Couture Fashion Week and stepped out for dinner together on Monday night.”
“"Kristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell are making the most of their time in Paris," the Daily Mail revealed to readers on Tuesday.”
“As the rumors of a split continue to swirl, Stewart and Maxwell are enjoying time together in France.”
““[The model] and Kirsten have a good thing… They’re two peas in a pod,” the insider told Gossip Cop.”
“The outlet also noted that while Stewart has been known to return to Cargile when other romances have failed, she and Maxwell are currently going strong and have a solid relationship.”
““Just weeks after setting up the house with Victoria’s Secret model Stella Maxwell, [Kristen] was caught sneaking around with ex-gal pal Alicia.”Although the report claimed Stewart had been caught visiting Cargile’s home on June, Gossip Cop has confirmed the cheating allegations as false.”


"Now look at the famous actors who refuse idol movie roles..."
"To see their reaction, check out the video clip below."
"A few days ago, Stewart and Maxwell were photographed together at the airport when a photographer on x17 online asked the couple about their possible marriage plans."
"In the photos of their trip, Stewart is wearing a white T-shirt and torn black jeans, while her girlfriend is wearing a black jacket with a matching leather jacket and trousers."
"It's reported that Stewart and Maxwell are currently in the city for haute couture week and going out to dinner on Monday night."
"Kristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell are making the most of their time in Paris," the daily mail told readers on Tuesday
"Stewart and Maxwell are having a good time together in France as the rumor of the breakup continues
"[model] and Kirsten have a good thing They are peas in two pods, "the insider told the gossip police
"The media also pointed out that although it is known that Stewart will return to Cargill when other relationships fail, she and Maxwell have a good and stable relationship at present."
"Just weeks after building a house with Victoria's Secret model Stella Maxwell, [Christine] was found sneaking around with her ex girlfriend Alicia." Despite reports that Stewart was arrested during a visit to Cargill's house in June, "gossip police" confirmed that the fraud charges were false



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Anticipate the same thing will happen for Alec Baldwin and Trump--especially if he continues the impression during the duration of Donald Trump's new gig.”
“We're still talking about Tina Fey's Sarah Palin impression years and years later.”
“...brownie points in other places...”
“So even though Alec Baldwin is only making 1 400 bucks to show up to practice and plan for each new Trump based sketch plus to perform during that inconvenient late night airing on Saturday night he s certainly earning...”
“...time to come...”
“Alec Baldwin s Donald Trump portrayal has certainly been popular with some factions and not with others but it s safe to say that is should live on as an example of a classic Saturday Night Live character for some...”


"The same thing is expected to happen to Alec Baldwin and Trump - especially if he continues to maintain that impression during Donald Trump's new concert."
"We're still talking about Tina Fey's impression of Sarah Palin years later."
__ Brownie points elsewhere... "
"So even though Alec Baldwin only made $1400 to practice and plan every new trump sketch, plus his performance on Saturday night's inconvenient late night broadcast, he certainly made..."
__ It's time... "
"Alec Baldwin's Donald Trump is certainly welcomed by some factions rather than others, but it's certain that this should continue to be a typical example of a live character on Saturday night, for some people..."



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s nice and down to earth Back handed compliment...”
“The actress noted People see that intensity that she has in photographs and on red carpets and that force around her but then you meet her and she s just a girl So Fanning thought Jolie was a mega Bleet then she meets her and it s the opposite she...”
“...biggest movie stars in the world...”
“Postby Guest Wed Jun 13 2018 11 50 pm She was such the opposite of what I thought she would be In an interview with Collider Elle Fanning talked about working with Jolie on the first Maleficent revealing that she was very down to earth despite being one of the...”


__ It's a good, down-to-earth compliment... "
"The actress noticed that people saw the intensity of her in the photos and on the red carpet, and the power around her, but when you met her, she was just a girl, so fanning thought Julie was a super beauty, and then she met her, and the opposite was true, she..."
__ The biggest movie star in the world... "
"Postby guest wed Jun 13 2018 11 50 PM, in an interview with collider Elle fanning, she talked about the first prank with Julie and revealed that she was very down-to-earth, even though she was one of them..."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I think she will fight for it."
"Jennifer has been through three failed marriages and is sad to hear Alex talking to Lauren," the person said
"On January 24, the former Yankees batter posted a picture in a few hours with a mysterious quote on it. There is nothing wrong with making a mistake. The mistake is not to try to correct it. The shadow of blue star shared a picture with a
__︹ Alex gave her a big bunch of flowers... "
The next day, she uploaded a self portrait with the title "everything is in God's hands" and the label "let go and let God"
"It's directed at Alex," according to one person familiar with the matter Hollywood's hottest duet is on the verge of a hit
"On the 48th, Jennifer privately questioned her relationship with her boyfriend who has been dating for nearly a year. She learned that her boyfriend is still in contact with former flying Lauren hunter, a fitness model. In an interview last year, she said that Alex 42 had sent her sex messages for several months, including during dating..."
"Jerome..."
"Recently," someone revealed some new details to Jennifer, saying that Alex is still texting Lauren, and that's why she lost contact, "a person familiar with the matter told contact
"Of course, he says it's not physical, maybe not, but in Jennifer's book, it's still cheating."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Right?”
“If we were Kris Jenner, we’d want to make a glorious and memorable comeback after taking a year off from an annual tradition, right?”
“That’s it.”
“That’s literally all we want.”
“The guessing game has exhausted us.”
“Thankfully, according to several sources, we might get our wish via the Kardashian Christmas card (or Kardashian Kristmas Kard, as we like to call it).”
“We’ve been sitting tight since September when news broke that both sisters are expecting their first babies.”
“But months later, the rumors have yet to be confirmed or denied.”
“Now that we’ve crept into December, it’s beginning to look a lot like the Kardashian’s annual Christmas card may give the confirmation fans have been waiting for.”
“Writer and Kardashian expert Mariah Smith who helms a column for The Cut called Keeping Up With the Kontinuity Errors tweeted on Sunday December 3rd that the Christmas card will most likely serve as our Khloe Kylie pregnancy announcement false Plus Kim Kardashian has been teasing bits and pieces of...”


"Is it?"
"If we were Chris Jenner, we would hope to be able to make a glorious and unforgettable comeback after a year of traditional vacation, right?"
"That's it."
"That's what we want."
"The guessing game tired us out."
"Thank goodness, according to some sources, we may be able to fulfill our wishes through the Kardashian Christmas card (or Kardashian christmascade, as we like to call it)
"We've been waiting to die since the news came out in September that both sisters are going to have their first child."
"But a few months later, the rumors have not been confirmed or denied."
"Now that we've crept into December, it's starting to look a lot like Kardashian's annual Christmas card, which may give fans the confirmation they've been waiting for."
"Writer and Kardashian expert Mariah Smith tweeted on Sunday, December 3 that Christmas cards are likely to be our Khloe Kylie pregnancy announcement, plus Kim Kardashian has been teasing about some bits and pieces of stuff..."



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, their romance took a rocky turn around Bieber’s birthday on March 1, according to reports.”
“They seemed inseparable, having spent New Year’s together in Cabo San Lucas, Mexico.”
“Here’s how the Biebs is coping with his time apart from Sel.”
“Justin Bieber, 24, is going through a tough time as his relationship with Selena Gomez, 25, is on pause.”
“She’s currently on vacation with friends in Sydney, Australia, where she appears to be carefree in this new video.”
“However, a source reveals that the same can’t be said for Bieber.”
““Justin has Selena on the brain constantly.”
“He is trying to drown it out by hanging with friends and doing stuff on his own time but he keeps thinking about her,” a source EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““He always wants to be around her, talk to her and be with her.”
“She is like a drug for him, he just needs more and more and more.”As the Biebs continues to struggle with their time apart, he’s got a few things up his sleeve for when she returns to LA.”


"However, it is reported that their relationship has undergone an unstable change around Bieber's birthday on March 1."
"They seem to be inseparable, spending the new year together in Cape Saint Lucas, Mexico."
"Here's how the biebers deal with his time away from sell."
"Justin Bieber, 24, is going through a tough time because his relationship with Selena Gomez, 25, is stalling."
"She is currently on holiday with friends in Sydney, Australia, and in this new video, she seems to be carefree."
"However, this is not the case with Bieber," a source said
"Justin always had Selena in his head."
"He wants to kill time by spending time with friends and doing something, but he thinks about her all the time," an exclusive told reporters Hollywood life. "
"He always wanted to be by her side, to talk to her, to be with her."
"She's like a drug to him, he just needs more and more." As the Bieber family continues to struggle for time apart, when she returns to Los Angeles, he is ready for something



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
__ One month old... "
__ Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
__ Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner has been keeping a low profile and has not publicly discussed her pregnancy, nor has her rapper boyfriend, Travis Scott.”
“...series “Keeping Up with the Kardashians.”In the promo, the reality star is seen on a video call with her sister, Khloé Kardashian.”
“Kardashian West shared the news on her website and verified social media accounts early Tuesday.”
““We are incredibly grateful to our surrogate who made our dreams come true with the greatest gift one could give and to our wonderful doctors and nurses for their special care,” Kardashian West wrote.”
“The baby joins older siblings North, 4, and Saint, 2.”
“No name has been announced for the newest member of the family as of yet.”
“The couple kept their expectant parent status quiet for awhile, refusing to confirm a baby was on its way despite published reports.”
“But in September, Kardashian West confirmed the news in a clip from Season 14 of her family’s E!”
““What happens every time I say, ‘Guess what?’” Kim says to her sister.”
“In September, CNN confirmed that Kylie Jenner was pregnant and in December Khloé Kardashian confirmed that she and her NBA player boyfriend Tristan Thompson were expecting.”


"Jenna has always kept a low profile and has not publicly discussed her pregnancy, nor has her rapper boyfriend Travis Scott."
__ Series "to keep up with Kardashian. "In the promo, the reality TV star is on a video call with her sister, Kardashian."
"Earlier on Tuesday, Kardashian West shared the news on her website and verified her social media account."
"We are very grateful to our surrogate mother for giving us the best gift to make our dreams come true and for the special care of our excellent doctors and nurses," Kardashian West wrote
"The baby joined a four-year-old brother and sister and a two-year-old saint."
"The name of the latest member of the family has not been released so far."
"The couple have temporarily maintained their identity as parents to be and, despite some reports, refuse to confirm that the child has been born."
But in September, Kardashian West wrote in her family's e
"Every time I say, 'guess what? "Kim said to her sister."
"In September, CNN confirmed that Kelly Jenner was pregnant, and in December, Kardashian confirmed that she and her NBA player boyfriend Tristan Thompson were pregnant."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So it is understandable that he wouldn't want to lose his cool and hence, he is avoiding any kind of interaction with his estrange wife.”
“A few weeks ago, the 53-year-old apparently stormed off the sets of Ad Astra, a sci-fi thriller he has been shooting for.”
“Hollywood Life claims so.”
“The gossip website reveals that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie could be coming together on the occasion of Halloween.”
“Apparently, Jolie has reached out to her estranged husband to invite him to celebrate Halloween with the children.”
“The website says that the move is for the sake of her children.”
“Also Read: WHAT!”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's relationship was '12 years of hell'?”
“"Angie invited Brad to go trick-or-treating with the kids next week.”
“She knows how much he loved going out with the kids during the one holiday where they could all be disguised and blend in like regular people," an insider close to Jolie told the website.”


"So it's understandable that he doesn't want to lose his cool, so he avoids any form of interaction with his estranged wife."
"A few weeks ago, the 53 year old obviously rushed out of the shooting scene of the science fiction thriller, ADASTRA, for which he had been working."
"Hollywood life claims that."
"The gossip website revealed that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie might get together on Halloween."
"It's obvious that Julie has contacted her separated husband and invited him to celebrate Halloween with the children."
"The website said it was for her children."
"Still read: what!"
"The relationship between Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie is" 12 years of hell "
"Angie invited Brad to play trick or treat with the kids next week."
"She knows how much he likes to go out with the kids on a holiday, and they can all fit in as ordinary people," an insider close to Julie told the site



**Something goes wrong**
“Kathie Lee will be co-hosting without Hoda, while Radar Online pointed out that Megyn will remain in New York with “no hour to host at all.””
“That comment was awkward, mean-spirited.”
“...the control room were horrified said the insider...”
“But rather than explain that to viewers Kelly probed Kotb asking if Hoda ever took time to contemplate her life and think holy moly NBC News Staffers Shocked By Nasty On Air Exchange When Megyn mentioned Hoda s dark period without explaining it to viewers NBC News staff members in...”
““You were going through a dark period.”Staffers assumed that Megyn was talking about Hoda’s breast cancer diagnosis and subsequent surgery.”
““We talked recently about how, 10 years ago, your life was very different,” said Kelly on air to Kotb.”
“Kelly saved her congratulations for the broadcast, but Megyn’s supposed congratulatory remark to Hoda was seen as a “Mean Girls” type of jab.”
“Today show s 9 a m time slot...”
“The atmosphere is so bad around Megyn Kelly at Today that producers of the 7 to 9 a m slot hosted by Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb are openly sniping at her In the wake of Lauer s exit and Hoda s promotion Megyn follows Kotb and Guthrie in the...”
“That rumored feud involves Hoda, her co-anchor Savannah Guthrie, and Megyn Kelly, along with the producers, an NBC News insider told Page Six.”


"Casey Lee will co host without Hotan, while radar online points out that Megan will stay in New York," there's no time to host at all. "
"The comment was embarrassing and mean."
__ The control room was terrified, and the insider said
"But Kelly didn't explain this to the audience. Instead, he asked kotbe if Hoda took time to think about her life. He thought that the NBC News staff of holy Molly was shocked by the bad air communication. Megan didn't explain to the audience that the NBC News staff were in..."
"You're going through a dark period." Staff believe Megan is talking about Hoda's breast cancer diagnosis and subsequent surgery
"We recently talked about how different your life was 10 years ago," Kelly said on the radio to cottlebut
Kelly saved her congratulations on the radio, but Megan's remark to Hoda was considered a "mean girl" attack
"Today's program is at 9 am..."
"Today, the atmosphere around megyn Kelly is very bad. Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb's 7-9 am producers publicly snipe Lauer after she quits. Hoda's promotion megyn follows Kotb and Guthrie in the production
An NBC News insider told pagemix that the rumored feud involved Hoda, her co anchor Savannah Guthrie, megyn Kelly and the producer



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whether or not Jonas' sweet Instagram story is definitely confirming their relationship, it seems like Jonas and Chopra are having a great time together.”
“Additionally, Chopra and Jonas were spotted together in May at a Los Angeles Dodgers baseball game and attending the Beauty and the Beast concert at the Hollywood Bowl in Los Angeles, according to Us Weekly.”
“Fans are using lots of heart-eye emojis themselves.”
“Fan reaction to Chopra and Jonas' reportedly confirmed relationship involved a lot of excitement.”
“(Bustle reached out to reps for Chopra and Jonas for comment when the rumors first began circulating, but did not receive a response.)”
“News.”
“Jonas and Copra were also spotted together dining at Toca Modera in the Los Angeles neighborhood West Hollywood in May, according to E!”
“An eagle-eyed Twitter user even posted a video of the Chopra and Jonas at the game.”
“Earlier this month, The Daily Mail published photos on June 11 of the rumored couple attending his cousin Rachel Tamburelli’s wedding in Atlantic City, New Jersey.”
“Even one fan on Twitter is trying to figure out Chopra and Jonas' couple name.”


"Whether or not Jonas's sweet story on instagram confirms their relationship, it seems Jonas and Chopra are having a good time together."
In addition, Chopra and Jonas were found together at a Los Angeles Dodgers Baseball game in May and attended the "beauty and beast" concert of the Hollywood Bowl in Los Angeles, US Weekly reported
"Fans themselves use a lot of heart and eye expressions."
"Fans are reported to be very excited about the confirmed love affair between jopra and Jonas
(at the beginning of the rumor, whistle contacted representatives of Chopra and Jonas for comments, but received no response.)
"News."
According to e! "
"A sharp eyed twitter user even posted a video of jopra and Jonas in the game."
Earlier this month, the daily mail published a picture of the rumored couple at their cousin Rachel temprelli's wedding in Atlantic City, New Jersey, on June 11
"Even a twitter fan was thinking about the names of jopra and Jonas."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Last month, the pregnant model sparked engagement rumors after she stepped out sporting a massive diamond ring on her left hand during an outing.”
“However, Gossip Cop assures fans that the story is made up.”
“Jan 7, 2017AceShowbiz - Bradley Cooper and her pregnant girlfriend Irina Shayk reportedly have split after dating for nearly two years.”
“Naughty Gossip claims it's over between the 42-year-old actor and the Russian model, pointing out that "Bradley is in Santa Monica.”
“Irina spent New Year's Day in Russia with her family."”
“"She went home to her native Russia and might stay until after she has the baby.”
“Her and Brady are done," an alleged insider tells the news outlet.”
“"If it wasn't for the kid, they would never see each other again," the insider claims, adding that Cooper "just wasn't that into her.”
“He would rather hang out with the boys."”
“"Cooper and Shayk have not split," the site confirms.”


"Last month, the pregnant model appeared on a trip wearing a huge diamond ring in her left hand, triggering rumors of engagement."
"However, the scandal police assured fans that the story was fabricated."
Bradley Cooper and her pregnant girlfriend Irina Shayk are reported to have split up nearly two years after dating
Mischievous gossip says the relationship between the 42 year old actor and the Russian model is over, and points out that "Bradley is in Santa Monica."
"Irina and her family celebrate the new year in Russia."
"She went back to her hometown Russia and may stay until she has a baby."
"She and Brady are finished," an accused insider told the news media
"If it wasn't for the kids, they would never see each other again," the person said, adding that Cooper "just didn't like her."
"He would rather be with the children."
"Cooper and Shayk haven't broken up yet," the website confirmed



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...when they embark on their first solo outing in Cheshire England...”
“Nevertheless, fans were quick to rush to Markle's defense.”
“On June 9, the newly minted Duchess of Sussex joined her husband, Prince Harry, and the entire royal family for the London festivities.”
“The highly attended ceremony celebrates a 250-year-old British tradition where military troops show off their flags (or colours) and march throughout the Buckingham Palace square, Fox News reports.”
“MEGHAN MARKLE’S BEST FRIEND HAS 'PIPPA MOMENT' IN FITTED DRESSQueen Elizabeth, whose real birthday is on April 21, turned 92 this year.”
“For the special event, the 36-year-old former actress wore a pale pink, bespoke Carolina Herrera dress with matching Philip Treacy hat, which she evidently recycled from her first royal engagement in her new role, just three days after her May 19 wedding.”
“Though the royal newlywed appeared perfectly content riding in a carriage alongside Prince Harry and mingling with the royal family on the iconic balcony of Buckingham Palace, some detractors on social media felt that the look was “inappropriate” for the regal occasion.”
““Off the shoulder is inappropriate day wear at the Trooping or any official engagement,” one critic clapped.”
““I do feel her choice of an off the shoulder dress was pushing it for HRH Queen Elizabeth’s Birthday celebration.”
“I have a feeling she’s going to push the limits a little too much?”


__ When they started their first solo trip in Cheshire, England... "
"Despite that, the fans were quick to defend him
On June 9, the new Duchess of Sussex joined her husband, Prince Harry, and the royal family in a celebration in London
Fox News reported that the ceremony, attended by a large number of people, was to celebrate Britain's 250 year old tradition of displaying flags (or colors) and marching on Buckingham Palace Square
Megan markel's best friend has "Pippa moment" in Queen of fashion. Queen Elizabeth is 92 years old and her real birthday is April 21
"At this special event, the 36 year old former actress wore a light pink Carolina erera custom dress with a Philip Treacy hat, which she apparently wore when she first engaged to the royal family three days after her wedding on May 19."
"Although the Royal newlyweds, sitting side by side with Prince Harry on the iconic balcony of Buckingham Palace in a carriage and mingling with members of the royal family, look very satisfied, some detractors on social media believe that this style is" not suitable "for royal occasions."
"Off the shoulder is not suitable for everyday wear in the army or any official engagement," one critic applauded
"I do feel that she chose a strapless dress to celebrate Queen Elizabeth's birthday."
"I have a feeling that she will push the limit a little too far?"



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I spit in your face, you’re like, ‘Hey babe.’ ”Kardashian and Disick split, seemingly for good, in July 2015.”
“...you don t say hello to me...”
“Disick quipped Here s the thing every time I become too good of a person she stops loving me because she fell in love with a guy who was a little bit f ked up I treat you like royalty...”
““The debauchery that’s gone on has definitely closed the door several billion times [on a reconciliation], but it’s been back open,” Kardashian said at the time.”
“Disick and Kardashian discussed their rocky on-again-off-again romance on the 10-year-anniversary special of “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” in September 2017.”
“Kardashian, who shares sons Mason and Reign and daughter Penelope with Disick, split from a much younger lover of her own, 25-year-old model Younes Bendjima, earlier this month.”
“She captioned the image, “I swear this is about [pal] Steph [Shepherd’s] jeans.”Richie has been dating Disick, 35, for about a year.”
“Hours later on Friday, Kardashian, 39, took to her Instagram story from a swanky walk-in closet wearing jeans, heels and nothing on top but a necklace — plus her arm and a text bar reading “proud wife” obscuring her nipples.”
““I’m like goddamn bitch, I am not a teen choice #20,” Richie captioned her sultry snap.”
“...a bikini and his ex Kourtney Kardashian apparently refused to be outdone following up with a topless shot...”


"I spit on your face, you're like 'Hey baby'" Kardashian and disik broke up in July 2015, seemingly forever
__ You don't say hello to me... "
"Every time I become such a nice person, she stops loving me because she falls in love with a man who is a little unhappy. I treat you as a member of the royal family..."
"Today's debauchery has been closed billions of times, but it has been reopened," Kardashian said at the time
"In September 2017, Dirk and Kardashian discussed their Rocky's off and on romance on the 10th anniversary special of" keep up with Kardashian. "
Kardashian, who has two sons, Mason, Rafe and daughter Penelope, broke up with one of her young lovers, 25-year-old model yones benjima, earlier this month
"I swear it's about Stephen's jeans," she wrote in the title of the picture Rich has been dating 35 year old dick for a year
A few hours later, on Friday, Kardashian, 39, read her instagram story from a trendy walk-in closet, wearing jeans, high heels and nothing but a necklace - plus her arms and a text strip with the words "proud wife" covering her nipples
"I'm like a damned whore, I'm not a young man's choice 喾 20," Ritchie said in her sultry snapshot title
__ A bikini and his former Courtney Kardashian apparently refused to be defeated by a topless shot



Number  125
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Sun also reported that sources close to Pitt have denied the dating rumors and said that he and Lawrence are not together.”
“The two ended their relationship in August of 2014.”
“Prior to dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28-year-old “X-Men” co-star, Nicolas Hoult, for five years off and on.”
“Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a short fling with Coldplay lead singer and ex-husband a Gwyneth Paltrow, Chris Martin — Paltrow being another common thread between her and Brad.”
“But age hasn’t seemed to stop Lawrence before.”
“According to The Sun, Lawrence broke up with Aronofsy after a year of dating due to their great difference in age.”
“However, the tabloid checking website Gossip Cop reported that despite reports about the two A-listers becoming a pair, for now the rumors remain just rumors.”
“The source added that Pitt was nervous to contact Lawrence, but was encouraged by friends to make the first move.”
“There’s an intense connection between them!”An insider also told the magazine that Pitt allegedly reached out to Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend.”
“[They] have been enjoying lots of late nights together.”


"The sun also reported that sources close to Pitt denied rumors of a date and said he was not with Lawrence."
"The two ended their relationship in August 2014."
Before dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28 year old X-Men partner Nicholas Holt intermittently for five years
Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a brief relationship with Gwyneth Paltrow, the lead singer and ex husband of Coldplay. Chris Martin Paltrow is another common clue between her and Brad
"But age never seemed to stop Lawrence."
According to the sun, Lawrence and aronofs broke up after a year of dating because of a big age gap
"However, the tabloid censorship website gossip police report that despite reports that two first-line stars have become a couple, the current rumors are still just rumors."
"The source added that Pete was nervous about contacting Lawrence, but encouraged by his friends, he was the first to act."
"There is a close connection between them! "An insider also told the magazine that Pete was said to have contacted Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend."
"(they) spent many late nights together."



Number  126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...above news articles Tweets or blog posts...”
“An article in the latest issue of the National Enquirer says the actor recently had a near death experience when he came close to asphyxiating on his IMDb com Inc takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the...”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively expose this fake news.”
“A new tabloid report claiming Josh Brolin almost died after choking on a bite of food is completely false and sensationalized.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
__ Above news articles, tweets or blog posts... "
"According to an article in the latest issue of the National Enquirer, the actor had a near death experience recently when he nearly suffocated on his IMDB com. The company is not responsible for the content or accuracy of the report..."
"Gossip police can expose this fake news exclusively."
"A new tabloid report claims that Josh Brolin choked on a mouthful of food, which is totally false and sensational."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Love was not checked into the game at the time of the skirmish, but he found himself on the court at the time of the pushing and shoving, though he quickly made his way back to the sideline.”
“Like Thompson, Kevin Love also avoided a ban for his Game 1 actions.”
“The on-court altercation could have led to the suspension of multiple Cavaliers.”
“When the Cavs won their first-ever championship in 2016, Thompson was a force in the paint, averaging 10.3 points and 10.1 rebounds per game in the Finals.”
“Although he did not make an impact in Game 1, Thompson may be a key to victory for Cleveland.”
“He recorded a plus/minus of minus-nine in 20 minutes.”
“The 6'9", 238-pound big man posted just two points on 1-of-4 shooting while grabbing five rebounds.”
“When asked what led tempers to flare, Thompson said Warriors guard Shaun Livingston took an unnecessary shot (NSFW language):That confrontation caught the eye of Los Angeles Clippers guard Patrick Beverley:Video Play Button Videos you might likeThompson had a quiet game to open the series.”
“Instead of leaving the court and going to the locker room, however, Thompson was at the center of a scrum during which he shoved the basketball in the face of Warriors forward Draymond Green.”
“He was assessed a flagrant-2 on the play.”


"When the skirmish happened, love didn't enter the game, but when he pushed, he found himself on the court, but he soon returned to the sidelines."
"Like Thompson, Kevin love avoided a ban in the first game
"The quarrel on the field may result in the suspension of several knights."
"When the Cavaliers won the championship for the first time in 2016, Thompson was a key force, averaging 10.3 points and 10.1 rebounds per game in the finals."
"Although Thompson didn't play his part in the first game, he may have been the key to Cleveland's victory."
"He recorded plus or minus nine points in 20 minutes."
"The 6-foot-9-inch, 238 pound man scored only two points on one of four shots and grabbed five rebounds at the same time."
"When asked what caused the outburst, Thompson said warriors guard Sean Livingston threw an unnecessary shot (nsfw language): the confrontation caught the attention of Los Angeles Clippers guard Patrick Beverly: video play button video you might like. Thompson has a quiet game to open the series."
"However, Thompson did not leave the court to go to the dressing room. Instead, he stood at the center of a game in which he pushed the basketball in front of warriors forward Raymond Green
"He was named the number two man in the play."



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I'm going to need some backup testimony before I can accept this turban ministry.”
“He probably has a stack of hundreds shoved up in that turban right next to his Werther's Originals and his spare handkerchief.”
“Like an actual nose.”
“Photographer: Yes, but it's supposed to go on your face.”
“Mother Cannon: I am wearing it.”
“Take this photo from Red Nose Day:NBC Getty ImagesPhotographer: Can you wear the nose, please?”
“Of course, Cannon has a propensity for pointing, even when it's not necessary.”
“It is literally being held together by the North Star; we noticed.”
“Steve Granitz Getty ImagesFirst of all, Mother Cannon, I'm unclear about why you are pointing to the turban, as if our attention could be anywhere else.”
“And he wants you to know about it, too.”


"But before I accept this headscarf, I need some backup testimony."
"He may have put hundreds of things in his turban, right next to Victor's original and spare handkerchief."
"It's like a real nose."
"Photographer: Yes, but it should be on your face."
"Cannon Mom: I'm wearing it."
"Take this picture from red nose day: NBC Getty Images photographer: would you please put on your nose?"
"Of course, cannons have a tendency to point, if not necessarily."
"It's actually connected by Polaris; we noticed that."
"First of all, mother cannon, I don't know why you pointed at the headscarf, as if our attention could be anywhere else."
"He wants you to know, too."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments below!”
“The talented star is known for having confidence in her body and it sure showed during her incredible energetic Grammys performance of “Wild Thoughts.”Although speculation of a pregnancy soared after Rihanna’s performance, she has yet to publicly comment about it.”
“Drake, 31, was admiring his once lady love Rihanna, 29, when they attended the 2018 Grammy Awards on Jan. 28 and he thought her full body was super hot despite all the pregnancy rumors it caused!”
“The gorgeous singer showed up to one of the music’s biggest nights with her beau Hassan Jameel.”
““Drake thought Rihanna looked incredibly sexy at the Grammys,” a source close to the hip hop star EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““He did not think she looked pregnant at all, just healthy, happy and really sexy.”
“Watching her dance and shaking her body all over the stage really turned him on, he was totally into it.”
“Drake was shocked and surprised over the subsequent pregnancy rumors that followed her big appearance.” Woah!”
“It sounds like Drake is still hooked on RiRi and we can definitely see why!”
“She is, however, reportedly laughing it off and having the time of her life despite what others think of her weight.”


"Please let us know in the comments below!"
The talented star is known for her confidence in her body, which is also reflected in her incredible Grammy concert "fantasy". Although speculation about pregnancy soared after Rihanna's performance, she hasn't publicly commented on it
"Drake, 31, is admiring his former lover, Rihanna, 29. When they attended the 2018 Grammy Awards on January 28, he thought her whole body was extremely hot, despite rumors of pregnancy!"
"The beautiful singer and her boyfriend Hassan Jamil are on one of the biggest nights in the music world."
"Drake thinks Rihanna looks very sexy at the Grammy Awards," an exclusive source close to the hip-hop star told Hollywood life
"He doesn't think she looks pregnant at all, just healthy, happy, really sexy."
"It's exciting to see her dancing on the stage, shaking all over. He's totally involved."
Drake was shocked and surprised by the rumor that she was pregnant after her big show
"It sounds like Drake is still in love with Riley. We can understand why!"
"However, it is reported that she laughs it off and is happy despite what others think of her weight."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Story continuesRelated video:Read more from Yahoo LifestyleFollow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“...https://t.co/UXPFvfCJiF — Shannon Bearman (@BearmanShannon) December 16, 2017While Prince Harry famously met Ivanka’s mother-in-law, first lady Melania Trump, in Toronto while hosting the Invictus Games in September, there’s no word on whether he’s met with Ivanka.”
“Could she seriously not get how much disdain the Royal Family has for #TrumpCrimeFamily?”
“#BritsAreSmart — LetsSaveAmerica (@Donnaphoto) December 16, 2017Aww how sweet but I don’t think y’all are gonna get invited — Mike MacCormick (@DFWsMrFantastic) December 15, 2017‍♀️Gives pause about why Kremlin Barbie would tweet this other than fishing 4 an invite.”
“They don’t like you and yours any more than we do.”
“They don't want your family at their wedding… #Sad — Top Rope Travis (@TopRopeTravis) December 15, 2017They don’t care what you wish them.”
“— Ivanka Trump (@IvankaTrump) December 15, 2017Trump’s well wishes were soon the target of online trolls, who accused her of trying to lock in an invite to the couple’s wedding next May at St George’s Chapel in London.”
“Congratulations!”
“— Ivanka Trump (@IvankaTrump) December 15, 20172:2 I have no doubt that this couple will do extraordinary things, both individually and collectively.”
“Congratulations!”1:2 Wishing Meghan and Prince Harry a lifetime of love, laughter and happiness together.”


"The story goes on Video: read more from Yahoo lifestyle, follow us on instagram, Facebook and twitter, and provide fresh inspiration for your feeds every day."
_... https://t.co/UXPFvfCJiF- Shannon Behrman (@ bearmanshannon) on December 16, 2017, when Prince Harry was hosting the inviolable games in Toronto in September, he met with first lady Melania trump, Ivanka's mother-in-law. There was no news whether he had met Ivanka
"Doesn't she really know how much Royal contempt trump has?"
"British Art - letssaveamerica (@ donnaphoto) December 16, 2017 is lovely, but I don't think you will be invited - Mike MacCormick (@ dfwsmrfantastic) December 15, 2017" _锔 There was a pause as to why the Kremlin Barbie tweeted the news instead of the invitation to "fishing 4."
"They don't like you and your family more than we do."
"They don't want your family to attend their wedding #Sadness - Top rope Travis (@ topropetravis) December 15, 2017 they don't care what you expect of them. "
"- Ivanka trump (@ Ivanka trump) on December 15, 2017, Trump's blessing soon became the target of Internet villains, who accused her of trying to lock in an invitation to the wedding of two people at St. George's Church in London next May."
"Congratulations
"- Ivanka trump (@ Ivanka trump) December 15, 20172 2:2 I have no doubt that this couple will do extraordinary things, both individually and collectively."
"Congratulations! "I wish Megan and Prince Harry love, laughter and happiness all their lives."



**Something goes wrong**
“Adds the insider: “It was obvious that he was super into her, age difference be damned.””
“They spoke for a long time and she was laughing a lot.” Still, the Oscar winner struck out, as Paris eventually left to be with her friends — though not before Jared snuck in a kiss on her cheek!”
““He was staring directly into her eyes while she was talking and they were standing really close.”
“The duo crossed paths at the Harper’s Bazaar Icons party in NYC on Sept. 8, where the actor, 45, “was definitely making a play for her,” says an insider.”
“Jared Leto has his eye on a pretty young thing: 19-year-old Paris Jackson!”


"It's clear that he's crazy about her and the age gap is too big," the person familiar with the matter added
"They talked for a long time and she laughed a lot." Even so, the Oscar winner was out because Paris finally left to be with her friends - not before Jared stole a kiss on her cheek! "
"As she spoke, he was looking her in the eye and they were standing very close."
"The two met at the Harper fair idol party in New York on September 8, and the 45 year old actor" must be filming for her, "said one person familiar with the matter
"Jared Leto has his eye on a young man: Paris Jackson, 19!"



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“6.”
“Ugh, just give this woman an Oscar already!”
“In between that time, the Academy did honor O'Toole with an Honorary Oscar in 2003, but there's nothing quite like taking a bow on that international stage.”
“First nominated in 1963 for his work in Lawrence of Arabia, O'Toole received his final Oscar nomination in 2007 for Venus.”
“Peter O'TooleOver the course of his 50-year career, Peter O'Toole was nominated for a staggering eight Oscars.”
“1.”
“Keep in mind that, because not all actors are as fortunate as DiCaprio when it comes to Oscar nods.”
“For the purposes of this list, I went with the amount of Oscar nominations without a win.”
“This makes tallying up DiCaprio's Oscar snubs incredibly difficult — do you count the times he was nominated but didn't win, or the times he deserved a nomination but didn't get one?”
“(Personally, I take issue with his lack of nominations for Catch Me If You Can and The Departed.)”


_6._
"Ah, give this woman an Oscar!"
"During this time, the Oscars did present the Oscars for ottol in 2003, but there is nothing better than bowing on the international stage."
"In 1963, ottol was first nominated for his work in Lawrence of Arabia, and in 2007, he was last nominated for an Oscar for Venus."
Peter ottol has won eight amazing Oscar nominations in his 50 year career
_1._
"Keep that in mind, because not all actors are as lucky as DiCaprio to be nominated for the Oscars."
"As far as this list is concerned, I don't have the number of Oscar nominations to win."
"It makes it extremely difficult to count DiCaprio's Oscar snub - will you count the number of times he was nominated but didn't win, or the number of times he should have been nominated but didn't?"
"(personally, I didn't nominate him for" if you can catch me "and" the dead ")



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Leave your thoughts below!”
“With that being said, don’t you think people would’ve noticed him wearing a bulletproof vest — and asked why he’s wearing one.”
“Mandatory Credit: Jeff Swinger-USA TODAY SportsThe Moment Dave Chappelle, Talib Kwali and Common Knew Kanye West Would Be Famous by Ryan BrennanReports are saying that Kanye West is so paranoid that he wears a bulletproof vest everywhere.”
“I don’t buy it one bit.”
“If so, then Kanye West is a lot skinnier than I thought he was.”
“The report I am talking about comes from the National Enquirer which stated that Kanye West is so paranoid he is going to be assassinated he s made a bulletproof vest part of his everyday attire I wasn t buying it the second I saw it mostly because their source...”
“...was cited as a snitch According to this snitch Yeezus fears that his wealth has made him his wife Kim Kardashian and his children susceptible to people that mean harm...”
“As evidence, he now wears a bulletproof vest anytime he leaves the house.”
“When he married Kim Kardashian and had two children with her, he created quite the household.”
“It’s a household that gets a crazy amount of attention and doesn’t get much privacy.”


"Leave your thoughts down there!"
"Then again, don't you think people will notice him wearing a bulletproof vest? And asked him why he was wearing a bulletproof vest. "
"Compulsory credit: when Dave chapel, Talib quarry and common knew Kanye West would be famous for Ryan Brennan, it was reported that Kanye West was so paranoid that he wore bullet proof back everywhere."
"I don't believe it at all."
"If so, Kanye West is much thinner than I thought."
"The report I'm talking about comes from the National Enquirer. It's reported that Kanye West is too paranoid. He will be assassinated. He takes bulletproof vests as part of his daily clothes. I don't buy them as soon as I see them, mainly because of their source..."
__︹ According to this informant, yezus worried that his wealth made his wife, Kim kardashan, and his children vulnerable to those who meant harm... "
"As evidence, he now wears a bulletproof vest every time he goes out."
"When he married Kim Kardashian and had two children, he made a pretty good family."
"It's a family that gets crazy attention and doesn't have much privacy."



**Something goes wrong**
“Tell us how you feel, below!”
“HollywoodLifers, is the “Kardashian cure” to blame for Blake’s injury?”
“Even worse, she fears that she will somehow be blamed for his bad luck this season.”
““Kendall [Jenner] feels horrible about Blake [Griffin]‘s injury.”
“Kendall fears she will somehow be blamed for his bad luck.”
“She has heard about the Kardashian curse for years and thinks it is just ridiculous.”
“She also understands how dedicated fans may look for anyway to make sense of a bad situation.”
“But in the end, Kendall feels like any accusations towards her are simply unfair, misguided anger.”
“Kendall loves watching Blake play and she knows how important basketball is in his life, so she is going to do everything she can to care, support and help him get back to his teammates ASAP,” a source close to Kendall tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“At this time, it’s not clear how Blake’s injury (which occurred during a game on Nov. 28) will affect the rest of his basketball season, but sources told ESPN that he could be out for two months!”


"Tell us how you feel, next!"
Hollywood, is "Kardashian therapy" the cause of Blake's injury
"What's worse, she's worried that she'll be blamed for this season's bad luck."
"Kendall [Jenner] was horrified by Blake [Griffin]."
"Kendall was worried that she would be blamed for his bad luck."
"She's heard about Kardashian's curse for years and thinks it's ridiculous."
"She also knows what kind of opportunities enthusiastic fans may look for to understand the bad situation anyway."
"But in the end, Kendall felt that any charges against her were unfair, misleading and angry."
"Kendall likes to watch Black play. She knows how important basketball is in his life, so she will make every effort to care, support and help him return to his teammates as soon as possible," a source close to Kendall told reporters
"It's not clear how Blake's injury (in a game on November 28) will affect the rest of his basketball season, but the source told ESPN that he may be absent for two months!"



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sabrina will premiere on Netflix sometime in 2018.”
“...and the way they dealt with the supernatural...”
“During a recent interview on BBC's Radio 1 Breakfast Show, Selena Gomez was asked about the possibility of her starring in the series, which is currently being called Sabrina.”
“But as she revealed, the role isn't in the cards, so much so that she hasn't even heard about the part.”
“"I love that!"”
“Gomez revealed.”
“"That's new information for me.”
“No, that's a rumor."”
“While most know Gomez now for her music career, she actually got her start starring in Disney Channel's Wizards of Waverly Place.”
“This, combined with her working relationship with Netflix on 13 Reasons Why, made many of her fans suggest that she should play the new Sabrina Spellman.”


"Sabrina will premiere on Netflix sometime in 2018."
__ And the way they deal with the supernatural... "
"In a recent interview with BBC breakfast one, Selena Gomez was asked if she could play in the series now known as Sabrina."
"But as she revealed, the character wasn't on cards, so she didn't even hear about it."
"I like it!"
"Gomez revealed."
"It's new news for me."
"No, that's a rumor."
"Although most people know Gomez's current music career, she actually started starring in the Disney Channel's" the marvels of Waverley square. "
"This, together with her working relationship with Netflix for 13 reasons, led many of her fans to suggest that she should play the new Sabrina Spelman."



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I think as long as you keep remembering who you are as a person — and keep remembering the good and the good around you — then nothing can stop you.””
““That can make you change and feel guarded or shut down and weird.”
““Once you obtain a certain level of success, you can become jaded and you can see certain people around you change,” she said.”
“In addition to spilling the tea, Aguilera shared some advice with the aspiring drag performers.”
“The “Genie in a Bottle” singer is currently engaged to longtime love Matthew Rutler.”
“After her split from Santos, whom she described as her “first love,” Aguilera married Jordan Bratman, from whom she split in 2010.”
“...track was inspired by her ex boyfriend dancer Jorge Santos whom she dated for two years...”
“When discussing the inspiration behind her 2002 song Infatuation on RuPaul s Drag Race Untucked on Thursday she admitted It was heartbreaking because I found out he played for your team not mine Aguilera 37 didn t reveal her muse s name but she previously told MTV News that the...”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Christina Aguilera was infatuated with a guy who was into guys.”


"But I don't think anything can stop you as long as you always remember that you are a person - the good people and the good people around you."
"It makes you change, feel protected or shut down, it's strange."
"Once you get a certain degree of success, you get bored and you can see that someone around you is changing," she said
"In addition to splashing tea, Aguilera also shared some suggestions with aspiring drag performers."
"Spirit in the bottle" singer is currently engaged to Matthew rutler, who has been in love for a long time
After breaking up with Santos, Aguilera called Santos her "first love" and married Jordan bratmann in 2010
__ The song was inspired by her ex boyfriend dancer Jorge Santos, who she dated for two years
"When it comes to the inspiration in her 2002 song" infatuated with rupaul ", she admits that it's very sad because I found that he played for your team, not my team. Aguilera 37 didn't disclose the name of her muse, but she told MTV News before..."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) Christina Aguilera is infatuated with a boy who likes boys."



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It has made headlines in past years when the actress would celebrate her birthday with famous friends, but no such party was reported this year.”
“...nothing to indicate that Witherspoon even had a birthday bash this year...”
“She had been secretly worried that having them both there could ruin her evening but it all went amazingly well But while the magazine hides behind an untraceable source Aniston s spokesperson tells Gossip Cop on the record that the tabloid s story is made up In fact there s...”
“The seemingly phony tipster concludes, “Reese was so proud of them for being so mature and poised.”
“As the story goes the conversation turned out to be extremely courteous and civil The insider says Brad Pitt s name was never mentioned but Jolie did tell Aniston she was sorry to hear of her split from Justin Theroux...”
“But she decided enough was enough and encouraged both of them to attend The outlet s questionable tipster goes on to say that Aniston approached Jolie first and when she did so everyone in the room was suddenly aware of what was going on and you could feel the tension...”
““For years, Reese has had to delicately balance the friendships and it hasn’t been easy at times,” says the supposed insider.”
“According to a so-called “source,” it was Witherspoon’s idea to bury the hatchet between the two.”
“Postby Guestmr » Fri Apr 06, 2018 2:44 amThe latest issue of Woman’s Day says Aniston and Jolie have spent the past decade avoiding each other, but both agreed to attended Witherspoon’s 42nd birthday party last month.”


"In the past few years, when the actress celebrated her birthday with a famous friend, it made headlines, but this year there was no report of such a party."
__ There's no sign that Witherspoon had a birthday party this year... "
"She had been secretly worried that both of them would ruin her night, but everything went very well, but when the magazine was hidden behind an untraceable source, a spokesman for Aniston told the gossip police that the tabloid story was fictional, in fact..."
"Reese is proud that they are so mature and steady," concluded the hypocritical informant
"As the story develops, the conversation becomes very polite and civilized. People familiar with the matter say that Brad Pitt's name has never been mentioned, but Julie does tell Aniston that she is sorry to hear that she and Justin seru are breaking up..."
"But she thought it was enough, so she encouraged both of them to go to the event. The informant in question goes on to say that Aniston finds Julie first. When she finds Julie, everyone in the room suddenly realizes what's going on. You can feel nervous... "
"Over the years, Reese had to skillfully balance friendships, which sometimes wasn't easy," the so-called insider said
"According to a so-called 'source', Witherspoon's idea is to bury an axe between the two."
"The latest issue of women's day, 2:44 a.m. on Friday, April 6, 2018, says Aniston and Julie have been avoiding each other for the past 10 years, but both agreed to attend Witherspoon's 42nd birthday party last month."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Taylor and Joe will make their love last in 2018?”
“Click here to see pics of celebs, including Taylor, who wore the sexiest MTV EMAs dresses of all time.”
“These two seem inseparable!”
“In addition, the two were spotted holding hands at the Madison Square Garden event — hey, their PDA doesn’t lie.”
“We reported earlier how the two of them were caught smooching at Jingle Ball as they danced to Ed Sheeran, 26.”
“It looks like Taylor is trying to make this relationship work long-term, and that these two are clearly in love.”
““Things are amazing between them, their relationship is awesome—it’s built on mutual respect and trust, and one whole lot of love,” our source added.”
“The source went on to say that the two not only love each other, they trust and respect one another as well.”
““Now she has the new album to promote she’s out and about a lot more, and when Joe isn’t working, he’s with her…” That should make any Swifty extremely happy to hear!”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Hollywood stars, do you think Taylor and Joe will make their love last in 2018?"
"Click here to see photos of celebrities, including Taylor, who is wearing the sexiest MTV EMAS dress ever."
"The two seem to be inseparable!"
"In addition, the two were found holding hands at the Madison Square Garden event - Hey, their PDAs didn't lie."
"We reported earlier that the two of them were caught kissing ed Sheeran, 26, while dancing at the jingle ball."
"It seems Tyler wants to keep the relationship going, and the two are obviously in love."
"The relationship between them is amazing, their relationship is terrible, it's built on mutual respect and trust, as well as a whole lot of love," our source added
"The source went on to say that the two people not only love each other, but also trust and respect each other."
"Now she has a new album to promote, she goes out for a walk, and when Joe doesn't work, he's with her..." This should make swift very happy to hear it! "



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Rob even sent Kristen a bunch of flowers with a really sweet supportive note telling her to break a leg he s super excited for her and how well her career is going right now Meanwhile as HollywoodLife com previously reported K Stew is terrified she will mess up on...”
“In fact, R-Patz even sent K-Stew some flowers to congratulate her on her upcoming ‘SNL’ performance!”
“Read on for details.”
“Looks like Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart are finally back in a good place once again.”
“As K-Stew prepares to make her big SNL hosting appearance tonight, R-Patz is showing his support for his ex-girlfriend, in a super sweet way.”
“And when it comes to her possibly name checking the Brit during the show, he’s totally not phased!”
““Rob isn’t worried about Kristen’s SNL performance,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He knows that if she does make reference to him it will be in a light-hearted way, and there won’t be any malice involved.”
“They’re in a pretty good place these days and talk quite often.”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Rob even sent Christine a bunch of flowers with a very sweet letter of support on it, telling her that he was very excited about her when she broke one leg. Her career is now progressing very smoothly. Meanwhile, according to Hollywood website, K stew was afraid that she would screw up..."
"In fact, R-Patz even sent k-stew some flowers to celebrate her upcoming" SNL "performance
"Please read on for more details."
"It seems that Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart are finally back in a good place."
"When k-stew was going to host the show at SNL tonight, R-Patz expressed his support for his ex girlfriend in a super sweet way."
"When she found out the name of the Englishman on the show, he didn't realize it at all!"
"Rob is not worried about Christine's SNL performance," a source told reporters
"He knew that if she did mention him, it would be easy and harmless."
"They are in a good situation these days and they often chat."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Pascal Le Segretain/Getty Images]”
“Kim hired a transition team to make sure that she gives off a different image than she did previously the source said of Jenner and her daughter potentially parting ways professionally claiming that part of this process includes phasing out Kris s management While Kris and Kim have not commented...”
“That s according to a new report by Radar Online who s claiming that the mother daughter duo could be caught in a nasty feud as a source alleged that Kardashian has had somewhat of an epiphany during her time away from the spotlight and allegedly has now opened her...”
“...eyes to see how Jenner used her to build the Kardashian brand...”
“According to the site, Kim is ready to project a very different image from the uber-glamorous money flaunting Kardashian fans used to know and is allegedly ready to kick mom Kris to the curb, at least professionally, in order to do so.”
“A source alleged to the site this week that Kim now seems to be thinking that Kris used her to get where she is today which Radar Online is alleging could have led to a nasty feud between Jenner and her daughter as well as the reality star reportedly making...”
“...a pretty big business decision when it comes to her mom...”
““[Kim] will never think of [Kris] in the same way again,” the source said of Jenner’s supposed drama with her daughter amid reports she believes Jenner has been “using” her for years.”
“The site then went on to report that Kim is now in the process of projecting her new toned-down image amid the feud claims with Kris, revealing that Jenner may no longer play such a big part in Kardashian’s career going forward.”
“...on the claims this isn t the first time it s been reported that Kardashian may be looking to distance herself from Jenner at least professionally in the wake of her October robbery in Paris...”


"[Pascal Le segret / Getty pictures]
"Kim hired a transition team to make sure she presented a different image than before, and the source said Jenna and her daughter might go their separate ways, claiming professionally that part of the process included phasing out Kris's management, while Kris and Kim did not comment..."
"According to a new report from radar online, she claims that the mother and daughter may fall into a fierce fight, because it is reported that Kardashian had some kind of Epiphany when she was away from the spotlight, and now she is said to have opened her heart..."
__ See how Jenna used her to build the Kardashian brand... "
"According to the website, Kim is ready to present a very different image from Uber's glamorous and rich image known to Kardashian fans in the past. He is said to be ready to kick Kris's mother to the side of the road, at least professionally."
"This week, a source claimed to the website that Kim now seems to think that Chris used her to achieve today's goal. Radar online claimed that this may lead to a vicious feud between Jenna and her daughter as well as reality TV stars. It is reported that..."
__ A pretty big business decision when it comes to her mom... "
"Kim will never think of (Chris) in the same way again," the source said of Jenner's imaginary play with her daughter, saying she believed Jenner had "used" her for many years
"The website went on to report that Kim is now shaping her new low-key image in the discord with Chris, and revealed that Jenna may no longer play such an important role in Kardashian's future career."
__ As for the claim, this is not the first time that it has been reported that Kardashian may want to keep a distance from Jenner, at least after the robbery in Paris in October... "



Number  141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She wore five-inch heels during the show, but she couldn’t walk more than a few inches at a time, and her knees seemed to buckle under her weight.”
““Mariah’s clearly miserable,” an insider spilled to The National ENQUIRER.”
“Now a medical expert warns the 263-pound tootsie faces crippling arthritis and a string of life threatening health woes!”
“That is the spectacle witnessed by the bamboozled audiences who paid to watch the 5-foot-8 songbird waddle around a Las Vegas stage.”
“MARIAH Carey is now so fat her handlers have to wheel her on to the stage on a bed or Jet Ski!”
“...star has to be Wheeled Around so she won't fall!”
“263-lb.”


"She wore five inch heels in the show, but she could only walk a few inches at a time, and her knees seemed to be flexing under the pressure."
"Maria is obviously miserable," a person familiar with the matter told the national inquirer
"Now a medical expert has warned that the 263 pound tutz is facing severe arthritis and a series of life-threatening health problems!"
"That's what the crowd who paid to see this 5-foot-8 songbird wobble on the Las Vegas stage saw."
Maria Kelly is so fat now that her coach has to push her onto the stage in a wheelchair or motorboat
__ The stars have to be turned around so they don't fall
"263 pounds."



**Something goes wrong**
“MORE : Jay-Z drops $110,000 on alcohol he already owns on massive birthday benderMORE : Rihanna turns 30: A closer look at the icon’s greatest moments in the last three decades...”
“Not everyone was up in arms about the tip, with some fans getting excited for the lucky waitress on the receiving end of the thousand dollar cash out.”
“The hip hop mogul reportedly racked up a whopping $91,135 (£65,227.14) bar tab at the New York Playroom club for a friend’s birthday on Sunday, as well as few other expenditures.”
“According to Page Six, the father-of-three also treated his pals to a $13,000 (£9,304.36) meal at Japanese restaurant Zuma before stopping off at bar Made in Mexico for $9,000 (£6,441.48) worth of drinks – all before heading to the Playroom.”
“Ever the business man, the billionaire reportedly paid for 40 bottles of his own Ace Of Spades Champagne to go along with the $80,035 table for his friend and Roc Nation associate’s 50th b’day celebrations.”
“To top the night off, the 48-year-old music star also left enough room in his wallet to pay the bar staff an $11,100 tip before he left.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementBut news of the generous service charge left some people unhappy, with one person even calling the star a ‘weak ass tipper’ for paying the staff less than 15% of the overall bill.”
“I typically tip 18-20%, this bozo spends $91,000 and only tips 12%??”
“Jay-Z has 99 problem but being a weak ass tipper ain’t one!”
“Darrel Robinson texasdarrel February 20 2018 Not even 20 smh Morris Fabbri MoMoneyMoFabbri February 20 2018 That s only a 13 87 tip Jay Z pic twitter com v4cMkKKwSQ Rudolf E Havenstein RudyHavenstein February 21 2018 Service must have sucked because that isn t even the customary tip of 15”


"More: Jay-Z spent $110000 on the wine he already had at his birthday party. Bendermere: Rihanna is 30 years old: take a closer look at this idol's greatest moment in the past 30 years... "
"Not everyone is excited about tipping. Some fans are excited about the lucky waitress who receives a thousand yuan in cash."
"The hip-hop tycoon is reported to have raised $91135 (65227.14) in bar bills for a friend's birthday at playroom club in New York on Sunday, with little else to spend."
"According to the report on page 6, the father of three also invited his friends to a $13000 (? 9304.36) meal at Zuma restaurant in Japan, then stopped at a bar made in Mexico and drank $9000 (? 6441.48) wine - all before going to the game room."
The billionaire, a former businessman, spent 40 bottles of his ace of spades with a $80035 table to pay for the 50th National Day celebration of his friends and colleagues in the Republic of China, according to reports
"To make the evening more exciting, the 48 year old music star has enough room in his wallet to tip the bar staff $11100 before he leaves."
"Some people are not happy about the advertisement but the news of generous service charge. Some even say that the star is a" tipping coward "who tips less than 15% of the total bill."
"I usually tip 18-20%, and this idiot paid $91000 for 12%?"
"Jay-Z has 99 problems, but as a weak ass, tipping is not a problem!"
"Darrel Robinson texasdarrel February 20, 2018 is not even 20 SMH Morris Fabbri Mooney mobbri February 20, 2018, it's just a 13 87 tip. Jay z pic twitter com v4cmkkwsq Rudolf e havenstein Rudy havenstein the service on February 21, 2018 must be terrible, because it's not even the customary 15 tip."



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or do you think he’ll break her heart again?”
“It has helped her learn about herself and how much Justin means to her.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how Selena Gomez is missing Justin Bieber like crazy while she’s away in Europe.”
“Selena Gomez, 25, is an ocean away from sweetie Justin Bieber, 23, on a trip to London and this is the farthest they’ve been apart since getting back together in late October.”
“While there’s always Facetime, nothing beats the real thing and the singer is missing her honey with all of this distance between them.”
““Selena has been a bit bummed since her time out of the states and away from Justin.”
“She misses him dearly and the time apart has helped her realize how important he is to her,” a source close to Selena tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Selena felt the need to pull back a little but that has only made things more clear in her mind.”
“Selena has a strong love and bond for Justin.”
“She wanted alone time, got it, and it was what she needed.”


"Or do you think he'll break her heart again?"
"It helps her understand herself and how important Justin is to her."
"We have an exclusive report on how Selena Gomez madly missed Justin Bieber when she was in Europe."
"Selena Gomez, 25, and sweetheart Justin Bieber, 23, travel a long way from each other in London, the furthest since they met again at the end of October."
"Although there is always a FaceTime, there is nothing like the real thing. The singer misses her baby because of the distance between them."
"Serena has been a bit depressed since she left the United States and Justin."
"She missed him so much that she realized how important he was to her when she was apart," a source close to Serena told reporters
"Serena felt the need to step back a little bit, but it only made her feel better."
"Serena has a strong love and bond with Justin."
"She wanted time alone, got it, that's what she needed."



**Something goes wrong**
“ET on E!”
“Kardashian says, “If I’m truly barefaced, then I love to brush my eyebrows and curl my lashes and put on lip balm.”Season 15 of Keeping Up with the Kardashians premieres Sunday at 9 p.m.”
“Has Looked the Same for 10 Years As for when she goes completely makeup free...”
“Image zoom Credit Nicholas Hunt Getty Dave Kotinsky Getty Stefanie Keenan Getty When Kardashian s keeping her makeup routine minimal she grabs a lightweight foundation and does a little of Kim s contour a little lip liner tiny mascara and that s it RELATED PHOTOS Photographic Proof that Kourtney Kardashian...”
““I do use her gloss, but I’m a lipstick [user] — I like it matte,” the star explains.”
“Besides using one of Jenner’s lip liners and Kardashian West’s contour sticks each day, Kardashian also likes to use the KKW Beauty lipstick.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Looking for more style content?”
““But to me, I don’t mind if I don’t look contoured, but I do like a little lip definition, so I might pick Kylie’s.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I would pick Kylie Jenner lip liner, because that’s the lip liner I wear every day, and then I think I would have to pick Kim’s concealer,” Kardashian, 39, tells PEOPLE exclusively leading up to this weekend’s season 15 premiere of Keeping Up with the Kardashians.”


"Wait!"
Kardashian said, "if I really don't have a face, then I love to brush my eyebrows, curl my eyelashes, and put on lipstick." Season 15 "keep up with Kardashian" premieres at 9pm on Sunday
"For 10 years, when she didn't make up at all, she looked the same..."
"Image zoom credit Nicholas Hunter Getty Dave Kotnsi-GETY Stephanie Keenan GETY when Kardashian maintains her makeup routine minimum, she grabs a lightweight foundation and makes a little outline of Kim, a small lip liner small mascara, which is its related photo photo proof of..."
"I use her gloss, but I'm lipstick [user] - I like it matte," the star explained.
Besides using Jenner's lip line and Kardashian West's outline bar everyday, Kardashian also love KKW beauty lipstick.
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
"Looking for more style content?"
"But for me, I don't mind looking out of balance, but I do like a little bit of lip clarity, so I might choose Kelly." Get push notification of news, functions, etc
"I will choose Kylie Jenner lip line, because this is the lip line I wear everyday, and then I think I have to choose Kim's concealer," Kardashian, 39, told people that we should keep up with the cardash people in the 15 season's premiere this weekend.



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Many are hoping Blake Shelton may even surprise fans and propose to Gwen Stefani at some point on The Voice.”
“Life...”
“A report alleging that Blake Shelton will pop the question to Gwen Stefani with an expensive engagement ring on Valentine’s Day is untrue.”
“The rumor was started by Hollywood Life on Monday when it claimed The Voice judge had been shopping for a $500,000 diamond ring to have when he asks his lady love to marry him.”
“As an insider told the website, one of Shelton’s assistants had recently been shopping with a private jeweler in Beverly Hills.”
“The source surmised that the timing indicates that Blake is planning to ask Gwen to marry him on Valentine’s Day.”
“Hollywood Life‘s report added that Gwen Stefani can expect some “serious bling” from Blake Shelton when he finally does pick the right ring.”
“Gossip Cop squashed the rumor hours after the article was published.”
“It had readers take into consideration that the tabloid also claimed Shelton and Stefani had already gotten engaged and even secretly married The celebrity surveillance website revealed that they were informed by reliable sources a long time ago that no sources close to Blake or Gwen share details with Hollywood...”
“GP corrected another fabricated story just days before about Blake and Gwen after Celebrity Insider reported that the couple is having a “miracle baby.” The report cited a made-up report from OK!”


"A lot of people hope that Blake Sheldon can even surprise the fans and propose to Gwen Stephanie in his voice at some time."
"Life..."
"There are reports that Blake Sheldon will propose to Gwen Stephanie with an expensive engagement ring on Valentine's day, which is not true."
"The rumor was released on Monday by Hollywood life, which claimed that when the voice judge proposed to his wife, he was shopping for a $500000 diamond ring."
"An insider told the website that one of Sheldon's assistants recently went shopping with a private jeweler at Beverly Hills."
"Sources speculate that this time shows that black is planning to propose to Gwen on Valentine's day."
Hollywood life also reported that when Gwen Stephanie finally picked the right ring, he could look forward to some "serious auras" from Blake Shelton
"The gossip police crushed the rumor hours after the article was published."
"It allows readers to consider that the tabloid also claims that Sheldon and Stephanie are engaged, or even secretly married. Celebrity surveillance website reveals that they learned from reliable sources long ago that there are no sources close to black or Gwen to share details with Hollywood..."
Just a few days ago, after celebrity insider reported that Blake and Gwen had a "miracle baby", the general practitioner corrected another fabricated story



**Something goes wrong**
“For more on the couple’s decision to put their baby plans on hold, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now.”
““Not because of a change in her love for Blake,” explains the source, “but because she feels as if it might not be meant to be.” The country star is on board with her thoughts.”
““Gwen sat in the stands and was grooving along,” a concert-goer says in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
““Blake sang a lot in her direction.” At one point, he even shared a sweet detail of their home life, says the witness: “Their dog was having puppies and they couldn’t wait to get home!”For now, those furry family members are serving as surrogates of sorts.”
““Blake and Gwen have decided to put plans to have a baby on hold,” an insider shares in the new issue.”
““Their feeling is if it happens naturally, great.”
“But they’ve decided to not focus on it for the time being.”Stefani, 48, and Shelton, 41, have been trying to conceive for over a year, the source reveals.”
“But the one blessing of their struggle is that it’s made them stronger than ever.”
“The source says Shelton is “absolutely devoted” to Gwen’s sons, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9, and Apollo, 4: “Blake is extremely attentive, loving and doting towards Gwen and the boys.”Shelton’s devotion is part of what made the couple try for a child together.”
““Blake has always wanted children,” explains a friend.”


"For more information about the couple's decision to suspend their family planning, please read the new issue of American weekly and start now."
"It's not because her love for black has changed," the source explained, "but because she feels it may not be predestined." The country star was on the boat with her ideas
"Gwen is sitting in the stands and walking," one concert goer said in the new issue of American weekly
"Black sang a lot to her." On one occasion, he even shared the sweet details of their family life. The witness said: "their dog gave birth to a puppy, and they can't wait to go home! "At the moment, those furry family members are acting as surrogate mothers of all kinds."
"Black and Gwen decided to postpone their plans to have children," an insider said in the IPO
"Their feeling is that if it happens naturally, that's great."
Stefani, 48, and Sheldon, 41, have been trying to conceive for more than a year, sources said
"But one of the benefits of their struggle is that it makes them stronger than ever before."
The source said Sheldon was "absolutely loyal" to Gwen's sons Kingston (11), Zuma (9) and Apollo (4), "black was very concerned, loving and doting on Gwen and the children." Sheldon's loyalty is one of the reasons why the couple want to have children together
"Black always wanted to have children," a friend explained



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When it comes to Lachey, though, the insider says last week could’ve been her last performance with Chmerkovskiy: “I wouldn’t be surprised if Maks doesn’t return as her partner for the rest of the season.”However, a DWTS rep says Chmerkovskiy will compete next week.”
“““The reason why Maks and I worked out so well was because I come from a world where all I worked with was men, and pretty much I’m like a guy in a lot of ways,” the ESPN personality told PEOPLE in 2015.”
“I’ve already done more on this season than I’ve done on Dancing with the Stars in 13 seasons.”RELATED VIDEO: Peta Murgatroyd and Maksim Chmerkovskiy Welcome Son Shai AleksanderAndrews, now 39, has also raved about her experience working with the new dad on season 10.”
“It’s cool.”He added at the time, “She lets me be creative.”
““He pushes me to stand up for myself, whether it’s in real life or on the dance floor.”
“In 2015, he told The Real of his season 13 partner, soccer star Hope Solo, “That’s literally the only person that I could dislike from my past, present or future.”“I feel that I can really be myself with Maks,” she told PEOPLE in 2014.”
“This isn’t the first time Chmerkovskiy, 37, has butted heads with his DWTS celebrity counterparts.”
“Image zoomWhile the former Total Request Live host, 36, has called the Ukrainian dancer the “best coach,” the source adds, “They’ve been fighting a lot.” (Reps for Chmerkovskiy and Lachey could not immediately be reached for comment.)”
““They both have big personalities and that’s not always the best recipe for a good partnership.”PEOPLE’s special issue 25 Seasons of ‘Dancing with the Stars’ is on stands now.”
““There’s a big chemistry issue,” the insider says.”


However, when it comes to lacy, the insider said last week could be her last performance with chimmelkovsky: "I wouldn't be surprised if Michael didn't come back as a partner for the rest of the season." However, a representative of the German professional baseball team said that chimmelkovsky will play next week. "
"The reason Max and I work so well together is because I come from a world that only works with men, and I'm like a man in many ways," the ESPN celebrity told people in 2015
"I've done more in this season than in 13 seasons of dance with the stars." Related video: PETA murgatroyd and maxim chimmerkovsky welcome their son Shay Aleksander Andrews, 39, and praise her experience with her new dad in season 10
"Cool," he added at the time, "she makes me creative."
"Whether in real life or on the dance floor, he urged me to stand up for myself."
"In 2015, he told his 13th season partner, football star hope Solo's the real," this is the only person I didn't like in the past, now or in the future. " "I feel like I can really be myself with Michael," she told people in 2014
"This is not the first time that the 37 year old chimmerkovsky has confronted his DWTS celebrity."
The 36 year old former total request live host called the Ukrainian dancer "the best coach," the source added, "they've been fighting." (representatives of chmerkovskiy and Lachey were not immediately available for comment.)
"They all have strong personalities, which is not always the best recipe for a good partnership." The 25th season of people's special issue "dancing with stars" is now on the exhibition stand
"There's a big chemistry problem," the insider said



**Something goes wrong**
“"We're able to sort of see each other and smile and wish each other well," Paltrow said.”
“By the time of the Sawyer sit-down, Pitt was married to Jennifer Aniston.”
“For both, perhaps?”
“I f ked that up Brad Paltrow said on the Girlboss Radio podcast when host Sophia Amoruso mentioned Gwyneth s great love of the mid to late 90s whom she met in 1994 on the set of the thriller Se7en...”
“...playing his ill fated wife...”
“When he won a Golden Globe for 12 Monkeys in 1996, Pitt's final thank you was reserved for "especially the love o' my life, my angel, Gwyneth Paltrow."”
“They got engaged, they even got matching haircuts, but then they broke up in June 1997.”
“Paltrow has been relentless in blaming herself for the demise of their relationship, telling Diane Sawyer in 2003, "I'm so lucky that I spent time with Brad, somebody who was such a good person!”
“Especially when I was, like, such a mess."”
“Admittedly the relentless media attention—which peaked when long-lens nude photos of the couple taken while they were vacationing in the Caribbean ended up online—really got to her then, understandably so.”


"We can see each other, smile and bless each other," Paltrow said
"By the time Sawyer sat down, Pete had married Jennifer Aniston."
"Maybe both?"
"When the host Sophia Amoruso mentioned Gwyneth's love for the mid and late 1990s, Brad Paltrow said on the radio girl boss podcast," I messed it up. She met Gwyneth on the set of the thriller Se7en in 1994... "
__ Playing his ill fated wife... "
In 1996, when Pete won the Golden Globe Award for twelve monkeys, his last thanks were "especially the love of my life, my angel, Gwyneth Paltrow."
"They got engaged and even had matching haircuts, but then they broke up in June 1997."
"I'm very lucky to be with Brad, a very nice person," Paltrow told Diane Sawyer in 2003, mercilessly blaming herself for ending the relationship
"Especially when I'm, like, in a mess."
"It's undeniable that when the couple's long nude photos on holiday in the Caribbean finally came to light online, the media's relentless attention peaked, which she was really interested in at that time, which is understandable."



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““At this point she’ll do whatever she can to avoid drawing attention to Kanye’s embarrassing rants.”We pay for juicy info!”
““In his mind, they could be the most powerful couple and spread an important message together, but Kim’s not interested in getting caught up in this,” the source concluded.”
“But the source says West knows what he is doing and is just looking for a little loyalty from his life partner.”
“...are worried they ll have to step in and stop him...”
“But the reality is that she d rather stay as far away from his drama as possible and has made it very clear that she s not going to keep rushing to his aid That lack of support has only fueled West s rage and Kardashian and mom Kris Jenner...”
““Kim defended him on Twitter at first,” the source confided.”
“But after the rapper said during a live TV interview that “slavery was a choice,” his family started getting threats from people close to dangerous gangs.”
“As Radar readers know, West, 40, has been on a tweeting tirade for the past several weeks, and even admitted to undergoing liposuction and abusing painkillers.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"At this point, she will do everything she can to avoid drawing attention to Kanye's embarrassing rant." We pay for interesting information! "
"In his view, they may be the most powerful couple, spreading an important message together, but Kim Jong Il is not interested in getting involved," the source concluded
"But the source said West knew what he was doing and just wanted a little loyalty from his life partner."
__ Worried that they would step in and stop him... "
"But the reality is that she would rather stay as far away from his play as possible, and has made it very clear that she will not continue to rush to help him, because the lack of support will only fuel West's anger, Kardashian and his mother Chris Jenner..."
"Kim Jong Il initially defended him on twitter," the source said
But after the rapper said in a live television interview that "slavery is an option," his family began to be threatened by dangerous gangs
"Radar readers know that 40 year old West has been making a lot of hype on Weibo in the past few weeks, even admitting to accepting liposuction and abusing painkillers."



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...close ties: Brad's parents are regular visitors to the family abroad and help care for the couple's six children...”
“A spokesperson for Pitt is yet to respond to Mail Online's request for comment.”
“The Moneyball star, 48, has not seen Betty Russell, who resides in an alleged 'sub-standard' nursing home in Oklahoma, for over four years, his great-aunt claims.”
“Speaking to The Sun, Mary Ann Lanier said: 'Betty misses him.”
“He doesn't write, he doesn't seem to stay in contact with her. '”
“Estranged Brad Pitt s family have issued a public plea for the actor to visit his elderly grandmother after a four year absence The last time Brad visited was in 2008 when he and Angelina Jolie at the time pregnant with twins Knox and Vivienne attended a family gathering with...”
“...their children Maddox Pax Zahara and Shiloh...”
“'The last time he came to Shawnee, Angelina was very pregnant.”
“She was just great, just like a member of the family,' Mary Ann told the paper.”
“'There was no put-on airs or anything like that.”


__ Intimacy: Brad's parents are frequent visitors to foreign families and help take care of the couple's six children... "
"A spokesman for Pitt has yet to respond to an email online request for comment."
"The 48 year old Golden Globe star has not seen Betty Russell for more than four years and lives in a so-called" substandard "nursing home in Oklahoma, his aunt said
"Betty missed him a lot," Mary Ann Lanier told the sun
"He doesn't write and doesn't seem to keep in touch with her."
"Brad Pitt's estranged family publicly appealed to the actor to visit his four-year-old grandmother. Brad's last visit was in 2008, when he and Angelina Jolie were pregnant with twins, and Knox and Vivian attended a family party..."
__ Their children, Maddox Pax Zahara and Shiloh... "
"The last time he came to Shawnee, Angelina was pregnant."
"She's wonderful, just like a member of the family," Marianne told the paper
"No airs or anything."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow the AllAboutTRH Podcast on iTunes & Soundcloud – Remember to Rate, Comment & Subscribe!”
“...months back...”
“However, it turns out that the Real Housewives of Atlanta star‘s latest get-rich-quick plan isn’t panning out so far.”
“According to Life & Style, NeNe is trying to get paid to endorse a major weight-loss product but isn’t getting any bites from companies.”
““NeNe’s put on a few extra pounds,” says a source, “so she’s been reaching out to companies in hopes of getting a deal like Oprah Winfrey has with Weight Watchers, or Marie Osmond has with Nutrisystem.”But it seems that companies aren’t interested.”
“Why do you ask?”
“NeNe “is a hothead,” sources say.”
“No big company wants to gamble that she can keep her attitude at bay Adding that she sticks her foot in her mouth way too much A perfect example of NeNe s hotheaded ways is the not so funny rape joke she made during a stand up show a few...”
“I think NeNe would be a good spokesperson on a good day, but then again she has a nasty side she can’t always keep in check.”
“Like AllAboutTRH On Facebook.”


"Follow allaboutthh podcasts on iTunes and Soundcloud - remember ratings, reviews and subscriptions!"
__ A few months ago... "
"However, the real housewives in Atlanta stars' latest get rich quick plan have so far failed."
According to life and fashion magazine, Nien is trying to get paid for endorsing a major weight loss product, but has not benefited from the company
One source said: "Nen has gained some weight, so she has been contacting companies to try to make a deal like Oprah Winfrey and weight watchers or Marie Osmond and NutriSystem. But none of these companies seem to be interested. "
"Why do you ask?"
"Neinei" is a hot head, "the source said
"No big company wants to bet that she can control her attitude. She also said she put her feet in her mouth too much. This is a perfect example of Nen's irascibility. This is a not so funny rape joke she told on an independence show a few weeks ago. "
"I think Nei Nei will be a good spokesperson on a good day, but once again she has a bad side and she can't always stay in control."
"It's like allaboutthh on Facebook."



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get started today by signing-up and submitting an article Get started today by signing-up and submitting an article HERE BECOME AN AUTHOR”
“Do YOU want to write for HMB?”
“One witness, writing about the experience on Twitter, said “the shit hit the fan in business class” when Jay-Z “lost control” and began shapeshifting in front of the other business class passengers.”
““V scary.”
“He kept changing shape.”
“He knew more and more people were watching and he got angrier and angrier when he couldn t stop At one point just before the plane began it s descent Jay Z scuttled off to the bathroom where he spent at least 10 minutes according to another eyewitness before emerging...”
“...with a pale drawn expression and then immediately begin shapeshifting again with the eyes of the entire business class cabin fixed on him...”
““Everybody saw it.”
“His chin jutted out the door and then he just changed completely into a leering reptilian.”According to one passenger, Jay-Z’s reptilian form is a shrunken version of his human form.”
“Describing reptilian Jay Z on Twitter the passenger wrote He looked sickly about five feet tall like a hunchback crossed with a bird but with scales and a really negative vibe Another witness described him as swaggering around evil grey a f cking reptile Twitter exploded with tweets detailing the...”


"By registering and submitting articles from today on by registering and submitting articles from today on"
"Do you want to write for HMB?"
An eyewitness described the experience on twitter, saying that when Jay-Z "lost control" and began to deform in front of other business class passengers, "poop hit business class fans."
"It's terrible."
"He keeps changing shapes."
"He knew that more and more people were watching. When he couldn't stop before the plane began to descend, he became more and more angry. Jay z rushed to the bathroom where, according to another witness, it took him at least 10 minutes to get out..."
"With a pale expression, and then immediately began to deformation, the whole business class eyes are staring at him..."
"Everybody saw it."
"His chin sticks out of the door, and then he's completely a squint reptile." According to a passenger, Jay-Z's reptilian form is a reduced version of his human form
"Describing the reptile jay z on twitter, the passenger wrote that he looked sick, about five feet tall, like a hunchback crossed with a bird, but with scales and a very negative atmosphere. Another witness described him swaggering around the evil gray, and a damned reptile tweeted in detail on twitter... "



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple has been living together in the Grammy-winning vocalist’s new Mulholland Estates mansion in Los Angeles, which she bought in April 2013 for $10 million.”
“Golden Globes...”
“He s such a character and he s so happy and at the end of the day that s what s most important Though The Voice coach is known for keeping her personal life private Aguilera has posed with her new fiancé on several major red carpets including the 2011”
““He’s the love of my life, and I adore him,” Aguilera gushed about Max on The Ellen DeGeneres Show in November 2010 shortly after the divorce news broke.”
“They share custody of 6-year-old son Max Bratman.”
“Aguilera and Bratman were married from November 2005 until October 2010, and, ironically, the couple finalized their divorce on Valentine’s Day 2011.”
“Xtina met her beau on the set of the 2010 film Burlesque, which premiered while the pop diva was in the middle of a painful divorce from ex-husband Jordan Bratman.”
““He asked and I said……” she wrote Friday along with a picture of her sparkling new engagement ring.”
“On Valentine’s Day, the “Beautiful” singer, 33, and her film producer boyfriend decided to make things official.”
“After almost three years of dating, Christina Aguilera announced her engagement to boyfriend Matt Rutler via Twitter.”


"The couple have been living in the Grammy award-winning singer's new Mulholland estates mansion in Los Angeles, which she bought for $10 million in April 2013."
The golden globe
"He's such a character. He's so happy. Last but not least, although the voice coach is famous for her private life, Aguilera took pictures with her new fiance on the red carpet in 2011."
"He's the love of my life, and I adore him," Aguilera gushed about Max at Ellen DeGeneres Show in November 2010, shortly after the divorce
"They raised their six-year-old son, Max brattman."
"Aguilera and Bratman married from November 2005 to October 2010. Ironically, the couple divorced on Valentine's day in 2011."
"Xtina met her boyfriend on the set of the 2010 film funny, when the pop divorcee was divorcing her ex husband, Jordan Bratman."
"He asked, and I said..." She wrote in Friday's letter, along with a photo of her shiny new engagement ring
On Valentine's day, the 33 year old "beautiful" singer and her filmmaker boyfriend decided to make it public
Nearly three years after dating, Christina Aguilera tweeted her engagement to her boyfriend Matt rutler



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if you talk about my dad, I will cut you.”Despite their estrangement, in April of last year Kardashian West told Ellen Degeneres that she would “always love her” for helping raise her and her sisters.”
““I was just trying to be respectful.”
““My relationship with Caitlyn was strained,” the mother of three said during the episode, which aired October of last year.”
“Simpson was guilty of having killed wife Nicole Brown Simpson and waiter Ron Goldman — despite having served as the NFL star’s defense attorney in his 1994 murder trial.”
“In an episode of KUWTK, the KKW Beauty mogul also revealed that she had been hurt by a chapter in the memoir in which Jenner implied that her late father Robert Kardashian thought his friend O.J.”
“Although Kardashian West publicly supported Jenner’s journey, she cut ties after reading her book, which alleged Kris Jenner — Caitlyn’s ex-wife and Kim’s mom — knew more about her gender identity crisis than she’s admitted.”
“Kim, I haven't talked to in a year," Jenner said while discusing her memoir at the U.K.’s Cambridge Union, according to Cambridge News.”
“"To be honest, I don't talk to [the Kardashians] anymore.”
“Last November, Jenner revealed she hadn’t spoken to Kim Kardashian West in a year.”


"But if you talk about my father, I'll cut you off." Despite their estrangement, last April, Kardashian West told Ellen DeGeneres that she would "always love her" because she helped raise her and her sisters
"I just want to show respect."
"I have a very tense relationship with Caitlin," the mother of three said in a broadcast last October
"Simpson is guilty of killing his wife Nicole Brown Simpson and waiter Ron Goldman - even though he served as a defense lawyer for the NFL star in the 1994 murder trial."
In an episode of kutke, the kkw beauty tycoon also revealed that she was hurt by a chapter in her memoir, in which Jenner hinted that her late father, Robert Kardashian, thought his friend O.J
"Although Kardashian West openly supported Jenner's journey, she broke off contact after reading her book, which says that Chris Jenner, Caitlin's ex-wife and Kim's mother, knows more about her gender identity crisis than she admits."
"Kim, I haven't talked about it in a year." According to Cambridge news, Jenner said in a memoir of the Cambridge Union in the UK.
"To tell you the truth, I won't talk to (the kardashians any more."
"Last November, Jenner revealed that she had not spoken to Kim Kardashian West for a year."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Justin's response?”
“), and now the internet is speculating about WHY they're rushing into marriage.”
“The obvious answer is that Justin and Hailey are in love and want to spend forever together, but there's also a rumor lurking in some corners of the internet (read: Twitter) claiming that Hailey's pregnant.”
“Which, to be clear, is definitely not anyone's business, and is also pretty sexist!”
“That aside, a pap caught up with Justin while he was buying coffee, and made the mistake of asking him about the rumors, saying "Is Hailey pregnant right now?”
“You stated that you guys are family, so everybody was thinking she might be pregnant."”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“To stop in his tracks and call this dude out, saying "What’s your deal, bro?”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Justin's reaction?"
"Now, the Internet is guessing why they got married in a hurry."
"The obvious answer is that Justin and Haley are in love and want to be together forever, but in some corners of the Internet (read: Twitter), there is also a rumor that Haley is pregnant."
"To be clear, it's not anyone's business, and it's quite sexist!"
In addition, a dad caught up with Justin when he was buying coffee and mistakenly asked him about the rumor, saying, "is Haley pregnant now?"
"You said you were a family, so everyone thought she might be pregnant."
"This content was imported from YouTube."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
Stop and call this guy out and say, "what's the matter with you, brother?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Comment below with your thoughts!”
““Twigs knows that Kristen understands him almost better than anyone,” a source told OK magazine’s May 23 issue.”
“A new report claims that FKA Twigs has been leaning on Robert Pattinson’s ex, Kristen Stewart, for advice about their relationship.”
“Hmm.”
“Is Kristen Stewart, 26, doling out love advice to her ex’s fiancee?”
“One shocking report claims that FKA Twigs, 28, has been reaching out to the Twilight actress in hopes of figuring out her future husband, Robert Pattinson, 29.”
“Uh oh.”
“Is there trouble in paradise for the future Mr. and Mrs. Pattinson?”
“Unfortunately, a new report claims that Rob is “off the rails,” and that his fiancee, FKA Twigs, is having trouble reaching him.”
“So, what’s a girl to do?”


"Comment on the following with your ideas!"
"Tevez knows that Kristen knows him better than anyone else," a source told OK magazine on May 23
"A new report says FKA twigs has been asking Robert Pattinson's ex girlfriend, Kristen Stewart, for advice on their relationship."
"Well."
Is Kristen Stewart, 26, offering love advice to her ex-wife's fiancee? "
"A shocking report says that the 28 year old FKA twigs has been contacting the Twilight star, hoping to find her future husband, 29 year old Robert Pattinson."
"Ah, oh."
"Is the future of the pattinsons in trouble in heaven?"
"Unfortunately, a new report claims that rob" cheated "and that his fiancee FKA twigs had difficulty contacting him
"So, what should a girl do?"



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When Foxx was asked during the NBA All-Star Celebrity Game in February about shooting hoops with the mom of 12-year-old Suri days earlier, he immediately took off his microphone and walked off of the live interview.”
“The outfit featured high-waisted, pleated shorts with a semicircle trim and a cropped, off-shoulder bodice top.”
“Night Out!”
“Jamie Foxx and Katie Holmes Grab Dinner in the Big Apple After Split RumorsJamie Foxx was the constant gentleman while out with Katie Holmes on Monday night.”
“The Beat Shazam host, 50, was photographed helping Holmes out of their black SUV as the two headed to dinner at popular Asian fusion restaurant Tao in New York City.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Earlier in the day, Foxx was spotted heading to a taping of The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, where he and costar Taron Egerton promoted their upcoming movie, Robin Hood.”
“For the dinner date, Foxx wore skinny white pants and a navy blue polo.”
“Holmes, meanwhile, kept cool from the summer heat in a Zimmermann two-piece look.”
“The 39-year-old Dawson’s Creek alum paired the ensemble with a red handbag, tan shoes, a pendant necklace, and oversized sunglasses.”


"In February, when fox was asked to shoot with 12-year-old Suri's mother a few days ago at the NBA all star masters, he immediately took off the microphone and left for the interview."
The dress features high waist Pleated Shorts with semicircular edges and a cropped off shoulder bodice
"Go out at night!"
"Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes have dinner at the big apple after they split up. Jamie fox is a regular on Monday night when they go out with Katie Holmes."
"Beat Shazam, 50, was photographed helping Holmes get out of the black SUV while dining at Tao, a popular Asian fusion restaurant in New York City."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Earlier in the day, it was found that fox was on his way to the recording scene of the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon, where he and his partner Taron Eagleton promoted their upcoming film Robin Hood
"On the dinner date, fox was wearing white tights and Navy polo."
"At the same time, Holmes wore Zimmerman's two-piece suit to keep out the cold and spend the summer."
"The 39 year old Dawson stream alum paired the outfit with a red handbag, a pair of Tan shoes, a pendant necklace and a pair of oversized sunglasses."



Number  158
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kendall deleted the snap soon afterwards.”
“Many identified the “cute” baggie as the same kind of bag popularly used to store cocaine.”
“Kim’s sister Kendall Jenner, no stranger to scandals herself (see: the recent T-shirt fiasco, her Pepsi commercial), posted a photo to her Snapchat in July of last year of a tiny plastic bag with the caption: "this is the cutest little ziploc baggie I have ever seen."”
“This isn’t the first time a Kardashian has been involved in a social media related cocaine scandal.”
“Shop in Manhattan this Sunday...”
“That s sugar from our candy mess from dylan s candy shop https t co oICdPQVi8d Kim Kardashian West KimKardashian July 11 2017 For the record Kim is indeed in NYC this week and according to photos posted on TMZ she did take her daughter North to Dylan s Candy...”
““That’s sugar from our candy mess from dylan’s candy shop.”I do not play with rumors like this so I'm gonna shut it down real quick.”
““I do not play with rumours like this,” she wrote in response.”
“It didn't take long for many of her millions of followers to screenshot the scene and upload it to social media, pointing out that the two white lines look suspiciously like cocaine.”
“In the bottom right hand corner of the video, two short, thin, straight white lines can be seen on a table behind the reality star.”


"Kendall quickly deleted the snapshot."
Many people think that this "cute" bag is the same as the one commonly used to store cocaine
Kim's sister, Kendall Jenner, is no stranger to the scandal (see: recent T-shirt fiasco, her pepsi ad). Last July, she posted a picture of a small plastic bag on her snapchat, which read: "this is the cutest ziploc bag I've ever seen."
"This is not the first time that Kardashian has been involved in a cocaine scandal related to social media."
"Shopping in Manhattan this Sunday..."
"This is the candy we bought from Dylan candy store, HTTPS t Co oicdpqvi8d Kim Kardashian West Kim Kardashian on July 11, 2017. For the record, Kim was actually in New York this week. According to the photos released on TMZ, she did take her daughter north to Dylan candy store..."
"That's the candy we got at Dylan's candy store." I don't like this rumor, so I'll turn it off soon
"I don't like such rumors," she wrote in her reply
"Before long, many of her millions of fans took screenshots and uploaded them to social media, pointing out that the two white lines looked suspiciously like cocaine."
"In the lower right corner of the video, you can see two short, thin white lines on a table behind the reality show star."



Number  159
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More:Princes William and Harry hit the 'Star Wars: The Last Jedi' red carpetMore:Duchess Kate is perfection in a plum Seraphine maternity coat...”
“"The photograph was taken by Hugo Burnand at Highgrove in July during the private 70th Birthday party of The Duchess of Cornwall," the official residence for the pair tweeted Monday.”
“...from Charles Prince of Wales and Camilla Duchess of Cornwall...”
“More Prince Harry interviews Barack Obama for upcoming radio show More Prince Harry and Meghan Markle set royal wedding date May 19 If you have room on your card holder for one more royal Christmas card you can also print out this tweet from Clarence House featuring the Christmas card...”
“We look forward to welcoming Charlotte to our nursery in January,'" Kensington Palace added.”
“"The Willcocks Nursery School has said: 'We are delighted that The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge have chosen the Willcocks Nursery School for Princess Charlotte.”
“The palace also had other news to share on the social media site Monday: Princess Charlotte will attend Willcocks Nursery School in London beginning in January, the palace's account tweeted.”
“Kensington Palace announced in October that Will and Kate were expecting a baby due in April.”
“This time next year, they will be a family of five.”
“In the photo with an ecru background, the royals coordinate by donning various shades of light blue.”


"More: Prince William and Harry play red in" Star Wars: the last Jedi "C appetmore: Duchess Kate is perfectly dressed in a plum colored Seraphine maternity jacket..."
"This photo was taken by Hugo burnand at Highgrove in July at the Duchess of Cornwall's private 70th birthday party," the couple's residence tweeted on Monday
__ From Prince Charles of Wales and Camilla, Duchess of Cornwall... "
"More Prince Harry interviews Barack Obama for the upcoming radio show more Prince Harry and Megan Marcel set the royal wedding date on May 19. If you still have room for another royal Christmas card on your business card, you can also print out this tweet from Clarence House with the Christmas card on it..."
"We look forward to welcoming Charlotte to our nursery in January," Kensington Palace added
"Wilcox kindergarten said:" we are very glad that the Duchess of Cambridge chose Wilcox kindergarten for Princess Charlotte. "
"The palace has other news to share on social media sites on Monday: Princess Charlotte will start school at Wilcox kindergarten in London from January next year, and the palace's account tweeted
"Kensington Palace announced in October that will and Kate will be due in April."
"This time next year, they will be a family of five."
In this photo set in natural color, the royal family uses various shades of light blue to coordinate



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comments!”
“"Just a couple years ago, it was Gigi getting all the good gigs.”
“The two models have rocked some major shows over the years, however the younger of the two has been killing it on the runway in New York and Milan as of late, and it's making her older sibling extremely jealous!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyBella’s the talk of the modeling world and it’s getting to Gigi really badly.”
“An insider says, “Gigi feels she’s being usurped in the modeling world by her own sister.”
“All of a sudden Bella has the momentum and Gigi’s jealous as hell.”Source: Getty"She’s always been sensitive about Bella’s success, and now her insecurity is at an all-time high,” the insider reveals.”
“Does sensitive equal jealousy in this situation?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyGigi was the “It girl” for a while in the industry prior to Bella making it big on the scene.”
“Her kittenish looks were ‘in’ and designers called her the new Brigitte Bardot,” says the insider.”
“Source: GettyWhat do you think about Gigi’s jealousy of her baby sister?”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Just a few years ago, it was Gigi who got all the good shows."
"These two models have been brilliant on some big shows for many years. However, recently, the young people of the two models have been brilliant on catwalks in New York and Milan, which makes her brothers very jealous!"
"The article continues with the following advertising sources: Getty Bella's talk about the modeling world and it got Gigi really bad."
"Gigi feels like she's been usurped by her sister in the modeling world," one industry source said
"All of a sudden, Bella has a motivation, and Gigi is so jealous." Source: Getty "she has always been sensitive to Bella's success, and now her insecurity is at an all-time high," a person familiar with the matter said
"In this case, is sensitivity equal to jealousy?"
The article continues in the following ad source: Getty Gigi is an "it girl" in the industry before Bella made it big on the spot for a while
"Her cat is so popular that designers call her the new Brigitte Bardot," the person familiar with the matter said
"Source: what do you think Gigi is jealous of her little sister?"



Number  161
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Hey,that’s the time I spent on this book!”
“Sweet and Bitter: “Britney Jean Spears was born on December 2,1981, after twenty-one hours of labor (but who’s counting?).”
“She used tobe the happiest girl in the world.”
“All I could think of was, How could this be?”
“It was Britney, andshe was shaving off her beautiful hair.”
“From Here to There: “I wanted to be in denial, but I couldn’tdeny the video footage unfolding in front of me.”
“1.”
“When I dropped it while convulsing withlaughter, that is.”
“...addCredit(“Annotated copy of Through the Storm: Brandon Keim”)Introduction: “If you’re looking for parenting advice, you’veopened the wrong book.” — Um, I’m not looking for parenting advice, but Iclosed the book anyway.”
“Though chances are you know this already.”


"- Hey, that's the time I spend on this book!"
Sweet words: "Britney Spears was born on December 21, 1981, after 21 hours of labor (but who is counting?)."
"She used to be the happiest girl in the world."
"All I can think of is, how is that possible?"
"It's Britney Spears. She's shaving her beautiful hair."
"From here to there:" I want to deny it, but I can't stop the video from showing in front of me
_1._
"I fell when I was convulsed with laughter, that's it."
__ addCredit_____hrough the  Storm:Brandon Keim If you're looking for parenting advice, you're opening the wrong book -Well, I'm not looking for parenting advice, but I've lost my book. "
"Although you may already know."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The news was first reported by Deadline Hollywood.”
“DiCaprio is repped by LBI Entertainment.”
“Appain Way is developing a reboot of the “Captain Planet” series with Glen Powell, among its many projects.”
“Paramount has been busy acquiring material for DiCaprio following his new first-look deal, which he signed in 2015.”
“He will next play Sam Phillips, a pioneer in the music industry during the 1950s who helped launch the careers of Elvis Presley, Johnny Cash, and Jerry Lee Lewis.”
“As a ghostwriter, Talty’s work includes “A Captain’s Duty,” which was the basis for the 2013 Oscar-nominated Tom Hanks-starrer “Captain Phillips.”DiCaprio recently starred in “Before the Flood,” the 2016 documentary about climate change directed by Fisher Stevens.”
“Talty is the New York Times-bestselling author of six nonfiction books focused on history and individual achievement.”
“DiCaprio’s producing partner, Jennifer Davisson, will also produce with Gotham, as well as Nathaniel Posey on behalf of his Appian Way Productions.”
“Ellen Goldsmith-Vein and Jeremy Bell of The Gotham Group will produce.”
“They were loathed by law-abiding Italian families who were frightened, but nevertheless helped Petrosino behind the scenes.”


"This news was the first reported in Hollywood."
"DiCaprio is represented by LBI entertainment."
Appain way is working with Glen Powell to restart the captain of the planet series, one of its many projects
"Paramount has been busy sourcing materials for DiCaprio after he signed a new FirstLook agreement in 2015."
He will next play Sam Phillips, a music pioneer in the 1950s who helped Elvis Presley, Johnny Cash and Jerry Lee Lewis start their own careers
"As a ghost writer, tardy's works include captain's duties, which is the basis of Captain Phillips, starring Tom Hanks, who was nominated by the Academy Award in 2013. DiCaprio recently starred in Fisher Stevens' 2016 documentary on climate change, before the flood
"Tardy is the best-selling author of the New York Times and the author of six nonfiction books, focusing on history and personal achievements."
"DiCaprio's production partner, Jennifer Davidson, will also work with Gotham, and Nathaniel Posey will produce on behalf of his apian way production company."
"Alan goldsmith Wayne and Jeremy bell of Gotham group will produce."
"The law-abiding Italian family hated them, they were scared, but they helped Petrosino behind the scenes."



**Something goes wrong**
“"Sad to lose some sentimental items, but thankful to be safe."”
“"Thanks for all the kind words about my house ❤️ luckily no one was hurt," she tweeted.”
“The actress took to Twitter Tuesday to share that no one was hurt in the robbery.”
“Luckily, Hale wasn't home at the time of the robbery, TMZ reports.”
“The site reports that the robber entered Hale's house by breaking one of her windows and proceeded to steal over $15,000 worth of purses and jewelry.”
“According to TMZ, Hale's house was burglarized on Friday, Jan. 5, early in the morning.”
“News can confirm that the 28-year-old Pretty Little Liars star's house in the San Fernando Valley was recently robbed.”
“E!”
“Lucy Hale was the victim of a home invasion last week.”


"It's sad to lose some sentimental things, but I'm glad to be safe."
"Thank you for your kind words to my family _わ_  Fortunately, no one was hurt, "she tweeted
"The actress tweeted on Tuesday that no one was injured in the robbery."
"Fortunately, hale wasn't at home at the time of the robbery, TMZ reports."
"The website reported that the robbers broke one of Hale's windows, entered her house and then stole $15000 worth of wallet and jewelry."
"According to TMZ, Hale's house was stolen early in the morning on Friday, January 5."
"It has been confirmed that the 28 year old star's house in the San Fernando Valley was recently robbed."
__锛_
"Lucy Hale was the victim of a burglary last week."



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But hey, she loves Swift as a songwriter still!”
“They’ve been fueling the feud fire ever since, most recently when Perry may have seduced Karlie Kloss away from Swift’s girl gang.”
“The two singers have been publicly feuding since Swift called them “enemies” in a 2014 Rolling Stone interview.”
“When a contestant on American Idol apologized to Perry for saying that he loved Swift and looked up to her as a musician, Perry said, “I love her, as a songwriter, as well.” Then she made a face most accurately described as “¯\_(ツ)_/¯” and looked away.”
“But amid all of that, Perry is still giving the people what they really want — reasons to believe she dislikes Taylor Swift.”
“Photo: Getty ImagesIt’s been quite the month in Katy Perry news: She gave a boy his first kiss on American Idol and has been embroiled in a legal battle with a group of nuns over property in L.A.”
“Taylor Swift, Katy Perry.”


"But, hey, she still likes swift as a composer!"
"Since then, they've been adding fuel to the feud, and Perry may have recently seduced Carly Klaus from Swift's gang."
"The two singers have been openly at loggerheads ever since swift called them" enemies "in an interview with Rolling Stone magazine in 2014."
A contestant on "American Idol" apologized to Perry, saying that he loved swift and regarded her as a musician. Perry said, "I love her, too, as a songwriter." Then she made a face, best described as "'\ \ (_) \ /'", and looked away
"But still, Perry is giving people what they really want - there's reason to believe she doesn't like Taylor Swift."
"Photo: Katy Perry news had a good month: she gave a boy her first kiss on American Idol and got involved in a legal dispute with a group of nuns over property in Los Angeles."
"Taylor Swift, Katie Perry."



**Something goes wrong**
“Thank you to these beautiful women.”HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Justin missing Billboard‘s Women In Music event?”
““It wasn’t their night, it was her night and she wanted to share it with Francia and leave Justin out of it and he totally understood,” a source close to the couple toldEXCLUSIVELY.”
“HollywoodLife.com has the EXCLUSIVE scoop!”
“Selena Gomez, 25, was honored at Billboard‘s Women In Music event on Nov. 30, and her touching speech about her friend and kidney donor Francia Raisa, 29, brought us all to tears.”
“But while the “Wolves” singer attended the annual dinner and awards ceremony with a close loved one, another important person in her life was noticeably absent from the special event.”
“Justin Bieber, 23, didn’t attend the big night where Selena was awarded Woman Of The Year, but that choice to stay home was a deliberate one.”
“HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““It wasn’t the time or place to reintroduce themselves as a couple.”
“He is clearly proud of her but he didn’t want to take away any light shed on her from the night.”
“People needed to focus on Selena and he didn’t want to ruin that by attending because he knows then he would have been the story.” Honestly, that’s a pretty fair point — and actually a very sweet reason to skip out on the night.”


"Thank you beautiful women." Hollywood stars, what do you think Justin missed the woman in billboard at the music festival
"It's not their night, it's her night, and she wants to share it with Francia, excluding Justin, which he fully understands," a source close to the couple said categorically
"Exclusive report from Hollywood life
"Selena Gomez, 25, won the honor at the Billboard's women in music event on November 30, and her touching speech about her 29 year old friend and kidney donor Francia Raisa made us all cry."
However, when the wolf singer and her beloved attended the annual dinner and award ceremony, another important person in her life was obviously absent from the special event
"Justin Bieber, 23, didn't attend the big party where Serena was awarded the woman of the year, but choosing to stay at home was deliberate."
"Exclusive to Hollywood life."
"This is not the time and place to reintroduce yourself as a couple."
"He was obviously proud of her, but he didn't want to take away the light of her night."
"People need to focus on Serena, and he doesn't want to ruin that by being there, because he knows that he will be the main character of the story." To be honest, it's a fairly fair view - in fact, it's a good reason not to go to the party. "



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you sad that Sophie isn’t in Australia with Joe?”
“Earlier this month, the pair enjoyed a romantic getaway to a private island in the Maldives, and then followed up the vacation with a huge celebration in New York City for Sophie’s 22nd birthday on Feb. 21.”
“Why is he hanging out with all of these gorgeous girls?”
“Joe Jonas looks like he’s having a blast on the beach!”
“The 28-year-old was spotted surrounded by a group of bikini-clad women on Bondi Beach in Sydney, Australia on Feb. 22 — but none of which were Sophie Turner.”
“Don’t worry, though!”
“The girls were just fans of the DNCE frontman, who graciously posed for photos with them on the sunny shoreline.”
“How sweet!”
“The “Cake By The Ocean” singer went Down Under to shoot the upcoming season of The Voice Australia, which he will be a celebrity coach on, alongside Delta Goodrem, Kelly Rowland, and Boy George.”
“While his fiancée didn’t make the trip, the couple were able to spend some quality time together before Joe’s excursion to the Southern Hemisphere.”


"Hollywood stars, are you sad that Sophie is not in Australia with Joe?"
Earlier this month, the two spent a romantic holiday on a private island in the Maldives, followed by a big celebration in New York City to celebrate Sophie's 22nd birthday on February 21
"Why is he with so many beautiful girls?"
"Joe Jonas seems to have a good time on the beach!"
"On February 22, at Bondi Beach in Sydney, Australia, the 28 year old was surrounded by a group of women in bikinis, but none of them was Sophie Turner."
"But don't worry!"
"These girls are just fans of the Dnce team leader. They take pictures with them gracefully on the sunny coastline."
How sweet
The "cake by the sea" singer is off-line to film the upcoming voice of Australia season and will coach stars with delta goodram, Kelly Rowland and Boy George
"Although his fiancee didn't make it, the couple had a good time together before Joe's trip to the southern hemisphere."



**Something goes wrong**
“Share below!”
“News last year.”
“Andrew Harnik/APMiranda Kerr and Snapchat CEO and founder Evan Spiegel are making it official — with help from a geofilter, of course.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The happy couple are engaged, Kerr announced on Instagram, Wednesday.”
““I said yes!!”
“!” she declared, alongside a photo of her gorgeous new bling, which was, of course, snapped with one of Spiegel’s social media company’s filters – this one, specially designed to feature Bitmoji caricatures of the couple during the big moment.”
“(Snapchat just confirmed its acquisition of Bitmoji.)”
“Kerr’s ring featured a round-cut center diamond, set between two tapered baguettes.”
“The 33-year-old Australian model and Spiegel, 26, were first spotted together in Los Angeles in June of last year.”


"Share it below!"
"Last year's news."
"Andrew harnik / apmiranda Kerr and snapchat CEO and founder Evan Spiegel are officially launching - with the help of geofilters, of course."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"This happy couple is engaged," cole announced on instagram on Wednesday
"I said yes!"
"!" she announced next to the photo of her gorgeous new jewelry, which is, of course, one of the filters with Der Spiegel's social media company - this one, specially designed to feature bitmoji comics couple at momentous moments. "
"(snapchat just confirmed bitmoji.)
Kerr's ring is set with a round diamond between two conical French breads
"The 33 year old Australian model and the 26 year old Spiegel were first found together in Los Angeles last June."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“In […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“While Gossip Cop hasn’t been around quite as long as the iconic book series, we’re celebrating the occasion by looking back at rumors we’ve busted about the movies and film cast over the years.”
“Friday, September 1, 2017 marks the date of the “19 Years Later” epilogue to Harry Potter And The Deathly Hallows .”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"In ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Although gossip police hasn't been around as long as this iconic series, we celebrate this moment by looking back at years of rumors about movies and movie actors."
"Friday, September 1, 2017 is the" 19 years later "end of Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows."



Number  169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are a lot of people in unhealthy marriages."”
“Why do people think that marriage equates to happiness?”
“...married again one day but I don t have a time frame...”
“I m in the best relationship I ve ever been in and it doesn t take a ring for me to feel that way she told Daily Mail s YOU magazine I believe in marriage and I want to be...”
“Khloe recently gushed over her relationship with Tristan.”
“The source adds, "He's clinging to this hope that she's still got feelings for him, which of course is ridiculous, and he's even talking about having a face-to-face with her for closure."”
“Lamar apparently still cannot forget Khloe.”
“It burns Lamar up because however much he wants to deny, the reality is that he's still in love with her and believes they're soul mates who are destined to be together again," the source tells Radar Online.”
“"He hates how Khloe's finally dating a guy who treats her right.”
“Lamar is whimpering his regrets about how he treated the "Keeping Up with the Kardashians" star, according to a source.”


"A lot of people have unhealthy marriages."
"Why do people think marriage equals happiness?"
__︹ One day I got married again, but I didn't have time... "
"I'm in the best relationship I've ever had," she told the Daily Mail's you magazine. "I believe in marriage and I want to be..."
"Khloe has been talking a lot about her relationship with Tristan recently."
"He has always held such a hope that she still has feelings for him, which is ridiculous. He even said that he would end up face to face with her," the source said
"Lamar obviously can't forget Chloe."
"It makes Lamar furious, because no matter how much he wants to deny it, the reality is that he still loves her and believes that they are soul mates destined to be together again," the source told radar online
"He hated Khloe and finally dated a man who was nice to her."
According to a source, Lamar regrets how he treats the star who "follows Kardashian."



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““When Johnny’s single, he doesn’t have anyone to reign him in, and he can get pretty wild when let to his own devices.””
““He’s partying hard,” another source previously told us.”
“Still, that hasn’t stopped those close to him from worrying about the effect this rock ‘n roll lifestyle will have on his health and well-being.”
“...exact look he s going for as the frontman of his band...”
“So what we might be seeing is the start of a little bit of a mid life crisis for him As we previously reported EXCLUSIVELY Johnny is totally unbothered by all the talk surrounding his appearance as it s the...”
““He wants to be forever young, so he is doing things that make him feel young,” our source adds.”
“Our insider says this desire to live the life of an ultimate rockstar may have contributed to the skinny gaunt look Johnny recently debuted which has fans concerned about his health...”
“He is accustomed to being adored and has been named Sexiest Man Alive twice so he likes doing the rockstar thing and living the life he s always led because he doesn t feel 55 or want to be 55”
““Johnny’s 55th birthday is this Saturday [June 9] and, like most of us, he doesn’t like getting older,” a source close to the actor tells us EXCLUSIVELY.”
“However, HollywoodLife has learned EXCLUSIVELY that there’s a reason he’s pushing so hard to keep up with the demanding lifestyle.”


"When Johnny is single, he has no one to control him. When he has his own ideas, he becomes wild."
Another source told us earlier: "he's reveling like hell."
"However, it doesn't stop people around him from worrying about the impact of this rock lifestyle on his health and happiness."
__ What kind of person is he looking for as the leader of the band? "
"So what we may see is the beginning of his midlife crisis. As we reported in the exclusive before, Johnny is completely free from all the comments about his appearance, because this is..."
"He wants to be young forever, so what he does makes him feel young," our source added
"Our insiders say that this desire to live in the life of an ultimate rock star may be contributing to the bony look Johnny recently launched by fans concerned about his health..."
"He's used to being worshipped and twice rated as the sexiest man, so he likes to be a rock star and live the life he's been living because he doesn't feel 55 and doesn't want to be 55."
"Johnny's 55th birthday is this Saturday (June 9), and like most of us, he doesn't like to get old," a source close to the actor told us exclusively
"However, Hollywood life has fully realized that there is a reason why he has worked so hard to keep up with the harsh lifestyle."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mayer, who has been mounting a comeback of sorts in recent months, is apparently having a hard time finding a new famous woman to date.”
“Finally, I’ll leave you with a rude little “Page Six” story about John Mayer.”
“This leak says to me that everything is status quo: Holmes and Foxx are together, they’re not going to talk about it publicly, and there’s probably never going to be a wedding.”
““She said she loves him and asked if he wanted ‘cookies from Paris.’ He was in Miami.” The source added that Holmes’s daughter, Suri Cruise, a nanny, and another friend were also on the flight.”
““Katie was FaceTiming Jamie after they boarded,” a source told the site.”
“At least according to the latest from “Page Six.”The gossip site reported yesterday that Holmes and Foxx had a “lovey dovey FaceTime chat” as Holmes was about to take off on a plane to Paris for Haute Couture Fashion Week.”
“But they’re in love!”
“But not planning a wedding.”
“Last week, the mostly fictional gossip site RadarOnline reported that Holmes and Foxx were planning a wedding but recently called it off due to “trust issues.” Surprisingly, Holmes’s publicist responded to the report, telling People that it was “100 percent untrue.” So … they’re together still?”
“So what’s their status now?”


"Mayer has made a comeback to some extent in recent months, and it's obviously hard to find a new famous woman to date."
"Finally, I'll tell you a little rude story about John Mayer."
"This leak tells me that everything is the status quo: Holmes and fox are together, they won't talk about it in public, they may never have a wedding."
"She said she loved him and asked him if he wanted 'biscuits from Paris'. He was in Miami at the time." The source also said Holmes' daughter, Suri cruise, was a nanny and another friend was on the plane
"Katie joked with Jamie after they boarded the plane," a source told the website
"At least according to the latest news from page 6, the gossip website reported yesterday that Holmes and fox had a" lovely doff talk "while preparing to fly to Paris for haute couture week
"But they are in love!"
"But not planning a wedding."
Last week, the fictional gossip website radaronline reported that Holmes and fox were planning a wedding, but recently cancelled it because of "trust issues.". Surprisingly, Sherlock Holmes' PR staff responded to the report, telling people that it was "100% untrue.". So Are they still together? "
"So how are they now?"



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You know, so she’d always be there for her.”
“In 2005, Jennifer Aniston was named godmother of Courteney Cox’s daughter, Coco Arquette.”
“...one another s children at other times too...”
“And when I was pregnant then they would say Have a great show love you love you love you little Julian Cause we knew it was a boy and that was his name She added So sweet they included my little fetus in the huddle The stars of Friends embraced...”
““The six of us would do a huddle backstage and just say, ‘All right, have a good show, love you love you love you love you,’” Kudrow, 55, told the outlet.”
“On Monday, the actress told People that her co-stars altered a pre-show ritual when she was pregnant during Seasons 4 and 5 to include her unborn child — her now 20-year-old son, Julian Murray Stern.”
“Lisa Kudrow has offered up even more proof that the cast of “Friends” took the name of the beloved sitcom to heart.”
“Gary Null/NBC/NBCU Photo Bank via Getty Images Jennifer Aniston as Rachel Green and Lisa Kudrow as Phoebe Buffay during the filming of the “Friends” episode “The One with Ross's Wedding: Part 1” in 1998.”


"You know, so she'll always be with her."
In 2005, Jennifer Aniston was appointed godmother to Courtney Cox's daughter coco Arquette
__ Other times, they will take care of each other's children... "
"When I'm pregnant, they'll say there's a great show love you love you love you little Julian, because we know this is a boy, this is his name, she added so sweet, they include my little baby in the crowded star friend hug..."
"The six of us will huddle together backstage and say, 'OK, play well, love you, love you,'" cudro, 55, told the media
"On Monday, the actress told people that her partner changed a pre show ritual when she became pregnant in the fourth and fifth seasons, including her unborn child, her 20-year-old son, Julian Murray stern."
"Lisa Kudrow provides more evidence that the cast of friends remember the name of this beloved sitcom."
"Gary null / NBC / nbcu photo gallery through Getty pictures Jennifer Aniston as Rachel Green and Lisa cudrow as Phoebe Buffy in filming" friends "episode" wedding with Rose: Part one in 1998. "



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...on such a wonderfully layered complex character...”
“So I wasn t sitting there frustrated that I wasn t getting certain parts because they knew something I didn t know which was that I couldn t do it It s something I hadn t done before to take...”
“...that I was able to do it...”
“The former Friends star added that she was keen to take on the role of a woman suffering with chronic pain in Cake to test herself as an actress I needed to do it so I could prove to myself...”
“So it's really, really nice."”
“They are all amazing women, but you know, we're all rooting for each other and it doesn't take away the work that was done.”
“...sweet email as did Julianne...”
“Julianne Moore Reese Witherspoon Marion Cotillard Felicity Jones and Rosamund Pike are the nominees for Best Actress at this year s Academy Awards and Aniston has received messages of support from a couple of them Reese sent me such a...”
“Now I don't have any pressure."”
“It was almost just as good to be number one snubbed than to be nominated.”


__ In such a well-organized and complex role... "
"So I'm not depressed sitting there, because I didn't get some parts, because they know something I don't know, that is, I can't do it, it's something I haven't done before..."
__ I can do it... "
"The former friends star added that she wanted to test herself by playing a woman who suffered chronic pain on a cake. As an actress, I need to do this so that I can prove to myself that..."
"So really, really good."
"They're great women, but you know, we're all cheering on each other, and that doesn't take away the work that's been done."
__ Sweet email like Julian... "
"Julian Moore Reese Witherspoon, Marian godia felicity Jones and Rosamond peck are the best actress nominees for this year's Oscar. Aniston received a letter of support from a couple. Reese sent me such a letter..."
"Now I don't have any pressure."
"Being left out first is almost as good as being nominated."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image via Splash...”
“SMH.”
“But was it really THAT bad that Nick had to take the kids away from a show that was for them?”
“The obvious answer might seem to be the fugly orange outfits that Nick had Morrocan were rockin’, but chances are it was something much deeper.”
“What the hell could Nick and Mariah POSSIBLY be beefing about, in front of their children, at the Kids’ Choice Awards???”
“And Mariah didn’t return to her seat!”
“...the insider...”
“The two apparently had an argument of some sort while they were sitting in their seats And while it s unclear what they disagreed on it didn t seem to blow over as she got up and left and Nick went over to her manager and grabbed his kids continued...”
“...exclusively that Mariah and Nick, who put on a united front around the cameras, were not as happy once inside.”
“But, a source told OK!”


"Through splash image..."
"Well."
"But is it really that bad Nick took the kids off the show for them?"
"The obvious answer seems to be the orange suit Nick is wearing. Molokan likes it, but it's probably deeper."
"What are Nick and Maria talking about in front of the children and at the children's Choice Awards?"
"Maria didn't return to her seat!"
__ Insider... "
"When they were sitting in their seats, there was obviously some kind of dispute. Although it was not clear what differences they had on this matter, when she got up and left, Nick didn't seem to calm down. Nick went to her manager and grabbed his child to continue..."
__︹ The only reason is that Maria and Nick, who are united in front of the camera, are not so happy as soon as they go in. "
"But, a source told me, yes!"



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Selena Gomez has anything to worry about?”
“Justin Bieber and Kourtney Kardashian are just friends!”
“In most cases, if your boyfriend is texting an ex, things aren’t looking so good!”
“As we reported earlier, Selena Gomez, 25, found herself in a weird situation after realizing Justin Bieber, 23, and former fling, Kourtney Kardashian, 38, are still communicating!”
“Yikes!”
“Luckily, for Selena, the situation is harmless!”
“Thank God!”
““Kourtney and Justin are on great terms, they still talk every once in a while but there’s nothing for Selena to worry about.”
“Kourtney only has eyes for Younes Bendjima, she’s totally into him and only him.”


"Let's know what you think below!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Serena Gomez has anything to worry about?"
"Justin Bieber and Courtney Kardashian are just friends!"
"In most cases, if your boyfriend is texting your ex, things don't look so good!"
"As we reported earlier, Selena Gomez, 25, finds herself in a strange situation because she realizes that Justin Bieber, 23, and Courtney Kardashian, 38, are still communicating!"
"Oh dear!"
"Fortunately, for Serena, it's harmless!"
"Thank God!"
"Courtney and Justin get on well, they still talk from time to time, but Selena has nothing to worry about."
"Courtney's only eyes are on yones benjima. She likes him completely. He's the only one."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Apparently t's still awesome being semi-secretly with British boyfriend of over a year, Joe Alwyn.”
““She seems to be in a great place both career and love wise,” a source told the outlet.”
“Alwyn tries to attend her concert dates when he can, the source added.”
“Footage of him there hasn't really been shared on social media, except for at the first show—a testament to how undercover these two can keep things.”
“Alwyn is really the best though, the source made abundantly clear: “Joe is just an amazing boyfriend.”
“He is very supportive.”
“Taylor adores his family.”
“She’s in a very good place.”Swift and Alwyn were last photographed out together on a North London pub date at the end of May.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Obviously, it's great to be semi secret with my British boyfriend, Joe Alvin, who has been in love for more than a year."
"She is outstanding in both her career and her love," a source told the paper
"Alvin tries to attend her concerts whenever possible," the source added
"His footage there has not really been shared on social media except on the first show - which proves how these two undercover agents keep things."
"However, Alvin is really the best, and the source said very clearly," Joe is just a great boyfriend
"He's very supportive of me."
"Taylor worships his family."
Swift and Alvin were last photographed dating at a bar in North London at the end of May



Number  177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Randee Dawn on Twitter.”
“Richie, driver Redena McManus and a 3-year-old boy, Christopher McManus, all died during or shortly after the collision, while the bus driver and passengers were uninjured, according to police reports.”
“He was just 14 when his older brother Richie died on Nov. 13, 1990.”
“And, as Shelton noted in a tweet Monday, "It changed my life forever."”
“Lost my brother 27 years ago today.”
“I was only 14 at the time but it changed my life forever... Made me realize that life is precious and there's no time like RIGHT NOW to go for it... We still miss you Richie!!”
“— Blake Shelton (@blakeshelton) November 13, 2017Richie was 24 when he died in a car accident in the Sheltons' home state of Oklahoma.”
“Two years ago, Shelton sent out a message for the 25th anniversary of his loss:Wow... 25 years ago today we lost my brother Richie Shelton.”
“He's still my hero going strong.”
“Wish everyone could've known him.”


"Follow randee dawn on twitter."
Ritchie, driver redna McManus and a 3-year-old boy Christopher McManus all died during or shortly after the crash, while neither the driver nor the passengers were injured, police reported
On November 13, 1990, when his brother Richie died, he was only 14 years old
"And, as Sheldon tweeted on Monday," it changed my life forever. "
"27 years ago today, I lost my brother."
"I was only 14 at the time, but it changed my life forever... Let me realize that life is precious, there is no time to pursue it like now... We still miss you, rich! "
"Black Shelton (@ blakeshelton) on November 13, 2017, rich died in a car accident in Shelton's home state of Oklahoma, when he was 24 years old."
"Two years ago, Sheldon sent a letter for his 25th birthday: Wow... 25 years ago today, we lost my brother, rich Sheldon. "
"He's still my hero. Be strong."
"I hope everyone knows him."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She'd later edit the caption after some considered it a jab toward Taylor.”
“It only continued when Karlie captioned an Instagram photo "swish swish," referencing Katy's T. Swift diss track of the same name.”
“Rumors of a rift sparked when Swift snubbed Kloss' name (as well as Lorde, Ruby Rose and Cara Delevingne) from a squad-inspired shirt worn in her "Look What You Made Me Do" music video.”
“Karlie and Katy were joined by mutual bestie and man-about-town Derek Blasberg for the late night sushi run in Los Angeles, adding fuel to the speculation that Taylor is never, ever getting back together with Kloss.”
“Karlie Kloss proved she refuses to pick sides in the apparent feud between her BFF Taylor and Katy Perry, stepping out Wednesday for dinner with the "Chained to the Rhythm" songstress and a group of pals.”
“Wonder what Taylor Swift would have to say about this outing!”


"Some people thought it was an attack on Taylor after she later edited the title."
"It's only when Carly adds the title" whoosh "to a photo on instagram, quoting Katie's T. swift diss track of the same name, that all this continues."
Swift, wearing a team inspired shirt in her "see what you want me to do" music video, snuffed out Klaus's name (as well as Lord, ruby Ross and Carla delaviny) and sparked rumors of discord
Carly and Katie took part in a late night sushi run in Los Angeles, which led to speculation that Taylor would never get back together with Klaus again
Kelly Claus, who proved that she refused to choose between her boyfriends Tyler and Katie Perry, went out on Wednesday to have dinner with the "rhythm bound" singer and a group of friends
"I want to know what Taylor Swift will say about this trip!"



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Last April, they filed for divorce pro per - she giving the petition, he the virtually identical response - and were both asking joint custody, TMZ reported at the time.”
“Despite moving on romantically Affleck has remained a family man as he was spotted taking the kids to church with ex-wife Jennifer Garner last Sunday.”
“...this week...”
“Loved up The weekly also claims that Ben s 37 year old Saturday Night Live producer girlfriend arrived in Hawaii earlier this week the couple are pictured in LA in January The weekly also claims that Ben s 37 year old Saturday Night Live producer girlfriend arrived in Hawaii earlier...”
“'He wanted to do it for everyone as the shoot has been rough with 14 days of rain and training.'”
“It definitely seems like the father of three was really excited about bringing everyone together as the insider added: 'Ben has been planning this luau for weeks.”
“Yum: The traditional Hawaiian party had all the fixings including the culinary staple of a full roasted pig (stock photo)No doubt Ben has created a healthy and fun environment on set as a source told People: 'They are all really enjoying the shoot.'”
“The Oscar-winning filmmaker even ensured that everyone has a good time by providing shuttle service for the entire cast and crew.”
“Affleck even sprung for entertainment in the form of fire dancers and a three-piece Hawaiian band.”
“...people who were in attendance at the celebration according to the weekly stock photo of a luau from 1965 The traditional Hawaiian party had all the fixings including the culinary staple of a full roasted pig...”


TMZ reported at the time: "in April last year, they filed for divorce - she filed for divorce and he gave almost the same answer - and both demanded joint custody."
"Although Affleck continues his romantic life, he is still a family man, because last Sunday he and his ex-wife, Jennifer Garner, were found taking their children to church."
__ This week
Love weekly also claimed that Ben's 37 year old Saturday night live producer girlfriend arrived in Hawaii earlier this week. The couple took a group photo in Los Angeles in January. Weekend night live also claimed that Ben's 37 year old Saturday night live producer girlfriend arrived in Hawaii ahead of schedule... "
"He wanted to do it for everyone, because after 14 days of rain and training, shooting has been very difficult."
"It seems that the father of three is really excited to bring everyone together, because the person familiar with the matter added:" it's been planned for weeks. "
"Yum: the traditional Hawaiian party has all the decorations, including the staple food of roast pigs (stock photos). There is no doubt that Ben created a healthy and interesting environment on the set. A source told people:" they all enjoy shooting. "
"The Oscar winning actress even provides shuttle service for all actors and staff to ensure everyone has a good time."
"Affleck even appeared in the entertainment industry as a fire dancer and a three person Hawaiian band."
__︹ According to the weekly stock photo of lu'ao in 1965, the traditional Hawaiian party has all the decorations, including the staple food of roasted pig... "



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Just an amazing job by her of setting the boundary."”
“I always tell her, like, she saved my life because she was the first person to really tell me that, like, the party's over.”
“"I didn't know what my plan was," he said.”
“After some thinking, Zac decided to try to convince a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get prescription pills.”
“ABC via Getty ImagesHis partying, though, got more intense, and he desperately wanted more pills.”
“So, I had a lot of the outsides going on."”
“And, you know, I started dating a girl my sophomore year that I would eventually marry.”
“I mean, I was playing baseball, and I was trying to get out of there in four years, which I was able to do.”
“"I would not tell you that my drug use was so rampant during college.”
“And the Adderall eventually turned into some cocaine use here and there," he said.”


"She's great at setting boundaries."
"I always told her that she saved my life because she was the first to really tell me that the party was over."
"I don't know what my plan is," he said
After careful consideration, Zach decided to persuade a doctor to remove his gallbladder so that he could get the prescription medicine
"ABC via Getty Images although his party is getting more and more intense, he is eager for more pills."
"So, I have a lot to do."
"And, you know, I started dating a girl in my sophomore year, and I'll eventually marry her."
"I mean, I was playing baseball and I wanted to get out of it in four years, but I did it."
"I'm not going to tell you how rampant I was when I was in college."
"Snakes eventually turned into cocaine abuse," he said



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The insider even gave an example of Demi’s insights: “Miley is a big star, but Liam has his own career, and Demi says you can’t have egos in a marriage!””
“Jane” star first met Miley while filming the 2012 flop flick “LOL.”“Demi’s teaching Miley things like how to survive being married to a movie star,” added the source.”
“The “G.I.”
“Miley Cyrus’s Wildest Instagram Posts!”
“Don’t Tell Liam!”
““Demi sees a lot of herself in Miley,” said an insider, while Demi’s been married and divorced three times — to Freddy Moore, Bruce Willis and Ashton Kutcher.”
“Miley Cyrus is set to wed Liam Hemsworth next summer, and Demi Moore is mentoring the pop diva on how to have a successful marriage!”


The insider even gave an example of Demi's opinion: "Miley is a big star, but Liam has his own career. Demi says there can be no self in marriage!"
The stars in Jane met Miley for the first time when they made the 2012 remake of "ha ha ha". "Demi taught Miley how to survive after marrying a movie star," the source added
__.I._
"Miley Cyrus's craziest instagram post!"
"Don't tell Liam!"
"Demi sees a lot of herself in Miley," said a person familiar with the matter. Demi has been married and divorced three times - Freddie Moore, Bruce Willis and Ashton Kutcher
Miley Cyrus will marry Liam Hemsworth next summer, and Demi Moore is teaching the pop diva how to have a successful marriage



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Brad and Jennifer are really texting?”
“To make matters worse, Angie apparently knows about Brad and Jen’s alleged newfound relationship and she’s not happy whatsoever.”
“Brad’s reportedly been secretly chatting with his ex, Jennifer Aniston, and Angie’s allegedly ‘enraged.’ Will the kids be spending time with Jen?!..”
“Although Angelina Jolie, 41, and Brad Pitt, 53, opted to make their legal docs involving their split completely private on Jan. 10, 2017, Angie’s reportedly got a new demand to add to their split negotiations.”
“She doesn’t want Brad’s reported new texting buddy, Jennifer Aniston, 48, anywhere near her kids, according to In Touch.”
““As Angie and Brad’s divorce talks continue, she’s demanding that Brad agree to never have their children around Jen,” the mag reported.”
“Brad and Angie share six children together — Maddox, 15, Pax, 12, Zahara, 11, Shiloh, 10, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 8.”
“The actor has reportedly been leaning on his ex-wife while he deals with his emotional split from Angie.”
“He and Jen married in July 2000 and ended their courtship in Oct. 2005 after he met Angie on the set of their love, action flick, Mr & Mrs. Smith.”
“However, he’s reportedly reconciled with Jen via phone.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Brad and Jennifer are really texting?"
"What's worse, Angie obviously knows about Brad and Jane's so-called new relationship. She's not happy at all."
"It is reported that Brad has been secretly chatting with his ex girlfriend, Jennifer Aniston, and Angie has been accused of being" angry. ". Will the children be with Jennifer? "
"Although Angelina Jolie, 41, and Brad Pitt, 53, chose to keep the legal documents concerning their separation completely confidential on January 10, 2017, it is reported that Angelina has received a new request to contribute to their separation negotiations."
"She doesn't want Brad's new texting partner, Jennifer Aniston, 48, anywhere close to her children, according to in touch."
"As Angie and Brad continue their divorce negotiations, she's asking Brad to agree never to have their children around Jane," the magazine reported
"Brad and Angie have six children - 15-year-old Maddox, 12-year-old parks, 11-year-old Zahara, 10-year-old Shiloh, and 8-year-old twins Knox and Vivian."
"It is reported that the actor has been relying on his ex-wife in dealing with the split with Angie."
He and Jen got married in July 2000 and met Angie in October 2005 in Mr. and Mrs. Smith, ending their relationship
"However, it is reported that he made up with Jane by phone."



**Something goes wrong**
“Share it in the comments below.”
“In January, Lohan deleted all the pictures on her Instagram account and changed her bio to 'Alaikum salam.'”
“PHOTO: DAILY MAILLindsay Lohan made headlines for her much-speculated change of faith when she was spotted holding the Holy Quran last year as well as sporting a headscarf.Now, the Rumour singer was recently spotted wearing the headscarf once again at the London Modest Fashion Week on Sunday.”
“The Mean Girls actor, 31, opted to wear a hijab for the event, conforming to the event's theme - which showcased the latest styles in hijabs, abayas and long hemlines, reported Arab News.”
“Taking to Instagram, one of the halal makeup line, Hawa Cosmetics, shared the picture of the starlet with a caption, “Oh my days!”.”
““As if Lindsay Lohan came over to say hello to Team Hawa!”
“She was so lovely and was saying how she’s into halal cosmetics and what she’s actually wearing on her face today was all halal!”
“Well all I can say is if it’s good enough for Lindsay Lohan, (girl, what are you) all waiting for?”Running alongside London Fashion week, the event, which charges up to £200 for tickets, features shopping, runway shows, talks and workshops - including a 'sharia legal hub'.”
“In full swing: Lindsay was spotted with designer Zeynep Kartal as she attended her AW18 collection show at London Fashion Week at Freemasons Hall on Saturday.”
“PHOTO: DAILY MAILMore than 40 designers from around the world showcased scarves, hijabs and loose-fitting maxi dresses at the annual style showcase organised by Haute Elan, who consider 'modest fashion' to be one of the fastest growing consumer markets.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"In January of this year, Rohan deleted all the photos on his instagram account and changed his resume to" alaikum Salam. "
Photo: last year, the daily mail Lohan was photographed holding the Koran and a pistol, leading to speculation that she had changed her faith and made headlines. Now, at the modest fashion week in London on Sunday, the rumored singer was found wearing a headscarf
The 31 year old "stingy girl" actor chose to wear a headscarf in line with the theme of the event, showing the latest styles of headscarf, robe and skirt, according to Arab News
"Go to instagram, one of the halal cosmetics series, Hawa cosmetics, and share a picture of the little star with a headline," oh my God! " ._
"It's like Lindsay Lohan came to say hello to team hava!"
"She's so cute. She also said that she likes halal cosmetics. Today she's wearing halal on her face!"
"Well, all I can say is, if that's good enough for Lindsay Lohan, (girl, what are you waiting for) everybody's waiting? "The event is on a par with London Fashion Week, with a ticket price of up to 200 pounds and features shopping, runway shows, lectures and seminars - including an Islamic Law Centre."
"In full swing: Lindsay was found with designer Zeynep Kartal at London Fashion Week's fall and winter 18 series at Freemasonry hall on Saturday."
Photo: more than 40 designers from all over the world display scarves, headscarves and loose skirts at haute Elan's annual fashion show, believing that "moderate fashion" is one of the fastest growing consumer markets



**Something goes wrong**
“RELATED: Ed Lover Asks Gary With Da Tea For Weight Loss Advice [VIDEO]RELATED: Oprah Gets Real About Weight Loss: “I Can’t Accept Myself If I’m Over 200 Pounds”RELATED: LeBron James Supports His Wife On Her Weight Loss Journey...”
““Ghosted” airs every Sunday at 8:30pm on FOX.”
“He also was excited to talk about his new show and how it helped him lose the weight.”
“...cheese the most...”
“I was like let me see if I can go six months and I just haven t gone back and then working out and I ve been trying this vegan lifestyle too Robinson talked about what kind of meals he currently eats and confessed that he missed eating macaroni and...”
“He also mentioned, “I haven’t been drinking, since January I just put down the alcohol I was going to detox…I had heard, I don’t know how true it is, but I heard you can regenerate your liver in six months.”
“Please be sure to open and click your first newsletter so we can confirm your subscription.”
“Close Thank you for subscribing!”
“I lost 50 pounds.”Sign Up For Our Newsletter!”
“The comedian looked very slender and Robinson said, “I lost a bunch of weight.”


"Related report: ed love asks Gary and Da tea for weight loss advice [Video] related report: Oprah really understands weight loss:" if I weigh more than 200 pounds, I can't accept myself "related report: LeBron James supports his wife's weight loss journey..."
Fox broadcasts ghost at 8:30 every Sunday evening
"He's also excited to talk about his new show and how it helps him lose weight."
__ Most cheese... "
"I want to see if I can go for six months. I just didn't go back and exercise. I've been trying this vegan lifestyle. Robinson talked about what he's eating now and admitted that he missed eating macaroni and..."
He also mentioned, "I've stopped drinking since January. I've just put down the alcohol I'm going to give up I heard that. I don't know what's going on, but I heard that you can regenerate the liver in six months. "
"Be sure to open and click on your first press release so that we can confirm your subscription."
"Thank you for your subscription!"
"I lost 50 pounds." Sign up for our newsletters
The comedian looked slim, and Robinson said, "I lost a lot of weight."



**Something goes wrong**
“At the time, it was also MTO that first claimed, "Kim used her time away from the media to undergo a controversial BOOTY REDUCTION surgery."”
“Late last year, the stunning socialite sparked butt reduction speculations as her famous backside looked smaller.”
“It's not the first time Kim's said to have undergone butt and breast reduction surgery.”
“Citing a rep for the wife of Kanye West, the site has confirmed that all of the above claims are 100|percent| "not true."”
“However, Gossip Cop has assured fans that the report made by MTO is not true.”
“MTO has neither given any proof nor cited any reliable source close to Kim.”
“I don't think that was through diet alone."”
“Citing an insider, the news outlet says, "She lost way too much butt and too much boob.”
“But many are whispering that she appears to have undergone butt and breast reduction surgery."”
“The news outlet notes that the mother of Saint and North says her weight loss is "through dieting...”


"At that time, and for the first time, MTO claimed that" Kim Jong Un used his time away from the media to undergo a controversial operation to reduce stolen goods. "
"At the end of last year, the amazing socialite sparked speculation that her famous butt looked smaller."
"It is said that this is not the first time that Kim Jong Il has undergone hip and breast reduction surgery."
The website quotes a representative of Kanye West's wife as confirming that all of the above statements are 100% "untrue"
"However, the scandal police assured fans that MTO's report was not true."
"The MTO has neither given any evidence nor cited any reliable sources close to Kim Jong Il."
"I don't think it's just through dieting."
"She lost too many hips and too many breasts," the news media quoted an insider as saying
"But a lot of people are whispering that she seems to have undergone hip and breast reduction surgery."
The news media noted that saint and North's mother said her weight loss was "through dieting..."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementEven more terrifying, the acid build-up can lead to gastrointestinal bleeding and ulcers.”
“Paula has admitted that it hasn’t been easy climbing on stage at the age of 55 and stated that it was crazy she was doing things she used to do 28 years prior.”
“As fans may remember, Paula Abdul struggled with an eating disorder years ago, and she thankfully managed to recover her health.”
“However, these days her close ones are worried that getting injured on tour could cause her to relapse into bulimia.”
“Last month, the former American Idol judge strained a muscle and had to cancel some dates on the Total Package Tour with New Kids on the Block and Boyz II Men.”
“‘This is the last thing Paula needs right now.”
“She has worked so hard to get back into shape.”
“Paula is using muscles she has not exercised in years as part of her grueling stage show, and that is probably the cause of her injury.”
“Paula could start worrying that she hurt herself because she is too heavy — and that could trigger her eating disorder!’ stated one worried close pal.”
“In the early 1990s, 5-foot-2 star’s weight was around 103 pounds.”


"What's more, the accumulation of acid can lead to gastrointestinal bleeding and ulcers."
"Paula admits that it's not easy to get on stage at 55 and says that what she does is what she used to do 28 years ago, which is crazy."
"Fans may remember that Paula Abdel fought an eating disorder a few years ago, and thankfully she's finally back to health."
"These days, however, her family and friends are worried that injuries on the tour may make her suffer from bulimia again."
"Last month, the former American Idol Judge strained his muscles and had to cancel some appointments with the new kid and Boyz II man's ensemble tour."
"This is the last thing Paula needs right now."
"She made a lot of efforts to get back in shape."
"Paula is using muscles she has never exercised in years as part of her intense stage performance, which may be the cause of her injury."
"Paula may start to worry that she'll hurt herself because she's too heavy - it could lead to her eating disorder! A worried close friend said
"In the early 1990s, a 5-foot-2 star weighed about 103 pounds."



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I never want to leave him — but it’s important to teach your child the value of working.””
“Despite the age difference between the spouses, Kerr has gushed about Spiegel’s maturity.”
“The supermodel announced on Wednesday, November 15, that she is expecting a baby with her husband of six months, Evan Spiegel.”
“This will be the second child for the 34-year-old, who shares custody of son, Flynn, 6, with her ex-husband, Orlando Bloom.”
““Miranda, Evan and Flynn are looking forward to welcoming the newest member of their family,” a spokesperson tells Us Weekly.”
“Kerr and the Snapchat founder, 27, were married at their home in Los Angeles’ Brentwood neighborhood on May 27.”
“They couple announced their engagement in July 2016 when she shared a photo of her diamond ring alongside a custom “Marry Me” Snapchat filter.”
““I said yes!!”
“!” wrote the former Victoria’s Secret Angel on Instagram.”
““He’s not out partying.”


"I never wanted to leave him - but it's important to teach your children the value of work."
"Despite the differences in the age of the couple, Cole is still talking about the maturity of the mirror."
"The supermodel announced on Wednesday, November 15 that she would have a baby with her six-month-old husband, Evan Spiegel."
"This will be her second child at 34, and she and her ex husband Orlando Bloom are raising her six-year-old son Flynn."
"Miranda, Evan and Flynn are looking forward to welcoming the newest members of their family," a spokesman told us weekly
Kerr and the 27 year old founder of snapchat married at their home in the Brentwood community of Los Angeles on May 27
"In July 2016, when the couple announced their engagement, she shared photos of her diamond ring next to a custom" marry me "snapchat filter."
"I said yes!"
"!" the former Victoria's Secret angel wrote on instagram. "
"He didn't go out to the party."



**Something goes wrong**
““@realDonaldTrump is a hateful, cowardly menace.””
“Many celebrities and political figures strongly criticized the moves and their timing on social media, calling the president a “racist,” “monster,” and “disgusting.”“Transgender Ban & Arpaio pardon on the same day, hiding behind the news of Hurricane Harvey,” tweeted House of Cards creator Beau Willimon.”
“In defense of the move, the administration is citing Arpaio’s long history of military and law enforcement service.”
“Announced two days after the president’s rally in Phoenix, the pardon comes before Arpaio, who spoke at last year’s Republican National Convention, has even been sentenced following his July conviction of criminal contempt for disregarding a court order in a racial profiling case.”
“ET, the White House announced that Trump granted a presidential pardon to former Arizona Sheriff Joe Arpaio.”
“Around 8 p.m.”
“As much of the country is tracking the arrival of Hurricane Harvey, the Trump administration has taken the term “Friday news dump” to a new level — and the president is getting ripped for it.”


"@ realDonaldTrump is a hateful, cowardly threat."
"Many celebrities and politicians have strongly criticized these moves and their timing on social media, calling the president a" racist "," monster "and" disgusting person. ". "On the same day, the sex change ban and the apayo amnesty were hidden behind the news of Hurricane Harvey," house of cards creator beau Willimon tweeted
"In defense of this move, the U.S. government cited the long history of apayo's military and law enforcement services."
In the pardons announced two days after the president's rally in Phoenix, Mr. apayo, who spoke at last year's Republican National Convention, was convicted of contempt of court in July for ignoring court orders in racial profiling cases
"Eastern time, the White House announced Trump's amnesty to former Arizona Sheriff Joe apayo."
"Around eight in the evening."
"With most of the country tracking the arrival of Hurricane Harvey, the trump administration has taken the term" Friday news dump "to a new level - and the president has been blamed for it."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Duchess of Cambridge did not partake in an engagement with the Queen alone until almost a year into her marriage with Prince William.”
“Such an occasion comes incredibly quickly following her marriage into the Royal Family and marks a stark contrast to the Duchess of Cambridge.”
“Engagements attended by the Duchess of Sussex and the Queen will mark the newlywed’s first solo event with her husband’s grandmother.”
“The Queen, Prince Philip, Prince Charles and Camilla are all entitled to ride the Royal rail, but not even the Duchess of Sussex’s husband or the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge have ever used it on an official basis.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"The Duchess of Cambridge was not engaged to the queen alone until nearly a year after her marriage to Prince William."
"After she married into the royal family, such occasions came very quickly, in sharp contrast to the Duchess of Cambridge."
"The engagement of the Duchess of Sussex and the queen will mark the first personal event between the newlyweds and their husband's grandmother."
"The queen, Prince Philip, Prince Charles and Camilla all have the right to take the Royal railway, but even the husband of the Duchess of Sussex or the Duchess of Cambridge have never used it on an official basis."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...sides of the camera...”
“Emma Stone hosts Women in Film s Celebration of the 2018 Female Oscar Nominees Crustacean Beverly Hills Logline The reigning Best Actress winner and in the famous flub also announced as the Best Picture winner joins Women in Film president Cathy Schulman and the community of female nominees from both...”
“March is coming in like a lion.”
“Lookout: I don’t envy the elegant face of the Chateau, Anya Varda, and her team that night.”
“Gersh Oscar PartyChateau Marmont PenthouseLogline: The agency and Tequila Don Julio 1942 will raise a glass to the agency’s nominees Allison Janney, Sam Rockwell and Richard Jenkins.”
“Connection: As the Academy’s official wheels, Cadillac will be shuttling nominees and presenters across town all week to many of the events listed below.”
“Thursday, March 1Cadillac Celebrates the 90th Academy AwardsChateau MarmontLogline: Michael Patrick’s soiree always draws a mix of familiar faces (Zoe Saldana, Christoph Waltz, Naomi Watts, Joel McHale) and some news ones (Angela Sarafyan, Jay Ellis) at one of the most social industry gatherings of the week.”
“Stepping into the spotlight instead: Sophia Bush, Elisabeth Röhm, Sharon Lawrence and Ed O’Neill.”
“Global Green’s 15th Anniversary Oscar PartyNeuehouse HollywoodLogline: The CEO of the Leonardo DiCaprio Foundation will be honored but the Oscar-winning environmentalist himself is not expected.”
“Vanity Fair, Barneys New York, and Sony Pictures Classics’ Cocktail PartyChateau MarmontLogline: Cocktail with one of the season’s buzziest films, “Call Me by Your Name,” while servicing one of the mag’s many advertising clients touching Oscar week.”


__ The side of the camera... "
"Emma stone hosts" women in the film "to celebrate the 2018 Oscar. Female nominating crustacean Beverly Hills, logline is a well deserved best actress winner. In the famous flub, she also announced that the best picture winner will join" women in the film "President Kathy Shulman and the female nominating groups from these two places..."
"March comes like a lion."
"Be careful: I don't envy the elegant faces of the castle Anya Valda and her team that night."
"Gersh Oscar paticeto malmont ponthaus loglin: in 1942, the agency and tequila don Julio will propose a toast to the agency's nominees Alison Jennie, Sam Rockwell and Richard Jenkins."
Connection: as the official wheel of the Academy, Cadillac will shuttle between nominees and presenters throughout the week, taking part in many of the activities listed below
"On Thursday, March 1, Cadillac celebrated the 90th Academy Awards ceremony rmontline:Michael Patrick "Our party is always at the most social industry gathering of the week, attracting some familiar faces (Zoe Saldana, Christoph Waltz, Naomi Watts, Joel McHale) and some news figures (Angela Sarafyan, Jay Ellis)."
"Turn to the spotlight: Sophia bush, Elizabeth ROM, Sharon Lawrence and ED O'Neill."
"Hollywood logline: the CEO of the Leonardo DiCaprio foundation will receive the award, but the Oscar winning environmentalist himself is not expected to win."
Vanity fair, Barneys New York and Sony Pictures Classics cocktail party "marmontlogline: cocktails and one of the most popular movies of the season" (call me by your name), at the same time serving one of the magazine's many advertisers, moved Oscar week



**Something goes wrong**
“Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Christopher Plummer All the Money in the World POPULAR VIDEO”
“Me by Your Name James Ivory WINNER The Disaster Artist Scott Neustadter Michael H Weber Logan Scott Frank James Mangold and Michael Green Molly s Game Aaron Sorkin Mudbound Virgil Williams and Dee Rees Live Action Short Film The Silent Child Chris Overton Rachel Shenton WINNER DeKalb Elementary Reed Van...”
“The film also nabbed prizes for production design and original score.”
“Gary Oldman won the lead actor award for his work as Winston Churchill in Darkest Hour Frances McDormand earned her second best actress Oscar for her role as a grieving mother in Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Meanwhile Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri and Allison Janney I Tonya...”
“...picked up supporting actor and actress honors...”
“Here’s the full winners list.”
“Best Picture The Shape of Water WINNER Call Me by Your Name Darkest Hour Dunkirk Get Out Lady Bird Phantom Thread The Post Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Actress Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri WINNER Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady...”
“Bird Meryl Streep The Post Actor Gary Oldman Darkest Hour WINNER Timothée Chalamet Call Me by Your Name Daniel Day Lewis Phantom Thread Daniel Kaluuya Get Out Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Director The Shape of Water Guillermo del Toro WINNER Dunkirk Christopher Nolan Get Out Jordan Peele Lady...”
“Bird Greta Gerwig Phantom Thread Paul Thomas Anderson Original Song Remember Me from Coco Kristen Anderson Lopez Robert Lopez WINNER Mighty River from Mudbound Mary J Blige Mystery of Love from Call Me by Your Name Sufjan Stevens Stand Up for Something from Marshall Diane Warren Common This Is Me...”
“...from The Greatest Showman Benj Pasek Justin Paul Original Score The Shape of Water Alexandre Desplat WINNER Star Wars The Last Jedi John Williams Dunkirk Hans Zimmer Phantom Thread Jonny Greenwood Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Carter Burwell Cinematography Blade Runner 2049 Roger Deakins WINNER Darkest Hour Bruno Delbonnel Dunkirk...”


"Florida project woody hallerson three billboards out of the ebb, Missouri Richard Jenkins' water Christopher Plummer all the money shapes popular in the world video"
"I'm your name James Ivory prize winner disaster artist Scott newstadt Michael h weblogan Scott Frank James mango and Michael grimly's game Alan Sorkin muddy Virgil Williams and Derris live action video silent child Chris Overton Rachel Shenton champion decab junior reed fan..."
"The film also won awards for its design and original soundtrack."
"Gary Alderman won the best actor award for his role as Winston Churchill in the darkest hour. Francis mcdorman won the second Academy Award for Best Actress for his role as sad mother in three billboards outside Missouri, while Sam Rockwell won three billboards outside Missouri and Alison Jennie Tonya..."
__ Won the accolades of supporting actor and actress... "
"This is the complete list of winners."
"Best picture water shape champion call me your name darkest moment Dunkirk goes out Lady Bird phantom line after three billboards out of the ebb Missouri actress Francis mcdorman and three billboards out of the ebb Missouri champion Sally Hawkins water shape Margot Robby me Tonia salonan lady..."
"After Byrd Meryl Streep actor Gary Oldman darkest moment champion Timothy chalamit calls me your name Daniel Day Lewis phantom thread Daniel caruya out of Denzel Washington Rome J Israel ESQ director water shape Guillermo de Toro champion Dunkirk Christopher Nolan out of Madame Jordan peel..."
"Greta gewig phantom line of birds Paul Thomas Anderson original song" remember me "from coco Christine Anderson Lopez Robert Lopez winner" the river "from muddy Mary J. blich" the secret of love "from" call me your name "Sufjan Stevens stands up for Marshall Diane Warren's work, and that's me _︹︹
__︹ From the greatest performer Benji Pasek Justin Paul original soundtrack "the shape of water" Alexander deplat "Star Wars" champion last Jedi John Williams Dunkirk Hans Zimmer "phantom line" Jonny Greenwood "three billboards out of Missouri" silver winged killer 2049 "Roger Dickins" the most beautiful " Bruno delboner Dunkirk, champion of the dark hour... "



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But in the past that wasn’t the case, adds Lacey.”
“William who will surely be present for the births will be able to see firsthand which baby is born first...”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The firstborn girl or boy will be heir experts tell PEOPLE When Prince William and Kate s official announcement that she is pregnant came Monday the palace said she was expecting a baby But in light of the fact that the Duchess of Cambridge is also suffering from hyperemesis gravidarum...”
“...a form of acute morning sickness there has been growing speculation that she may in fact be expecting twins...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to the National Institutes of Health, the Duchess’s rare condition tends to appear more often in women carrying twins.”
“So what would it mean for the royal family if Kate, 30 – who was discharged from the hospital Thursday – were to deliver two little royals?”
“A pair of heirs?”
“Nope, royal experts tell PEOPLE.”


"But that was not the case in the past," Lacey added
"William will definitely be at the scene of delivery. He can see with his own eyes which baby was born first..."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"When Prince William and Kate officially announce their pregnancy on Monday, the first girl or boy born will be the heir. Experts tell people that the palace says she is pregnant, but since the Duchess of Cambridge also has hyperemesis..."
__︹ It's an acute morning sickness. More and more people speculate that she may actually be pregnant with twins... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
According to the National Institutes of health, the Duchess of this rare disease often occurs in women with twins
"So what does it mean for the royal family if 30-year-old Kate leaves hospital on Thursday and gives birth to two little royal family members?"
"A couple of heirs?"
"No, Royal experts tell people."



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“5.”
“News.”
“'”2.”
“Because if I don’t, I’m going to die.”
“I’m going to use it now.”
““It wasn’t until I had to go through the worst tragedy that it really opened up a channel for me to be like, ‘God gave me a gift.”
“She came out with a new album that includes a single titled, “Used To Love You.”“It was really a life-saver record for me,” she told Time.”
“Gwen had a messy divorce from Gavin Rossdale after she reportedly found out he cheated.”
“Although the singer has made a new album about the end of the relationship, there is still mystery surrounding what caused the divorce.”
““That’s when it became painfully obvious that it wasn’t going to work out in my ­marriage,” he told Billboard.”


_5._
"News."
_'_2._
"Because if I don't, I'm going to die."
"I'll use it now."
"It wasn't until I had to go through the worst tragedy that it really opened a channel for me, making me feel like" God gave me a gift. "
"She has released a new album, including a single called once loved you." "It's a life-saving record for me," she told time
"Gwen is reported to have had a messy divorce with Gavin Rosedale after she found out he was cheating."
"Although the singer made a new album about the end of the relationship, the reason for the divorce is still a mystery."
"Since then, I have painfully realized that my marriage will not bear fruit," he told billboard



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more bio…”
“According to one of the insider, she was not having fun in the event as usual.”
“She is always focused on the lens whereas rumors come alongside.”
“As being a public figure it is very hard for her to keep herself far from the flash.”
“Another photo shows her and her kids playing carnival games and chatting with other attendees.”
“Well, looking at the photos it is very hard to say that she was sad.”
“Although the site claimed that she was sad and not having a good time but in the photos, she was captured with the big smile on her face.”
“The source also added that appeared to be “extremely skinny” and “very unhealthy.” Furthermore, the insider said:“I didn’t see her eating or drinking anything, either.”Despite the statement, the photos of the event of her along with her children said a completely different story.”
“The insider said:“She didn’t seem like she was having a good time at all.”According to the source, she was not having a good time at all in the event.”
“Now the Radar Online is claiming that the mom of two was having a sad attitude at the event.”


"See more profiles..."
"According to one person familiar with the matter, she was not as happy at the event as usual."
"She's always focused on the camera, and rumors always follow."
"As a public figure, it's hard for her to keep away from the flash."
"Another photo shows her playing carnival games with the children and chatting with other participants."
"Well, it's hard to say she's sad looking at the pictures."
"Although the website claimed that she was very sad and had a bad time, there was a bright smile on her face in the photo."
The source added that it appeared to be "very thin" and "very unhealthy.". In addition, people familiar with the matter said, "I didn't see her eat or drink anything either." Despite the announcement, she and her children's activity photos tell a completely different story
"She doesn't look happy at all," a person familiar with the matter said According to sources, she was not happy at all during the event
"Now radar online claims that the mother of two is very sad at the event."



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you excited about Katy and Rob possibly being a couple?”
“While nothing is confirmed yet on whether or not Rob and Katy are ~official~ we’ll be holding our breath until we find out more about this blossoming romance!”
“Katy Perry and Robert Pattinson were reportedly spotted making out at a restaurant in Los Angeles!”
“Are they a couple?!”
“Get the deets!”
“Are Katy Perry, 33, and Robert Pattinson, 31, dating?”
“They were reportedly spotted kissing during a group dinner on Jan. 26 at Taix French Restaurant in Los Angeles, a witness told Wonderwall.com.”
““They were making out,” an onlooker told the website.”
“The witness also added that their behavior made it seem like they were “totally a couple.” Eek!”
“See pictures of Katy and Rob together here.”


"Hollywood stars, are you excited that Katie and rob may be a couple?"
"It's not sure if rob and Katie are official yet, but we will hold our breath until we find out more about this blooming love!"
Katie Perry and Robert Pattinson are reported to be making out at a restaurant in Los Angeles
"Are they a couple?"
"Get the drugs!"
"Is Katie Perry, 33, dating Robert Pattinson, 31?"
A witness told reporters: "it is reported that they were found kissing at a group dinner at the Tex French restaurant in Los Angeles on January 26 Wonderwall.com Website. "
"They're making out," one bystander told the website
The eyewitness added that their actions made people feel that they were "a perfect couple."
"Look at the pictures of Katie and rob together."



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So in my opinion, I knew he touched her.”Swift’s countersuit against the DJ will also go before a jury next week with closing arguments set to begin on Monday morning.”
““She reacted, pushed her skirt down and moved over.”
“As previously reported, Mueller worked at country music station 98.5 KYGO when he attended Swift’s concert at Denver’s Pepsi Center in June 2013.”
“After posing for a meet-and-greet photo with Swift, Mueller was confronted by the singer’s bodyguard, who claimed he had reached under her dress and grabbed her butt.”
“The DJ was subsequently escorted out of the arena, leading to his being fired.”
“Following the alleged incident, he filed a lawsuit against Swift, seeking up to $3 million in damages, claiming he was falsely accused and that Swift should have contacted police rather than his bosses.”
“Swift did not go to the police, despite Mueller’s request, because she wanted to keep the alleged incident “discreet and quiet and confidential,” her attorney Douglas Baldridge argued in court, the AP reports.”
“Judge William Martinez ruled on Friday that Swift could not be held liable because Mueller failed to prove that she personally set out to have him fired.”
“His similar allegations against Swift’s mother, Andrea Swift, and her radio liaison, Frank Bell, will go to jurors for a verdict, with closing statements set for Monday, August 14.”
“The Grammy winner’s case against Mueller for assault and battery is still going forward.”


"So in my opinion, I know he touched her." Swift's counterclaim against DJ will also be presented to the jury next week, and the closing statement will begin on Monday morning
"She reacted, pushed the skirt over and walked over."
"As mentioned earlier, Muller worked at country music station 98.5 kygo when he attended Swift's concert at the Pepsi Center in Denver in June 2013."
"After taking a picture with swift, Muller met the singer's bodyguard, who claimed that he reached under her skirt and grabbed her by the bottom."
"DJ was then escorted out of the arena, leading to his dismissal."
"After the alleged incident, he sued swift for damages up to $3 million, claiming that he was falsely accused and that swift should contact the police instead of his boss."
According to the associated press, Swift's lawyer Douglas Baldridge argued in court: "despite Mueller's request, swift did not call the police because she wanted to be cautious, quiet and confidential about the alleged incident."
"Judge William Martinez ruled on Friday that swift could not be held responsible because Mueller failed to prove that she intended to fire him."
"His similar charges against Swift's mother, Andrea swift, and her radio contact, Frank bell, will be submitted to the jury for a verdict, with the closing statement due on Monday, August 14."
"The case of the Grammy winner suing Mueller for assault is still on trial."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“China and can t perform at the Victoria s Secret Fashion Show carolinephinney...”
“Let me now direct your attention to“Bon Appétit,” where Katy Perry is cooked in a giant, human-sized pot and then served to a bunch of other humans on a plate.”
“But the only one that can't hold its weight is the theory Katy Perry is actually murdered child beauty pageant queen JonBenét Ramsey, because the cultural lexicon is only vast enough for one theory per celebrity at a time.”
“And hers is this:Katy Perry is a cannibal who attends private dinner parties in Hollywood where the guests dine on human flesh.”
“So here's what you need to know before making your mind up.”
“According to leading theorists, the "Bon Appétit" singer opened up about her cannibalism in an interview "on French radio" earlier this year.”
“No one's been able to find audio of the interview, but several sites have picked up wild-ass quotes that they attributed to her.”
“...god damn katy perry is a fuckin cannibal go find that article cause that lady needs help beardgaud gsmg23 November 2 2017 They quote the singer as having said people in Hollywood say human meat is the best meat but its gotten a bad rap because of squeamish Christians and...”
“...their hypocritical virtues While you might think this is bullshit or I know Katy Perry did you also know she started her career as a Christian country singer before reinventing her image to attract the masses...”
“Country Taylor is shaking!”


"China can't show Caroline fini on Victoria's Secret Fashion Show..."
"Now let me turn your attention to" Bon app 茅 tit, "where Katie Perry cooks in a huge human sized pot and serves it on a plate to a group of other people
"But the only thing that can't support it is the theory that Katie Perry was actually murdered by Joan Bennett Ramsay, the queen of children's beauty contests, because the breadth of cultural vocabulary is only enough for every celebrity to say one theory at a time."
"Here's her: Katie Perry, a cannibal who attends private dinners in Hollywood where guests eat human flesh."
"So before you make up your mind, you need to know the following."
According to leading theorists, the "Bon app 茅 tit" singer made his cannibalism public in an interview with French radio earlier this year
"No one can find the audio of the interview, but several websites have found the wild donkey quotations they think she quoted."
__︹ Damn Katie Perry is a cannibal. Go to that article, because this lady needs help. On November 2, 2017, they quoted the singer as saying that people in Hollywood say that human flesh is the best meat, but it is not well appraised because of neurotic Christians, and.... "
__ Their hypocritical virtues, though you might think that's bullshit, or I know Katie Perry, you know, before she started her career as a Christian country singer, reshaping her image to attract the crowd... "
"Tyler's shaking!"



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s the Good, the Bad, and the Ugly”,”reading_time”:11}]};”
“Vox dug deep into this phenomenon, and Card Advice Is Going Viral on TikTok.”
“But while many of the tips you might find are pretty useful \u2014 hello, tortilla trend \u2014 there\u2019s plenty of bad advice floating around, especially on a topic near and dear to our hearts at NextAdvisor: personal finance.”
“Here’s What to Know About Legal Sports tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who\u2019ve Done it is known for viral videos and life hacks galore.”
“Here\u2019s what you should know the Are Betting Billions on Super Bowl LV.”
“...const FP = you make money from sports betting leading up to the Super Bowl?”


"Here are the good, the bad, the ugly", "reading time: 11}]}
"Vox delves into this phenomenon, and the card proposal spreads on tiktok."
"However, although you may find many tips very useful, tortilla trend has a lot of bad suggestions, especially a topic we are very concerned about: Personal Finance on next advisor."
"Here's some knowledge about legal sports, which can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. These skills are provided by some experts who are famous for virus videos and a lot of life hackers. "
"Here's what you should know, they bet billions on Super Bowl Lv."
__ Const FP = did you make money from sports gambling before the super bowl? "



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And the feedback from fans and investors is that Kourtney’s the most relatable, down-to-earth member of the family.”It's Kourtney to the rescue, fam!”
“...insider adds...”
“Khloe s in the doghouse for sticking with Tristan while Kim s very focused on her and Kanye s dramas and the other girls are too young or inexperienced business wise Kris is thrilled with Kourtney s work rate the...”
““She’s the go-to of all the sisters right now, for big picture decisions as well as being the more serious and intellectual face of the brand,” a family insider told Radar Online.”
“Momager Kris Jenner has had it with all the drama so she's reportedly enlisted her eldest child, Kourtney Kardashian to sort shit out.”


"Feedback from fans and investors is that Courtney is the most reliable and down-to-earth member of the family." This is Courtney's savior, family
__ The insider added
"Khloe is locked up in a doghouse because of being with Tristan, while Kim is very focused on her and Kanye's plays, while other girls are too young or lack business experience. Kris is excited about Kourtney's efficiency..."
A family insider told radar online: "she is now the best of all the sisters, not only a more serious and intelligent image of the brand, but also a spokesman for the overall decision-making."
"Mother Chris Jenner has had enough of all the drama, so it's reported that she has recruited her eldest son, Courtney Kardashian, to deal with these things."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My little one is very, very generous and very sensitive,” Holmes said, according to People.”
“Numerous reports describe Suri as an intelligent, kind-hearted girl, with Holmes herself opening up about her daughter’s philanthropic heart in a 2015 interview with Today.”
““She’s slowly warming up to the idea of a reunion,” an insider told the Star.”
“But Holmes also was torn because she wants to do what’s best for Suri.”
“...controversial self styled religious organization the Star reported...”
“He s dying to be a part of her life Holmes isn t a fan of a reunion given that she agreed to stay quiet about Cruise and Scientology if he agreed to stay away from their daughter and not try to brainwash her into becoming a part of the...”
“He’s had to watch from afar as Suri grew into a lovely young lady, and he regrets that he’s missed out on so much.”
““But Tom’s tired of being bossed around by them.”
““Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn’t see Suri, he didn’t question it,” an insider told the Star.”
“According to Hollywood Life, citing a report by Star magazine, Cruise ached over the fact that he had been an absent father and not seen his daughter in more than five years, because his Church of Scientology bosses told him he couldn’t see her.”


"My child is very, very generous, very sensitive," Holmes said, according to people
"Many reports describe Suri as a smart and kind-hearted girl, and Sherlock Holmes himself disclosed her daughter's charity in an interview with today magazine in 2015."
"She's slowly becoming interested in the idea of reunion," a person familiar with the matter told the star
"But Holmes was torn, too, because she wanted to do the best for Suri."
__︹ Star, a controversial self styled religious organization
"He longed to be a part of her life. Holmes didn't like reunion because she agreed to keep silent with cruise and Scientology. If he agreed to stay away from their daughter, he didn't want to brainwash her to become It's part of the story. "
"He had to watch Suri grow into a lovely young woman from a distance. He regretted missing so much."
"But Tom is fed up with them."
"Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn't see Suri, he didn't question it," a source told sky
"According to a report in Star Magazine quoted by Hollywood life daily, cruise felt sad that he was an absent father and had not seen his daughter for more than five years, because his Scientology boss told him that he could not see his daughter."



Number  201
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was mesmerizing.”
“Watching him work was like watching someone channel a spirit.”
“Dule Hill tweeted, “Shocked & saddened to hear of Nelsan Ellis’ passing.”
“#brillIantactor #trueblood #getonup #thesoloist #thehelp,” she posted on Twitter and Instagram.”
“#RIPNelsanEllis.”
“My heart breaks for his kids and family.”
““Just got word that we lost @nelsanellisofficial.”
“Additional credits from both mediums include Secretariat, The Help, Get On Up, “Veronica Mars,” “Without A Trace” and a guest-judging appearance on “Ru Paul Drag’s Race.” Octavia Spencer, Ellis’ co-star in The Help, was actually the first on social media to break the news of his passing.”
“Ellis also worked on the big screen, most notably portraying Martin Luther King, Jr. in The Butler.”
“His character was killed off on the May 7, 2017 episode.”


"It's fascinating."
"Watching him work is like watching someone guide a spirit."
"I'm shocked and saddened to hear about the death of Nelson Ellis," durhill tweeted
She wrote an article on Twitter and instagram: "great actors, purebred people, colorists, help."
"Ripnell sanelis."
"I feel heartbroken for his children and his family."
"Just got the news that we lost @ nelsanellis."
"The extra credit for these two media includes the Secretariat, help, stand up," Veronica Mars, "no trace," and a guest as a judge in the competition of Rupert Drago. Ellis's co star in help, Octavia Spencer, is actually the first person to reveal his death on social media
"Ellis also works on the big screen, most famously playing Martin Luther King Jr. in housekeeper."
"His character was killed in the episode on May 7, 2017."



Number  202
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us your thoughts below!”
“Do you think they broke up again?”
“#fbf A post shared by Mariah Carey (@mariahcarey) on May 19, 2017 at 9:00pm PDTWatch the video above as Mariah leaves the restaurant, needing an extra helping hand to get to her car.”
“Just two weeks later, they were seen all over each other on a dinner date.”
“But rumors started to swirl that they were hooking back up after the 47-year-old diva posted a selfie with her boytoy, 34, on May 20.”
“Mariah Carey Busts Out Of Her Dress During Wild Night OutAs Star reported, the pair got back together after a blowout fight that led to their breakup earlier this year in April.”
“WATCH: Hot Mess Express!”
“Mariah Carey was spotted grabbing a bite to eat in Los Angeles on Tuesday night, June 6 — but her backup dancer boyfriend, Bryan Tanaka, was nowhere to be seen!”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Trouble in paradise?”
“Is It Over AGAIN?”


"Tell us what you think!"
"Do you think they broke up again?"
"# a post shared by FBF Mariah Carey (@ MariahCarey) at 9:00 p.m. on May 19, 2017. When Mariah leaves the restaurant, she needs an extra helper to get to her car. Please watch the video above. "
"Just two weeks later, they were all over a dinner date."
"But after the 47 year old girl and her 34 year old boyfriend took a selfie on May 20, rumors began to spread that they had started dating again."
Mariah Carey took off her clothes on a wild night and they got back together after an explosive quarrel that led to their breakup earlier in April, the Star reported
"Look: Hot express!"
On Tuesday night, June 6, Mariah Carey was found eating in Los Angeles, but her dancing boyfriend Brian Tanaka was missing
"Click send this message to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) trouble in heaven?"
"Is it over again?"



Number  203
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt and Aniston haven't seen each other for years and have no plans to reunite romantically after she broke up with Justin Theroux.”
“The rumor-debunking site pointed out that the said report came less than two weeks after the same magazine published a story announcing that Pitt and Jolie "were back together."”
“The "Mr. & Mrs. Smith" stars are still negotiating their children's custody.”
“According to Life & Style, Pitt was hoping that his private talks with Jolie would "create sparks between them again."”
“The tabloid alleges that the "Allied" actor wanted to "resume their lives together" and to have a "new beginning" with their six children.”
“A so-called source claimed that the "Salt" star is giving her ex-husband false hope to receive a favorable divorce settlement.”
“"Once [Pitt] realizes that, it could send him spinning," the insider said.”
“"[Brad] has blinders on when it comes to Angie."”
“According to Gossip Cop, however, the report is not true.”
“Pitt is not using the custody negotiations to get back with Jolie.”


"Pete and Aniston haven't seen each other for years, and there's no plan for a romantic reunion after she broke up with Justin Cyrus," he said
"The website pointed out that less than two weeks before the report was published, the same magazine published a report announcing that Pitt and Julie were" back together. "
The stars of the Smiths are still negotiating for custody of their children
Pitt hopes his private conversation with Julie will "spark between them again," according to life and fashion magazine
The tabloid claimed that the "ally" actor wanted to "get back to life together" and have a "new start" with their six children
"A so-called source claimed that the" salt "star gave the ex husband a false hope to get a favorable divorce agreement."
"Once [Pete] realizes this, it may make him spin," the person familiar with the matter said
"[Brad] is dazzled at the mention of Angie."
"However, according to the gossip police, this report is not true."
"Pete didn't use custody negotiations to get back together with Julie."



**Something goes wrong**
“Now all we need to do is pick the brain of MEAT BALL’S GHOST, the guy who used the RPatz/KStew tweets to predict Trump’s presidency.”
“I don’t know — this could be why people get annoyed with me.”
“It was an apocalyptic year: 2012, end of the Mayan calendar and of the Twilight film franchise.”
“Breaking Dawn — Part 2 hit theaters on November 16.”
“Two days before, the future president of the United States tweeted this:And four days before that, he tweeted this:Two weeks before that, he tweeted this:And the day before that, he tweeted this:Four days before that, he tweeted this:And this!”
“And the day before that, he tweeted this.”
“Thanks to the magic of social media and his own obsession with press coverage, the American people have access to a rich archive of our president’s unseemly fixations.”
“Trump’s brief obsession with Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart ranks alongside his diatribe about his predecessor’s gum-chewing habit as the strangest of these.”
“What drove him to tweet seven times about the breakup of America’s sweethearts?”
“Why did he seem so desperate for Pattinson’s friendship?”


"Now all we need to do is pick the brains of the meatball ghost, who uses rpatz / kstew twitter to predict Trump's presidency."
"I don't know - that may be why people are angry with me."
"It was an apocalyptic year: 2012, the end of the Mayan calendar and Twilight series."
Breaking Dawn - Part Two opens on November 16
"Two days ago, the future president of the United States tweeted this: there are four more. A few days before that, he tweeted this: two weeks before that, he tweeted this: the day before that, he tweeted this: four days before that, he tweeted this: and this!"
"And just the day before, he wrote on Weibo."
"Thanks to the magic of social media and his own obsession with news reporting, the American people have access to a rich archive of our president's untimely gaze."
"Trump's brief obsession with Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart goes hand in hand with his abuse of his predecessor's chewing habits, which is one of the strangest."
"What drove him to tweet seven times about the breakup of an American lover?"
"Why does he seem so eager for Pattinson's friendship?"



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, do you ship this couple?”
“Scott and Sofia also traveled to Miami together in Sept. 2017.”
“A new report claims to know about two family members who are NOT happy, and when they’ll announce the news!”
“Uh, congrats?”
“— Scott Disick, 34, and Sofia Richie, 19, are reportedly engaged!”
““They’ve fallen in love,” a source tells Life & Style in the magazine’s latest issue.”
“Scott proposed during a “candlelit dinner” when he and Sofia jetted off to Italy for a romantic getaway in early Oct., as reported by the mag.”
“And, despite Scott’s admitted failed attempts at an engagement with his ex, Kourtney Kardashian, 38, and his multiple rehab stints, a source tells the mag that “he claims he’s a changed man.” The insider says “Scott is more well-behaved” when he’s with sofia.”
“And, despite the 15-year age gap, “he feels that Sofia is the only person who understands him.” Yikes.”
“However, his alleged proposal didn’t involve a ring.”


"Holly bug, you'll deliver this, right?"
"Scott and Sophia also went to Miami together in September 2017."
"A new report claims to know that two family members are unhappy. When will they announce the news?"
"Well, congratulations?"
"Scott Disick, 34, is reported to be engaged to Sophia Ritchie, 19!"
"They have fallen in love," a source told reporters in the latest issue of life and fashion magazine
Scott and Sophia proposed at a candlelight dinner in early October when they were flying to Italy for a romantic holiday, the magazine reported
Moreover, although Scott admitted that he was not engaged to his 38 year old ex girlfriend Courtney Kardashian and had received many drug treatment, a source told the magazine that "he claimed to be a different person." "Scott and Sophia are more decent together," people familiar with the matter said
"And, despite the 15-year-old gap," he felt that Sophia was the only one who understood him
"But his so-called proposal does not involve rings."



Number  206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pregnant with their first child If she isn t preggo and they really wanted the gossip to stop they would just issue a denial but we think it s telling that they haven t...”
“The only things left are a wedding and a baby In fact rumors are swirling that the couple plan to tie the knot in Hawaii by the end of summer adding fuel to the growing speculation that she s indeed...”
“Not only did they move in together, but the A-list actor has been spending time bonding with her daughter Madeline, and he recently spent the weekend with her parents when they came into town.”
“To us, those are two huge signs that she's got a bun in the oven!The Oscar winner and the SNL producer have been busy crossing off some major milestones on their relationship checklist recently.”
“...and her boobs have gotten a lot bigger...”
“Her maybe baby bump just keeps getting bigger Ben Affleck s girlfriend Lindsay Shookus left their shared Pacific Palisades mansion over the weekend with suitcases in hand and we couldn t help but notice that her midsection looked noticeably fuller...”


__ Pregnant with the first child, if she is not pregnant, they really want the rumors to stop, they will only deny it, but we think it means they are not... "
"There's only one wedding and one child left. In fact, the rumor is that the couple plan to get married in Hawaii before the end of the summer, which makes more and more people guess that she really..."
"Not only did they move together, but the A-level actor has been with his daughter Madeleine, who recently spent the weekend with her parents when they went to town."
"For us, these are two huge signs that she has a loaf in the oven! Oscar winners and SNL producers have recently been busy crossing out some important milestones on their relationship list
__ Her breasts are getting bigger... "
"Her stomach is getting bigger and bigger. Lindsay shookus, Ben Affleck's girlfriend, left their apartment in Pacific Palisades with a suitcase last weekend. We can't help noticing that her abdomen looks obviously fuller..."



Number  207
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more: All the Celebrities Who Have Gotten Engaged This Year...So Far!”
“They often go to restaurants for dinner dates, or to hang out with friends.”In September, Holmes was spotted visiting Foxx in Georgia while he was filming Just Mercy, where they were seen biking and going to the gym together.”
“But this year, they have been more social together.”
““After the beach pictures, they only spent time together at home and got extra careful.”
““Everyone knows they are dating, but they still want to keep it private,” the insider said.”
“In May, a source told People that the couple are still cautious about being seen together.”
“Though Foxx and Holmes have kept their relationship largely private, the two have been photographed together more and more in the past year.”
“It's not surprising that fans were speculating about her relationship status: Holmes has been dating actor Jamie Foxx since August 2013, just one year after her split from Tom Cruise.”
““Katie’s not engaged to anyone besides her fictional movie fiancé, played by Jerry O’Connell,” her rep said.”
“A rep for Holmes told People the ring is not an engagement ring.”


"See more: all the celebrities engaged this year So far! "
"They often go to restaurants for dinner, date, or go out with friends." Sherlock Holmes was photographed visiting fox in Georgia in September when he was filming just mercy, and they were seen cycling and going to the gym together
"But this year, they're more social together."
"After taking photos of the beach, they just stay at home together and be extra careful."
"Everyone knows they're dating, but they still want to keep it a secret," the person said
"In May, a source told people that the couple were cautious about being seen together."
"Although Fox and Holmes basically maintain a personal relationship, more and more photos have been taken of them together in the past year."
"Fans guess it's not surprising that she's in love: Holmes has been dating actor Jamie fox since August 2013, just a year after she broke up with Tom Cruise."
"She's not engaged to anyone except her fictional movie fiancee (played by Jerry O'Connell)," Katie's agent said
"A representative of Holmes told people that this ring is not an engagement ring."



**Something goes wrong**
“This article originally appeared on The Sun and has been republished with permission.”
“The Sun has contacted Katie and Jamie’s representatives for comment.”
““She’s allowed to date, but she cannot do so in a public fashion, and she’s not supposed to let any boyfriend near their daughter, Suri.”She was said to have had gone to extraordinary lengths to keep relationship with Jamie a secret.”
“An insider claimed: “Katie signed a clause in her quickie divorce settlement that prevents her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, like talking about him or Scientology, or publicly dating another man for five years after the divorce.”
“According to Radar Online, Holmes agreed not to publicly date another man for five years in exchange for US$5.8 million in child support and US$6.2 million payment for herself.”
“Katie was said to have been banned from having a public relationship under the strict terms of her quickie divorce from superstar Tom Cruise.”
“Two years ago, Jamie was forced to deny dating Katie when a picture emerged of the two of them holding hands in a recording studio.”
“A source is said to have told Radar Online: “Katie just couldn’t get over her trust issues.”The pair had insisted they were just good friends following Katie’s divorce from Tom Cruise.”
“Radar Online reported that Dawson’s Creek star Katie called it quits with Jamie after reports he had been dating other women during their time together.”
“The couple only went public with their relationship in September last year but were first linked back in August 2013.”


"This article first appeared in the sun and was reprinted with permission."
"The sun has contacted representatives of Katie and Jamie for advice."
"She's allowed to date, but she can't do it in public, and she shouldn't let any boyfriends near their daughter Suri." It is said that she has spared no effort to keep her relationship with Jamie secret
"Katie signed a clause in her express divorce agreement to prevent her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, such as talking about him or Scientology, or dating another man publicly for five years after the divorce," a person familiar with the matter said
"According to radar online, Holmes agreed not to date another man publicly for five years in exchange for $5.8 million in child support and $6.2 million in compensation."
"It is said that under the strict rules of Katie's speedy divorce from superstar Tom Cruise, she is forbidden to have relations with the public."
"Two years ago, Jamie was forced to deny dating Katie, when there was a picture of them holding hands in the studio."
"Katie just can't overcome her trust problem," a source is said to have told radar online After Katie and Tom Cruise divorced, they insisted they were just good friends
"Radar Online reported that Dawson's Crick star Katie broke up with Jamie after reporting that Jamie was dating with other women."
"The couple only announced their love affair in September last year, but the first scandal came out as early as August 2013."



Number  209
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““My little one is very, very generous and very sensitive,” Holmes said, according to People.”
“Numerous reports describe Suri as an intelligent, kind-hearted girl, with Holmes herself opening up about her daughter’s philanthropic heart in a 2015 interview with Today.”
““She’s slowly warming up to the idea of a reunion,” an insider told the Star.”
“But Holmes also was torn because she wants to do what’s best for Suri.”
“...controversial self styled religious organization the Star reported...”
“He s dying to be a part of her life Holmes isn t a fan of a reunion given that she agreed to stay quiet about Cruise and Scientology if he agreed to stay away from their daughter and not try to brainwash her into becoming a part of the...”
“He’s had to watch from afar as Suri grew into a lovely young lady, and he regrets that he’s missed out on so much.”
““But Tom’s tired of being bossed around by them.”
““Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn’t see Suri, he didn’t question it,” an insider told the Star.”
“According to Hollywood Life, citing a report by Star magazine, Cruise ached over the fact that he had been an absent father and not seen his daughter in more than five years, because his Church of Scientology bosses told him he couldn’t see her.”


"My child is very, very generous, very sensitive," Holmes said, according to people
"Many reports describe Suri as a smart and kind-hearted girl, and Sherlock Holmes himself disclosed her daughter's charity in an interview with today magazine in 2015."
"She's slowly becoming interested in the idea of reunion," a person familiar with the matter told the star
"But Holmes was torn, too, because she wanted to do the best for Suri."
__︹ Star, a controversial self styled religious organization
"He longed to be a part of her life. Holmes didn't like reunion because she agreed to keep silent with cruise and Scientology. If he agreed to stay away from their daughter, he didn't want to brainwash her to become It's part of the story. "
"He had to watch Suri grow into a lovely young woman from a distance. He regretted missing so much."
"But Tom is fed up with them."
"Tom is a loyal Scientologist, so when church leaders told him he couldn't see Suri, he didn't question it," a source told sky
"According to a report in Star Magazine quoted by Hollywood life daily, cruise felt sad that he was an absent father and had not seen his daughter for more than five years, because his Scientology boss told him that he could not see his daughter."



Number  210
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...which still excites Watt even though he s a multimillionaire...”
“But even if he doesn t take home the sports award he s had quite an offseason cavorting with tennis star Caroline Wozniacki in Paris pretending to be a security guard for the Zac Brown Band doing a dead on impression of Arnold Schwarzenegger and flying in a private plane...”
“He's also a nominee for Best NFL Player along with Tom Brady (New England Patriots), Antonio Brown (Pittsburgh Steelers), DeMarco Murray (Philadelphia Eagles) and Aaron Rodgers (Green Bay Packers).”
“The two-time NFL Defensive Player of the Year is up for Best Male Athlete alongside Stephen Curry (Golden State Warriors), LeBron James (Cleveland Cavaliers) and Aaron Rodgers (Green Bay Packers).”
“#LifeMade"We're guessing the duo met in Los Angeles, where Watt will appear on the ESPY Awards Wednesday night.”
“He tweeted the photo above, with the caption, "I'm not even going to try to pretend like I acted cool when this happened.”
“On Monday night, Watt met his lifetime crush, and he couldn't help exulting about it.”
“Now it looks like dreams do come true — even for NFL superstars.”
“All you have to do is look at his Twitter feed: "Anybody who knows me knows my one lifetime crush has been Jennifer Aniston" reads a tweet from February 12, 2014.”
“It's no secret that Houston Texan J.J. Watt has always had a crush on Jennifer Aniston.”


__ It's still exciting for Watt, even though he's a multimillionaire... "
"But even if he didn't get the sports prize back, he had a good time in Paris with tennis star Caroline Wozniacki during the off-season. She pretended to be the security guard of Zach brown, played" the death impression of Arnold Schwarzenegger "and flew in a private plane..."
"He was named best NFL player along with Tom Brady (New England Patriots), Antonio Brown (Pittsburgh Steelers), DeMarco Murray (Philadelphia Eagles) and Alan Rogers (Green Bay Packers)
"Two time NFL defensive player of the year will compete with Stephen curry (Golden State Warriors), LeBron James (Cleveland Cavaliers) and Alan Rogers (Green Bay Packers) for best male player."
"Lifemade" we guess the pair met in Los Angeles, and watt will appear at the ESPY awards on Wednesday night
"He posted the photo on Weibo with a note," I'm not even going to pretend to be cool when this happens. "
"On Monday night, Watt met the sweetheart of his life, and he couldn't help rejoicing."
"Now it looks like the dream has come true - even the NFL superstar."
On February 12, 2014, a tweet read: "you just need to look at his twitter message to know: everyone who knows me knows that my favorite in my life is Jennifer Aniston."
"It's no secret that J.J. Watt, a Houston Texan, has always been infatuated with Jennifer Aniston."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Image via magicinfoto / Shutterstock.com]”
“And it’s not that he doesn’t love her, because from all that we hear he does.”
“Ryan Seacrest’s Radio Show reported that Mendes has told Gosling that she wants a ring.”
“Apparently Ryan Gosling, 32, is not ready to settle down, yet and that might be creating some tension with Eva.”
“The actress who is going to be 40 next year, wants to start a family soon, but her beau seems to be enjoying the status quo.”
“According to a report in ShobizSpy, things started getting a bit icy when Mendes pressured Ryan for a commitment, and he denied her.”
“Mendes has said that Ryan is too focused on his career right now and she may be right.”
“His name comes up whenever a new leading man role opens as is the case with the possible role as Batman.”
“Eva has made it clear on several occasions that she wants to get married to Gosling, but her pleas seem to be falling on deaf ears.”
“Eva Mendes has reportedly tried to bring mama Gosling in to back her ultimatum and make her son see reason.”


"[image via magicinfo/ Shutterstock.com Website] "
"It's not that he doesn't love her, because from what we've heard, he does."
"Ryan Seacrest's radio show reported that Mendes told Gosling that she wanted a ring."
"It's clear that 32 year old Ryan Gosling is not ready to settle down, which may bring some tension to Eva."
"The actress will be 40 next year. She wants to get married as soon as possible, but her boyfriend seems to enjoy the status quo."
"According to a report by shobiz spy, when Mendes put pressure on Ryan for a commitment, things started to get a little chilly, and he turned her down."
"Mendes said Ryan is too focused on his career now and she may be right."
"Every time a new hero appears, his name will appear, just like the possible role of Batman."
EVA made it clear on several occasions that she wanted to marry Gosling, but her request seemed to be ignored
"It's reported that Eva Mendes is trying to get mother Gosling to support her ultimatum and make her son understand it."



Number  212
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“PICS: Selena Gomez Channels Justin Bieber in Trendy Wire-Framed Silver GlassesPICS: Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez Reunite in L.A. After Jamaican GetawayRelated Gallery...”
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:RELATED: Justin Bieber Celebrates 24th Birthday Go-Karting With Friends -- But Where Was Selena Gomez?”
“Despite rumors of a split or the couple taking a break, a source tells ET that Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber are "still together."”
“While they often spend time apart, the source explains that distance between them is generally for "various reasons," saying, "It's not because they are broken up or taking a break."”
“In fact, both Gomez and Bieber were seen leaving church together in Los Angeles on Wednesday night, albeit in separate vehicles.”
“Pap Nation/Splash NewsPap Nation/Splash NewsThough they do not seem to be calling it quits, the source admits, "that doesn't mean things are perfect between them.”
“They have issues just like any other couple."”
“The pair started dating in 2010 and had been on and off until 2015.”
“They reconnected late last year and have kept their relationship very private, as Selena continues to put her health issues and personal needs first.”
“The 25-year-old "Wolves" singer suffers from lupus and underwent a kidney transplant last year.”


"Picture: salina Gomes channel Justin Bieber in fashionable wire frame silver glass picture: Justin Bieber and salina Gomes reunite, Jamaica leaves related galleries..."
"Embedded code restart" content: related: Justin Bieber and friends celebrate kart's 24th birthday - but where's Serena Gomez? "
"Despite rumors that they have broken up or taken a break, a source told et that Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber" are still together. "
"Although they often separate, the source explained that the distance between them is usually caused by 'various reasons', not because of breakup or rest."
"In fact, Gomez and Bieber were seen leaving the church in Los Angeles together on Wednesday night, even though they were in different vehicles."
"Although they don't seem to have announced their exit, it doesn't mean their relationship is perfect," the source admitted
"They have the same problems as other couples."
"The two started dating in 2010, intermittently until 2015."
"They reestablished contact at the end of last year and have been in a very private relationship because Selena continues to put her health problems and personal needs first."
The 25-year-old singer, who has lupus, received a kidney transplant last year



Number  213
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Alyssa Norwin...”
“Do you wish they’d kiss and make up…or are they better off not friends?”
“Despite the ‘Slow Down’ singer’s attempt to play nice, the former Disney darlings are still at war, a new report claims.”
“Find out how Miley reacted to Selena’s plea that they make up.”
“Selena Gomez, 22, hoped the 2015 Vanity Fair Oscar Party would be a chance for reconciliation with her old BFF Miley Cyrus, 22 — but the “Wrecking Ball” singer was far from willing to kiss and makeup.”
“Get the scoop on Miley’s public rejection!”
“Selena Gomez Miley Cyrus Fight Miley Rejects Plea To End Feud At the celeb filled post Academy Awards party Selena hoped she would be able to smooth things over with Miley who she had a falling out with after staring a relationship with Nick Jonas 22 Miley s ex in...”
“2008”
“The feud worsened when Miley pulled a similar stunt, hooking up with Selena’s ex, Justin Bieber (and getting pregnant!)”
“...while the then-couple was on a break, Life & Style reports.”


"- Eliza norwin..."
"Do you want them to kiss and make up Or are they better off not being friends? "
A new report says that despite the "slow down" singer's efforts, the former Disney favorites are still fighting
"See how Miley responds to Serena's request."
"Selena Gomez, 22, hopes that the 2015 Vanity Fair Oscar Party will be an opportunity for her to reconcile with her 22-year-old boyfriend, Miley Cyrus - but the ball of destruction singer is far from willing to kiss and make-up."
"Get an exclusive that Miley has publicly rejected!"
"Selena Gomez and Miley Cyrus fight. Miley refuses to end her resentment at the Oscars after celebrities gather. Selena hopes that she can sit down with Miley. Who is she? She had a quarrel with Nick Jonas Miley's ex girlfriend on the 22nd..."
_2008_
"When Miley does a similar stunt, she's hooking up with Serena's ex boyfriend Justin Bieber (and pregnant!) The resentment gets worse when the time comes. "
__ When the couple are at rest, life and style report



Number  214
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If you get a chance to send your kids to film school,” Kimmel teased.”
“It really is.”
“...bestiality in his new movie Good Time...”
“The actor made the joke Thursday night on Jimmy Kimmel Live!, where he said he refused his director’s request to act out a very NSFW scene involving a dog.”
“Pattinson’s comments soon went viral, even eliciting praise from the animal rights group PETA, which thanked him for declining to participate.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Now, the actor, 31, is trying to set the record straight.”
““The story I told on Jimmy Kimmel last night seems to have spiraled out of control,” he said in a statement.”
““What didn’t come across is that this was supposed to be a joke.”
“No one at all expected or assumed that anything like that would happen on the Good Time set.”He continued, “We are all huge animal lovers and would obviously never do anything to harm an animal.”


"If you have a chance to send your kids to film school," Kimmel quipped
"It's true."
__ The beast in his new movie "good time"
"The actor made a joke on Jimmy Kimmel's live show on Thursday night! He said he refused the director's request to perform a very new South Wales scene involving dogs
"Pattinson's comments soon spread, and even attracted praise from the animal rights group, the organization for the good treatment of animals, which thanks Pattinson for refusing to participate."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Now, the 31 year old actor is trying to clarify the truth."
"The story I told last night about Jimmy Kimmel seems to be out of control," he said in a statement
"Unexpectedly, it should be a joke."
"No one expected or assumed that such things would happen in good times." He went on, "we are all animal lovers, and obviously we don't do anything to hurt animals."



**Something goes wrong**
“ https://t.co/6FXVxKnT7m — Sonam Kapoor (@sonamakapoor) January 9, 2017Sonam writes,”Okay, India isn’t in such a bad way… This person is a joker… at least our leader has a semblance of intelligence,”.”
“...is a joker at least our leader has a semblance of intelligence...”
“— James Woods (@RealJamesWoods) January 9, 2017How DARE Meryl exercise her right to free speech like that’s a thing we are allowed to do here in Ameri- wait…hmm.”
“A national treasure and fine woman.”
“That experience set a standard to which I always aspired.”
“1/ — Joy Reid (@JoyAnnReid) January 9, 2017I started my career working with #MerylStreep.”
“My daughter and I just watched the #MerylStreep speech together, both with lumps in our throats.”
“Check out the tweets here.”
“While some called it graceful, others said it was brave.”
“Big names from media like Joy Reid also thanked Streep for being so strong with her words.”


_  https://t.co/6FXVxKnT7m Website - sonama Kapoor (@ sonama Kapoor) on January 9, 2017, Sonam wrote: "well, the situation in India is not so bad This man is a clown At least our leaders look smart. "
__ It's a clown, at least our leader looks smart... "
"James Woods (@ realjames woods) January 9, 2017 how dare Meryl exercise her right to freedom of speech, as we are allowed to do in the United States - and so on Well
"National treasures and good women."
"That experience set the standard I've always wanted."
"1 / - Joy Reid (@ joyannreid) on January 9, 2017, my career began in # Meryl Streep."
"My daughter and I just watched Meryl Streep's speech together. They both had lumps in their throats."
"Look at the microblog here."
"Some say it's elegant, others say it's brave."
"Media moguls like joy Reid also thank Streep for his tough words."



**Something goes wrong**
“Their former Thousand Oaks, Calif. ranch — which they sold in 2013 for $10.85 million — was also previously featured in Elle Décor.”
“DeGeneres released her interior design book “Home” in 2015, which included photos and design tips from many of their past and present residences.”
“According to Celebrity Net Worth, DeGeneres receives an estimated annual salary of between $75 million and $90 million.”
“In 2015, “The Ellen Show” won the Daytime Emmy Award for Outstanding Talk Show Entertainment.”
“Upon her return to the show in September, her season premier ratings dropped 29% from the previous season, Variety reported.”
“Her daytime talk show, “The Ellen DeGeneres Show” debuted on Sept. 8, 2003, and had consistently high ratings until the recent controversies.”
“Starting out as a stand-up comedian, DeGeneres rose to fame as an actress, starring in the TV series “Ellen” from 1994 to 1998 and “The Ellen Show” from 2001 to 2002.”
“Her wife — actress Portia de Rossi — has her own $50 million fortune, which brings the celebrity couple’s total net worth to $420 million.”
“12 spot on Forbes’ list of the highest-paid celebrities in the world.”
“In 2020, DeGeneres made $84 million, retaining the No.”


"Their former ranch in Thousand Oaks, California - sold for $10.85 million in 2013 - has also appeared in Elle D 茅 cor before."
"In 2015, DeGeneres released her interior design book home, which includes photos and design techniques of many of their homes, past and present."
"According to celebrity net worth, DeGeneres' annual salary is estimated to be between $75 million and $90 million."
"In 2015, the Ellen show won the Daytime Emmy Award for its excellent talk show entertainment."
After returning to the show in September, her premiere ratings fell 29 percent from the previous season, according to variety
Her daytime talk show, the Ellen DeGeneres Show, premiered on September 8, 2003, and had a high audience rating until the latest controversy
Starting as a stand up comedian, DeGeneres became famous as an actress. From 1994 to 1998, he appeared in the TV series Allen, and from 2001 to 2002, he appeared in the Allen Show
Her wife, actress Portia de Rossi, owns $50 million, bringing the celebrity couple's total assets to $420 million
"There are 12 on Forbes' list of the world's highest paid celebrities."
"In 2020, DeGeneres made 84 million dollars and kept the first place."



**Something goes wrong**
“Click to enlarge more Jessica Simpson photos from this concert event ...[Photo Credits: Splash News Online]”
“What is that belt?”
“Is she packing on the pounds or is this just a terrible photo series?”
“In other Cowboys news, Terrell Owens is getting a reality show!”
“Tony Romo may want to pursue an offseason trade.”
“Her trademark airheadedness blonde curls and giant boobs dazzling smile may still be there, but as for that slim figure of hers, well, you can see for yourself below ...WOW: Jessica Simpson terrifies revs up a crowd.”
“And appear she did.”
“Double-belted into vintage mom jeans, the alleged pop singer / former reality TV star / attempted country crooner Jessica Simpson appeared at some sort of chili cook-off concert thingy in Florida this weekend.”
“Either that, or girl needs a stylist - STAT.”


"Click to enlarge more photos of Jessica Simpson's concert [image source: splash news online] "
"What's that belt?"
"Is she gaining weight or is this just a bad photo series?"
"In other cowboy news, Terrel Owens is on a reality show!"
"Tony Romo may want to trade off-season."
"Her trademark blonde curls and huge breasts, dazzling smile may still exist, but as for her slim figure, well, you can take a look at the following Wow: Jessica Simpson scared a lot of people
"It looks like she did."
Jessica Simpson, a pop singer / former reality star / country singer, is said to be wearing vintage mom jeans and a double belt at a spicy cooking concert in Florida this weekend
"Either that or girls need a stylist - statistics."



**Something goes wrong**
“Plus, her posts seem to be all about summer fun, without signs of trouble.”
“That certainly wouldn't be the case if Hudson were having complications.”
“In fact, Instagram photos show Kate and Danny have been traveling together all summer.”
“Gossip Cop, however, reports the story is bogus, pointing to their social media accounts as proof.”
“Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“A wild new story claims Kate was rushed to an emergency room with complications, adding that amid the health scare… Danny dumped her.”
“Kate Hudson and Danny Fujikawa are doing just fine as they await the arrival of their baby girl, despite a report.”


"In addition, her posts seem to be all about the fun of summer, without any sign of trouble."
"If Hudson had complications, it certainly wouldn't be like this."
"In fact, instagram photos show Kate and Denny traveling together all summer."
"However, the gossip police report that the story is false and point to their social media account as evidence."
"Waiting for your permission to load instagram media."
"A crazy new story says that Kate was rushed to the emergency room because of complications, and that she was in a health panic Denny dumped her
"Kate Hudson and Denny Fujikawa are waiting for the baby girl to arrive. Despite reports, they are doing well."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know!”
“Stormy had another message for Stormi herself: “It’s a tough name to live up to.”
“The porn star who allegedly slept with the president says Kylie’s baby’s only going to be ‘trouble’!”
“It’s probably a total coincidence that Kylie Jenner named her newborn daughter Stormi Webster at the same time that another Stormy became a household name, right?”
“Stormy Daniels, the former porn star and alleged mistress to now-president Donald Trump thinks that, too — but it didn’t stop her from sending a message to Kylie through TMZ (watch HERE).”
““I will say congratulations (to Kylie), and I wish her all the best,” she said.”
““And hang on to your heart, because little girls named Stormi are known to cause trouble.”Aww, come on!”
“Stormy’s comments were totally tongue-in-cheek, but it’s been less than a week since Stormi came into the world!”
“The last thing Kylie and dad Travis Scott are thinking about right now is their newborn daughter growing up to be a porn star!”
“Hope you’re fierce.”Fans have their own theories about why Kylie and Travis named their baby Stormi, and the reason is wild.”


"Let us know!"
"Tommy sent another message to himself:" it's a hard name to live up to. "
"The porn star who was said to have sex with the president said Kelly's children would only be trouble!"
"It may be a complete coincidence that when Kelly Jenner named her newborn daughter Tommy Webster, another Tommy became a household name."
"Former porn star and current president Donald Trump's mistress, stormy daniels, agrees - but that doesn't stop her from sending messages to Kelly via TMZ (see here)."
"I want to congratulate (Kelly) and wish her all the best," she said
"Hold on to your heart, because everyone knows that a little girl named Tommy can cause trouble." Oh, come on
"Tommy's comments are nonsense, but it's less than a week since Tommy came to the world!"
"The last thing Kelly and her father, Travis Scott, think about now is that their newborn daughter has grown into a porn star!"
"I hope you're good." Fans have their own opinions on why Kelly and Travis named their children stommie. The reasons are crazy



Number  220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out the entire Gen Why series and other videos on Facebook and the Bustle app across Apple TV, Roku, and Amazon Fire TV.”
“We love you girl, please keep us posted?”
“King Kylie s pregnancy has left all of us laying on the side of our beds looking up at the ceiling in some degree of an existential crisis and now the new question starting to simmer to the surface is Wait a minute are Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott getting...”
“...married...”
“World, I can't even with this right now... but then again... if I must...”
“Here is what we know.”
“And by "know," I mean here is what we are all rapidly absorbing at an alarming rate from various sources creating the false illusion of fact, but YA KNOW WHAT, THIS ISN'T ABOUT MY CONSPIRACY THEORIES SO BACK OFF, JAMIE.”
“What we know is that reports are claiming that Kylie Jenner is pregnant with Travis Scott's baby, and due sometime in February.”
“TMZ was the first to break the news on Sept. 22., and so far no one in the family has said she isn't pregnant, which is basically the same thing as shouting, "YES, SHE IS."”
“On top of that, sources say Jenner and Scott are reportedly having a baby girl, which feels pretty specific.”


"See the entire Gen why series and other videos on Facebook, as well as the bubble app on Apple TV, roku and Amazon fire TV."
"We love you, girl. Please let us know at any time, OK?"
"King Kelly's pregnancy makes us all lie by the bed and look up at the ceiling, which is a kind of survival crisis to some extent, and now new problems begin to surface, etc., have Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott..."
__ Married... "
"World, I can't even do this now... But then again... If I had to... "
"That's what we know."
"When I say 'know', I mean that we absorb things from various sources at an amazing speed, creating a false impression of the facts. But you know, it's not about my conspiracy theory, so step back, Jamie."
"As far as we know, there are reports that Kelly Jenner is pregnant with Travis Scott's baby, due in February."
"TMZ was the first to break the news on September 22. So far, no one in the family has said that she is not pregnant, which is basically the same as shouting" yes, she is pregnant. "
"In addition, the source said Jenna and Scott were reported to have a baby girl, which feels quite specific."



Number  221
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"Another year of growth will make her the youngest self-made billionaire ever, male or female, trumping Mark Zuckerberg, who became a billionaire at age 23," Robehmed reported.”
“However, the magazine says it would take more than a slow year of sales to stop Jenner from reaching billionaire status and making history.”
“Kylie Cosmetics is dealing with slowing growth — Forbes reports that revenue grew just 7% last year, with lip-kit revenue dropping an estimated 35%.”
“There are only five full-time employees, with Jenner's mother, Kris Jenner, handling finances and public relations in exchange for a 10% management cut, the report says.”
“Forbes' Natalie Robehmed detailed how Kylie Cosmetics has found success by harnessing Jenner's immense social-media following and slashing costs by outsourcing labor.”
“Jenner is both the face of the company and the sole owner.”
“Forbes conservatively values the company at $800 million, with an estimated $330 million in sales last year.”
“The 20-year-old's net worth has skyrocketed thanks to the success of Kylie Cosmetics.”
“For comparison, Forbes estimates that Jenner's older sister Kim Kardashian West is worth roughly $350 million.”
“According to Forbes' calculations, that makes her not only the Jenner or Kardashian with the highest net worth, but the 27th-richest self-made woman in the United States.”


"Another year's growth will make her the youngest self-made billionaire ever, both male and female, surpassing Mark Zuckerberg, who became a billionaire at the age of 23," robertmead reported
"However, the magazine said it would take more than a year of slow sales to stop Jenner from becoming a billionaire and making history."
Kylie cosmetics company is dealing with the problem of slowing growth. According to Forbes, revenue increased by only 7% last year, and lipstick revenue decreased by 35%.
"There are only five full-time employees, and Jenner's mother, Chris Jenner, is in charge of Finance and public relations in exchange for a 10% management cut," the report said
Natalie robertmead of Forbes magazine described in detail how Kelly cosmetics company used Jenner's huge social media to reduce costs by outsourcing labor to achieve success
"Jenner is both the spokesman and the sole owner of the company."
Forbes conservatively valued the company at $800 million, with sales estimated at $330 million last year
"The 20-year-old's net worth has soared due to the success of Kelly cosmetics."
"By contrast, Forbes estimates that Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian West, is worth about $350 million."
"According to Forbes, this makes her not only the highest net worth Jenna or Kardashian, but also the 27th richest woman to start from scratch in the United States."



**Something goes wrong**
““Kanye was really nervous about the surgery … but I know he would want to have more kids,” she said.”
““I give up.”As a result, the star decided it was time to revisit the option of hiring a surrogate.”
“But because I don t know anyone that has been a surrogate or used one I didn t really think about that as an option for me Image zoom Credit Kim Kardashian West Instagram At sister Kourtney Kardashian s suggestion Kardashian west met with a woman named Natalie who had...”
““If our goal is to grow your family like you want to, then a surrogate makes sense.”“If the two doctors that I trust have told me it wouldn’t be safe for me to get pregnant again, I have to listen to that,” said Kardashian West.”
““Using a surrogate is not an unreasonable option,” he said.”
“Kardashian West then met with two fertility specialists, including Dr. Wong, who was on board with the option considering the medical risks of a third pregnancy for the star.”
“...the possibility of having someone else carry her third child...”
“And I couldn t stand to be on a flight for 10 hours not knowing RELATED VIDEO Kim Kardashian West Is Trying for a Third Baby But Doctors Warn It s Not Safe Exploring Other Options A few months later in a November 2016 episode of KUWTK Kardashian West broached...”
“And I just thought it was funny, because I’ve been so private before — and what do I really care if I was pregnant again?”“I didn’t get my period this month, so I was just really confused,” she added.”
““Some people were asking me why I would Snapchat the pregnancy test on the airplane.”


"Kanye is very nervous about the operation But I knew he would want more children, "she said
"I gave up." As a result, the star decided it was time to reconsider hiring a surrogate mother
"But because I don't know who has been a surrogate mother or used a surrogate mother, I didn't take it as my choice. This is Kim Kardashian West instagram's suggestion on the website of sister Kardashian of Kourtney. Kardashian West met with a woman named Natalie, who once..."
"If our goal is to make your family grow as you think, then surrogacy makes sense," says Kardashian West "If two doctors I trust tell me it's not safe for me to get pregnant again, I have to listen to them."
"Using surrogacy is not an unreasonable choice," he said
Kardashian West then met with two fertility experts, including Dr. Wang, who was considering the medical risks of the star's third pregnancy
__ It's possible for someone else to have her third child... "
"I can't stand being on a plane for 10 hours because I don't know the video Kim Kardashian West is trying to have a third child, but doctors warn that a few months later, in an episode of kuwtk Kardashian West in November 2016, it's not safe to explore other options..."
"I just think it's funny because I used to be very private - if I'm pregnant again, what do I really care? "I didn't have my period this month, so I'm really confused," she added
"I was asked why I was in such a hurry to talk about pregnancy tests on the plane."



**Something goes wrong**
“Happy Mothers Day to all of the moms out there!”
“Being a mom is the most rewarding feeling in the world!”
“How beautiful is Marvin's Mum?!”
“Sorry.”
“X A photo posted by Victoria Beckham (@victoriabeckham) onMar 5, 2016 at 11:59pm PSTMarvin HumesErmmmm.”
“Happy Mothers Day.You inspire me every day and I love you so much.”
“IT'S POSH SPICE AS A BABY.”
“Happy mama's day as the little ones would say A photo posted by David Beckham (@davidbeckham) onMar 6, 2016 at 12:44am PSTVictoria BeckhamOMG.”
“17 years ago our brood started and these little ones have the most amazing mummy that they love so much ... And I love her for many reasons but the main one is because she gave me the most amazing children ...”
“AWWWWW.”


"Happy Mother's day to all mothers
"Being a mother is the most rewarding feeling in the world!"
"How beautiful is Marvin's mother?"
"I'm sorry."
"X Victoria Beckham (@ Victoria Beckham) released a photo of Marvin humesermmm at 11:59 pm on March 5, 2016."
"Happy mother. You inspire me every day. I love you very much. "
"It's the fashionable spice of infancy."
"Happy Mother's day, children will say, David Beckham (@ DavidBeckham) on March 6, 2016 12:44 am released photos, Victoria Beckham."
"17 years ago, our cubs began to breed, and these kids have the most amazing mummies they love... I love her for many reasons, but the most important one is that she gave me the best child... "
"Oh, dear."



**Something goes wrong**
“Daily Star Online has contacted Lady Gaga's representative for comment.”
“Love your face as normal.”
“...nude ambition gown...”
“** LADY GAGA 'NEW FACE' GRAMMYS 2018 TREND *While her red carpet style was undoubtedly a hit, many fans were far too distracted by Lady Gaga's physical transformation to comment on her wardrobe choices.”
“Following her appearance at the event, held in New York City's Madison Square Gardens, the search term "Lady Gaga face lift" started trending on Google.”
“Taking to Twitter, viewers accused Gaga — real name Stefani Germanotta — of having had appearance-altering procedures.”
“(Image: Getty)(Image: Getty)(Image: Getty)One fan said of the 31-year-old: "Oh no.”
“She's started the plastic surgery crisis phase."”
“Another wrote: "Why did she get plastic surgery herself?”
“Her face at the Grammys looks nothing like her face in 2009."”


"Daily Star online has contacted a representative of Lady Gaga for comments."
"Love your face as usual."
__ The naked robe of ambition... "
"* * Lady Gaga 'new face' Grammy 2018 trend * although her red carpet style is undoubtedly very popular, many fans are too distracted by Lady Gaga's physical changes to comment on her wardrobe choices."
At the event at Madison Square Gardens in New York, the term Lady Gaga became popular on Google
"On twitter, viewers accused Gaga, whose real name is Stefani Germanotta, of having undergone a facelift operation."
"Oh no," one fan said of the age of 31
"She started the crisis of plastic surgery."
Another wrote, "why does she have plastic surgery herself?"
"Her face at the Grammy Awards was nothing like that of 2009."



Number  225
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...of Blue tapped him on the shoulder while he was looking for his car after a meeting in Los Angeles...”
“I describe it as the luckiest day of my life Rodriguez who s celebrating his 45th birthday today with his adoring fiancée said on Ellen about the day when the iconic entertainer clad in her plainclothes cop wear for Shades...”
“As they were in 2005, when Lopez and then-husband Marc Anthony posed for a photo with the Yankees' married third baseman during a Subway Series game.”
“The proper life experience would not yet have been tucked under their respective belts, and they would've been ships in the night.”
“It just wouldn't have worked out.”
“Because if Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez had set their sights on each other at any other time than early 2017, when he was retired from playing baseball and she was single and all the stars were aligned...”
“As they say, timing is everything.”


__︹ After a meeting in Los Angeles, when he was looking for a car, a blue man patted him on the shoulder... "
"I describe this as the luckiest day of my life. Rodriguez celebrated his 45th Birthday with his beloved fiancee today. She said in Ellen magazine that one day this iconic artist was wearing plain clothes, police clothes and sunglasses..."
"As in 2005, Lopez and her husband Mark Anthony were photographed with the Yankees' married third baseman in a subway series
"Proper life experiences will not be hidden under their respective belts, they will be the boats of the night."
"It's impossible."
"Because if Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez were looking at each other at any time outside early 2017, when he retired from baseball and she was single and all the stars were together..."
"As they say, timing is everything."



Number  226
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But I drank loads of water and tea to suppress my sugar cravings – but not having something sweet has proven to be tough on day one.”
“How I felt at the end of the day: Hungry!”
“The science behind the diet is quite simple: eating foods that are high in carbohydrates makes your body produce more glucose and insulin.”
“Like the old Atkins, you are limiting your carbohydrate intake, cutting out sugars and processed foods, eating high protein, vegetables and healthy fats to curb those hunger pangs.”
“There are two options: Atkins 20 or Atkins 40, and the numbers are the total net carbohydrates you can have in a day, with 20 being stricter on the carb intake but quicker in weight-loss in comparison to 40.”
“What is the Atkins 20/40 Diet?”
“What this is also about is achieving a fitter version of myself that I can sustain without starvation.”
“People who want to lose weight or those that just want a healthier lifestyle and reign in their intake simple carbohydrates.”
“Who is it for?”
“Sounds promising – so what does it actually entail?”


"But I drank a lot of water and tea to curb my craving for sugar - but it turned out that it was hard not to eat sweets on the first day."
"My feeling at the end of the day is: hungry!"
"The science behind diet is simple: eating high carbohydrate foods makes your body produce more glucose and insulin."
"Like old Atkins, you limit your carbohydrate intake, cut down on sugar and processed foods, and eat high protein, vegetables and healthy fats to suppress hunger."
"There are two choices: Atkins 20 or Atkins 40. The number is the total net carbohydrate you can eat in a day. 20 is more strict on carbohydrate intake than 40, but it's faster to lose weight."
"What is the Atkins 20 / 40 diet?"
"It's also to make yourself healthier and not starve."
"People who want to lose weight or who just want to have a healthier lifestyle and control their simple carbohydrate intake."
"For whom?"
"It sounds promising - so what does it actually mean?"



Number  227
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The lawyer also responded to recent reports about their custody agreement, saying, "To correct some false statements...Rob does not have 'more than 50 percent custody.'"”
“This agreement does not resolve all disputes between Chyna and Rob."”
“"She will always have the right to go back into court if further incidents of domestic abuse occur.”
“News exclusively on Friday.o continue to stay away from Chyna and not contact her, Chyna has agreed to take the domestic abuse hearing scheduled for Monday, September 18 off the calendar," she added.”
“"Chyna is pleased that Rob has agreed to peacefully co-parent Dream with her, as she has been requesting all along," her attorneytold E!”
“It does not involve Dream.”
“...and obtained a temporary domestic violence restraining order against him...”
“He accused her of cheating belittled her and threatened that she would never see their daughter again unless she stopped the alcohol and drugs and cocaine and X and E Chyna responded on Snapchat by claiming Rob had beat her...”
“In July, Rob posted on Instagram a slew of naked pics of Chyna and a video of her kissing another man, which he said she sent him.”
“The two had split earlier this year after a one-year relationship.”


The lawyer also responded to recent reports about their guardianship agreement, saying that "in order to correct some false statements Rob does not have "more than 50% custody."
"This Agreement does not resolve all the disputes between chener and rob."
"If there is another domestic violence, she will always have the right to return to court."
"Friday exclusive. Stay away from Zina and don't contact her. Zina has agreed to cancel the domestic abuse hearing scheduled for Monday, September 18, "she added
"Zina is happy that rob has agreed to make peace with her, as she has always asked," her lawyer told her
"It's not about dreams."
__︹ And got a temporary domestic violence injunction against him.... "
"He accused her of cheating and belittling her, and threatened that unless she stopped drinking, taking drugs and cocaine, she would never see their daughter again. X and E Chyna responded on snapchat that rob hit her..."
"In July, rob posted a large number of nude photos of Zina and videos of her kissing another man on instagram. He said she sent them to him."
"The two broke up earlier this year after a year of dating."



Number  228
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s all that they want.’For the full story see this weeks issue of New Idea - out now!”
“Reverend Swadley revealed to our source that it was clear Jen loved seeing Brad’s family again, spending long days talking and laughing for the first time since their 2005 divorce.”
“It’s believed the loved-up stars had flown to Missouri because Jen was desperate to reconnect with Brad’s mum, Jane, who she’d developed a very close bond with throughout the time of their first marriage.”
“During the seven-day visit, it’s been revealed that Jane orchestrated a meeting with the family priest Reverend Swadley – hoping it would be the gentle push Brad and Jen would need to make their reignited relationship official once again.”
“‘Reverend Swadley met Jen recently at a family function that Brad’s mum, Jane, threw at their family home in Missouri,’ a close friend of the pastor’s told New Idea exclusively.”
“Jen accompanied Brad home on the trip and attended church services with the family as well as joining Brad at meetings at the now retired reverend s home who Brad reconnected with after he decided to find himself and renew...”
“...his faith following his split from Ange...”
“He remarked at how at ease Jen was with his family who clearly adore her and how everyone said how much she s been missed and how happy they all were to have her back in Brad s and their...”
“...lives The source goes on to reveal that Reverend Swadley spoke at length with Brad and Jen about getting married as soon as possible in Missouri in a small ceremony with just local friends and family present...”
“Reverend Swadley revealed how in love Brad and Jen were and how they planned to officially wed as soon as their divorces were finalised with him agreeing to conduct the ceremony and welcome them both back into the church the...”


"That's exactly what they want." For a complete story, see the new ideas magazine this week
Pastor swadley revealed to our sources that Jane obviously likes to see Brad's family again, and for the first time since their divorce in 2005, she spent a lot of time talking and laughing
"It is believed that the reason why these popular stars flew to Missouri was that Jan was eager to reestablish contact with Brad's mother Jane, who had a very close relationship with Brad's mother throughout their first marriage."
"During the seven day visit, it was revealed that Jane arranged a meeting with the family pastor, Reverend swadley - hoping that this was the gentle push Brad and Jane needed to formalize their re established relationship."
"Pastor swadley recently met Jen at a family party held by Brad's mother Jane at her Missouri home," one of the pastor's friends said in an exclusive interview with new ideas
"Jane accompanies Brad home, attends church services with her family, and has a meeting with Brad at the now retired pastor's home. Brad decides to find himself and renew his contract, and then contacts him again..."
__ His faith after breaking up with Angie... "
"He said how comfortable Jen was with his family, they obviously adored her, everyone said how much she missed her, and they were happy that she could come back to Brad and their..."
__︹ Life sources continue to reveal that Reverend swadley and Brad and Jane held a small wedding in Missouri, with only local friends and family present... "
"Pastor swadley revealed how Brad and Jan fell in love. They planned to get married as soon as the divorce was over. He agreed to host the wedding and welcome them back to church..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know in the comments.”
“Source: BACKGRIDHer anxiety has gotten so bad, in fact, Kendall didn't walk at any of the spring Fashion Week shows.”
“The reality TV star has been laying low as she grapples with anxiety over her high-profile career and living life under a microscope.”
“Click through for more details.”
“Article continues below advertisementWatch to find out why!”
“Source: BACKGRID"All the stress has become too much for her," an insider revealed to OK!.”
“"She wants to focus on herself."”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDThe 22-year-old has opened up about suffering from "debilitating anxiety" in the past.”
“"I literally wake up in the middle of the night with a full-on panic attacks," she told friend Cara Delevigne for Harper's Bazaar.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID"Kendall hates traveling," the insider said, "and she's upset about her acne.”


"Please let us know in the comments."
"Source: backgroundher anxieties have become so severe that in fact Kendall did not show at any spring fashion week."
"The reality star has been keeping a low profile because she has been anxious about her high-profile career and life under the microscope."
Click for more information
The article continues the following advertisement observation, finds out the reason
"Source: backgrid" an insider said to OK! Revealed: "all the pressure is too much for her."! "
"She wants to focus on herself."
The article continues with the following ad source: backgrid, a 22-year-old, reveals his past experience with "debilitating anxiety disorder."
"I woke up in the middle of the night in complete panic," she told Harper fair friend Carla delaviny
The article continues with the following ad source: backgrid "Kendall hates traveling," the insider said, "she's upset about her acne."



Number  230
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““My thoughts are with Rep. Scalise, the Capitol Police & all those impacted.” Miranda also offered his “prayers and thoughts,” while Katie Couric asked, “God what is happening in this country?””
“The gunman was over by the third base dugout with a clear view of the field.”“The shooting in Alexandria this AM was a senseless horrific act,” Takei tweeted.”
“All of a sudden we heard a very loud shot.”
“Republican Senator Jeff Flake told the AP, “We were doing batting practice.”
“Scalise was taken to George Washington University Hospital in stable condition.”
“According to the Associated Press, the gunman was carrying a rifle and was wounded by return fire from officers.”
“Police Chief Michael Brown gave a statement on the situation to press after a suspect was taken into custody and five people were transported to local hospitals.”
“ET, Alexandria police were notified of a shooting at E. Monroe Street.”
““Our thoughts and prayers are with him.” Other politicians raising their voices include Senator Kamala Harris, who called the shooting “horrific,” and Congressman Ted Lieu, who wrote, “My thoughts and prayers are with the victims injured by this senseless shooting in Alexandria today.”Shortly after 7 a.m.”
“Steve Scalise of Louisiana, a true friend and patriot, was badly injured but will fully recover,” Trump tweeted.”


"My idea is to work with representative scalis, the Congressional police and all those affected." Miranda also offered his "prayers and thoughts," and Katie Couric asked, "God, what's going on in this country?"
"The gunman is near the third base air raid shelter with a clear view," Takei tweeted
"Suddenly we heard a loud shot."
"We're practicing batting," Republican Senator Jeff fleck told the associated press
"Scalis was taken to George Washington University Hospital in stable condition."
"According to the associated press, the shooter, armed with a rifle, was wounded by the police's counterattack."
"After one suspect was detained and five people were taken to a local hospital, police chief Michael Brown made a statement about the situation to the media."
"Eastern time, Alexandria police received a notice of the shooting on Monroe street."
"Our thoughts and prayers are with him." Other politicians who raised their voices included Senator Kamala Harris, who called the shooting "terrible," and representative Ted lieu wrote, "my thoughts and prayers go with the victims of the senseless shooting in Alexandria today." Shortly after 7 a.m
"Steve scalis of Louisiana is a real friend and patriot. He's seriously injured but he's going to make a full recovery," trump tweeted



Number  231
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The couple tied the knot in two ceremonies this past February and a few months later, Heard has only good things to report about being a wife.”
“WATCH: Johnny Depp Admits That He's 'Weird'"Nothing is a dramatic change.”
“We've been together for a long time now, so it's been a fairly organic process," the actress tells ELLE magazine.”
“"I have a fiercely independent spirit."”
“ELLEThat being said, the 29-year-old starlet has a very real fear of the price of fame, which is inevitable when you're Depp's wife and a gorgeous actress.”
“NEWS: Amber Heard Says She Can Go 'Trailer Park' Real Fast"The thing that really scares me is the potential of losing my freedom.”
“I never want for my life to lose the ability to transverse the world, with freedom and ease," she says.”
“"The freedom and ease I have worked so hard to acquire for myself."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The couple married at two ceremonies in February this year and a few months later. It is only reported that they are good wives."
"Observation: Johnny Depp admits he's very strange" "nothing dramatic."
"We've been together for a long time, so it's a pretty organic process," the actress told Elle magazine
"I have a strong sense of independence."
"After all, the 29 year old actress has a very real fear of the cost of fame, which is inevitable when you are Depp's wife and a gorgeous actress."
"News: Amber said she could go to 'Trailer Park' very quickly, and what really scares me is the possibility of losing my freedom."
"I never want my life to lose the ability to cross the world, free and easy," she said
"The freedom and comfort I strive for myself."



Number  232
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more at the Carmel Pine Cone >”
“...any politician who s not doing a good job...”
“...few minutes before show time Eastwood said he had three points he wanted to make That not everybody in Hollywood is on the left that Obama has broken a lot of the promises he made when he took office and that the people should feel free to get rid of...”
“Some other nuggets Eastwood didn t tell anyone in the Romney campaign what he planned to say before the speech because he didn t know Eastwood got to the convention center about 15 20 minutes before he went on Eastwood didn t think of the empty chair routine until a...”
“Eastwood didn't, at least not in the Carmel Pine Cone).”
“(Not to be annoying, but if you're going to say something like that, it seems as though you ought to back it up a bit.”
“Them's fighting words.”
“Among other things, Eastwood told the Carmel Pine Cone:"President Obama is the greatest hoax ever perpetrated on the American people."”
“Anyway, Eastwood has given an extensive interview about the speech to the newspaper of the tiny California town he used to be the mayor of, Carmel.”
“Just about everyone else I know hated it.)”


"Learn more at Carmel pine cone >"
__ Any politician who doesn't do well... "
__︹ A few minutes before the show, Eastwood said that he had three points to make: not everyone in Hollywood is on the left, Obama has broken many of the promises he made when he took office, and people should be free to get rid of... "
"Some of the other Nuggets Eastwood didn't tell anyone in Romney's campaign what he was going to say before the speech because he didn't know Eastwood would arrive at the conference center 15 to 20 minutes before the speech started, Eastwood until I think of the routine of empty chairs. "
"Eastwood didn't, at least not in carmelson orchard."
"It's not for fun, but if you're going to say that, it seems you should support a little bit."
"They're fighting."
Eastwood also told the Carmel pinecone: "President Obama is the biggest scam ever committed against the American people."
"Anyway, Eastwood gave an extensive interview about his speech to the newspaper when he was mayor of Carmel, a small town in California."
"Almost everyone else I know hates it."



**Something goes wrong**
“The movie will detail, from a child’s perspective, the brutal Khmer Rouge regime that claimed over 2 million lives back in the 1970s.”
““It’s strange, I never wanted to have a baby,” she reflected.”
“Mom of six Angelina Jolie revealed in a new interview with the Associated Press on Wednesday, February 17, that she never envisioned herself raising children.”
“But in 2000, she was shooting her blockbuster action flick Lara Croft: Tomb Raider in Cambodia, and something shifted.”
““When I first came to Cambodia, it changed me,” the superstar, 40, told the AP.”
““It changed my perspective.”
“I realized there was so much about history that I had not been taught in school and so much about life that I needed to understand and I was very humbled by it The daughter of actor Jon Voight and late actress Marcheline Bertrand recalled how shooting in Cambodia was...”
“...so different from L A where she felt a real emptiness growing up...”
““That trip triggered my realization of how little I knew and the beginning of my search for that knowledge,” she disclosed.”
“It also awakened her desire to be a mom.”


"The film will detail the brutal Khmer Rouge regime that took more than two million lives in the 1970s from the perspective of a child."
"It's strange that I never wanted to have children," she thought
"Angelina Jolie, the mother of six, revealed in an interview with the associated press on Wednesday, February 17 that she had never thought about raising a child herself."
But in 2000, she was filming her action blockbuster Laura Croft: Tomb Raider in Cambodia, and things changed
"When I first came to Cambodia, it changed me," the 40 year old superstar told the associated press
"It changed my mind."
"I realize that there is too much knowledge about history that I didn't learn in school, too much knowledge about life that I need to know, and I feel very humble about it. The daughter of actor Jon Voith and the late actress Marceline Bertrand recalled the shooting in Cambodia..."
__ It's totally different from Los Angeles, where she feels the void of growing up... "
"That trip made me realize how little I knew, and it made me start looking for it," she revealed
"It also awakened her desire to be a mother."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Tell us your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“Are you surprised that Celine Dion acted like a diva while taping ‘The Voice’?”
“The Voice airs Mondays and Tuesdays at 8/7c on ABC.”
““Gwen used to be everyone’s favorite and now a lot of people can’t stand her because sometimes she acts like she owns the show and they are lucky to have her,” an insider previously told Radar.”
“...this season an insider claimed...”
“She had to do several retakes and complained about everything from her hair and make up to the outfit that was chosen for her But as Radar reported Dion and Stefani pairing up was a perfect match as Blake Shelton s blonde lady love is also acting like a diva...”
““She was extremely entitled and was just not friendly or welcoming to the production crew at all!”“She got the royal treatment and, of course, brought an entire entourage of people with her,” the source claimed.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Are you surprised that Celine Dion acted like a queen when she recorded the sound?"
"It's on ABC 8 / 7 on Monday and Tuesday."
"Gwen used to be everyone's favorite, but now many people can't stand her because sometimes she acts like she's hosting a show. They're very lucky to have her," one insider told radar
__ This season, an insider claimed that
"She had to do a few remakes and complain about everything from her hair and makeup to the clothes she chose for her, but radar reports that Dion and Stephanie are a perfect match because blacksheldon's blonde love also acts like a heroine..."
"She's very qualified, but she's not friendly to the crew and she's not welcome! "She received royal treatment and, of course, brought a large number of entourage," the source said



**Something goes wrong**
“Tell us your opinions here!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Bella would be a rebound romance for The Weeknd?”
“Bella Hadid has been enjoying her time with The Weeknd again but fears it’s a rebound romance!”
“Get the details!”
“Bella Hadid, 21, and The Weeknd, 27, have been hanging out again and may be getting ready to officially reignite the spark they once had, but it turns out Bella’s worried she’ll be nothing more than a rebound!”
““Bella was really touched that Abel took the time out to send her flowers and to let her know that he was thinking of her, she thinks it was super sweet of him,” a source close to the model EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““He’s saying and doing all the right things right now, but Bella is still really cautious of him.”
“She wants to make sure that his intentions are good, and that he’s not just trying to get with her as some kind of rebound romance.”
“Bella has never stopped loving Abel, but he really, really hurt her before, and she doesn’t want to ever feel like that again.”
“She can t help questioning his timing now he s single again he s suddenly declaring his love for her but the whole time he was with Selena she didn t hear a thing from him As much as we d love to see these rekindle their romance we don...”


"Tell us your opinion!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Bella will be a romantic love this week?"
"Bella Hadid is enjoying the weekend again, but she's worried it's a rebound romance!"
"Learn more!"
"21-year-old Bella Hadid and 27-year-old weekend are together again. They may be preparing to rekindle their former spark, but it turns out that Bella is worried that she will only rebound!"
"Bella was really moved because Abel took the time to send her flowers and let her know he was thinking about her. She thought he was super cute," an exclusive source close to the model told Hollywood life
"What he said and did is right, but Bella is still very cautious about him."
"She wanted to make sure his intentions were good, and he didn't just want to see her as some sort of rebound romance."
"Bella has never stopped loving Abel, but he has really, really hurt her before, and she doesn't want to do it again."
"She can't help questioning his timing. Now that he's single again, he suddenly announces that he loves her, but during the time he was with Selena, she didn't hear what he said, just like we wanted to see them rekindle the romance we didn't know..."



Number  236
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We pay for videos too.”
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220.”
“15 Mark Feehily described his relationship with Mariah in an exclusive interview Credit: Rex Features“Her super stretch white limo was parked outside the block of flats.”
““So we were sitting on the floor, eating our Chinese and drinking champagne in a flat in London, discussing what was going on on the telly and having a laugh.”
““We literally ordered a Chinese and sat on the floor eating our takeaway.”
““Afterwards we went to a friend's apartment in Hackney.”
“15 Mariah is no diva, says Westlife's Mark Feehily Credit: Splash News“The last time I went to see Mariah she was playing in Wembley.”
“Speaking exclusively to The Sun Online, Mark, said: “They say never meet your idols - but this couldn’t be more opposite for Mariah.”
“The Irish singer, 37, who is making a comeback after he was asked to be Mimi’s Special Guest on her epic Christmas tour in December, gave an incredible insight to what hanging out with the star off-stage is really like.”
“Feehily revealed Mariah once ate Chinese food sitting on the floor of his friend s flat in Hoxton and isn t the diva she s claimed to be...”


"We also pay for video."
__ E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly. "
15 mark Fisher describes his relationship with Maria in an exclusive interview: Rex's close-up is "her super long white limousine parked outside the apartment building."
"So we sat on the floor, in an apartment in London, eating our Chinese food, drinking champagne, talking about what happened on TV, laughing."
"We ordered a Chinese dish and sat on the floor for takeout."
"Then we went to a friend's apartment in Hackney."
"15 Maria is not a queen," said Mark fisher of west city life. "The last time I went to see Maria, she played at Wembley
"They say you'll never see your idol - but it's the opposite for Maria," mark told the sun in an online interview
The 37 year old Irish singer, who made a comeback in December after being invited as a special guest on Mimi's Christmas tour, has an incredible insight into spending a good time off stage with the star
"Once, Maria was sitting on the floor of his friend's Hoxton apartment eating Chinese food. She wasn't the heroine she was talking about..."



**Something goes wrong**
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I think she will fight for it."
"Jennifer has been through three failed marriages and is sad to hear Alex talking to Lauren," the person said
"On January 24, the former Yankees batter posted a picture in a few hours with a mysterious quote on it. There is nothing wrong with making a mistake. The mistake is not to try to correct it. The shadow of blue star shared a picture with a
__︹ Alex gave her a big bunch of flowers... "
The next day, she uploaded a self portrait with the title "everything is in God's hands" and the label "let go and let God"
"It's directed at Alex," according to one person familiar with the matter Hollywood's hottest duet is on the verge of a hit
"On the 48th, Jennifer privately questioned her relationship with her boyfriend who has been dating for nearly a year. She learned that her boyfriend is still in contact with former flying Lauren hunter, a fitness model. In an interview last year, she said that Alex 42 had sent her sex messages for several months, including during dating..."
"Jerome..."
"Recently," someone revealed some new details to Jennifer, saying that Alex is still texting Lauren, and that's why she lost contact, "a person familiar with the matter told contact
"Of course, he says it's not physical, maybe not, but in Jennifer's book, it's still cheating."



Number  238
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“Would you like them to make a song together?”
“Hint: a major duet may be coming our way!”
““Seeing each other at the event was great, and they first gushed over fashion and their dresses.”
“They both were jealous of how good the other looked.”
“It was a total love-fest for the girls, who don’t get to see each other all that often.”
“Demi was concerned about Selena’s health and Selena assured her she was doing great,” our source adds.”
“Furthermore, “they both complimented each other’s new music and reaffirmed that they are not only friends, but also big fans of each other’s music too.”
“That also brought up the possibility of a collaboration.”
“Selena and Demi both dropped names of major music producers they loved working with and vowed to make time in the near future to put something out together.” OMG!”


"Tell us next!"
"Do you want them to sing a song together?"
"Hint: a major duet may come our way!"
"It's great to see each other at the event. First they talk about fashion and clothes."
"They are both jealous of each other's good looks."
"For the girls, it's a complete love affair. They seldom see each other."
"Demi is worried about Serena's health and Serena assures her she's doing well," our source added
"In addition," they all praised each other's new music and reiterated that they are not only friends, but also loyal fans of each other's music
"It also brings the possibility of cooperation."
"Serena and Demi have given up the names of the major music producers they like to work with and vowed to make time to work together in the near future."! "



Number  239
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Even one minute, 30 seconds can just sort of boost yourself, and it's important to remember to take that time to do that," Barrymore said.”
“"We're like more than best friends, she's my sister," the actress and beauty mogul told ET's Lauren Zima at Beautycon Festival LA, where she was celebrating new products from her makeup line, Flower Beauty.”
“She continued, "We have much more of that kind of relationship, we're very honest with each other.”
“We push each other.”
“And we've had the majority of our lives spent side by side, really going through what real life is, which is an everyday high and low and we just have each other's backs."”
“The BFFs gave everyone friendship goals when they recently posted a makeup free selfie together, both looking glowy and happy.”
“Barrymore admitted that sometimes it's easier to go bare.”
“"I love makeup so much, but it's like we don't have the time or energy to do it all the time, so I'm really into real life," she said about the selfie.”
“But the 43-year-old added makeup can be a powerful game changer.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Even one minute, 30 seconds can cheer you up, and it's important to remember to take the time to do it," Barrymore said
"We're not just best friends, she's my sister," the actress and beauty tycoon told et's Lauren zima at beautycon festival in Los Angeles, as she celebrates new products in her cosmetics line flower beauty
"She went on," we have more of that relationship, we are very honest with each other. "
"We push each other."
"Most of our lives are spent side by side. We have really experienced the real life. This is the high tide and low ebb of every day. We only have each other's back."
"BFFs recently released a self portrait without makeup. They both look radiant and happy, which gives us the goal of friendship."
"Barrymore admits that sometimes it's easier to be naked."
"I really like make-up, but it's like we don't have the time and energy to make it up all the time, so I'm really into real life," she said of her selfie
"But the 43 year old rookie can be a powerful game changer."



Number  240
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more exclusive celebrity news, be sure to pick up the latest issue of Life & Style on newsstands now.”
“Of course, they said yes.”Despite her three prior divorces, J.Lo, 48, has never given up on the idea of marriage.”
“The former Yankees star is ready to pop the question to his girlfriend of nearly one year, and sources reveal exclusively to Life & Style that A-Rod is pulling out all the stops on his upcoming proposal.”
““A-Rod dropped $3 million on a custom 15-carat diamond engagement ring,” a source says.”
“Though he didn’t consult her about it, “he knows her style,” the insider adds.”
““Big stone, lots of little bling on the band.” And if everything goes to plan, Alex will be getting down on one knee during the holidays.”
““He wants to start the New Year knowing Jennifer will be his wife,” explains an insider.”
““He didn’t have to do it, but A-Rod asked Jen’s mom [Guadalupe] and dad [David] for permission to marry their daughter.”
““I’m not saying marrying again is out of the question — but then, nothing in my life is out of the question,” she said in 2016.”
“...fourth time will be the charm...”


"To get more exclusive celebrity news, be sure to buy the latest issue of life and fashion at the newsstand immediately
"Of course, they agreed." Although Luo Zhiling, 48, divorced three times, she never gave up the idea of getting married
"The former Yankee star is ready to propose to his girlfriend who has been dating for nearly a year, and the source told life and fashion exclusively that A-Rod is doing everything he can for his upcoming proposal."
"A-Rod spent $3 million on a custom 15 carat diamond engagement ring," a source said
"Although he didn't consult her about it," the source added, "he knew her style."
"Big stone, there are a lot of trinkets in the band." If everything goes according to plan, Alex will be on one knee during the holiday
"He wants to know that Jennifer will be his wife and start the new year," one person familiar with the matter explained
"He didn't have to, but A-Rod asked Jen's mother (Guadalupe) and father (David) to allow them to marry their daughter."
"I'm not saying remarriage is impossible - but nothing in my life is impossible," she said in 2016
__ The fourth will be glamour... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“It’s a tough decision for her.”We pay for juicy info!”
“But she has two kids with another one the way.”
““Kim really seems like she’s over the marriage.”
“She has been saying it is time for a divorce.”The first source told Radar the end was near.”
“He says he is recording but Kim says he is avoiding her.”
““Kim has told her friends that she doesn’t think he’s taking his meds and he is doing really manic things like staying in the studio all night long.”
““After his breakdown Kanye did everything right, but he’s completely stopped that lately,” the source spilled at the time.”
““They’ve been in separate beds for weeks now, and he’s detaching himself from Kim again, which is what almost caused their divorce last year.”As Radar previously reported exclusively, Kimye nearly called it quits after Yeezy’s erratic behavior was destroying their relationship.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"It was a difficult decision for her." We pay for interesting information! "
"But she has two children and the other is on the way."
"Kim really seems to have ended the marriage."
"She kept saying it was time for a divorce." The first source told radar that the divorce was coming to an end
"He said he was recording, but Kim said he was avoiding her."
"Kim told her friends that she didn't think he was taking medicine and that he was doing really crazy things, like staying in the studio all night."
"After his collapse, Kanye did everything right, but recently he completely stopped doing it," the source revealed at the time
"They've been sleeping apart for weeks, and he broke up with Kim again, which is almost the reason for their divorce last year." According to radar's exclusive report, kimiye almost broke up because kimiye's eccentric behavior destroyed their relationship



Number  242
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If Khloe wants Caitlyn in her life, she can reach out — it’s not going to be the other way around.” Let’s hope a dialogue between these 2 begins very soon.”
““She hasn’t talked to Khloe in a very long time and that is going to continue despite the Tristan cheating drama Khloe dealt with before having her daughter.”
““Caitlyn doesn’t want to pretend that she has a relationship with Khloe,” a source shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“And back in April, after True was born, we learned that Caitlyn refused to congratulate Khloe.”
“As we previously reported, Caitlyn left Khloe out of her Mother’s Day tribute in May, highlighting just how poor their relationship has become.”
“He congratulated her on all her Olympic accomplishments and told her that in her heyday she was a fierce competitor like LeBron [James].” There’s no word on if a meeting has actually been arranged for Caitlyn and True.”
“They “joked about how controlling the Kardashians can be… Tristan even complimented Cait.”
“...some bonding over their similar experiences on the fringe of the world famous family...”
“An insider added that Cait explained to Tristan how Khloe s shut her out and how eager she is to see her first child Tristan felt sorry for Caitlyn and promised Cait that she d be part of True s life The outlet also claims that Tristan and Caitlyn did...”
““She made it clear: she wants to meet True.” We don’t blame her, but her methods are pretty shocking!”


"If Caitlin wants Caitlin in her life, she can help - it won't be another way." Let's hope that the dialogue between the two will begin soon
"She hasn't spoken to Khloe for a long time, and although Khloe dealt with Tristan's deception before giving birth to her daughter, it will continue."
"Caitlin doesn't want to pretend that she has a relationship with Chloe," a source said
"Back in April, after truer was born, we learned that Caitlin refused to congratulate helo."
"As we reported earlier, Caitlin threw Khloe out of the mother's Day Memorial in May, highlighting how bad their relationship has become."
"He congratulated her on all her achievements in the Olympic Games and told her that in her heyday, she was a fierce competitor like LeBron," there was no news to say whether a meeting had really been arranged for Caitlin and James
"They" joked about how Kardashian controlled Tristan even praised Kate
__ Some connections of their similar experiences on the edge of world famous families... "
"A person familiar with the matter added that Kate explained to Tristan how Chloe turned her away and how eager she was to see her first child. Tristan felt sorry for Caitlin and promised Kate that she would be a part of Caitlin's real life. The media also claimed that Tristan and Caitlin did... "
"She made it very clear: she wanted to see real people." We don't blame her, but her method is quite shocking! "



Number  243
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“It was very brief."”
“The former couple separated in 2013 and were reportedly not on good terms following the split, but things seem to have improved slightly since then.”
““Kris and Caitlyn interact when they have to for the kids,” an insider told People.”
““It’s important for Kylie and Kendall.”
“They can be cordial, but like most exes, they’re never going to be best friends.”Earl Gibson III Getty ImagesThis content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“As People points out, the family of four has reunited on several occasions, including Kylie's 21st birthday party earlier this month.”
“"It wasn’t a happy, laughing interaction between Kris and Caitlyn," a source told the site.”
“"It was more like, this is a moment where we’re coming together for the kids.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Very brief."
"The first two separated in 2013 and it is reported that they had a bad relationship after the breakup, but the situation seems to have improved slightly since then."
"Chris and Caitlin interact with the kids when necessary," a person familiar with the matter told people
"It's important for Kelly and Kendall."
"They can be friendly, but like most ex girlfriends, they will never be best friends." This content is imported from {embed name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"As people have pointed out, the family of four has been reunited many times, including Kelly's 21st birthday party earlier this month."
"The interaction between Chris and Caitlin was not pleasant or funny," a source told the site
"It's more like, it's a time for us to come together for the children."



Number  244
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““If more people would just put their personal feelings aside and talk about really important issues that have to be discussed, then so much more can get done,” she said.”
““I honestly saw that if I could use my platform just to do something for one person, that it opens the conversation for so much more and for other people to want to do the same thing.”
“But that’s not going to be like, ‘Kim’s running.’ That’s not where I am.”The “Keeping Up With the Kardashians” star added she wants to use her celebrity status for the welfare of people.”
“When asked if she would ever run for office, Kardashian told CNN, “I guess never say never.”
“Following her meeting with the president, Alice, who was sentenced to life in prison without parole in 1997 on money laundering and drug conspiracy charges, was released from Aliceville Correctional Facility in Alabama.”
“The 37-year-old entrepreneur recently met US President Donald Trump to discuss prison reforms after she spent months working with her legal team in a bid to get Alice Johnson parole.”
“Reality TV star Kim Kardashian said she is not actively considering a career in politics but she would not rule out the possibility of running for office.”
“Kim Kardashian recently met US President Donald Trump to discuss prison reforms.”


"If more people put their personal feelings aside and talk about really important issues that have to be discussed, then more can be done," she said
"I really see that if I can use my platform to do something for one person, it will open up a dialogue for more people and make others willing to do the same thing."
"But it's not like 'Kim's running.' I'm not like that. " The "keep up with Kardashian" star added that she wanted to use her celebrity status to benefit people
Asked if she would run for president, Kardashian told CNN, "I want to never say never."
In 1997, Alice was sentenced to life imprisonment without parole for money laundering and drug trafficking conspiracy. After meeting with the president, she was released from Alice Ville prison in Alabama
"The 37 year old entrepreneur recently met with us president trump to discuss prison reform after months of working with the legal team to get Alice Johnson parole."
"Reality TV star Kim Kardashian said she was not actively considering politics, but she did not rule out the possibility of running for office."
"Kim Kardashian recently met with us president trump to discuss prison reform."



Number  245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But while their friendship may be struggling, a Swift pal insists that the country artist-turned-pop vocalist loves Gomez and will always be there for her.”
“Recently she's been spotted with Modern Family's Sarah Hyland, True Grit's Hailee Steinfeld, Victoria's Secret model Karlie Kloss, and even Gomez's enemy, New Zealander Lorde.”
“And Swift has plenty of besties to spend time with otherwise.”
“"After Selena pulled that move, Taylor started distancing herself," a source tells Us.”
“She believes Gomez "used" a brief romance with the Grammy winner's pal Ed Sheeran last June to make her jailbird sweetie jealous.”
“But Gomez rekindling of the Jelena flame isn't the only thing peeving Swift.”
“Two days later, the "Come And Get It" crooner accompanied the Biebs to the SXSW music fest where he sang his hit "As Long as You Love Me" to her.”
“The "Boyfriend" singer sent his ex $10,000 in flowers and flew from Miami to McAllen, Texas to see her on March 7.”
“Swift is disgusted that the pair are back together, cutting off her bestie after tweeting just last July that Gomez was "the closest thing I've ever had to a sister."”
“The "Red" singer, 24, has distanced herself from former best friend Selena Gomez after the Disney star reconnected with her infamous ex-boyfriend, 20, sources confirm to Us Weekly.”


"But while their friendship may be struggling, a friend of Swift's insists that the country artist has become a pop singer and will always support her."
"Recently, she was found to be in contact with Sarah Helan of the modern family, Haley Stanfield of gengreit, Victoria's Secret model Carly Klaus, and even Lord of New Zealand, Gomez's enemy."
"Swift has a lot of good friends to spend together."
"After Selena took action, Taylor began to alienate herself," a source told us
She believes Gomez "took advantage" of her brief relationship with ED Sheeran, a friend of the Grammy winner, in June last year, making her prison break sweetheart jealous
"But Gomez's rekindling of Jenna's flame is not the only thing that's irritating."
Two days later, the "come and get it" singer accompanied Bieber's family to the Sxsw Music Festival, where he sang her hit song "as long as you love me"
The "boyfriend" singer gave her ex boyfriend $10000 in flowers and flew from Miami to McCullen, Texas, on March 7 to see her
Swift, disgusted by the reunion, tweeted last July that Gomez was "my closest sister ever" and then cut off her best friend
According to us weekly sources, the 24-year-old "red" singer has distanced herself from her former best friend Selena Gomez because the Disney star has reestablished a relationship with her infamous 20-year-old ex boyfriend



Number  246
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
““Now that Brad is back to work and the daily grind of filming on set, he misses coming home to his family.”
“Brad Pitt is returning to work in the wake of his split with Angelina Jolie but our insider says he’s missing seeing his 6 kids terribly!”
“Here’s the details!”
“Although it’s been less than a year since Angelina Jolie, 42, filed for divorce from Brad Pitt, 53, it feels like a lifetime!”
“Seriously, watching this picture-perfect family devolve into scandal after scandal has been the worst!”
“Now, the leading man is headed back to work for the first time since the announcement and, according to our insider, it’s a refreshing change for him!”
““Brad has begun his first really big project since his marriage fell apart last year and the new experience is bittersweet,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He is so happy to be an independent actor again, collaborating with the other actors on set and meshing with the director.”
“For many years he suffered Angelina’s constant advice, notes, and often unsolicited opinions about his work.”“Brad may miss Angelina, a little bit, but now that he is back on set, he does not miss her constant criticism,” the insider adds.”


"Let us know!"
"Now Brad is back at work, filming on set every day, and he misses the days when he went home and his family got together."
"Brad Pitt is going back to work after breaking up with Angelina Jolie, but our insiders say he's really looking forward to seeing his six children!"
"Here are the details!"
"It's less than a year since Angelina Jolie, 42, and Brad Pitt, 53, filed for divorce, but it feels like a lifetime!"
"Seriously, it's the worst thing to see this picture of the perfect family turn into scandal after scandal!"
"Now, the hero is going back to work for the first time after the announcement. According to our insiders, this is a refreshing change for him!"
"Brad started his first really big project since his marriage broke up last year, and the new experience is bittersweet," a source told reporters
"He's happy to be an independent actor again, working with other actors on the set, working with the director."
"For many years, he has been receiving Angelina's advice, comments, and often unsolicited comments on his work." "Brad may miss Angelina a little bit, but now that he's back on set, he doesn't miss her constant criticism," the source added



**Something goes wrong**
“CNN’s Cheri Mossburg and Stella Chan contributed to this report.”
“CNN has reached out to both Pitt and Jolie’s representatives for comment.”
“Democratic and Republican Presidential candidates are finishing up with the last full day of campaigning before voters head to the polls tomorrow.”
“(Photo by Joe Raedle/Getty Images)The gate-keeper - Huma Abedin has worn many hats for Hillary Clinton - intern, "body woman," chief of staff - but the title that best describes her is gate keeper and confidant.”
“No one without the last name Clinton is said to have a tighter relationship with the former secretary of state.”
“Although her formal title in the 2016 campaign is not yet clear, she remains one of Clinton's most trusted personal aides.”
“Studio assistants Alex Cameron and Olivia Steen move apart the wax figures of Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie at Madame Tussauds London following the news of their divorce on Wednesday September 21, 2016.”
“LOS ANGELES, CA - NOVEMBER 05: Actress/director Angelina Jolie Pitt (L) and husband actor Brad Pitt arrive at the AFI FEST 2015 presented by Audi opening night gala premiere of Universal Pictures' "By The Sea" at the Chinese Theatre on November 5, 2015 in Los Angeles, California.”
“(Photo by Kevin Winter/Getty Images)LOS ANGELES, CA - JANUARY 29: (L-R) Actor Brad Pitt (L) and actress Angelina Jolie arrive at the 18th Annual Screen Actors Guild Awards at The Shrine Auditorium on January 29, 2012 in Los Angeles, California.”
“(Photo by Jason Merritt/Getty Images)Actors Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt attend the World Premiere of Disney's "Maleficent" at the El Capitan Theatre in 2014 in Hollywood, California.”


"Cherie mosberg and Stella Chen of CNN contributed to this report."
"CNN has contacted representatives of Pitt and Julie for comments."
"Democratic and Republican presidential candidates will finish their last day's campaign before voters go to the polling station tomorrow."
(Photo by Joe raedle / Getty Images) doorman huma Abedin, who once wore many hats for Hillary Clinton, is the office director's "body woman", but her title can best be described as doorman and confidant
"No one named Clinton is said to be closer to the former Secretary of state."
"Although her official title in the 2016 campaign is unclear, she is still one of Clinton's most trusted personal assistants."
Studio assistants Alex Cameron and Olivia sting separate their wax figures at Madame Tussauds in London on Wednesday, September 21, 2016, after news of Brad Pitt's divorce from Angelina Jolie
"November 5, Los Angeles, California: Actress / Director Angelina Jolie Pitt (left) and husband actor Brad Pitt attended the AFI Film Festival 2015, the premiere of Audi Universal Pictures' seaside at the Chinese Theater in Los Angeles, California on November 5, 2015."
(Kevin winter / Getty pictures) Los Angeles, California - January 29: (left right) actor Brad Pitt (left) and actress Angelina Jolie arrive at the Shrine Auditorium for the 18th annual guild of actors awards in Los Angeles, California January 29, 2012
(Jason Merritt / Getty Images) in 2014, actors Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt attended the world premiere of Disney's maleficent at the El Capitan theatre in Hollywood, California



Number  248
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'There’s no doubt she has plenty of insight about the religion and how it affected her marriage to Tom and her children,' a source told InTouch Weekly in December.”
“Country musician Keith has made no secret of how instrumental Nicole was to him kicking his drug addiction, telling Woman's Day that his wife 'saved' him by staging an intervention in 2006, just months after their nuptials.”
“And Nicole Kidman, 49, is now rumoured to be lifting the lid on her well-guarded private life by penning a 'tell-all autobiography'.”
“According to Woman's Day, the Lion actress could earn up to $11 million in sales after releasing the supposed memoir.”
“Scroll down for videoWill she finally open up?”
“Nicole Kidman, 49, is rumoured to be lifting the lid on her well-guarded private life by penning a 'tell-all autobiography'Fans would be especially interested in learning more about Nicole's 2001 divorce from Tom Cruise, an avid Scientologist.”
“'Even now, Nicole is still haunted by how things came to such a nasty end,' a Woman's Day insider revealed.”
“'But she's worked through things in therapy, and I believe telling her side of the story would be even more healing.'”
“Will she give the inside scoop?”
“Fans would be especially interested in learning more about Nicole s 2001 divorce from Tom Cruise an avid Scientologist I ve chosen not to speak publicly Previously Nicole has made a point of keeping her experiences with the Church of Scientology a secret Previously Nicole has made a point of...”


"There is no doubt that she has deep insights into religion and how it affects her marriage to Tom and her children," a source told touch weekly in December
Country musician Keith made no secret of Nicole's role in his drug addiction. He told women's day that in 2006, just a few months after their marriage, his wife intervened and saved his life
Nicole Kidman, 49, is now rumored to unveil her guarded private life by writing a popular autobiography
"According to women's day, the lion actress could sell as much as $11 million after she released this so-called memoir."
"Scroll down to see the video, will she finally open it?"
"It's rumored that Nicole Kidman, 49, will unveil her heavily guarded private life by writing a" tell everyone autobiography. ". Fans will be particularly interested to learn more about Nicole's divorce from Scientology enthusiast Tom Cruise in 2001. "
A women's Day insider revealed that even now, Nicole is still worried about how things come to such a bad end
"But she has gone through a lot of things in her treatment, and I believe it would be more helpful to tell her stories about this."
"Will she give me the spoon in it?"
"Fans will be particularly interested in learning more about Nicole's divorce from Tom Cruise in 2001. Tom Cruise is a fanatical Scientologist. I chose not to speak in public. Nicole has stressed that her experience in the Church of Scientology should be kept secret. Nicole once stressed that... "



Number  249
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And that's a feat for such short notice.”
“In case violence breaks, the Boston Mayor Marty Walsh made it clear he's prepared to shut down the Free Speech rally.”
“Groups of counter-protesters have gathered under a Fight Supremacy demonstration, including Antifa members, Black Lives Matter activists, and anti-racists across the board.”
“But what does Fight Supremacy want, and what are their goals of the counter-protest?”
“Well, for starters, the Facebook page for the Fight Supremacy counter-protest has over 14,000 marked as attending.”
“So, in this case, gathering a crowd isn't an issue.”
“As for the protest's objective, organizers shared a handful of clear intentions on the page.”
“Understandably, one of the main intentions is to combat any possible repeat of the white supremacist violence in Charlottesville by organizing a coalition to march against the hate groups.”
“There can be safety, or at least, solidarity in greater numbers.”
“"As we have seen with the events in Charlottesville and around the country, white nationalists are emboldened by the current political administration and growing police state.”


"For such a short notice, it's a feat."
"In case of violence, Boston mayor Marty Walsh made it clear that he was ready to close the free speech rally."
"Opposition groups gathered in a fight first demonstration, including anti French members, black life activists and all-round anti racists."
"But what do they want to fight against hegemony, and what are their objectives?"
"Well, first of all, on the fight first anti protest page on Facebook, more than 14000 people were marked as present."
"So, in this case, gathering people is not a problem."
"As for the purpose of the protest, the organizers have several clear intentions on the page."
"It is understandable that one of the main intentions is to fight against any white supremacist violence that may repeat itself in Charlottesville by organizing a coalition march against hate groups."
"There can be a sense of security, or at least more people united."
"As we have seen in Charlottesville and across the country, white nationalists are inspired by the current political governance and the growing police state."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related VideosAlso, while the president was off in Michigan, remarking, as always, on the size of the crowd at his rally, Wolf closed the night with a reminder: Flint, Michigan, still doesn’t have water.”
“...she responded.”
““Like a porn star says when she’s about to have sex with Trump, let’s get this over with,” Wolf said, opening her remarks.”
“It was the president’s second consecutive year skipping the Correspondents’ Dinner, attendance at which would require him to be able to take a joke at his own expense.”
“(The last president to miss the dinner, as CNN’s Brian Stelter pointed out on Twitter, was Ronald Reagan, in 1981—then recovering from an attempted assassination.)”
“Among the objects of her scathing one-liners were several White House officials who did attend the Correspondents’ Dinner—for, it seems, they weren’t professionally mandated to fill out the crowd at the Michigan rally—as well as reporters and broadcast journalists across the political spectrum.”
“Mike Pence, Al Franken, Megyn Kelly, Rachel Maddow, Kellyanne Conway, and Morning Joe’s Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzezinski all got a bit of a roast—but perhaps no segment of the speech was quite so noted among audiences as Wolf’s jokes about Trump’s wealth (“Mr.”
“President, I don’t think you’re very rich; you might be rich in Idaho, but in New York, you’re doing fine”) and about Sarah Huckabee Sanders, just in general.”
“Sanders was reportedly seated in Wolf’s direct line of sight, making the comments all the bolder: “I loved you as Aunt Lydia in The Handmaid’s Tale,” Wolf said to her.”
““I’m never really sure what to call Sarah Huckabee Sanders.”


Salso, when the president was on vacation in Michigan, as usual, commented on the size of the crowd at the rally, and Wolff warned at the closing ceremony that flint, Michigan, still had no water
__︹ She replied
"It's like a porn star saying, when she's going to have sex with trump, let's put an end to it," wolf said in his opening remarks
"This is the second year in a row that the president has not attended a press dinner, which requires him to be able to make a joke at his own expense."
"(the last president to miss a dinner, as CNN's Brian Stelter tweeted, was Ronald Reagan, who was recovering from an attempted assassination in 1981.)
"Among the targets of her stern sentence, several White House officials did attend the journalists' dinner, and it seems that they are not professionally authorized to fill the crowd at the Michigan rally, as well as the political spectrum of journalists and radio reporters."
"Mike burns, Al Franken, Megan Kelly, Rachel maddo, Kelly Conway, as well as Joe Scarborough and Mika Brzezinski in" Morning Joe "are all a little popular, but perhaps no speech has attracted as much attention in the audience as Wolff's jokes about Trump's wealth."
"Mr. President, I don't think you're rich; you may be rich in Idaho, but you do well in New York.") and Sarah Huckabee Sanders, in general
According to reports, Sanders was sitting in Wolff's eye, making bolder comments: "I love you, just like aunt Lydia in the maid's story," Wolff told her
"I really don't know what to call Sarah Huckabee Sanders."



**Something goes wrong**
““The tour will fall on the occasion of @InvictusSydney 2018.”However, some are concerned about instances of the Zika virus in counties they are planning to visit.”
“The palace’s official Twitter account wrote: “The Duke and Duchess of Sussex will undertake an official visit to Australia, Fiji, the Kingdom of Tonga, and New Zealand in the Autumn.”
“Kensington Palace revealed the trip will take place in the Autumn.”
“Sign up fornow for the biggest moments from morning TVMeghan Markle and Prince Harry are jetting off on a Royal Tour after getting married last month.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"This tour will be held at the time of @ invictussydney 2018." However, some people are concerned about the Zika virus incident in the county they plan to visit
"The Duchess of Sussex will pay an official visit to Australia, Fiji, the kingdom of Tonga and New Zealand in the autumn," the palace's official twitter account read
"Kensington Palace revealed that the trip will take place in the autumn."
"Sign up for the most important time of the morning now. Megan Marcel and Prince Harry will fly to the royal palace after they got married last month."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



**Something goes wrong**
“Calms DownHarriet Walter...”
“This likely presages other moves from movie productions around the world that are being impacted by the global outbreak of Covid 19 More from DeadlineDisney Halts The Falcon And The Winter Soldier Prague Shoot Over Coronavirus ConcernsDisney Pausing Production On Features Little Mermaid Home Alone Nightmare Alley More Until Coronavirus...”
“...to assemble the one hour plus amount of the film he shot over 4 1 2 weeks...”
“Sources said the cast has been told all this and it is unclear when production will begin on a film that had been slated for Christmas Day release by Disney with an international rollout January 8 They hope to keep that date Scott is jumping right into the editing room...”
“The Ridley Scott -directed 20th Century Studios period epic The Last Duel has been put on “indefinite hiatus,” days before shooting was to commence in Ireland.”
“Exclusive: Swords down!”


"Calm Harriet Walter down..."
"This may indicate other trends in film production around the world. These films are being affected by the global outbreak of covid 19 virus. More come from the death line. Disney stops shooting coronavirus in Falcon and Winter Soldier Prague. Kansens Disney stops making special Mermaid, and has more nightmarish alleys to go home until coronavirus..."
__ In order to collect more than an hour's films he shot in four to 12 weeks
"The source said that the actors have been informed of all this and it is not clear that a Disney film originally scheduled for Christmas will be released internationally on January 8. They hope to keep that date. Scott is jumping into the editing room..."
"The last duel," a 20th century film company epic directed by Ridley Scott, was put on "indefinite rest" days before filming in Ireland
"Exclusive: drop the sword!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Get the exclusive celebrity scoop on all the stars you love before any of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast Straight Shuter below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“'He's proven time and again he can't be trusted.'”
“Family Feud funnyman Steve Harvey is facing a $400 million divorce bombshell — as his wife walked out because he was getting too close to showbiz pal Kris Jenner!”
“The love rat TV host, 61, and third wife Marjorie, 53, moved from Atlanta to Los Angeles last year to launch the former stand-up comic’s self-titled talk show.”
“But according to insiders, Steve’s cozying up to the Kardashian momager during closed-door business meetings, endless phone chats and nonstop text messages has sent Marjorie over the edge.”
““There was a huge blowout fight and Marjorie walked out threatening divorce,” a source told Radar.”
“PHOTOS Steve Harvey Has Lunch With Kris Jenner s Beau Corey Gamble There s no way she was going to put up with Steve hanging around a man eater like Kris especially since he s proven time and again he can t be trusted Steve and 62 year old Kris...”
“...a two time divorcée have been buddy buddy for years...”
“They were pictured together during Paris Fashion Week in 2015.”


"Get exclusive news of all your favorite stars in front of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast below!"
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Over and over again, he has been proved untrustworthy."
"Steve Harvey is facing a $400 million divorce bomb - his wife left because she was too close to his acting friend Chris Jenner!"
"The 61 year old mouse loving TV host and his 53 year old third wife, Marjorie, moved from Atlanta to Los Angeles last year to launch the former stand up comedian's talk show of the same name."
"But according to people familiar with the matter, Marjorie was overwhelmed by Steve's coquetry of Kardashian's mother in closed business meetings, endless phone conversations and endless text messages."
"There was a heated argument and Marjorie went out and threatened a divorce," a source told radar
"Photo Steve Harvey has lunch with Chris Jenner's boyfriend Corey Gambo. She can't tolerate cannibals like Steve and Chris mixing together, especially because he has proved time and again that he can't trust Steve and Chris, 62 years old..."
__︹ Two divorcees have been good friends for many years... "
"They were photographed during Paris Fashion Week 2015."



**Something goes wrong**
“Were you surprised to learn Kim didn’t invite her surrogate to the baby shower?”
““…She’s unhappy that things aren’t going her way.”Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think there’s really birthing drama between Kim and her surrogate?”
“And now the drama seems worse than ever, as she’s reportedly not wanted inside her baby’s delivery room!”
“As Kim Kardashian, 37, has previously admitted, not carrying her third child has been super stressful for her –mainly because the star can’t stand not being “in control,” which we totally get.”
“But apparently, things are only getting MORE challenging for her, as InTouch magazine reports the selfie queen’s surrogate doesn’t want her inside the delivery room at all when she gives birth!”
““There will be major tension between them in the delivery room,” an insider told the media outlet.”
““The surrogate doesn’t even want Kim to be there at this point, but she has no other choice.”
“Everyone is fearful a fight could break out between them!” Click here to see gorgeous pics of celeb baby bumps.”
“Why all the hostility?”
“Apparently the surrogate is angry Kim didn’t invite her to the baby shower she threw last month.”


"Were you surprised to learn that Kim didn't invite her surrogate mother to the baby shower?"
__︹ She's not happy things don't go her way Tell us, Hollywood actresses - do you think there's a real childbirth drama between Kim and her surrogate mother? "
"It seems to be worse now than ever, because it's reported that she doesn't want to enter the baby's delivery room!"
"As Kim Kardashian, 37, has previously admitted, not having a third child is a huge pressure on her - mainly because the star can't stand being out of control, which we fully understand."
"But obviously, it's only going to be more challenging for her, because touch magazine reported that the surrogate mother of the self portrait queen didn't want her in the delivery room at all when she gave birth!"
"There will be a lot of tension between them in the delivery room," an insider told the media
"The surrogate doesn't even want Kim here, but she has no choice."
"Everyone is afraid of a fight between them! "Click here to see a gorgeous picture of baby star bulge."
"Why all the hostility?"
"Obviously, the surrogate mother was angry that Kim didn't invite her to the baby shower last month."



Number  255
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gwen knows he'd be the best stepdad to her kids."”
“"He's so sweet with the boys and loves teaching them new things and telling them stories.”
“"Blake's given up drinking and really bonded with Gwen's kids," the source spilled.”
“Oklahoma...”
“Kingston 11 Zuma 9 and Apollo 4 and The Honey Bee crooner has developed a close relationship with her boys 11 9 and 4 and he has been building a Hawaiian inspired dream house for Stefani and her sons in...”
“Since then, he's devoted himself to winning over Gwen and her family.”
“Shelton hooked up with Stefani after his divorce from second wife Miranda Lambert while the two were coaches on singing competition "The Voice."”
“"She realized that if she's going to spend the rest of her life with someone, she wants him to share the same values and beliefs."”
“"Religion has become very important to Gwen again," said the source.”
“Gavin Rossdale The "No Doubt" singer returned to her faith during her bitter divorce from rocker after he had an affair with the family's nanny , according to the insider.”


"Gwen knew he was the best stepfather for her child."
"He's very kind to the children. He likes to teach them new things and tell them stories."
"Black quit drinking and was really close to Gwen's children," the source said
"Oklahoma..."
"Kingston 11, Zuma 9 and Apollo 4, as well as the bee singer, have established a close relationship with her boy 11, 9 and 4. He has been building a Hawaiian dream home for Stefani and her sons..."
"Since then, he has been fighting for Gwen and her family."
Sheldon and his second wife, Miranda Lambert, got together with Stefani when they were coaches of the voice
"She realized that if she was going to spend the rest of her life with someone, she wanted them to share the same values and beliefs."
"Religion has become very important to Gwen again," the source said
Gavin Rossdale, the "no doubt" singer, has returned to his faith after divorcing a rock singer, according to people familiar with the matter



**Something goes wrong**
“"[31] The eight-page letter was widely interpreted by legal analysts as containing political rather than legal On December 18, 2019, the House of Representatives impeached Donald Trump almost entirely along party lines.”
“[30]In an October 8, 2019 letter to House Democratic leaders, the White House stated it would not cooperate with "[their] partisan and unconstitutional inquiry under these circumstances.”
“[3] Vanity Fair characterized this as a preemptive effort to lay the groundwork for a future impeachment argument.”
“Constitution".”
“...such assets would constitute high crimes and misdemeanors under the impeachment clause of the U S”
“Summary of efforts edit In December 2016 Democratic senators Elizabeth Warren Dick Durbin Chris Coons Ben Cardin and Jeff Merkley introduced a bill that would require the president of the United States to divest any assets that could raise a conflict of interest including a statement that failure to divest...”
“This inquiry resulted in Trump's second impeachment.”
“In January 2021, during Trump's final weeks in office, a renewed effort was made to remove him from office, in the wake of the Trump–Raffensperger phone call and the storming of the United States Capitol.”
“[10] This inquiry resulted in Trump's first impeachment.”
“On September 24, 2019, Speaker of the House of Representatives Nancy Pelosi announced that six committees would undertake formal impeachment inquiries after reports about controversial interactions between Trump and the country of Ukraine.”


"[31] this eight page letter is widely interpreted by legal analysts as containing political content rather than legal content. On December 18, 2019, the house of Representatives impeached Donald Trump almost entirely along the party line."
"[30] in a letter to Democratic leaders in the house of Representatives on October 8, 2019, the White House said it would not cooperate with (their) party and unconstitutional investigations in this case."
"[3] vanity fair defines this as a preemptive effort, which lays the foundation for impeachment debate in the future."
"Constitution"
__︹ According to the impeachment provisions of the United States, these assets will constitute serious crimes and misdemeanors
"In December 2016, Democratic senators Elizabeth Warren, Dick Durbin, Chris Coons, Ben Cardin and Jeff Merkley introduced a bill to require the president of the United States to divest any assets that may cause a conflict of interest, including a statement that the divestiture failed..."
"This investigation led to trump's second impeachment."
"In January 2021, in the last weeks of Trump's administration, after trump lafinsperg's phone call and the storm in the US Capitol building, a renewed effort was made to remove him from office."
"[10] this investigation led to trump's first impeachment."
"On September 24, 2019, House Speaker Nancy Pelosi announced that six committees would conduct a formal impeachment investigation after reports of controversial interactions between trump and Ukraine."



Number  257
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Shuter says she’s replaced her old group of friends with a new, more regal group, including new besties Amal Clooney and Victoria Beckham.”
““He tried to call her and the number that he has for her no longer works, or nobody is answering it.”But don’t think Meghan is lonely in her castle.”
““Her dad says he has not spoken to Meghan since just after the wedding,” Shuter reveals.”
““They don’t know how to get in touch with Meghan and she’s not getting in touch with them.”In fact, as she continues to adapt and adjust to her new royal lifestyle, Markle even seems to have cut ties to her troubled father, Thomas.”
““A lot of her old friends can’t even reach her anymore,” the source added.”
““First, they attended her wedding at their own expense, and now Meghan is a little too busy for all of them.”Shuter’s sources say the new Duchess of Sussex has completely adapted to her new lifestyle, complete with new email address and specialized British phone number.”
““Her old friends feel a little bit dumped,” a source told Shuter.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
Shute said she has replaced a group of friends with a new, more Regal group, including new friends Amar Clooney and Victoria Beckham
"He tried to call her, but the number he gave her no longer worked, or no one answered." But don't think Megan is lonely in her castle
"Her father said he never spoke to Megan after the wedding," Schutter revealed
"They don't know how to get in touch with Megan, and she doesn't get in touch with them." In fact, as Megan continues to adapt to the new royal way of life, markel even seems to have severed contact with her troubled father Thomas
"Many of her old friends can't even reach her anymore," the source added
"First of all, they went to her wedding at their own expense, and now Megan is a little too busy for everyone." Shute's sources say the new Duchess of Sussex has fully adapted to her new lifestyle, with a new email address and a dedicated UK phone number
"Her old friend feels a bit dumped," a source told Schutter



Number  258
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We Did Absolutely Nothing For Our Anniversary The couple celebrated their rocky relationship at IHOP amid West s drug scandal...”
“In a tell-all interview with Allure, Kim Kardashian admitted she and husband Kanye West did “absolutely nothing” for their anniversary, RadarOnline.com has learned!”
“The news comes amid the couple’s intense backlash over their allegedly plummeting relationship.”
““We don’t do gifts,” she said in her interview.”
““We just did absolutely nothing [for our anniversary].”
“We spent two days in Santa Barbara, and we slept.”“You know what?”
“I think we went to IHOP.”
“That’s what we did,” Kardashian, 36, added.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We didn't do anything on our anniversary. In the west drug scandal, the couple celebrated their unstable relationship at IHop... "
In an interview with temptation, Kim Kardashian admitted that she and her husband Kanye West "did nothing" on their anniversary, RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
"The news came at a time when the couple rebounded strongly because of the alleged plummeting relationship."
"We don't give gifts," she said in an interview
"We didn't do anything."
"We stayed in Santa Barbara for two days, and then we fell asleep." "Do you know?"
"I think we went to IHop."
"That's what we do," added Kardashian, 36



Number  259
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...news articles Tweets or blog posts...”
“Three months after Gossip Cop called out the untrustworthy website for its made up articles the outlet has done a 180 and now reports the couple IMDb com Inc takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above...”
“HollywoodLife has now flip-flopped on its fake news stories that falsely maintained that John Cena and his fiancee Nikki Bella were looking forward to having children and starting a family.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
__ News article, tweet or blog article... "
"Three months after the gossip police scolded the untrustworthy website for fabricating articles, the media has scored 180 points. Now it is reported that the couple IMDB com Inc does not take any responsibility for the above contents or accuracy..."
"Hollywood life now twists and turns over false news reports that falsely claim that John senna and his fiancee Nicky Bella are looking forward to having children and starting a family."



Number  260
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Blame it on her perpetual grumpiness if you will, but the girl just lacks refinement, even while in the prettiest red carpet looks.”
““They were trying things on, making suggestions to one another, and he seemed to be really having a good time,” an onlooker told People.”
“After only two months of dating FKA twigs, Pattinson is supposedly really “smitten” with the adorable British singer and appears to be seriously in love, according to People magazine.”
“After the Twilight hunk’s anguish-filled years with ex Stewart, we really think that twigs, whose real name is Tahliah Barnett, is just that much better for him.”
“Here are five reasons why we think twigs blows Stewart way out of the water, and is a far better match for the hunky actor.”
“...twigs is way friendlier.”
“The half-Jamaican, half-Spanish rising star is so much friendlier to fans both online and offline as well as to eager photographers.”
“She has a much sweeter disposition and does not make your hair stand on end when giving interviews.”
“She makes him smile.”
“Spotted on a recent shopping trip together, Pattinson and twigs were constantly smiling and laughing as they tried different outfits on.”


"If you like, it's because she's always grumpy, but this girl is just not elegant enough, even on the most beautiful red carpet."
A bystander told people: "they're trying things on, giving advice to each other, and he seems to really have a good time."
According to people magazine, Pattinson has been dating FKA twigs for only two months. It is said that he is really "fascinated" by the lovely British singer and seems to be really in love
"We really think that the twig, whose real name is Talia Barnett, would be better for this handsome Twilight guy after his miserable years with former Stuart."
"Here are five reasons why we think the twigs can blow Stewart out of the water. It's a better choice for the burly actor."
__ The branches are more friendly. "
"The half Jamaican, half Spanish starlet is very friendly to fans online and offline and enthusiastic photographers."
"She's a lot sweeter and won't give you the creeps in an interview."
"She made him laugh."
"Pattinson and Xiaozhi were found shopping together recently. When they tried to put on different clothes, they always laughed."



Number  261
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We were just two women talking.”
““I didn’t have to make this big sales pitch.”
““It really delved into a lot of issues that women are dealing with daily that we don’t often see on-screen in this way,” Witherspoon, 40, said on a recent weekday in Pasadena.”
“Beneath all that too is a sense of sisterhood when intense situations call for it.”
“But underneath the melodrama and moments of acerbic humor are women dealing with private angst, running the gamut of adultery, divorce, volatile marriages, sexual assault and the stresses of motherhood.”
“There’s even a murder mystery that stitches the story together.”
“It’s a setting that lends itself to social satire, replete with fake smiles and a heavy helping of passive aggressiveness in the battle for power and status.”
“Lies Hilary Bronwyn Gayle HBO Advertisement The drama which debuts Sunday features five women Laura Dern Shailene Woodley and Zoë Kravitz in addition to Witherspoon and Kidman as mothers of first graders in a wealthy Northern California community...”
“The issues they get into on the show are things people deal with in life and it was nice to have this framework to put these stories forward Laura Dern left Reese Witherspoon and Shailene Woodley in a scene from HBO s all star adaptation of the bestseller Big Little...”
“And it serves as a bit of an antidote to the premium network’s recent tent-pole attraction, “Westworld,” and the unusual religious drama “The Young Pope.”“Not since ‘Big Love’ have we had a drama that is this female-centric,” said Casey Bloys, HBO’s president of programming.”


"We're just two women talking."
"I don't have to do such a big promotion."
"It really delves into a lot of problems that women deal with every day, which we don't see very often on the screen," Witherspoon, 40, said on a recent working day in Pasadena
"Behind all this, there is also a strong sisterhood, when tension demands it."
"But behind the melodrama and the acrid humor are women dealing with personal anxiety, adultery, divorce, fickle marriage, sexual assault and mother's pressure."
"There's even a murder case that puts the story together."
"This is a background suitable for social satire, full of false smile, and heavy help of negative enterprising in the struggle of power and status."
"In addition to Witherspoon and Kidman, there are also five women, Laura Donne Shereen Woodley and Zoroaster krawitz, who are mothers of first-year students in a wealthy community in Northern California."
"The problems they encounter on the show are things people deal with in their lives, and it's nice to have such a framework to put forward these stories. Laura Dean has left Reese Witherspoon and Shireen Woodley in a scene of HBO's all star adaptation of the best seller big and small."
"It's kind of like an antidote to the recent tent pole show west world and the unusual religious show young Pope," said Kathy bloys, President of HBO's program division



**Something goes wrong**
“5.”
“So, when the scene played out, the actors discovered each other’s surprising abilities at the same time as the film’s audience.”
“The Place Beyond The Pines – because he doesn’t take himself too seriously.”
“2.”
“We can’t wait to see the winning duo reunited again in La La land.”
“It seems like Ryan is a true gent and didn’t take it to heart as the pair have remained firm friends and went on to work together in Gangster Squad.”
“FUN FACT: Did you know that when shooting the scene, Emma panicked during the lift and accidentally kicked Ryan in the throat?”
“Gosling’s performance as a bachelor in Crazy, Stupid, Love changes the way we view the world when he instigates the re-enactment of the famous Dirty Dancing Scene with Emma Stone.”
“Crazy, Stupid, Love – because he’s a true gent.”
“GETTY Ryan Gosling is about to star in La La Land and Blade Runner1.”


_5._
As a result, when the scene was staged, the actors and the audience discovered each other's amazing abilities at the same time
"Over there in the pine tree - because he's not serious about himself."
_2._
"We can't wait to see the winning two reunite in Laran again."
"It seems that Ryan is a real gentleman and doesn't care about it, because they have always been firm friends and continue to work together in gangs."
"Interesting fact: did you know that Emma panicked in the elevator and accidentally kicked Ryan in the throat during the filming?"
"Gosling's performance as a bachelor in crazy, stupid, love changed our view of the world because he inspired us to repeat the famous dirty dance scene with Emma stone."
"Crazy, stupid, love - because he's a real gentleman."
"Getty Ryan Gosling is going to play Los Angeles and blade 1



Number  263
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Though Becca wasn’t quite sure how to take the news at first — especially considering the fact that she and Tia are actually good friends — Tia made an appearance on a recent episode and gave Becca her blessing to keep dating Colton.”
“As previously revealed, Colton had a short-lived relationship in January with Tia Booth, who competed on The Bachelor alongside Becca.”
“Before they part ways that night, Jason decides the time has come to finally express his feelings.”
“...about their future...”
“Jason reveals to his family that even though his heart is generally pretty darn guarded he s falling for Becca really deeply really seriously like I ve never fell for anyone before For her part Becca admits that there s still a long way to go but she s hopeful...”
“After hitting up a wing-eating competition and spending some time at a hockey rink, they arrive at Jason’s family home, where Becca meets his parents, his brother and his brother-in-law.”
“It just feels like it’s all falling into place.”HOMETOWN DATE WITH JASONNext up is Jason’s hometown date in Buffalo, New York.”
“Something just feels so easy and right and natural with him.”
“I could see myself fitting in with his family for life and starting a family of our own, and that’s something really special and meaningful.”
““There’s just so much heart and love behind all of them, and that’s something that I want in my future partner’s family — and in my future family.”


"Although Becca wasn't sure how to accept the news at first - especially considering that she and TIA are actually good friends, TIA appeared on a recent show and wished Becca continued to date Colton."
"As revealed earlier, Colton had a brief relationship with TIA booth in January, who played in the singles competition with Becca."
"Before they broke up that night, Jason decided it was time to express his feelings."
__ About their future... "
"Jason revealed to his family that although his heart is generally very cautious, he really falls in love with Becca, just like I have never fallen in love with anyone. Becca admits that there is still a long way to go, but she is full of hope..."
They took part in the wing eating competition, played in the hockey field for some time, and then came to Jason's home, where Becca met his parents, brother and brother-in-law
"It feels like everything is going well." Dating Jason's hometown "the next step is to date Jason's hometown in Buffalo, New York."
"For him, some things are so simple, right and natural."
"I can see myself integrate into his family and form my own family all my life. It's really special and meaningful."
"There's so much heart and love behind them, and that's what I want in my future partner's family - and in my future family."



Number  264
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story has been updated.”
““Yes, she has hung out with a couple of guys over the last year, but it’s extremely low-key,” a source told Us.”
“But you would think her next romantic interest would still be someone whose profession matched her preferences for prestige artistry or international do-gooding: a documentary filmmaker, a human rights crusader, an Ebola doctor.”
“But no, Jolie’s choice reportedly is far more home-grown and, well, mundane in a L.A. way.”
“Jolie, the Oscar winning actress, UNHCR special envoy and occasional New York Times op-ed columnist, is dating a real estate agent.”
“That’s according to a new report in “Entertainment Tonight.”Of course, at this stage, things are still pretty new, which means “it’s not serious,” a source told ET.”
“But the so-called real estate agent, who has not been identified, reportedly has a few things going for him that would make him appealing to the glamorous 42-year-old actress and mother of six, ET said.”
“He’s handsome, a source close to the actress told ET.”
“He’s also “older-looking” and isn’t “a celebrity or high-profile” in any way, the source added.”
“These are qualities that would probably make him relatively down-to-earth — by Jolie standards — and confer on him a maturity and stability that could be comforting to her.”


"The story has been updated."
"Yes, she's been out with several men in the past year, but it's very low-key," a source told us
"But you might think that her next romantic hobby is still someone whose career matches her preference for prestigious art or international philanthropy: documentary producer, human rights fighter, doctor Ebola."
"But no, it's reported that Julie's choice is more like a native, and, well, from the perspective of Los Angeles, it's very ordinary."
Julie, Oscar winner, special envoy of the UN refugee agency and columnist for the New York Times, is dating a real estate agent
"This is according to the latest report from entertainment tonight. Of course, at this stage, things are quite new, which means "it's not serious," a source told et
The unidentified so-called real estate agent is reported to have several things to do, which will make him attractive to the 42 year old glamorous actress and the mother of six children
"He's very handsome," a source close to the actress told et
The source also said that he is "old-looking" and is not "celebrity or high-profile" in any way
"According to Julie's standards, these qualities may make him relatively down-to-earth and give him a mature and stable character, which is a comfort to her."



Number  265
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Except, you know, with no bets for a little while.”
“That might be a little hyperbolic, and lacking in knowledge of how Hollywood business deals usually work, but it’s easy to see why Glynn is excited.”
“Coral bookmakers in the U.K. had to suspend betting on the actor, The Guardian reports, after a huge bet launched the actor’s perceived chances from 2-1 to 1-2.”
“Similarly, the Ireland-based independent bookmaker BoyleSports announced Sunday in a press release that they’d also been forced to suspend betting after Hiddleston’s support skyrocketed.”
“It seems, regardless of what anyone claims, the world is really trying to will this casting decision into existence—and really, who can blame anyone for trying?”
“According to BoyleSports s release Hiddleston was the 6 4 favorite for them before the whirlwind of bets including one four figure online bet from the U K Hiddleston was his nearest rival at 5 2 followed by Idris Elba...”
“...and Damian Lewis who were tied at 5 1”
““Judging by the gamble on Tom Hiddleston we expect that it’s only a matter of days before he is announced as Daniel Craig’s replacement,” BoyleSports representative Liam Glynn said in the press release.”
“Hiddleston speculation—and betting—has been on the rise at least since March.”
“Basically, right back where they started—waiting to find out whether or not Daniel Craig is actually done with the role, and brainstorming all of his enticing potential replacements.”


"Except, you know, no bets for the time being."
"It may be a bit of an exaggeration, and I don't know how Hollywood business deals usually work, but it's easy to understand why green is excited."
British coral gamblers had to suspend their bets on the actor after a big bet, the Guardian reported.
Similarly, boylesports, an Irish based independent gaming company, announced in a news release on Sunday that it had been forced to suspend its bets after the approval ratings of hiddleston soared
"It seems that no matter what people say, the world is really trying to make this decision come true. Really, who can blame anyone for trying?"
"According to boylesports data, hiddleston is their favorite 64 place gambler, and before the whirlwind, including a 4-digit online bet from the UK, hiddleston was his closest opponent, ranking 52nd, followed by Idris Elba..."
__ 1 draw with Damian Lewis
Boyle sports representative Liam Greene said in a press release: "judging from the gamble on Tom sidleston, we expect that it will only take a few days for him to be announced to succeed Daniel Craig."
"Speculation and gambling in sidleston have been on the rise since at least March."
"Basically, just as they started to wait, did Daniel Craig really complete the role and brainstorm all his attractive potential substitutes?"



**Something goes wrong**
“WATCH: Gwen Stefani Calls Boyfriend Blake Shelton the ‘Perfect’ Sexiest Man Alive...”
“And even if Shelton is not this year’s pick, Stefani said: “I still score.”Image zoom Credit: Kevin Mazur/BBMA2017/GettyAnd they’ve been inseparable ever since.”
“I already had scored but now I really scored,” she continued.”
“Wow, I’m gonna look really good huh?”
““Wow, I knew I was on to something.”
“Oh my God, well they got that right!” Stefani told Access Hollywood.”
““What?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When asked earlier Tuesday about the rumors speculating if her boyfriend of two years has been named PEOPLE’s Sexiest Man Alive, the mother of three, 48, gushed about her man.”
“Stefani and Shelton have been hot and heavy since they began dating in November 2015Gwen Stefani Is Convinced Blake Shelton Is PEOPLE's Sexiest Man Alive: 'I Really Scored'Gwen Stefani feels like the luckiest girl to be dating Blake Shelton.”


"Observation: Gwen Stephanie calls her boyfriend Blake Sheldon the sexiest man in the world..."
"Even if Sheldon is not the best choice for this year, Stefani said," I still score. "Thanks to image zooming: Kevin Mazu / bbma2017 / gettyan, they've been inseparable ever since."
"I've scored, but now I do," she continued
"Wow, I'll look good, won't I?"
"Wow, I knew what I found."
"My God, they're right! "Stefani told the Hollywood channel."
"What?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Earlier on Tuesday, when asked if her two-year-old boyfriend was rated" the sexiest man, "the 48 year old mother of three talked about her man
"Stefani and Sheldon have been sexy and heavy since they started dating in November 2015. Stefani is convinced that black Sheldon is the sexiest man in people's minds: "I really scored." Gwen Stefani thinks dating black Sheldon is the luckiest girl



Number  267
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For now, though, it seems like he and Stefani are content to take things slow.”
“Kevin Winter/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesEventually, that blossomed into a romance.”
“So, it's time to set the record straight: Are Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton engaged?”
“It's far from the first time such reports have circulated, and when the couple has shut down gossip in the past, they've made clear they're in no rush to tie the knot.”
“"Everything's crazy right now so no, absolutely not," Stefani said in June 2016 during 94.7 Fresh FM's The Tommy Show last summer when asked if she was engaged.”
“"Can you imagine the amount of gossipy, weird stories people make up?”
“To me, it makes me laugh every day.”
“I actually do Google my name just so I can see the next one that's gonna happen, because it's gotten so out of control."”
“That may have been a while ago, but there's been no comment to the contrary from the couple in regards to engagement and marriage.”
“Both Shelton and Stefani have been married before.”


"But for now, he and Stefani are content to take their time."
"Kevin winter / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images in the 1970s, it became a romance."
"So it's time to clear up: is Gwen Stephanie engaged to Blake Sheldon?"
"This is far from the first time such reports have been circulated. When the couple closed the scandal in the past, they made it clear that they were not in a hurry to get married."
"It's all crazy now, so no, absolutely not," Stefani said when asked if she was engaged on 94.7 fresh FM's "Tommy show" last summer in June 2016
"Can you imagine how many rumors and weird stories people have made up?"
"For me, it makes me laugh every day."
"In fact, I Google my name just to see what's going to happen next, because it's out of control."
"That may have been a long time ago, but the couple didn't comment to the contrary on engagement and marriage."
"Sheldon and Stephanie have been married before."



Number  268
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for more news and updates!”
“After all, Celeb Dirty Laundry is known to be a spreader of baseless rumors.”
“However, recent reports are claiming that former boyfriend of Kristen Stewart is hooking up with American singer Katy Perry.”
“Is the ‘Twilight’ actor cheating on his fiancée?”
“Gossip Cop was quick to debunk the claims saying that Robert Pattinson is hooking up with Katy Perry.”
“The publication claimed that the former boyfriend of Kristen Stewart is not seeing the “Roar” singer behind the back of FKA Twigs.”
“TMZ previously claimed that Pattinson and Perry were spotted getting flirty with each other at the Sunset Tower Hotel.”
“According to the news outlet, the former partners of Kristen Stewart and Orlando Bloom were eating with a number of friends but they later separated with the crowd later that night.”
“Speculations have it that Robert Pattinson and Katy Perry started secretly seeing each other following the latter’s split with the “Pirates of the Caribbean” actor.”
“This, according to TMZ, is amid the reports that the “New Moon” star is affianced to FKA Twigs.”


"Please continue to pay attention to more news and updates!"
"After all, celebrity dirty clothes are well known to spread unfounded rumors."
However, it has recently been reported that Kristen Stewart's ex boyfriend has an affair with American singer Katie Perry
"Are the twilight actors cheating on his fiancee?"
"The scandal police quickly debunked Robert Pattinson's collusion with Katie Perry."
The magazine claims that Kristen Stewart's ex boyfriend did not see the "roar" singer hiding behind FKA twigs
"TMZ previously claimed that Pattinson and Perry were found flirting with each other at the Sunset Tower Hotel."
"According to the news media, Kristen Stewart and Orlando Bloom's former partner were having dinner with some friends, but they were separated from the crowd later that night."
It is speculated that Robert Pattinson and Katie Perry began a secret date after the latter broke up with the Pirates of the Caribbean hero
According to TMZ, this is due to reports that the "Crescent" star is connected to the branch of FKA



Number  269
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Eugene Mirman (@EugeneMirman) May 4, 2017”
“...on Twitter right now, cheering the #AHCA being passed.”
“So far, her silence is deafening.”
“Inquiring minds want to know, and #GA06 voters deserve to know, where @KarenHandel stands on #Trumpcare.”
“See how Hollywood reacted on social media to the passing of the health care bill below.”
“America Ferrera, Sarah Hyland, Mark Ruffalo and George Takei took to Twitter to express their views.”
“The hashtag #IAmAPreexistingCondition became a trending topic quickly after the bill was passed.”
“"If your baby is going to die, and it doesn't have to, it should not matter how much money you make," he said while tearing up during his monologue on his show Monday night.”
“In a viral video, Jimmy Kimmel expressed his views on equal healthcare for those with pre-existing conditions such as his newborn son.”
“The bill will also block federal payments to Planned Parenthood for a year and allows states to get waivers to free insurers from coverage requirements, which could cause them to charge people with pre-existing illnesses higher rates than they charge healthy customers.”


"- Eugene Mirman (@ Eugene Mirman) May 4, 2017"
__ Now on twitter, cheer for the adoption of ahca. "
"So far, her silence has been deafening."
"Curious people want to know that ga06 voters should know, @ Karen Handel's position in trump."
"Look at Hollywood's reaction on social media to the health care bill that's going to be passed next."
"Ferreira, Sara Herland, mark rufaro and George tarkey of the United States have expressed their views on twitter."
"After the passage of the bill, the label" iamapreexisting condition "quickly became a hot topic."
"If your child is going to die and doesn't have to die, it doesn't matter how much money you make," he cried on Monday night's show
"In a viral video, Jimmy Kimmel expresses his views on equal health care for people with congenital diseases, such as his newborn son."
"The bill will also prohibit the federal government from paying family planning fees for a year, and allow states to exempt insurance companies from insurance requirements, which may result in insurance companies charging more for people with previous illnesses than for healthy customers."



Number  270
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the videos of Kardashian’s interview below!”
“No word yet whether Kardashian will take DeGeneres up on the invitation.”
“At that point, we’re told, the talk show host offered to host the entire Kardashian family for a one-hour birthday party.”
“...that the rapper s 40th birthday is on June 8 and she s still struggling with what she should do to mark his milestone...”
“Kardashian also discussed life with her kids following the frightening ordeal in Paris and said her 1 and a half year old son Saint is her 10 which the audience member understood to mean is a perfect baby And after DeGeneres asked about West and his well being Kardashian noted...”
“Now, I have several, just for me to be able to sleep at night.” The reality star fully believed she was going to die, and now she no longer cares about possessions and materialistic items.”
“If you think about it, yeah, I should have had a security guard outside my door 24/7 when I’m traveling and I didn’t.”
“I never thought that I needed security staying outside my door, even though I had a lot of jewelry.”
“Kardashian continued, “My whole life as changed as far as how I travel and security.”
“I’m such a different person,” she shared.”


"Watch the video of Kardashian's interview!"
"It is not known whether Kardashian will accept the invitation from DeGeneres."
"At that time, we were told that the talk show host offered to hold an hour's birthday party for Kardashian's family."
__ Rap singer's 40th birthday is on June 8, and she is still working hard to commemorate his milestone. "
"Kardashian also discussed with her children about her life after the terrible ordeal in Paris. She said that her 1.5-year-old son saint is her 10-year-old son. The audience understood that he meant a perfect baby. After DeGeneres asked about West and his happiness, Kardashian said
"Now, I have a few, just to sleep at night." Reality TV star completely believes that she's going to die, and now she doesn't care about property and material things any more
"If you think about it, yes, I should have a 24 / 7 security guard outside when I travel, and I don't have one."
"It never occurred to me that I needed security outside, even though I had a lot of jewelry."
"My whole life has changed, my way of traveling and my sense of security have changed," Kardashian added
"I'm a totally different person," she said



Number  271
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be a good dad and a good boyfriend so we can talk about you as a basketball player agai...”
“Get your act together, big man.”
“There's your season ticket problem solved right there.”
“Maybe Khloe will fill up the arena with her off-duty cops?”
“I’m still mad at Tristan Thompson — Kaitlyn Elliott Davis (@kaitndavis) June 26, 2018We're not so sure that those seats will fill up just to watch Tristan score almost six points in 20 minutes of play.”
“Cavs fans, you have to hope that Khloe and TT figure it out sooner rather than later, because this is just ridiculous.”
“An expensive way, too, at a reported $1,000-plus per day.”
“Details on Khloe Kardashian Spending $1000s a Day to Hire Off Duty Cops Following Tristan Thompson Around So He Doesn’t Cheat With The Thotourage™ https://t.co/ct5qpYJdDx pic.twitter.com/UuibZ4ET7D — Robert Littal (@BSO) July 2, 2018That's certainly one way to try and save a relationship.”
“It's going to be hard for him to put in the work this offseason and focus on basketball, however, girlfriend Khloe Kardashian has reportedly hired a team of off-duty cops to follow Tristan around to make sure he doesn't cheat on her again.”
“As sad as that sounds.”


"Be a good dad and a good boyfriend, so we can talk about you as a basketball player again..."
"Cheer up, big man."
"Your season ticket problem is solved."
"Maybe Khloe will fill the arena with her off duty police?"
"I'm still angry with Kaitlyn Elliott Davis. On June 26, 2018, we're not sure if those seats will be full, just to watch Tristan score almost six points in the 20 minutes."
"Cavaliers fans, you have to hope Chloe and TT solve this problem as soon as possible, because it's ridiculous."
"It's also an expensive way, and it's reported to cost an extra $1000 a day."
"Details of Kardashian paying off-duty police $1000 a day to track Tristan Thompson so he doesn't cheat with turaji _  https://t.co/ct5qpYJdDxpic.twitter.com/UuibZ4ET7D- Robert litar (@ BSO) July 2, 2018, which is undoubtedly a way to save a relationship. "
"This off-season, it's hard for him to get into work and focus on basketball, however, it's reported that his girlfriend, Khloe Kardashian, hired a team of off-duty police to track Tristan to make sure that Tristan won't cheat her again."
"It sounds sad."



Number  272
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are parents to daughter Suri, 12.”
“Following his split from the Grace of Monaco star, Cruise went on to wed Katie Holmes in 2006 but the duo famously divorced in 2012.”
“Nicole Kidman opened up about the miscarriages she suffered during her marriage to Tom Cruise in a candid new interview.”
“The Big Little Lies star, 50, understandably felt “massive grief” upon miscarrying at 23 shortly after her 1990 wedding to Cruise due to an ectopic pregnancy, a condition in which the embryo begins developing in the fallopian tube rather than in the womb.”
““There’s a huge, aching yearning.”
“I know the yearning,” Kidman told Talter magazine while covering their July 2018 issue.”
““And the loss!”
“The loss of a miscarriage is not talked about enough.”
“That’s massive grief to women.”Although the Oscar winner and the Mission Impossible actor, 55, tried to conceive again, she lost the child around the time he filed for divorce in 2001.”
“Kidman previously reflected on the miscarriages in a November 2007 interview with Marie Claire.”


"They are the parents of their 12-year-old daughter Suri."
After breaking up with Monaco star grace, cruise married Katie Holmes in 2006, but they divorced in 2012
"Nicole Kidman revealed in a frank new interview the miscarriage she had when she married Tom Cruise."
The 50 year old "big lie" star miscarried at the age of 23, shortly after her marriage to cruise in 1990, when she was understandably saddened by an ectopic pregnancy (the embryo began to develop in the fallopian tube rather than in the womb)
"There is a great and painful desire."
"I know the desire," Kidman told talt magazine in its July 2018 issue
"And the loss!"
"The loss of abortion is not enough."
"It's a great grief for women." Although the 55 year old Oscar winner and "mission impossible" hero tried to get pregnant again, she lost her child when he filed for divorce in 2001
"Kidman reflected on abortion in an interview with Mary Claire in November 2007."



Number  273
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...friends and it doesn t seem to matter whether or not they re taken...”
“He told Miley she better tell Nick to back off The magazine s questionable insider further contends Nick recently decided he really wants to find a girlfriend and settle down adding He is reaching out to old flames and old...”
“A so-called “source” tells the outlet, “[Nick] has been sending Miley friendly texts for weeks, and Liam is furious.”
“We’re told it’s “false.”According to Life & Style, Jonas has been regularly texting Cyrus, and “it isn’t sitting well” with Hemsworth.”
“Gossip Cop can debunk this claim.”
“Liam Hemsworth is NOT “livid” about Miley Cyrus and Nick Jonas texting one another, despite a new report.”


__︹ Friends, it doesn't seem to matter whether they are taken away or not... "
"He told Miley that she'd better tell Nick to give up the suspicious inside story of the magazine and further argued that Nick recently decided that he really wanted to find a girlfriend and settle down, adding that he was in contact with the old flame and the old
A so-called "source" told the media, "Liam is angry that" (Nick) has sent Miley friendly text messages for weeks. "
"We're told it's fake." Jonas often texted Cyrus and "didn't sit well" with Hemsworth, according to life and fashion magazine
"The gossip police can debunk this statement."
Despite new reports, Liam Hemsworth wasn't "angry" about Miley Cyrus and Nick Jonas texting each other



Number  274
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Should they become more than friends, no doubt everybody will know all the details sooner or later, but for now, Pitt appears to be adjusting well to life after his split with Angelina Jolie.”
“While it’s more fun to spin tales of exciting romance for Brad Pitt, it looks like, for now, he and Neri Oxman remain friends and have no plans to go home to meet the actor’s family and attend a wedding this summer.”
“Jeffries didn’t really explain much about how the weatherman returned, despite being fired, aside from briefly mentioning it.”
“The surprise cameo on the show last week was Pitt’s first since last summer.”
“Although he heard the words “you’re fired” last time he appeared, Pitt somehow made it back to the show as the always dreary weatherman that everybody loves to hate.”
“As for something Pitt really did do, he recently made a surprise appearance on the Jim Jeffries Show on Comedy Central, according to a People report.”
“Don’t look for it to happen anytime soon either, because these two exes aren’t in any type of regular contact and they haven’t seen each other in a while.”
“As for a Pitt-Aniston reunion?”
“The supposed family wedding doesn’t even exist.”
“In fact, they share a friendship and nothing more, according to Pitt’s representative.”


"If they're not just friends, there's no doubt that everyone will know all the details sooner or later, but for now, Pete seems to be adapting well to the life after breaking up with Angelina Jolie."
"Although it's more interesting to make up exciting romantic stories for Brad Pitt, it seems that he and nery Oxman are still friends, and there are no plans to go home to see the actor's family and attend the wedding this summer."
"Jefferies didn't really explain much about how the weatherman came back, although he was fired," he said
"Last week's unexpected guest show was Pete's first since last summer."
Although Peter heard the sentence "you're fired" when he last appeared, he came back to the show as a dull weather forecaster, and everyone loved and hated him
According to people magazine, Pete recently made a surprise appearance on Jim Jefferies at the comedy center
"Don't expect it to happen soon, because the two ex boyfriends don't have any regular contact. They haven't seen each other for a while."
"As for Pete Aniston's party?"
"There's no such thing as a family wedding."
"In fact, according to Peter's representative, they have a common friendship, that's all."



Number  275
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...actress to develop a relationship with the actor...”
“If we had anything to do with his service we had to be seen by a dentist and undergo a full dental program As for the reported audition process for actresses to date Cruise Vanity Fair reported in 2012 that the organization selected Nazanin Boniadi an Iranian born London raised...”
“At that point, “the cool-headed ingénue politely excused herself,” the magazine said.”
““After two hours of proselytizing, Cruise opened a door to reveal a second room full of upper-level Scientologists who had been waiting to dine with the pair,” RadarMagazine.com reported.”
“Today.com, citing a report from RadarMagazine.com, said Cruise invited Johannson to the Scientology center where he showed her literature about joining his controversial self-styled religious organization.”
““I wanted to work with Woody so, unfortunately, that was a casualty, I guess.”But another report from 2005 suggests that there were other conflicts as well, and they had to do with Cruise’s personal interests in Johannson.”
“She wanted to work with Woody Allen on his 2006 film “Scoop,” after working with Allen on his critically acclaimed “Match Point.”“When you have a big production like (“Mission: Impossible”), they can’t move stuff around that easily,” she said in an interview.”
“Film industry reports from 2005 also questioned why Johansson had been dropped from co-starring with Cruise in “Mission: Impossible III.”The actress told the media at the time that she had been attached to Cruise’s film, but said “scheduling conflicts” came up.”
“The story said that Cruise had attempted to entice several of beautiful, well-known women to accept his devotion to Scientology — and Johansson was one of them.”
“Only a man aka Brendan Tighe would come up with a crazy story like that.”But the 2012 Vanity Fair report confirms the essence of Tighe’s assertion.”


__ Actresses develop relationships with actors. "
"If we have anything to do with his services, we have to go to the dentist and accept a full dental plan, because cruise Vanity Fair reported so far in 2012 that it chose Nazanin boniadi, who was born in Iran and grew up in London..."
"At that moment," said the magazine, "the cool headed ina politely defended herself
"After two hours of preaching, cruise opened a door and found that the second room was full of upper class Scientologists who had been waiting to eat with them." RadarMagazine.com It has been reported. "
"Today. Com, quoted RadarMagazine.com He said cruise invited Johnson to the Scientology center, where he showed her literature about joining his controversial self styled religious organization
"I want to work with woody, so, unfortunately, I think it's a victim." But another report in 2005 showed that there were other conflicts related to cruise's personal interests in Johnson
She wanted to work with Woody Allen on the 2006 film "exclusive," which she had previously worked with Allen on the acclaimed "match point.". "When you have a big work like mission: impossible, they can't move things that easily," she said in an interview
"The film industry report in 2005 also questioned why Johnson co starred with cruise in Mission: impossible III. at that time, the actress told the media that she was very interested in Cruise's films, but she said there was a" schedule conflict. "
"The story says that cruise is trying to entice some beautiful, famous women to accept his loyalty to Scientology, and Johnson is one of them."
"Only a Brendan Tisch can come up with such a crazy story." But the 2012 vanity fair report confirmed the nature of Tisch's claim



Number  276
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It warms my heart to see how happy Meghan and Harry look, and it is sincere…a very pure kind of love.”The stunning revelations come days after the Duke and Duchess of Sussex wed in a stunning £32million Windsor Castle wedding in front of billions worldwide.”
“(Image: KEVIN LAW)“Their children will be very close with Will and Kate’s children, and I see them doing many play dates and activities together.”
“I see at least one girl for them.”
““Meghan will be a wonderful mother… another child may follow in a few years.”
“She told the twins: “I feel there may be a pregnancy fairly soon, before the year 2020, and both of them will be wonderful parents.”
“Now, in their latest conversation with Diana from beyond the grave, the Princess appears to have revealed when the new Duke and Duchess of Sussex will have children.”
“(Image: PA)The twins also correctly predicted each of Prince William and Kate Middleton’s children in 2011 during a TV appearance on Sunrise Australia.”
“They told us that Diana would attend the Windsor Castle wedding and appear as a butterfly, then during the ceremony a fly was captured on video hitting Meghan’s face.”
“The stunning revelations come from Terry and Linda Jamison, dubbed “Nostradamus in Stilettos”, whose astonishing Royal Wedding prediction appeared to come true last weekend.”
“And they say Diana reveals the second will follow “in a few years” – even going as far as revealing that one of them will be a girl.”


"My heart warms to see how happy Megan and Harry look. It's sincere A very pure love. " A few days ago, the Duke and Duchess of Sussex held a 32 million pound Windsor Castle wedding in front of billions of people around the world. The shocking news came to light
(photo: Kevin law) "their children will be very close to will and Kate's children. I see them doing a lot of games, dating and activities together."
"I saw at least one girl for them."
"Megan will be a wonderful mother There may be another child in a few years
"I think we're going to be pregnant soon, and they'll both be good parents by 2020," she told the twins
"Now, in a recent conversation with Diana, the princess seems to have revealed when the Duke and Duchess of Sussex had children."
"(photo: PA) the twins also correctly predicted each child of Prince William and Kate Middleton on the 2011 Australian sunrise TV show."
"They told us that Diana was going to the wedding at Windsor Castle and appeared as a butterfly, and then during the wedding, a fly hit Megan in the face and was videotaped."
Terry and Linda Jameson are known as the "Nostradamus in high heels" and their amazing royal wedding predictions seemed to come true last weekend
They also said Diana revealed that her second child would be born "in a few years" - and even that one of them was a girl



Number  277
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...can get some kind of strength Watch Pattinson s full interview below...”
“And so I thought in a way to kind of stop feeding it you just try and say I don t wanna talk about it And also it kind of makes you feel like that s the only way you...”
“But then the annoying thing happens as well, then you answer in these kind of vague ways which kind of create these weird conspiracy theorists.”The star added, “I don’t know how to deal with it.”
““I don’t want to be one of those people who’s just like, ‘Oh, no comment,’ ’cause I just think you just look like an idiot if you’re in it.”
““I’m quite an open person,” he said.”
“...of a lifetime in the Twilight series despite his best efforts to keep his personal life under wraps...”
“...just exciting to have a job where you re allowed to consistently break the walls of the box around you Pattinson went on to talk about the vast amount of media attention he s received since taking on the role...”
“On breaking free from his once perceived image as a teen heartthrob the star said I think so much of life people are trying to put you in a box and define you all the time He continued It s...”
“In the interview, it was revealed Good Time producers Josh and Benny Safdie were initially hesitant to work with Pattinson, but later discovered their opinions on the actor were far from accurate.”


__ You can get some power. Look at Pattinson's full interview... "
"So I want to stop feeding it in a way, you just try to say I don't want to talk about it, and it makes you feel like it's the only way you can..."
"But the annoying things happen, and then you answer in these vague ways what makes these strange conspiracy theorists." The star added, "I don't know what to do with it."
"I don't want to be the kind of 'Oh, no comment' person, because I just think if you're in there, you look like an idiot."
"I'm a very open person," he said
__ In the Twilight series, despite his best efforts to cover up his personal life
__ I'm glad to have a job that allows you to constantly break the barriers around you. Pattinson then talked about the amount of media attention he has received since he took up this role... "
"Breaking the image that he was once regarded as a baby of teenagers, the star said," I think a lot of people in life are trying to put you in a box and define you. He has been saying that this is... "
"In the interview, it was found that good time producers Josh and Benny Saffi initially hesitated about working with Pattinson, but later found that their views on the actor were far from accurate."



Number  278
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The only family members she will listen to are her brothers, but right now she is not following anyone’s direction but her own,” the insider said.”
““Her family thinks that she may have relapsed because she has been openly advocating the use of medical marijuan a lately,” the source told Radar.”
“As fans also know, the gorgeous teen has been struggled with substance abuse issues for several years and was recently said to be sober!”
““Although she wants everyone to think she is backpacking in Paris, she is staying at a super luxe pad with all the amenities,” the insider revealed.”
“According to the insider, Paris’s net worth, which is estimated at approximately $100 million, is causing her to feel “invincible” at times!”
“And I was also dealing with my depression and my anxiety without any help,” Paris said in the interview.”
“But up to that point, I was actually crazy, I was going through a lot of, like, teen angst.”
“"I'm a completely different person.”
““There is nothing they can do to stop her right now.”Paris admitted in a recent Rolling Stones interview that she attempted suicide “multiple” times!”
“...tried so many times but she refuses the source said...”


"The only family she'll listen to is her brothers, but now she's not following anyone's instructions, she's following her own," the person said
"Her family thinks she may have relapsed because she has been publicly advocating the use of medical Mariana recently," the source told radar
"Fans also know that this beautiful teenager has been fighting against drug abuse for several years, and recently someone said that he is very sober!"
"While she wants everyone to think she's backpacking in Paris, she lives in a super luxury apartment with all the amenities," the person familiar with the matter said
According to people familiar with the matter, the estimated net asset value of Paris is about $100 million, which makes her feel "invincible" from time to time
"I'm also dealing with my depression and anxiety without help," Paris said in an interview
"But by then, I was really crazy. I had a lot of experiences, like adolescent anxiety."
"I'm a totally different person."
Paris admitted in a recent interview with the rolling stones that she had attempted suicide "many times!"
__ She tried many times, but she refused. The source said



Number  279
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Only time will tell if these friends with so much history can make it work despite the bad blood.”
“Since then, the pair have taken their relationship public as they’ve been spotted going on dinner dates and grabbing coffee.”
“It sure looks that way!”
“Sources exclusively told In Touch that the longtime pals are no longer close because Matt isn’t too fond of Ben’s girlfriend, Lindsay Shookus.”
““[Matt] thinks she is controlling and manipulative,” the insider claimed.”
“Aside from her less redeeming qualities, Matt also believes Lindsay is “bad news” for Ben.”
““She likes to drink and Ben [who recently went to rehab] shouldn’t be around that,” the source said.”
“Although it’s unclear when Ben and Lindsay actually started seeing each other, a source told Entertainment Tonight that things got romantic after his separation from wife, Jennifer Garner.”
“Rumors even swirled that Ben introduced Lindsay to his three kids — Violet, 12, Seraphina, 9, and Samuel, 6.”
““I support him in all of his artistic expression.”But Lindsay is no artistic expression, and Matt “can’t stand” her.”


"Only time will tell us whether these friends with such a long history can succeed in a river of blood."
"Since then, they have made their relationship public because they have been found eating, dating and drinking coffee together."
"It does look like that!"
"The exclusive source told contact magazine that because Matt didn't like Ben's girlfriend Lindsay schokus very much, the old friends were no longer close."
"[Matt] thinks she's controlling and manipulating," the source claimed
"In addition to her less redeeming qualities, Matt thinks Lindsay is' bad news' for Ben."
"She likes drinking, and Ben (who recently went to rehab) shouldn't be around here," the source said
"It's not clear when Ben and Lindsay started meeting, but a source told entertainment tonight that things became romantic after he separated from his wife, Jennifer Garner."
"There are even rumors that Ben introduced Lindsay to his three children - violet, 12, Serafina, 9, and Samuel, 6."
"I support all his artistic expression." But Lindsay is not an artistic expression. Matt can't stand her



Number  280
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Despite being some of the biggest names in Hollywood, the Kardashians were reportedly not welcome at the annual “Night Before” party at Raleigh Studios after displaying what some claimed was some pretty unacceptable behavior, according to a new Star magazine report.”
“How bad could her behavior have been to get her entire family banned from the event?”
“Yikes!”
“HollywoodLife.com has reached out for further comment.”
““Kris Jenner went years ago and got drunk and no one liked that,” the insider explained to the magazine.”
“...way with her sloppy behavior at a previous party...”
“The reality TV stars were allegedly all denied an invite to the star studded event Leonardo DiCaprio Sylvester Stalone Kerry Washington and Alicia Vikander were among those who did make the cut in case you were wondering after a source tells the outlet Kris Jenner rubbed some people the wrong...”
“Well, this certainly doesn’t look good for the brand!”
“...seem rather unfair don t you think...”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
Although the kardashians are some of the big names in Hollywood, they are not popular at the annual "Eve" party at Raleigh's studio because they show what some people claim to be quite unacceptable behavior, new star magazine reported
"How bad will her behavior make her family banned from the event?"
"Oh dear!"
"Hollywood Life" we have contacted for further comments
"Chris Jenner went there a few years ago and got drunk. No one likes it," the person familiar with the matter explained to the magazine
__ Just like her sloppy behavior at the previous party... "
"It's said that all the reality show stars have been turned down for the star event. Leonardo DiCaprio Silvestre Sloan Kerry Washington and Alicia vicander are among them, in case someone tells the media that Chris Jenner has confused some people, you will be confused..."
"Well, it's definitely not good for the brand!"
__ It seems unfair, don't you think... "



Number  281
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She wants more help from Brad.”But according to the insider, the actor is "convinced her only motivation is money and has had enough of groveling for scraps when it comes to supervised visitation.””
““Six demanding kids, a move, tons of projects in the works and so much more.”
““What’s happening here is that Angie is not in a good place right now, and she’s starting to crack," a source revealed to RadarOnline.com.”
“According to new reports, Angelina has sent out an SOS to Pitt begging him to help her as she struggles with a variety of issues, including dramatic weight loss and a public meltdown.”
“Angelina Jolie is having a tough time since her split from Brad Pitt and she’s turned to her ex for help!”


"She wants more help from Brad." But according to people familiar with the matter, the actor "is convinced that his only motive is money, and has had enough of the servile bargaining during the supervision visit."
"Six demanding kids, a move, a lot of projects in progress, and so on."
"What's happening here is that Angie is in a bad situation and she's starting to collapse," a source told reporters RadarOnline.com Website. "
"According to the latest report, Angelina has sent out a distress signal to Pitt, asking Pitt to help her solve various problems, including dramatic weight loss and public emotional breakdown."
"Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt had a hard time after they broke up. She asked her ex-wife for help!"



Number  282
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The location of a park across the road provided paps with the ideal location to snap Jen as she came and went from her home.”
“They then apparently moved into an apartment in the West Village, but it just wasn't working.”
“Jen s team have now firmly shut down the gossip...”
“My reaction to Jennifer Aniston separation news but realized both her and Brad Pitt are single pic twitter com RJj9UWxgxg Hanii HaniLee1 February 15 2018 Advertisement Rumours began to circulate that Jen had looked to Brad as a shoulder to cry on when her relationship got tough with Justin but...”
“Open my cookie preferences.”
“In order to see this embed, you must give consent to Social Media cookies.”
“Hurry up!”
“Jennifer Aniston: single ✔️Brad Pitt: single ✔️ pic.twitter.com/glMAiNSQXz — La Colo (@soyluluuu) February 16, 2018Read next The Friends reunion has already started filming, here's what we know so far... Jennifer Aniston The Friends reunion has already started filming, here's what we know so far...”
“#JenniferAnistonWhen u realize both Jennifer Aniston & Brad Pitt are now single pic.twitter.com/Y9cxfIWQyH — Sonia Grace (@soniagracemusic) February 15, 2018In order to see this embed, you must give consent to Social Media cookies.”


"The location of a park across the road provides an ideal location for dads to capture Jane as she comes in and out of the house."
"Then they obviously moved into an apartment in the West Village, but it just didn't work."
"The Jens team has now resolutely shut down the scandal..."
"My reaction to the news of Jennifer Aniston's breakup is that I realize that she and Brad Pitt are both single. On February 15, 2018, the advertising rumors on twitter website rj9uwxgxg hanii hanile1 began to spread. When the relationship between Jennifer and Justin became difficult, I used Brad as a shoulder to cry, but..."
"Turn on my cookie preferences."
To view this embed, you must agree to use social media cookies
"Hurry up!"
Jennifer Aniston: single ___ Brad Pitt: single ___  pic.twitter.com/glMAiNSQXz -Lakolo (@ soyluluu) read "reunion of friends" on February 16, 2018 and started shooting. Here is what we know now... The Party of friends of Jennifer Aniston has been filmed. Here's what we know so far... "
"# when you realize that Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt are single now pic.twitter.com/Y9cxfIWQyH -Sonia Grace (@ soniagracemusic) February 15, 2018 to view this embed, you must agree to use social media cookies. "



Number  283
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sent to boardroom: Nicole "Snooki" Polizzi, Porsha Williams, Lisa LeslieNicole "Snooki" Polizzi, Porsha Williams, Lisa Leslie Terminated: Nicole "Snooki" Polizzi—Schwarzenegger felt that Snooki was not a strong contestant and was willing to take responsibility.”
“While one video was considered great by the executives, the second video lacked production values, had no story line that could be followed, and lacked connection to the product.”
“Losing team: PrimaPrima Reasons for loss: The marketing video did not send the message that the Trident executives requested.”
“While the video lacked some professional quality, the Trident executives felt it strongly carried the message about showing off one's smile.”
“...about showing off one s smile...”
“Prima Project Manager Carnie Wilson Carnie Wilson Arete Project Manager Jon Lovitz Jon Lovitz Judges Arnold Schwarzenegger Tyra Banks Patrick Schwarzenegger Arnold Schwarzenegger Tyra Banks Patrick Schwarzenegger Winning team Arete Arete Reasons for win While the video lacked some professional quality the Trident executives felt it strongly carried the message...”
“Trident—Teams were to prepare a short advertisement, including a jingle and video, for Trident's new gum brand.”
“Task 2 Task Scope: Trident—Teams were to prepare a short advertisement, including a jingle and video, for Trident's new gum brand.”
“Even though Carrie was her assistant, she still didn't contribute as much as the other women on Team Prima.”
“The governor was proud of Porsha Williams for her leadership.”


"Send it to the conference room: Nicole" snooky "Polizzi, Posha Williams, Lisa Leslie" snooky "Polizzi, Posha Williams, Lisa Leslie terminate: Nicole" snooky "Polizzi Schwarzenegger feels that snooky is not a strong competitor and is willing to take responsibility."
"While one video is considered great by executives, the second one lacks production value, storyline to follow, and product relevance."
"Losing team: the first reason for losing: the marketing video didn't convey the message Trident executives asked for."
"Although this video lacks some professional standards, Trident executives believe that this video strongly conveys a message, that is to show their smile."
__ About showing off your smile... "
"Prima project manager carnie Wilson carnie Wilson arete project manager Jon Lovitz judge Arnold Schwarzenegger Tyra Banks Patrick Schwarzenegger Tyra Banks Patrick Schwarzenegger winning team the reason for arete arete winning although the video lacks some professional quality, Trident executives strongly feel this, with information..."
"The Trident team will prepare a short advertisement for Trident's new gum brand, including jingle and video."
Scope of task 2: Trident team will prepare a short advertisement for Trident's new chewing gum brand, including jingle and video
"Although Carrie is her assistant, her contribution to Prima's team is still inferior to that of other women."
"The governor is proud of Bertha Williams' leadership."



Number  284
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“They often go to restaurants for dinner dates, or to hang out with friends.”Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
““But this year, they have been more social together.”
“Image zoom Credit: Felipe Ramales/Splash NewsRELATED VIDEO: The Truth About Katie Holmes & ‪Jamie Foxx’s Ultra-Private Relationship: ‘They Are Both Very Happy’“After the beach pictures, they only spent time together at home and got extra careful,” the insider says.”
“When a photographer captured a rare photo of the pair together, walking hand-in-hand on a Malibu beach in September, they only became more cautious.”
“After first being seen dancing with one another in the Hamptons in 2013 — one year after the actress split from Tom Cruise following six years of marriage — Foxx, 50, and Holmes, 39, have made sure to stay out of the spotlight.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Everyone knows they are dating, but they still want to keep it private.” So they make a point to exit separately.”
““Katie and Jamie are still careful about being photographed together,” a source tells PEOPLE in this week’s issue.”
“...twice in the last two weeks, but don’t ever expect the ultra-private couple to show any PDA on their way out the door.”


"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"They often go to restaurants for dinner, date, or go out with friends." Want to keep up with the latest news from people? "
"But this year, they're more social together."
"Image zooming credit: Philippe ramales / splash news relatedvideo: the truth of Katie Holmes & Jamie Fox's super personal relationship: they are all happy." "After taking pictures of the beach, they just stay at home together, being extra careful," the person familiar with the matter said
"When a photographer took a rare picture of two people walking hand in hand on Malibu beach in September, they just became more cautious."
"In 2013, fox, 50, and Holmes, 39, were first seen dancing together in Hampton. A year ago, the actress broke up with Tom Cruise after six years of marriage. Since then, Fox and Holmes have not been in the spotlight
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Everyone knows they're dating, but they want to keep it a secret." So they decided to leave separately
"Katie and Jamie are still very careful when taking pictures together," a source said in this week's People magazine
"Twice in the past two weeks, but don't expect this extremely private couple to show any PDAs on their way out."



Number  285
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Earlier the website has also busted a lot of fake reports about the actor's personal life too.”
“Thus, it is clear that the star is neither antisocial nor developing major trust issues.”
“A few weeks ago, he was spotted hanging out with a bunch of friends in New York City as well.”
“Besides that, last week he was also joined by Robert Pattinson and The Weeknd for his own birthday party at The Highlight Room in LA.”
“Given that, the actor was recently spotted attending Drake's birthday party in Los Angeles with his pals Jamie Foxx and Tobey Maguire.”
“Gossip Cop looked over the matter and busted the website for making up false news about the Inception actor as some of the actors' close pals called the magazine's report as 'nonsense.'”
“Now he won't let any woman near him," the source further claimed.”
“"He used to be the life of the party.”
“The magazine further claimed that DiCaprio, whose name has been involved with various supermodels and even with his Titanic co-star Kate Winslet lately, is no more interested in love life as well.”
“Also read: Spielberg trailer: Leonardo DiCaprio, Liam Neeson and more pay respect to the great film maker in HBO's new documentaryAn insider told the magazine that the actor is becoming antisocial these days because he has "developed major trust issues" and is "totally paranoid."”


"Earlier, the website also cracked a lot of false reports about the personal lives of actors."
"So it's clear that stars are neither antisocial nor develop major trust issues."
"A few weeks ago, he was found in New York City with a group of friends as well."
"In addition, last week he went to his birthday party with Robert Pattinson and weekend in the highlight room in Los Angeles."
In view of this, it was recently discovered that the actor and his friends Jamie Fox and Toby Maguire attended Drake's birthday party in Los Angeles
"The scandal police censored the incident and smashed the false news made up by the website about the hero of inception, because some close friends of the actors called the magazine's report" nonsense. "
"Now he won't let any woman near him," the source further claimed
"He used to be the life of the party."
The magazine further claims that DiCaprio is no longer interested in love life, that his name has been associated with various supermodels, and even recently with his Titanic co star Kate Winslet
"Read also: Spielberg Trailer: Leonardo DiCaprio, Liam Nissen and more pay homage to this great filmmaker in HBO's new documentary." Ryan insiders told the magazine that the actor recently became antisocial because he "developed major trust issues" and "completely paranoid."



Number  286
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jen feels betrayed.”For more celebrity news, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““Instead, Justin’s been acting like a man who was just let out of prison.”
““Jen believes they both should have laid low for the first few months and given their relationship a bit of a mourning period,” the source says.”
“It’s also how quickly Justin sprang into action after their seven-year relationship ended.”
““She considers it the ultimate insult.” And it’s not just the ages of the women that bother Jen.”
“Jen, 49, “feels like he’s traded her in for a bunch of newer models,” the source says.”
“'” In recent weeks, Justin, 46, has been out with a slew of women, including Selena Gomez, 25, model Erika Cardenas, 25, photographer Petra Collins, 25, and actresses Emma Stone, 29, and Aubrey Plaza, 33.”
““She keeps seeing him out with young models and actresses and she told him, ‘Stop humiliating me!”
““Jen confronted Justin and lit into him,” says the source.”
“The exes got into a particularly nasty fight recently.”


"Jane felt betrayed." For more celebrity news, please click on the latest issue of life and fashion - for more exclusive content, please sign up for our newsletters
"On the contrary, Justin acts like a man who just got out of prison."
"Zhan thinks the two of them should keep a low profile in the first few months and give their relationship a period of mourning," the source said
"That's why Justin moved quickly after her seven-year relationship."
"She thought it was a great insult." And it's not just women's age that bothers Jen
"Jen, 49, feels like he's replaced her with a bunch of new models," the source said
"In recent weeks, Justin, 46, has been dating many women, including Selena Gomez, 25, model Erica Cardenas, 25, photographer Petra Collins, 25, actress Emma stone, 29, and Aubrey square, 33."
"She's always dating young models and actresses, and she tells him, 'don't insult me anymore!"
"Jan confronted Justin and shot him," the source said
"Ex girlfriends have been fighting so hard lately."



**Something goes wrong**
“?.’MORE : Taylor Swift’s VMAs snub leaves camp ‘fearing feuds have turned industry against her’”
“...her into hiding with TaylorSwiftIsOverParty tweeted one fan...”
“They have holidays for everybody I mean everything these days Now the stuff of legend the tweet led to Kimye fans bombarding Taylor s social media accounts with the snake emoji and the pop star ended up going radio silent for nearly a year as she worked on her epic...”
“...comeback album Reputation...”
“But Taylor has never been one to take anything lying down, and now fans believe she may have just thrown the most subtlest of epic shade as she has been pictured two years on wearing a snake-print backpack.”
“Taylor casually wore a snake-print bag (Picture: Backgrid)Tay has embraced the snake symbolism, coming back to social media after deleting years worth of content with three videos of snakes, using snake imagery on her tour merchandise and even riding a giant snake basket on the tour.”
“And now her new look has given fans life.”
“Just a casual backpack Picture Backgrid Excuse me while I scream about the fact that Taylor Swift is out in the open carrying a bag with a snakeskin print on the 2 year anniversary of the day Kimberly Kardashian called her a snake on social media and the internet sent...”
“Advertisement Advertisement taylor swift stepping out of her apartment wearing a snake backpack and the same print she wore in a segment of the lwymmd music video on national snake day and the anniversary of kim kardashian s shady tweet about her is the biggest power move i ve ever...”
“????????????”


"?. More: Taylor Swift's Vmas left the camp in the cold, and the industry began to oppose her for fear of discord
__︹ She's hiding with Tyler vivtisovati, and a fan tweeted that
"Every one of them has a holiday. I mean everything now, legendary things. This tweet caused kimye fans to bomb Taylor's social media account with snake expressions. The pop star was silent for nearly a year in the process of creating an epic..."
__ Comeback album reputation... "
"But Taylor has never been a person who refuses to lie down, and now fans believe she may have just cast the most subtle epic shadow, because she was photographed wearing a snake rucksack two years ago."
"Taylor casually wears a snake bag (photo source: backgrid), and ty has accepted the symbolic meaning of the snake. After deleting three snake videos for many years, she goes back to social media, uses the image of the snake on her travel products, and even rides a huge snake basket on the journey."
"Now her new look gives fans life."
"Just a casual backpack picture background sorry, when I screamed about the fact that Taylor Swift was carrying a snakeskin printed bag outdoors on the 2nd Anniversary Kimberly kardashan called her a snake sent on social media and the Internet..."
"Taylor Swift's advertisement for walking out of her apartment in a snake backpack and the same print she wore on national snake day and Kim Kardashian's lwymmd music video clip about her dark twitter anniversary are the biggest move of power I've ever seen..."
_????????????_



**Something goes wrong**
“(To see more of their cute moments from throughout the years, click here).”
“That August, the couple tied the knot with an intimate ceremony in their L.A. home.”
“The happy couple later showed off their engagement bling on the Daytime Emmys red carpet that same year.”
“...her talk show DeGeneres announced her plans to wed de Rossi the reveal followed the news that the California Supreme Court had struck down a law banning same sex marriage...”
“I felt weak at the knees and I was overwhelmed with how I felt but then it took me about 10 months to get the courage up to actually do anything about it FROM PEN Jada Pinkett Smith Talks Celebrating 20 Years with Will Smith In a 2008 episode of...”
“...t believe it but she turned around and it was like an arrow was shot through my heart...”
“We did talk a little bit and then over those three years we saw each other at parties or at various things but the one time that was the most significant was during a photoshoot actually She continued I just walked over to say hello to her and I couldn...”
““We actually met socially and I just felt that immediate draw,” she said.”
““Happy anniversary @theellenshow and @portiaderossi.”During an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled about falling for DeGeneres.”
“It’s still one of the most fun things I’ve ever done,” Radin wrote.”


"To learn more about their lovely moments over the years, click here."
"That August, the couple had a close wedding at their home in Los Angeles."
"The happy couple later displayed their engagement ring on the red carpet of the Emmy Awards in the daytime of the same year."
__︹ Her talk show "DeGeneres" announced her plans to marry De Rossi. After the news that the Supreme Court of California has repealed the law against same-sex marriage was announced.... "
"My knees felt weak, and I was overwhelmed by my own feelings, but it took me about 10 months to get up the nerve and find a real solution from the 2008 episode of" penjada pinkert Smith celebrating 20 years with Will Smith. "
"I can't believe it, but she turned around like an arrow through my heart..."
"We did talk a little bit, and then in those three years, we saw each other at parties or all kinds of things, but the most important one was when taking pictures. In fact, she continued, I just went over to say hello to her, I can't..."
"We actually met on social occasions, and I just felt the direct attraction," she said
"Happy Anniversary @ theEllenShow and @ portiaderossi." In an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled falling in love with DeGeneres
"It's still one of the most interesting things I've ever done," Latin wrote



Number  289
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Beckgrid Sheldon, who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015, is also fascinated by Stephanie."
"Recently they were found wandering on Carmen beach in Mexico and even met Sheldon's friend Luke Bryan."
Stefani wore a white bikini top with a black sarong and Tan sweater, while Sheldon wore a blue trucker hat to match his board shorts and button down shirt
"Although they may have been an unexpected couple when they first started dating, Sheldon and Stephanie have been gone for some time."
"Background" Gwen really loves black because of who he is and has never tried to change him or anything about him
"She even likes his style!"
__ Source tells et
"She thinks he's a very manly person and is fascinated by that."
"When they don't take romantic walks on the beach, the couple often visit Sheldon's house in Oklahoma with Stefani's three sons, as well as Gavin Rossdale, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9 and Apollo, 3."



Number  290
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, how do you feel about Jelena’s reunion?”
“Do you think she will?”
“— Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez are reportedly shopping around for a home in CA, weeks after reuniting!”
“They’re hoping for a ‘long life together,’ a new report claims!”
“Jelena seems to be on the fast track to a happily ever after!”
“Justin Bieber, 23, and Selena Gomez, 25, are looking to buy their first home together, Life & Style reports.”
““It was Selena’s idea, and Justin is all for it,” a source tells the mag.”
““He’s already looking at homes in the Calabasas, CA area.”
“They just can t wait to start their life together The mag alleges that purchasing their first home together is the beginning of what they hope will be a very long life together The source points out that the pair are completely different than they were back when their relationship...”
“...wasn t the best...”


"Holly bugs, what do you think of jellyna's reunion?"
"Do you think she will?"
"Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez are reported to be shopping around California a few weeks after their reunion!"
"They want to live a long life," a new report says
"It seems that jelina has stepped on the fast track of happy life!"
"Justin Bieber, 23, and Serena Gomez, 25, plan to buy their first home together, life and fashion report."
"It was Serena's idea and Justin was all for it," a source told the magazine
"He's already looking for a house in Calabasas, California."
"They can't wait to start their life together. The magazine claims that buying the first house together is the beginning of a long time they want to live together. The source pointed out that the couple was totally different from when they were in love.... "
__ Not the best... "



Number  291
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Mel B noted she has been at a "crisis point" and that she was recently diagnosed with PTSD.”
“But the problem has never been about sex or alcohol—it is underneath all that."”
“As her explanation continued, "Sometimes it is too hard to cope with all the emotions I feel.”
“"I am being very honest about drinking to numb my pain, but that is just a way a lot of people mask what is really going on."”
“"I've been working with a writer on my book, Brutally Honest, and it has been unbelievably traumatic reliving an emotionally abusive relationship and confronting so many massive issues in my life," she said in remarks issued to the newspaper.”
“As a result, the star has decided to enter a "proper therapy program" in the coming weeks, as she told The Sun.”
“But yeah, I address a lot of those issues [in the book] and I did kind of have to ease my pain...I do suffer a lot from PTSD."”
“I'd like to say a lot more, but we're on this show—let's keep it P.C.”
“That's all I can say about it.”
“"You know, I was with the same person for 10 years and that was quite a turmoil, very intense.”


Mel B points out that she is already at a "crisis point" and that she was recently diagnosed with post-traumatic stress disorder
"But it's never about sex or alcohol, it's under all that."
"Sometimes it's hard for me to deal with all the emotions I feel," she continued
"I'm honest to say that drinking is for pain relief, but it's just a way for many people to cover up the truth."
"I've been working with a writer to write my book, cruel honesty, which is incredibly traumatic, reliving an abusive relationship and facing many major problems in my life," she said in a comment to the paper
"As a result, the star has decided to move into an 'appropriate treatment plan' in the next few weeks," she told the sun
"But, yes, I mentioned a lot of these problems (in the book), and I had to relieve my pain I do have PTSD. "
"I want to say more, but let's keep P.C. on this show."
"That's all I can say."
"You know, I've been with the same person for 10 years, and it's quite chaotic, very intense."



Number  292
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Apart from alleging that he abused their daughter, Norma also wrote in her declaration that he was prone to “beat on the people he is in conflict with” and that he had hit her “a number of times in the past including when I was pregnant with our daughter.””
“She also claimed theactor withheld contact between her and Shayla while their daughter stayed with him.”
““After 9 years of working extremely hard to co-parent our child, I am disappointed to learn that the mother of my daughter has made gross and false accusations against my character in a shameful attempt to ruin our co-parenting efforts,” he told PEOPLE in a statement.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““There is nothing I love more in this world than my daughter and I would never do anything to harm her well-being or happiness.”
“Co-parenting is tough and it’s unfortunate when your partner tries to sabotage the situation with hurtful lies and irrational behavior,” he added.”
“On Wednesday, Gibson, 38, shared photos on Instagram saying he just wanted to co-parent his daughter, adding that his ex, Norma Mitchell Gibson, was “being bitter, resentful” and mean-spirited.”
““All I wanna do is co/parent nothing else…… Please….”
“Stick and stones may break my bones but words will never hurt…… I’ve only prayed that your heart heals and we live our lives separately and peacefully on behalf of our daughter……,” he wrote on Instagram.”
“There s someone out here for everybody Norma I know you can see this I m sorry I got re married I m sorry we didn t work out I m sorry you haven t been able to find another man since we separated Sometimes you get married and have...”


"In addition to accusing him of abusing their daughter, Norma also wrote in the statement that he was prone to" beating people who had conflicts with him "and" beating her several times in the past, including when I was pregnant with my daughter. "
"She also claimed that when she and Sheila's daughter were with him, the director rejected the connection between her and Sheila."
"Over the past nine years, I have made great efforts to raise our children together, and I am disappointed to learn that my daughter's mother has made rude and false accusations against my character in an attempt to undermine our efforts to raise our children together," he told people in a statement
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"In this world, my favorite is my daughter. I will never do anything to hurt her happiness or her happiness."
"It's difficult to raise children together, and it's unfortunate when your partner tries to sabotage the situation with hurtful lies and irrational behavior," he added
"On Wednesday, 38 year old Gibson shared some photos on instagram, saying he just wanted to be a parent with his daughter, and that his ex girlfriend Norma Mitchell Gibson was" mean, indignant "and mean."
"I just want to be a co parent What else Please... "
He wrote on instagram: "sticks and stones may break my bones, but words never hurt I only pray that your heart will heal and we will live separately and peacefully on behalf of our daughter
"Everyone here has a person, Norma, I know, you can see this, I'm sorry, I'm married, I'm sorry, we didn't solve it, I'm sorry, since we separated, you can't find another man, sometimes you get married, and..."



Number  293
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Miley is probably enjoying her successful career as a musician — and as she should, girl hustles and works hard.”
“Because, ya know, women can look happy in white dresses without having to get married.”
“Which is exactly why we are so shocked by what Tish Cyrus has to say about him.”
“Miley Cyrus’s mom doesn’t get the pressure to marry Liam Hemsworth.”
“Say what?!!”
“While the rest of the world drools over Miley and Liam’s beautiful relationship, Tish just doesn’t see the big deal.”
“Guess visiting children’s hospitals together and raising a bunch of animals doesn’t warm her heart like it does for us!”
“Regardless of what the rest of the world wants, Tish thinks Miley has plenty of time before she even has to start thinking of marriage.”
“But don’t get her wrong.”
“Tish totally supports her daughter’s relationship.”


"Miley is likely to enjoy her successful career as a musician - what she should enjoy is that this girl works hard."
"Because, you know, women can look happy in white without having to get married."
"That's why we are so shocked by what tish Cyrus thinks of him."
"Miley Cyrus's mother has no pressure to marry Liam Hemsworth."
"What are you talking about?"
"When the whole world is salivating over the happy relationship between Miley and Liam, tish can't see the big deal."
"I guess going to the children's hospital together and raising a group of animals can't warm her heart for us!"
"Whatever the rest of the world wants, tish thinks Miley has a lot of time before she thinks about getting married."
"But don't get her wrong."
"Tish fully supports her daughter's relationship."



Number  294
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...s 5th turn as the iconic hero over a 12 year span bringing him within one film and one year of Roger Moore s record time in the role...”
“We are still going to see Bond shirtless and in tight swimming trunks but the totally naked James that we saw in Casino Royale in 2006 is a thing of the past The 25th official Bond film will be Craig...”
“Daniel Craig Back As Bond While Battling To Save Marriage!”
““Daniel is still in great shape, but at the age of 49 he doesn’t think he needs to be showing as much skin as he has in the past,” a set spy told The National ENQUIRER‘s Rob Shuter.”
“Daniel Craig will once again play superspy James Bond — but the 49-year- old Brit has added a new clause to his contract — no nudity!”


__ The fifth turning point as the iconic hero spans over 12 years, making his role in a film and Roger Moore's record time in a year. "
"We're still going to see bond go into action naked and in tight swimming trunks, but the completely naked James we saw at Casino Royal in 2006 is a thing of the past, and the 25th bond official movie will be Craig..."
"Daniel Craig is back when he's fighting to save his marriage!"
"Daniel is still in good health, but when he was 49, he didn't think he needed to show as much skin as he used to," a set spy told rob Shute of the national inquirer
Daniel Craig will play super handsome James Bond again, but the 49 year old Briton has added a new clause to his contract - no nudity



Number  295
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’d like to honor his memory by naming her son after him, and Ryan is more than ok with that.” Only time will tell if Eva is actually pregnant!”
““They’re thinking Viviana for the girl and Carlos, after Eva’s brother who passed away,” the source said.”
“A new report claims she & Ryan Gosling are expecting not 1, but 2 new babies — and that they are ‘over the moon’ with excitement.”
“Better yet, the mag says they’re having a boy & a girl!”
“Ryan Gosling, 37, and Eva Mendes, 44, are reportedly preparing to welcome twins this year, according to OK!”
“...magazine.”
“While the rumors have not been confirmed HollywoodLife com reached out to their reps for comment the media outlet claims the actors are very excited about growing their family and they re going to be having both a girl and...”
“...a boy...”
“They allegedly struggled with IVF, but now that their alleged “miracle babies” are on the way, they could not be more thrilled.”
““They are over the moon,” an OK!”


"She wanted to commemorate her son in his name, and Ryan agreed." Only time will tell if EVA is really pregnant
"After EVA's brother died, they thought viviana was for the girl and Carlos," the source said
"A new report says she and Ryan Gosling are not pregnant with one child, they are pregnant with two - and they are" ecstatic. "
Even better, the magazine says they have a boy and a girl! "
Ryan Gosling, 37, and Eva Mendes, 44, are preparing for twins this year, according to reports
__ Magazine. "
"Although the rumor has not been confirmed, the Hollywood website has contacted their representatives for opinions. The media claimed that the actors are very excited about the growth of their families. They will have a girl and..."
__ A boy... "
They are said to be struggling in IVF, but now that their so-called "miracle baby" is about to be born, they can't be more excited
"They're on the moon," OK



Number  296
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Only time will tell!”
“Of course, things change, and if Lindsay is pregnant, that could have inspired Ben to pop the question.”
“This is a sure sign that the couple, who have been dating for over a year, are getting serious.”
“The foursome sat down for a dinner out.”
“He's met the parentsBen recently met Lindsay's parents in Santa Monica.”
“A post shared by NRG ENERGY (@nrgalbania) on Nov 26, 2017 at 10:55pm PST3.”
“Those same sources say that Lindsay may be pregnant with Ben's baby.”
“Why the rush to put a ring on it?”
“Ben is just barely divorced from his ex-wife Jennifer Garner (even though they separated eons ago).”
“Is Lindsay pregnant?”


"Only time can prove everything!"
"Of course, things have changed. If Lindsay is pregnant, it might inspire ben to ask the question."
"It's a clear sign that the couple, who have been dating for more than a year, are getting serious."
"Four people sit down and go out to dinner."
"He met his parents. Ben recently met Lindsay's parents in Santa Monica."
"Post shared by NRG energy (@ nrgalbania) on November 26, 2017 at 10:55 p.m. pst3."
"The same source said Lindsay might be pregnant with Ben's baby."
"Why are you in a hurry to wear a ring?"
"Ben and his ex-wife, Jennifer Garner, hardly divorced (though they separated hundreds of millions of years ago)
"Is Lindsay pregnant?"



Number  297
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I’m still the only person that knows some of his truths.”When it comes to the public’s response to Affleck, she noted, “No one needs to hate [Ben] for me.”
“He can cast quite a shadow.”Of their bond, she admitted, “He’s still the only person who really knows the truth about things.”
“It’s something that we are working through.”May 2017After People magazine released a cover story about Garner’s new life as a single mom, Garner took to Facebook to set the record straight.”
“I would not choose to be single or be in this position.”
“#happyfathersday #threeluckykids #haveagreatday.”Story continuesNovember 2017In an interview with news.com.au, Garner talked about being separated from the father of her children, saying, “I would not have chosen this life for myself or for my kids.”
“...them benaffleck...”
“What s hard is going through it June 2018 For Father s Day Garner penned a rare and touching tribute to Affleck on Instagram writing Our kids are lucky to have a dad who looks at them the way you look at them and loves them the way you love...”
“But to be honest, public scrutiny, everyone says, ‘Oh, you’ve had to go through this in public.’ The public isn’t what’s hard.”
“If you are — if there is any inkling of trouble, or if the tabloids decide there’s trouble, it can create trouble.”
“Are they not?’ And that’s true in reverse, as well.”


"I'm still the only one who knows some of the truth about Affleck," she points out when it comes to public reaction to Affleck. "No one needs to hate (Ben) for me."
"He can cast quite a shadow." When it comes to their relationship, she admits, "he's still the only one who really understands the truth."
"It's a problem we're trying to solve." In May 2017, people magazine published a cover story about the new life of single mothers in Ghana, which Ghana clarified on Facebook
"I will not choose to be single, nor will I choose this position."
"Happy day, three lucky children, have a happy day." The story goes on in an interview in November 2017 with newsnet, where Ghana talks about being separated from her child's father, saying, "I won't choose this life for myself or my child."
__ They are Bernard fleck... "
"What's difficult is that on father's day in June 2018, Ghana wrote a rare and touching eulogy for Affleck on instagram, saying that our children are lucky to have a father who looks at them as you see them and loves them as you love them..."
"But to be honest, public scrutiny, everyone says," Oh, you have to go through this in public. " It's not difficult for the public. "
"If you are - if there's any sign of trouble, or if the tabloid thinks there's trouble, it can make trouble."
"Isn't it? "The other way around."



Number  298
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We made a movie that’s so tender and enjoyable, it can bridge gaps.””
““I can’t think of another movie where two men are so openly and honestly with each other,” Hammer told EW earlier this summer.”
“Call Me By Your Name debuted earlier this year to glowing reviews at the Sundance Film Festival and will hit theaters Nov. 24.”
“They split after more than six years of dating; in 2013, the 66-year-old Woods began dating 20-year-old Kristen Bauguess.”
“?”Woods was 59 when he reportedly started dating 19-year-old girlfriend Ashley Madison.”
“On Saturday, Woods retweeted a tweet that criticized the age gap between the two characters, to which Hammer responded: “Didn’t you date a 19-year-old when you were 60…….”
“Based on André Aciman s 2007 novel Luca Guadagnino s intimate romance follows a teenager in Italy Timothée Chalamet 21 who strikes up a relationship with his father s 24 year old academic assistant Hammer 31”
“Armie Hammer disses James Woods for denouncing gay romance Call Me By Your Name Call Me by Your Name type Movie Armie Hammer is firing back after actor James Woods claimed Hammer s critically acclaimed gay romance film Call Me By Your Name chips away the last barriers of decency...”


"We made a film, very gentle, very enjoyable, can bridge the gap."
"I can't think of a movie that would make two men so honest with each other," hammer told the Wall Street Journal earlier this summer
"Call me your name" made its debut at the Sundance Film Festival earlier this year and will be released on November 24
"They broke up after more than six years of dating; in 2013, woods, 66, started dating Christine Boggs, 20."
"It's reported that Woods started dating his 19-year-old girlfriend Ashley Madison when he was 59."
"Last Saturday, woods forwarded a microblog criticizing the age gap between the two characters. Hammer responded," didn't you date a 19-year-old when you were 60... "
"Based on Andre asiman's 2007 novel Luca guadanino's intimate relationship, it tells the story of Timothy chalamit's 21-year-old love affair with his father's 24-year-old academic assistant hammer, who is 31 years old."
"Amy hammer slandered James Woods and denounced the Gay Romantic movie" call me your name, call me your name "type movie. Amy hammer countered after actor James Woods claimed that hammer's widely acclaimed Gay Romantic movie" call me your name "removed the last decent barrier..."



Number  299
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Before I came away to TIFF I ended up staying until 5 in the morning because I decided I was going to clean the entire house," he said.”
“...require grand romantic gestures...”
“I ve been with my girlfriend 11 years and as anyone knows it s been a long term fully monogamous relationship that requires work a lot of work Hunnam says that working on his relationship with McNelis doesn t always...”
““I try to keep the romance on the reg,'” he told PEOPLE magazine.”
“While attending the Toronto International Film Festival to promote his new film, Papillon, Hunnam explained how he and McNelis have maintained their romance for more than a decade.”
“When the British actor isn't the subject of seemingly fake news stories, he is gushing over his longtime girlfriend, Morgana McNelis.”
“A source told Gossip Cop that this alleged incident "never happened."”
“According to Gossip Cop, the report is entirely fabricated.”
“...t completely true...”
“The insider went on to say there were a lot of snarky comments from other travelers and then people actually started booing him Given that the source was referred to as a spy it s likely that this story isn...”


"I stayed until 5 a.m. before I went to TIFF because I decided to clean the whole house," he said
__ Need a great romantic gesture... "
"I've been with my girlfriend for 11 years, and everyone knows it's a long-term, completely monogamous relationship that requires a lot of effort. Hennan said that his relationship with mcnellis was not always... "
"I try to be romantic," he told people
"While attending the Toronto International Film Festival to promote his new film papilon, Hennan explained that he and mcnellis have been in love for more than a decade."
"When the British actor is no longer the protagonist of seemingly false news, he is talking about his longtime girlfriend, moganna mcneilis."
A source told gossip police that the so-called incident "never happened"
"According to the gossip police, this report is a complete fabrication."
__ Not exactly... "
"The source went on to say that there were a lot of sharp comments from other travelers, and then people actually began to boo him because the source was called a spy, and it's very likely that the story wasn't..."



Number  300
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!”
“It certainly seems to be what she wants deep down—but then, she has an incredibly stubborn and self-destructive streak, and that may ultimately prevent her from following her heart.”HollywoodLifers, do you think Angelina will find love again?”
““I would not be surprised if she decides to give Brad another chance.”
““When things were good, they were a team, it was them against the world,” the insider told us.”
“That’s what she misses most about Brad [Pitt], their conversations and closeness.”Angelina has started to remember how much she loved Brad and how well they worked together as parents.”
““There’s no one that she fully trusts or can confide in.”
““Aside from the kids, bodyguards, and her staff, she has no one — not even a close friend,” the source continues.”
“The movie star reportedly hasn’t felt like there’s anyone she can really open up to about how she has been feeling.”
“Now we have to wonder, was the Salt actress simply putting on a brave face when she took Shiloh and Knox to the Renaissance Pleasure Faire of Southern California in Irwindale on May 6?”
““I don’t think she was prepared for what life would be like on her own.”She’s a mother to six adorable children, which has to be a tough job all by herself.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"It does seem to be what she wants from the bottom of her heart, but she has an incredible tendency to be stubborn and self destructive, which may eventually prevent her from following her heart." Hollywood stars, do you think Angelina will find love again? "
"I won't be surprised if she decides to give Brad another chance."
"When things are good, they are a team, they are against the world," the insider told us
"That's what she misses most about Brad, their conversation and intimacy." Angelina began to remember how much she loved Brad and how well they worked together as parents
"There's no one she can trust or confide in."
"Apart from the children, the bodyguards and her staff, she has no one - not even a close friend," the source continued
"It's reported that the film star hasn't felt that someone can really open up to her and tell her how she feels."
"Now we can't help asking whether the salt actress just put on a brave face when she took Shiloh and Knox to the Southern California Renaissance playground in Irvine Dale on May 6?"
"I don't think she's ready to face life on her own," she said. "She's the mother of six lovely children. It's definitely hard work to rely on her alone."



Number  301
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"We have never discussed it again," she told Rhimes.”
“The talk show host added that she wouldn't have fit into what she viewed as a "traditional" role.”
“Oprah Winfrey and longtime partner Stedman Graham have been going steady for 31 years, but don't expect any wedding bells soon.”
“Or ever.”
“The media mogul revealed in an interview with Vogue that not getting married has taught her to "live life on your own terms," she said.”
“Despite having dated for so long, Winfrey shared that the duo have only discussed marriage once.”
“"The only time I brought it up was when I said to Stedman, 'What would have happened if we had actually gotten married?'”
“And the answer is: 'We wouldn’t be together.'”
“"She continued to explain that "marriage requires a different way of being in this world."”
“Last year, it was rumored that Winfrey and Graham said "I do."”


"We haven't talked about it any more," she told Rhimes
The talk show host added that she was not suited to what she saw as a "traditional" role
"Oprah Winfrey and old partner sterman Graham have been stable for 31 years, but don't expect the wedding bell to ring soon."
"Or forever."
"The media tycoon revealed in an interview with fashion that not getting married taught her to" live her own way, "she said
"Despite the long date, Winfrey said they only discussed marriage once."
"The only time I mentioned it, I said to sterman, 'if we do get married, what will happen?'"
"The answer is: 'we won't be together.'"
"Marriage requires a different way of life," she continued
"Last year, there was a rumor that Winfrey and Graham said 'I will.'



Number  302
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SIGN UP for Gold Derby’s newsletter with experts’ latest predictions...”
“Other coaches to rotate through were Gwen Stefani (Seasons 7, 9 and 12), Pharrell Williams (Seasons 7-10), Miley Cyrus (Seasons 11 and 13), Alicia Keys (Seasons 11, 12 and 14), Jennifer Hudson (Season 13) and Kelly Clarkson (Season 14).”
“CeeLo returned only once more for Season 5.”
“Usher and Shakira joined the panel for Season 4 and Season 6, with Christina coming back for Seasons 5, 8 and 10.”
“For the first three seasons Christina Aguilera and CeeLo Green held down the center chairs before both decided to take a hiatus.”
“Adam has won three titles including the series’ first champion, Javier Colon (Season 1) followed by Tessanne Chin (Season 5) and Jordan Smith (Season 9).”
“Blake mentored six champs: Jermaine Paul (Season 2), Cassadee Pope (Season 3), Danielle Bradbery (Season 4), Craig Wayne Boyd (Season 7), Sundance Head (Season 11) and Chloe Kohanski (Season 13).”
“Between the pair fo them, they have coached nine of the 13 champions crowned on “The Voice” to date.”
“What do YOU think about these poll results?”
“It would be a disaster if [they] leave the show.”Meanwhile, a modest 13% of our readers think it is time for both coaches to take a hiatus, just 6% want only Blake to leave, and a paltry 4% believe just Adam needs to go.”


"Sign up for Kingdee's newsletters, which contain the latest predictions of experts..."
"Other rotation coaches include Gwen Stefani (Season 7, 9 and 12), Farrell Williams (season 7-10), Millie Cyrus (Season 11 and 13), Alicia case (Season 11, 12 and 14), Jennifer Hudson (season 13) and Kelly Clarkson (Season 14)
"Serro only came back once in the fifth season."
"Arthur and Shakira are on the judges for the fourth and sixth seasons, and Christina will be back in the fifth, eighth and tenth seasons."
"For the first three seasons, Cristina Aguilera and CELO green were sitting in the middle chair before deciding to rest
Adam has won three titles, including the first in the series, Javier Cologne (Season 1), followed by tessana Chin (Season 5) and Jordan Smith (Season 9)
"Black has coached six Champions: Jermaine Paul (Season 2), Cassady Pope (Season 3), Daniel Bradley (Season 4), Craig Wayne Boyd (Season 7), Sundance Hyde (Season 11) and Chloe kohanski (season 13)."
Between the two of them, they have coached nine of the 13 champions, and so far, they are all champions of the voice
"What do you think of the poll results?"
"If [they] leave the show, it will be a disaster." At the same time, 13% of readers think it's time for both coaches to have a rest, only 6% hope that only Blake will leave, and only 4% think that only Adam needs to leave



Number  303
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...is announcing on […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
““ Gwen Stefani ’s Ditching All Plastic Surgery Thanks To Her Boyfriend Blake Shelton ,” Ok!”
“And it comes from the same tabloid that has fabricated numerous non-existent weddings and pregnancies for the couple.”
“An online story claiming Gwen Stefani is “ditching plastic surgery” due to Blake Shelton was made up, Gossip Cop can reveal.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
__ Will be on [ ]"Announce" IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Thanks to her boyfriend Blake Sheldon, Gwen Stephanie gave up all plastic surgery," OK
"It came from the same tabloid, which made up countless non-existent weddings and pregnancies for the couple."
Gossip police revealed that an online report claiming Gwen Stephanie "gave up plastic surgery" for Blake Sheldon was fabricated



Number  304
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to Cosmopolitan, a source claimed, “Initially, they leaned on each other for emotional support after going through messy breakups.”
“Theroux is reportedly seeing Selena GomezRumors have begun circulating that Theroux has moved on from Aniston with Selena Gomez — who is 21 years his junior.”
“News reported that Theroux prefered keeping a low profile, which just wasn’t possible when married to a Hollywood A-lister like Aniston.”
“E!”
“Their lifestyles were completely differentAniston and Theroux seemed perfect for each other, but their lifestyles just weren’t compatible.”
“3.”
“A source revealed that by the time of their split, they’d actually “been separated for two months.”However, they “were having intense issues for about eight months.”Next: They may not have ever been meant to be.”
“News, Aniston and Theroux had been unhappy for quite some time.”
“They went through ‘intense issues’ for almost a yearAccording to E!”
“2.”


According to cosmopolitan, a source said, "initially, after a messy breakup, they relied on each other for emotional support."
"It's reported that serrux has seen Selena Gomez. It's rumored that serrux has transferred from Aniston to Selena Gomez, 21 years younger than him."
"The news reports say that Cyrus prefers to keep a low profile, which is impossible when he marries a Hollywood star like Aniston."
__锛_
"Their lifestyles are totally different, and Cyrus seems to fit each other, but their lifestyles are just incompatible."
_3._
At the time of their breakup, they had actually been "separated for two months," a source said. However, they "had been having a heated argument for about eight months." The next news: they may never have been meant to be
"Good news, Aniston and seru have been unhappy for a long time."
"They've gone through nearly a year of 'hot issues' according to e!"
_2._



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“A source told ET in March that they were finally working out the details of their highly anticipated wedding.”
“Despite a recent tabloid report claiming the two have broken up, ET has exclusively learned that Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth are still very much together.”
“Minutes after we reported the news, Hemsworth took to his Instagram Stories and posted a video of himself driving around in a car with Cyrus.”
“Instagram StoriesAdditionally, Cyrus, 25, and Hemsworth, 28, were recently spotted together at the airport, as documented by a fan on Instagram.”
“Rumors began circulating early this week that the lovebirds had split and called off their engagement, with many fans speculating that the breakup was the reason why Cyrus swiped her Instagram clean earlier this week.”
“The report claimed the pair couldn't agree on when they should have children.”
“Cyrus and Hemsworth first starting dating after meeting on the set of The Last Song in 2009.”
“They got engaged in 2012, but broke up the following year.”
“The two rekindled their romance in 2016 and have seemingly been going strong ever since.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"A source told ET in March that they had finally finalized the details of the much anticipated wedding."
"Despite recent tabloid reports that the two broke up, et learned exclusively that Millie Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth are still together."
"A few minutes after we reported this, Hemsworth started following his instagram news and released a video of him and Cyrus driving together."
"The story of instagram. In addition, Cyrus, 25, and Hemsworth, 28, were recently found together at the airport, recorded by a fan on instagram."
"Rumors began earlier this week that the two broke up and cancelled their engagement, and many fans speculated that the break-up was the reason Cyrus cleaned up instagram earlier this week."
"The report said the two couldn't agree on the timing of the birth."
"Cyrus and Hemsworth started dating for the first time after they met on the set of their last song in 2009."
"They got engaged in 2012, but they broke up the next year."
"The two rekindled their relationship in 2016, and it seems that they have been walking fiercely ever since."



Number  306
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We already have four between us, so that’s a lot.””
“I remember saying No matter what I m not dating anyone for a year and don t let anyone near me Watch the full episode of People Cover Story Christina El Moussa I ve Never Been So Happy streaming now on peopletv com or download the PeopleTV app on your...”
“...last November and it may not be long before the couple makes their relationship official...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I can see myself getting married to him,” Christina says in this week’s issue of PEOPLE.”
““He’s so down-to-earth, and we have so much in common.”
“We basically do the same thing so he gets what my world is like and he s just rolled with the punches and handled everything so well Image zoom Credit Christina El Moussa Instagram Christina 34 first met Anstead who restores vintage classic cars on Discovery s Wheeler Dealers through...”
“...a mutual friend after she split from ex husband Tarek...”
““I was definitely not looking to meet anyone.”
“...favorite device...”


"There are already four between us, so that's a lot."
"I remember I said, no matter what, I don't date anyone for a year, and I don't want anyone around me to see the full episode of the cover story of people, Christina Musa. I've never been so happy on peopletv, or download peopletv app on your website..."
__︹ Last November, perhaps soon, the couple will officially announce their relationship... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I can see myself marrying him," Christina said in this week's People magazine
"He's down-to-earth. We have a lot in common."
"We're basically doing the same thing, so he got my world what it was like, and he was just kicking with punches, dealing with everything so well image zooming credit Christina elmosa instagram Christina 34 first met Anstead who recovered the vintage classic car found by wheeler dealer through..."
__ Her mutual friend after breaking up with her ex husband Tariq... "
"I certainly don't want to see anyone."
__ Favorite devices... "



Number  307
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And I looked at the chair.”For all the latest Bachelor news subscribe to our new podcast ‘Watch With Us’ below!”
““She ran out,” he quipped.”
“Not drizzle, I had to go back to the hotel, that’s how hard he made me laugh.”Oyelowo didn’t realize what was happening.”
““He kept going with the story until I actually urinated myself.”
““I kept saying, ‘You have to stop,’ and he wouldn’t stop,” she recalled.”
“According to the actress, she and Oyelowo, 41, were at a restaurant and he began telling a funny story.”
“Theron was joined on Corden’s stage with Gringo costar David Oyelowo and she shared a hilarious memory about how they first bonded while filming in Mexico City.”
“The Bachelor wasn’t the only thing Theron got candid about.”
“I just want to watch.”Meanwhile, Theron will have to find a new “boyfriend.” The season finale of The Bachelor aired on Monday, March 5!”
“I date the show.”When Corden, 39, inquired about who the Oscar winner would like to receive a rose from, she replied: “No, I don’t want to be on the show.”


"I looked at the chair." For the latest singles news, please subscribe to our new podcast "watch with us"! "
"She ran out," he joked
"It didn't drizzle. I had to go back to the hotel. He made me laugh so hard." Oyelovo didn't realize what was going on
"He kept telling stories until I really peed."
"I kept saying, 'you have to stop,' and he wouldn't stop," she recalled
According to the actress, she was in a restaurant with 41 year old oyelovo and he started telling an interesting story
"Seron and greeno's partner, David oyelovo, made it to the stage of Corden, sharing an interesting memory of their first union in Mexico City."
"Theron is not the only one to confess."
"I just want to see it." Meanwhile, Theron has to find a new "boyfriend.". The season finale of bachelor will air on Monday, March 5
When the 39 year old asked the Oscar winner who she wanted a rose from, she replied, "no, I don't want to be in the show."



Number  308
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“6.”
“Next: A major new development suggests that Lauer is making moves towards his comeback.”
“Next: Some information about how Lauer might go about a comeback3.”
“Another report from Radar Online later that month suggested that Lauer was thinking about becoming a film producer, starting his career by funding documentaries, as Katie Couric has done.”
“A source close to Lauer said that he “misses the spotlight” and is “now reconsidering a future comeback.” However, the source said that Lauer’s friends and his lawyers were telling him that it’s far too soon.”
“He reportedly started thinking about a comeback as soon as JanuaryIn January, less than two months after Lauer’s firing, Hollywood Life reported that he was thinking about making a comeback.”
“Next: The first rumbling that Lauer might be interested in returning2.”
“But this did not seem to remain true for very long, according to numerous reports.”
“Page Six reported in December that Lauer had no plans to return to public life.”
“In April, he listed his Manhattan apartment for $7 million.”


_6._
"Next step: a major new development shows Raul is moving towards his comeback."
"Next step: some information about Raul's comeback."
"Another report from radar online later that month showed that Raul was considering becoming a film producer, like Katie Couric, starting his career by funding documentaries."
A source close to Raul said Raul "missed the spotlight" and "is now reconsidering his future comeback." However, sources said Raul's friends and lawyers told him it was too early
"It's reported that he started thinking about coming back in January. Less than two months after Raul's dismissal, Hollywood life reported that he was considering a comeback
"Next: the first rumor is that Raul may be interested in coming back 2."
"But according to many reports, it doesn't seem to last long."
"Page six reported last December that Raul had no plans to return to public life."
In April, his Manhattan apartment went on sale for $7 million



**Something goes wrong**
“— Tierney McAfee, Reporting by Tim Plant...”
“Tell us how you feel!”
“She even texted him to reconnect, but is Harry interested?”
“Here’s what we know!”
“HollywoodLife.com told you Taylor Swift is all about getting back together with Harry Styles after his sad split from Nadine Leopold, and what Taylor wants, Taylor gets!”
“Now that the two stars are back in touch, we can’t help but wonder is this could be the beginning of a Haylor reunion!”
“Harry Styles & Taylor Swift Back Together?”
“— Texting After Nadine Leopold BreakupIt’s true that Taylor, 25, reached out to Harry, 21, after his breakup, but sadly for her, he wasn’t very responsive.”
“Since the split Taylor sent him a text just seeing how he was doing a source tells HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY Taylor may have been trying to play it cool with a casual message but according to our insider Their mutual...”
“...friends say she is definitely still hung up on him...”


"Tierney McAfee, by Tim plant..."
"Tell us how you feel!"
"She even texted him to get back in touch, but was Harry interested?"
"We know that!"
"Hollywood life has told you that after Taylor swift and Nadine Leopold break up, they want to get back together with Harry stiles. Taylor will get whatever Taylor wants!"
"Now that the two stars are back in touch, we can't help asking, this may be the beginning of Heller's reunion!"
"Harry stiles and Taylor Swift together again?"
"Nadine Leopold texted after breaking up. Taylor, 25, did contact Harry, 21, after breaking up, but unfortunately, he didn't respond very well."
"Since the breakup, Taylor sent him a text message just to see how he did it. A source told Hollywood life that Taylor may have been trying to be cool with a casual message, but according to our insiders, their common..."
__︹ My friend said that she must still miss him.... "



**Something goes wrong**
“Crews also expressed hope that, by making his experience public, he would “deter a predator and encourage someone who feels hopeless”.”
““But Harvey Weinstein is not the only perpetrator,” he added.”
“Crews, who played for teams including the Los Angeles Rams, the San Diego Chargers and the Washington Redskins and appears in the sitcom Brooklyn Nine-Nine, recounted the incident via a series of tweets.”
“The 49-year-old said he was prompted to share his story in the wake of the ongoing Harvey Weinstein scandal.”
““This whole thing with Harvey Weinstein is giving me PTSD.”
“Why?”
“Because this kind of thing happened to ME,” he wrote.”
“Film producer Weinstein has been accused of sexual assault or harassment by multiple women, including Asia Argento, Gwyneth Paltrow and Angelina Jolie.”
“Weinstein denies some of the allegations and says all his relationships were “consensual”.”
“This whole thing with Harvey Weinstein is giving me PTSD.”


The crew also expressed the hope that by disclosing his experience, he would "deter predators and encourage those who feel desperate."
"But Harvey Weinstein is not the only culprit," he added
Cruise, who played for the Los Angeles Rams, San Diego stormtroopers and Washington Redskins in the sitcom Brooklyn 99, tweeted about the incident
"The 49 year old man said he was asked to share his story after the Harvey Weinstein scandal
"This whole Harvey Weinstein thing has made me suffer from PTSD."
"Why?"
"Because it happened to me," he wrote
"Film producer Weinstein is accused of being sexually assaulted or harassed by a number of women, including Asia Argento, Gwyneth Paltrow and Angelina Jolie."
Weinstein denied some of the charges and said all his relationships were "voluntary"
"Harvey Weinstein, the whole thing has made me suffer from PTSD."



**Something goes wrong**
“And maybe we’ll find someone who knows how to make policy."”
“Clooney and his wife, human rights lawyer Amal Clooney, pledged $500,000 to help fund the U.S. student-run march on Washington.”
“In the last few months, we’ve heard rumors that Oprah Winfrey, Kanye West, Duane “The Rock” Johnson, and Katy Perry are going to run — and that’s just naming a few.”
“There’s also George Clooney, whose recent donation has some people wondering: George Clooney for president?”
“The topic was first broached back in the beginning of September 2017, when Clooney was doing press for his movie Suburbicon.”
“A reporter asked if he’d like to run for president one day, and Clooney said,"Would I like to be the next president?”
“Oh, that sounds like fun.”
“Can I just say that I'd like anybody to be the next president of the United States.”
“Right away, please."”
“Now, Clooney’s latest actions have fans wondering if he might actually run for office.”


"Maybe we'll find someone who knows how to make policies."
Clooney and his wife, human rights lawyer Amar Clooney, have pledged $500000 to help American students march in Washington
"Over the past few months, we've heard rumors that Oprah Winfrey, Kanye West, Duane Johnson and Katie Perry will run - just to name a few."
"And George Clooney, whose recent donation has made some people wonder: George Clooney running for president?"
"The topic first came back to early September 2017, when Clooney was doing media coverage for his film" the suburbia. "
A reporter asked him if he would like to run for president one day. Clooney said, "do I want to be the next president?"
"Oh, that sounds interesting."
"I can say that I want anyone to be the next president of the United States."
"At once, please."
"Now, Clooney's latest move makes fans doubt whether he will really run for office."



**Something goes wrong**
“In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list - and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics.”
“'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer.”
“'But they won't announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'”
“Another insider reportedly told the US publication, 'All the signs have been there for months now.”
“'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'”
“The Enquirer's shocking report claims 36-year-old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne.”
“'Harry and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells.”
“'They both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive - and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'”
“Along with fertility check-ups, Meghan also visited London-based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer.”


"In the latest episode of the New Creative Royal podcast, Frances sheen and royal expert Angela mollard will take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's amazing dress to the surprise guest list - and talk about all the highlights that keep us focused."
"The happiness of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex twins may be his genetic help."
"It's amazing It's incredible, "a friend gushed to the questioner
"But they don't announce it for a period of time, or until the end of the first three months of pregnancy, which is American custom."
"It is reported that another insider told the US media that all the signs have existed for several months."
"It's really good news, but it shouldn't shock anyone."
According to the shocking report of the inquirer, Megan, 36, secretly visited a fertility doctor before her wedding to Prince Harry, the sixth in line to the throne, on May 19
"Harry and Megan want to get pregnant as soon as possible after the wedding," a friend told reporters
"They all know that it's going to be harder and harder to get pregnant as Megan gets older - and they're acutely aware that the older Megan gets, the more likely she is to have health complications and miscarriage."
People familiar with the matter told inquirer that while checking her fertility, Megan also visited Melanie brown, a nutritionist at Kensington Palace in London



**Something goes wrong**
“No surprise that Barry Jenkins’ tender if somewhat problematic film Moonlight, with its focus on the vicissitudes of black gay existence, is the critically praised movie of the year.”
“Intersectionality was the year’s overused buzzword—it’s little more than a 21st-century reboot of DuBois’ concept of double consciousness and multiple embodied identities.”
“And we watched as dread turned to doom on the heels of the worst mass shooting in American history at Orlando’s Pulse nightclub.”
“Dread infused the police standoffs in Charlotte, North Carolina, and the water cannoning of protesters at Standing Rock.”
“It was refugees on the run; it was microcephaly-carrying mosquitos in South America; it was extreme summer ice loss at the poles signaling ecological disaster.”
“It was North Korea’s brazen nuclear tests; it was the tumbling to earth of EgyptAir Flight 804; it was grisly suicide bombings in Belgium and Lahore, Pakistan; and it was mounting carnage in Aleppo, Syria; Turkey; Nice, France; and Berlin.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementCalamity this year tasted like toxic water in Flint, Michigan; it felt like the rumble of the deadly Italian earthquake and the swoosh of devastating Hurricane Matthew that brutalized Haiti and the Southern U.S.”
“All this socio-political upheaval unfolded in the midst of mass-mediated smoke bombs of disinformation and fake news that has left many of us sometimes unable to properly parse out the difference between what’s real and what’s not.”
“...and Austria to name a few...”
“We ve all been reminded that things don t necessarily get better they could just as easily fall apart in light of the tectonic shift that was the U S election and similar referendums in Britain Colombia and Italy as well as burgeoning right wing populist movements in Germany France...”


"There is no doubt that Barry Jenkins's" Moonlight ", a gentle but problematic film, focuses on the vicissitudes of black homosexual life and is highly praised this year."
"Crossover is a popular word that has been overused in this year. It is just the restart of Dubois's dual consciousness and multiple embodiment of identity concept in the 21st century."
"After the worst mass shooting in American history at pulse nightclub in Orlando, we saw fear turn into destruction."
Police in Charlotte, North Carolina, faced off in fear, while protestors in Lishi were killed by water cannon
"This is a refugee on the run; this is the Microcystis carrying mosquitoes in South America; this is the extreme loss of ice and snow in polar summer, which indicates an ecological disaster."
"It was North Korea's brazen nuclear test; it was Egyptian Airlines flight 804 falling to earth; it was the terrible suicide bombings in Belgium and Lahore, Pakistan; it was the constant massacres in Aleppo, Syria, Turkey, nice, France and Berlin."
"This year's disaster tastes like poisonous water in Flint, Michigan; it's like the rumble of a deadly earthquake in Italy and the whoosh of a devastating hurricane Matthew that's ravaging Haiti and the southern United States."
"All these social and political upheavals are carried out in the smoke bomb of large-scale rumor making and false news, which makes many of us sometimes unable to correctly analyze the difference between true and false."
__ And Austria... "
"We are all reminded that things are not necessarily going to get better, but given the US general election, similar referendums in Britain, Colombia and Italy, and the rapid rise of right-wing populist movements in Germany and France, the situation could easily fall apart as well..."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by Emma McIntyre/Getty Images]”
“Maddox received an Executive Producer credit and Pax worked as a photographer.”
“It has been over a year since Jolie and Pitt announced their split after a 12-year relationship that included two years of marriage, but the divorce proceedings continue to drag on without resolution.”
“Is it possible that the breakup is causing some severe sibling rivalry between oldest sons Maddox and Pax Jolie-Pitt?”
“In the latest issue of National Enquirer, the tabloid is claiming that 16-year-old Maddox and 13-year-old Pax are locked in a feud, causing non-stop fighting between the two brothers.”
“The source in the story says that Maddox is bossy and Pax has had enough; and with the younger brother being taller and stronger, Maddox could “have that smug smile knocked off his face.” However, Gossip Cop has looked into the story and has discovered that it is inaccurate.”
“Teenage boys do have disagreements, but that doesn’t mean there is any battle between the brothers.”
“According to Gossip Cop’s source, Maddox and Pax are close, and they get along just fine.”
“The divorce has been difficult for the family, but they are all getting through it as best they can.”
“The boys are growing up fast, and they both worked with their mom on her latest project First They Killed My Father.”


"[Emma Macintyre / Getty pictures]
"Maddox got credit from the executive producer and parks worked as a photographer."
"It's been more than a year since Julie and Pete announced their breakup. They've been in a relationship for 12 years, including a two-year marriage, but the divorce process has been delayed until now."
"Is it possible that the breakup led to a serious sibling fight between the eldest son, Maddox, and parks Jolie Pitt?"
"In the latest issue of the National Enquirer, the tabloid claimed that 16-year-old Maddox and 13-year-old parks were at loggerheads, leading to constant bickering between the two brothers."
"Sources say that Maddox is overbearing and parks has had enough of it; and as his brother gets taller and stronger, Maddox can" knock down his face with a proud smile. " However, the gossip police investigated the story and found that it was inaccurate. "
"Teenage boys do have differences, but that doesn't mean there's any fighting between brothers."
"According to gossip police sources, Maddox and parks are close and they get on well."
"Divorce is difficult for the family, but they are all trying their best to get through it."
"The kids grew up so fast that they all finished her latest project with mom. First, they killed my father."



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Angelina’s stress levels will finally cool down, or do you think the holiday season will only amp them up?”
“Check out the celebrities, including Angelina, who were allegedly sexually blackmailed by Harvey Weinstein, 65.”
“...divvy up time with their children over the holidays...”
“The past year following the split from Brad has been monumentally stressful and challenging for Angelina and she s only now getting to the point where she feels she can breathe again We reported earlier how there s some major tension between Brad and Angelina over how the two will...”
““Angelina has no plan, or desire, to get married again—her divorce from Brad isn’t even finalized yet—so God only knows where the wedding reports have come from,” the source added.”
“...future for Angelina...”
“Now that she s finally feeling better emotionally though she can start concentrating on her health again While there have been reports that Angelina might be planning her fourth wedding to a wealthy philanthropist our source has set the record straight on whether or not wedding bells are in the...”
““Whenever she’s under stress, Angelina always loses her appetite, and unless she has someone by her side making sure she’s eating regularly, she has a tendency to skip meals and lose weight, which really isn’t good, as she’s so thin anyway.”
““All of the stress really took a toll on Angelina, and her main focus now, aside from the kids, is getting her health back on track again,” our source said.”
“A source EXCLUSIVELY gave us the deets on how Angelina’s post-marriage life has changed her diet and health.”


"Holly bugs, do you think Angelina's stress will eventually cool down, or do vacations just make them more excited?"
"Look at the celebrities, including Angelina, who are suspected of being sexually blackmailed by 65 year old Harvey Weinstein."
__ Spend time with the children during the holidays... "
"The past year after breaking up with Brad has been a great pressure and challenge for Angelina. Now she feels like she can breathe. As we have reported before, what will happen between Brad and Angelina..."
"Angelina has no plans to remarry, no desire to remarry, her divorce from Brad has not even been finalized, so only God knows where the wedding report came from," the source added
__ Angelina's future... "
"Now she finally feels better. Although she can start to pay attention to her health again, it is reported that Angelina may be planning her fourth wedding with a rich philanthropist. Our sources have clarified whether the wedding bell is ringing or not..."
"When the pressure is high, Angelina always loses her appetite. Unless someone around her ensures that she eats regularly, she will have a tendency to not eat and lose weight. It's really bad. Anyway, she is so thin."
"All the pressure really cost Angelina, except for the kids, her main focus now is to get her health back on track," our source said
"An exclusive source revealed to us how Angelina's married life has changed her diet and health."



**Something goes wrong**
“For more on this story, pick up the latest issue of In Touch Weekly, on newsstands now!”
““He’s strong enough now,” the insider says.”
“The reality star and her husband, Kanye West, flew to Paris to see designer Virgil Abloh’s debut Louis Vuitton fashion show, but Kanye had another outburst and it pushed Kim over the edge.”
““Kim’s emotions were heightened,” a source tells In Touch.”
“And apparently, Kanye wasn’t helping.”
“After the show on June 21, Kanye “made a scene,” according to the source, when he leaped from his front-row seat into the arms of Virgil.”
““Kim didn’t know what to do,” the source explains, adding that the rapper burst into tears.”
““Kanye acting up just added to her anxiety.”Kanye’s latest incident comes just a month after his controversial slavery comments and tweets about Donald Trump.”
“Kim has apparently had enough of it, and told her family that she’s considering leaving her husband.”
““It’s over,” says one insider.”


"To learn more about this story, check out the latest issue of contact weekly at the newsstand!"
"He's strong enough now," the person familiar with the matter said
"The reality star and her husband, Kanye West, flew to Paris to see designer Virgil abloh's first louis vuitton fashion show, but Kanye broke out again and pushed Kim to the top of the wave."
"Kim Jong Il is in high spirits," a source said in contact magazine
"Obviously Kanye didn't help."
"After the end of the program on June 21, Kanye" made a scene. "According to the source, he jumped into Virgil's arms from the front row seat at that time."
"Kim didn't know what to do," the source explained, adding that the rapper burst into tears
"Kanye's behavior increased her anxiety." Kanye's latest incident came a month after his controversial slavery talk and tweets about Donald Trump
"Kim obviously had enough. She told her family that she was thinking about leaving her husband."
"It's all over," one insider said



**Something goes wrong**
“We explore all the ways.”
“While we had a hint about the twins names last month when it was reported the music superstar filed trademark documents with the U.S. Patent and Trademark Office the confirmation from Queen Bey, no less, had the BeyHive in a frenzy.”
“The Queen has blessed us again.”
“One month after giving birth to twins in Los Angeles, a boy and a girl, Queen Bey posted the first official photo of them to Instagram early Friday morning.”
“Beyhold, the world has finally been introduced to Sir and Rumi Carter.”
“Beyoncé unveiled the family portrait on the twin’s one-month birthday with the caption.”
““Sir Carter and Rumi 1 month today.”
“??❤️?????????”
“?”The image of Bey holding the precious babies received over 1 million likes within 30 minutes of the unveiling.”
“Looks like we're gathering hoes today.”


"We explore all the ways."
"Last month, it was reported that the music superstar submitted trademark documents to the U.S. patent and Trademark Office. Although we have some hints about the names of the twins, the confirmation of Queen bey still drives Bessie crazy."
"The queen has blessed us again."
"A month after giving birth to twins in Los Angeles, a man and a woman, Queen Shelley posted their first official picture on instagram early Friday morning."
"Behold, the world is finally introduced to Sir rummy Carter."
"Beyonce announced the picture of the family on the twins' one month birthday, with instructions attached."
"Sir Carter and rummy are a month away today."
_?? _ 锔?????????_
"The photo of Bei holding her baby received more than 1 million praises within 30 minutes of its unveiling."
"It looks like we're going to pick up the hoes today."



**Something goes wrong**
“Speakers at the conference included Richard Plepler, David Zaslav, Jeff Zucker, Jodi Kantor and Janice Min.”
“I don’t have to.’”Kelly said: “I think powerful women need to be there for less powerful women so they can grow into powerful women, so they’re not scared out of the workforce or effectively shoved out.”An insider insisted that Kelly does not want Lauer’s role.”
“I’m not going to tell you who reported it.”
“I would work it behind the scenes, even if I had to go into the boss’ office and say, ‘Here’s a name, go investigate, you have to do some sort of looking.”
“I would advise her on what to do and B.)”
“A.)”
“.”
“After discussing her own experiences with reporting misconduct at Fox News during the Business Insider Ignition conference on Wednesday, Kelly told the crowd: “Let me tell you, if a woman came to me at NBC News and said this has happened to me .”
“Kelly, who hosts the 9 a.m. hour of NBC’s “Today,” also offered herself as a role model for younger female staffers at NBC News who may be weighing sexual-harassment claims.”


Speakers for the meeting included Richard plepleplepler, David zaslav, Jeff Zucker, Jodie Kanter and Janice min
"I don't need to," Kelly said. I think powerful women need to be there to serve those who don't, so that they can grow up to be powerful women, so that they won't be intimidated or pushed out Kelly didn't want the role of Raul, an insider insisted
"I won't tell you who reported it."
"I'll work behind the scenes, even if I have to go into the boss's office and say," it's a name. To investigate, you have to do some investigation. "
"I'll advise her what to do and then tell her what to do."
"Answer:)"
_._
"Let me tell you, if a woman on NBC news comes to me and says it happened to me," Kelly told the audience, discussing her experience of reporting misconduct on Fox News at a business insider Conference on Wednesday
"Kelly, who hosts NBC's 9 a.m. today, also said she was a role model for young women at NBC news, who may be weighing sexual harassment charges."



**Something goes wrong**
“1 hit “I’ll Name the Dogs,” and most recent single, “I Lived It.””
“I wrote a verse, then I wrote a chorus, then I realized it was going somewhere and I felt good about it.”
“The new release from Blake has the country singer and “The Voice” coach singing about all the things that turn him on about his girlfriend of 3 years, Gwen.”
“She s turning me on turning me on Pushing my buttons like it ain t no thing If I m what she wants she gets what she wants The neon s buzzing when she pulls that string Turning me on...”
“...like it s her job Sometimes I think she must get off on Turning me on turning me on Blake began writing the song by himself and as he got on a roll he asked his songwriter friend to help...”
“...him finish it...”
““We’re sitting on my bus one day early in 2017 and I think I was in Baton Rouge,” said Blake.”
““I was up there alone and I had my guitar, started playing a little melody that I was hearing in my head and next thing you know I started writing a song.”
“Like I always have in the last couple of years I called up my friend Jessi Alexander and said Man I think I m onto something and I need somebody way better than me to try to bring this thing...”
“...room in the world just like she s turnin me on Turnin Me On featured on Blake s current album Texoma Shore is the follow up to Blake s No...”


"I'm going to give the dog a name," the recent single "I survived."
"I wrote a poem, and then I wrote a chorus, and then I realized that the song was going somewhere, and I felt good."
In Blake's new album, country singer and voice coach sing out all the things that make him interested in his girlfriend Gwen of three years
"She makes me excited, makes me excited, as if I'm what she wants. It's nothing. She gets what she wants. When she pulls that rope to make me excited, the neon lights buzz..."
__︹ Just like this is her job, sometimes I feel that she has to stop pursuing me, and black starts to write this song himself. When he starts to write this song, he asks his songwriter friend to help him... "
__ Let him finish it... "
"One day in early 2017, we were in my car and I think I was in Baton Rouge," Black said
"I was there alone, with my guitar, playing a little melody that I heard in my head, and then I started to write songs."
"Like in the past few years, I called my friend Jesse Alexander and said, man, I think I have a problem. I need someone better than me to solve this problem..."
__ The room in the world, like her close-up in Blake's current album Texoma coast, is Blake's first A sequel to the album



**Something goes wrong**
“Shorts “”
“SIGN UPfor Gold Derby’s free newsletter with latest predictionsIn the marquee race for Best Drama Series, “General Hospital” is the reigning champion and also the all-time record-holder with 13 victories.”
“Morgan The Young and the Restless Jacqueline MacInnes Wood The Bold and the Beautiful BEST YOUNGER ACTOR Lucas Adams Days of Our Lives Rome Flynn The Bold and the Beautiful Tristan Lake Leabu The Young and the Restless Casey Moss Days of Our Lives Hudson West General Hospital BEST YOUNGER”
“Lives Anthony Montgomery General Hospital Greg Rikaart The Young and the Restless Greg Vaughan Days of Our Lives BEST SUPPORTING ACTRESS Marla Adams The Young and the Restless Camryn Grimes The Young and the Restless Susan Seaforth Hayes Days of Our Lives Elizabeth Hendrickson The Young and the Restless Mishal...”
“Billy Miller General Hospital James Reynolds Days of Our Lives BEST ACTRESS Eileen Davidson The Young and the Restless Nancy Lee Grahn General Hospital Marci Miller Days of Our Lives Maura West General Hospital Laura Wright General Hospital BEST SUPPORTING ACTOR Wally Kurth General Hospital Chandler Massey Days of Our...”
“Refresh this page for the most up to date nominations DRAMA BEST DRAMA SERIES The Bold and the Beautiful Days of Our Lives General Hospital The Young and the Restless BEST ACTOR Peter Bergman The Young and the Restless Michael Easton General Hospital John McCook The Bold and the Beautiful...”
“Check out the complete list of nominations below.”
“And will there also be record-extending victories for “Jeopardy” (16-time winner for Best Game Show) and “The Ellen DeGeneres Show” (combined 10-time winner for Best Talk Show and Best Entertainment Talk Show).”
“Will it defend its title against “The Bold and the Beautiful,” “Days of Our Lives” and “The Young and the Restless”?”
“The contenders in younger acting categories skipped the initial round: all eligible candidates in those two races became automatic pre-nominees and went straight to the blue ribbon round.”


"Shorts"
General hospital is the defending champion and the record holder of 13 victories in the best drama series
"The young Morgan and the restless Jacqueline mahinnes wood, the brave and beautiful best young actor Lucas Adams, the days of our lives, Rome Flynn, the brave and beautiful Tristan lake, the young and restless Casey moss, the days of our lives, the best young man at Hudson west general hospital"
"Living in Anthony Montgomery general hospital, Gregory Carter's young and restless Greg Vaughn, the days we live, best supporting actress Marla Adams's young and restless Camille Grimes's young and restless Susan Hayes, the days we live, Elisabeth hendrikson's young and restless Mishal..."
"Billy Miller general hospital James Reynolds" the days of our lives "best actress Irene Davidson" the young man and the restless Nancy Lee Gran "general hospital Marcy Miller" the days of our lives "Mullah west general hospital Laura Wright general hospital best supporting actor Wally Coors general hospital Chandler Macy" the days of our lives "..."
"Refresh this page to get the latest nominations for the best drama series" bold and beautiful days in our lives "general hospital" young and restless "best actor Peter Bergman" young and restless "Michael Easton general hospital" John McCullough "bold and beautiful" General Hospital... "
"Please see the full list of nominations below."
"Danger" (16 times for best game show) and "Ellen DeGeneres Show" (10 times for best talk show and best entertainment talk show combination) will also win record victories
"Will it compete with" bravery and beauty "," the days of our lives "and" youth and restlessness "for its title?"
"Young acting competitors skip the first round: all eligible candidates from both races become automatic pre candidates and go straight to the blue ribbon."



**Something goes wrong**
“Jenner was originally hopeful about Trump, given that he promised to make LGBTQ rights part of his platform.”
“But when they see Caitlyn, they agree that she should use the women’s bathroom.”
“Jenner spoke candidly with Variety about the pain of that rejection.”
“Her conservatism made her a pariah in the left-leaning entertainment industry, where she’s been criticized for not doing enough to help the transgender community.”
“She voted for Trump in the 2016 election (but is no longer a fan).”
“On her reality show, Jenner expressed support for Ted Cruz and sparred with activists, who were as experienced in trans-politics as she was unversed.”
“She had difficulty living up to those expectations, especially after coming out as something more controversial than being transgender: a Republican in Hollywood.”
“Next came the cover of Vanity Fair and her own reality TV show, “I Am Cait.”Her newfound fame put enormous pressure on Jenner — who had lived the first 65 years of her life as Olympic gold medal-winning decathlete Bruce Jenner — to be the perfect transgender role model.”
“...a man to a woman attracted a staggering 17 million viewers...”
“I can get more things done if I don t stick my nose into everything publicly Jenner s low key lifestyle and muted public profile stand in sharp contrast to the days when her much talked about 2015 interview with Diane Sawyer in which she revealed plans to transition from...”


"Jenner had hoped for trump because he promised to make LGBTQ rights a platform for him."
"But when they saw Caitlin, they agreed that she should use the ladies' room."
"Jenner spoke frankly about the pain of that refusal."
"Her conservatism has made her a pariah in left leaning entertainment circles, and she has been criticized for not doing enough to help transgender communities."
"She voted for trump (but no longer a fan) in the 2016 election."
In her reality show, Jenna expressed her support for Ted Cruz and had disputes with activists who had as much cross political experience as she had
"It's hard for her to live up to those expectations, especially after her more controversial debut as a transgender: a Republican in Hollywood."
Next comes the cover of vanity fair and her own reality show I'm Cain. Her new fame has put a lot of pressure on Jenner, who has become a perfect transgender role model as an Olympic gold medalist Bruce Jenner for the first 65 years of her life
__ One man and one woman attracted 17 million viewers... "
"If I don't pay attention to everything publicly, I can do more. Jenna's low-key lifestyle and low-key public image are in sharp contrast to the days when she talked about it in an interview with Diane Sawyer in 2015, in which she revealed that A plan for transition. "



**Something goes wrong**
“...now...”
“Even more the couple has scaled back on work projects to spend more time with their children as their top priority is always family For more on Roberts and Moder s relationship and life at home with their three kids pick up the new issue of Us Weekly on newsstands...”
““It fills her heart and makes her love him even more."”
“The duo, who are very “hands-on parents,” the source says, love their “simple, laid-back life in Malibu, attending school functions and community events.”“Julia just loves watching [Danny] with the kids,” says the pal, adding that the family of enjoy love hitting the waves.”
““They have a really solid, loving marriage.”Their strong bond has helped them remain a united front for their three children, twins Hazel and Phinaeus, 13, and Henry, 10.”
“...they always come out on the other side very much together adds the insider...”
“They still have crazy passion and love for each other a source reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly noting that the pair s secret to success is always making time for each other Although the Wonder star 50 and the cinematographer 49 have faced challenges throughout their relationship...”
““When you see them together, there is no doubt about it.”
“Despite experiencing their fair share of ups and downs, the A-list couple is in it for the long haul.”
“The couple, who are celebrating 16 years of marriage in July, are stronger than they’ve ever been.”


__ Now... "
"The couple even cut back on their work projects and spent more time on their children, because their first task is always family, to learn more about the relationship between Roberts and Maud and their life at home with their three children, and to pick up a new issue of American weekly on the newsstand..."
"It filled her heart and made her love him more."
"Both of them are very" hands-on "parents, and the source said they like to" live a simple and leisurely life in Malibu, participate in school activities and community activities. " "Julia just likes to see Denny with the kids," the friend said, adding that the loving family enjoys the shock wave. "
"They have a really strong, loving marriage." Their strong ties helped them maintain the united front of three children, 13-year-old twins hazel and Phineas, and 10-year-old Henry
__ They always come out on the other side together, the insider added
"They still have crazy passion and love for each other. A source revealed in the new issue of American weekly that the secret of their success is always to make time for each other, although miracle star 50 and photographer 49 have been facing challenges in their relationship..."
"When you see them together, there's no doubt about it."
"Despite quite a lot of ups and downs, this A-class rich couple will still be involved for a long time."
"The couple, who celebrated their 16th wedding anniversary in July, are stronger than ever."



**Something goes wrong**
“I hit the lottery, and I still would waste my time on those hollow pursuits."”
“Save from a Golden Globe appearance that proved the bulk of Hollywood was still in his corner, the actor dipped underground for several months, committing himself to a life of cranberry juice and fizzy water—"I was boozing too much.”
“As he fought to earn time with his kids, Pitt also set upon a self-improvement crash course designed to transform him into the type of dad he wanted to be.”
“"I grew up with a Father-knows-best/war mentality—the father is all-powerful, super strong—instead of really knowing the man and his own self-doubt and struggles," he offered by way of explanation to GQ Style.”
“"And it's hit me smack in the face with our divorce: I gotta be more.”
“I gotta be more for them.”
“I have to show them.”
“And I haven't been great at it."”
“It's just become a problem," he said of what he called his ability to drink a Russian under the table with his own vodka—and therapy.”
“And this is coming from a guy who hit the lottery, I'm well aware of that.”


"If I win the lottery, I will still waste my time on those empty pursuits."
"In addition to a golden globe showing that most of the people in Hollywood are still in his corner, the actor has been underground for months and devoted himself to cranberry juice and soda -" I drank too much. _
"As Pete struggles for time with his children, he's also starting a self-improvement crash course aimed at turning him into the kind of father he wants to be."
"I grew up with a mentality that my father knew the most about war. My father was omnipotent and super strong, rather than really understanding the self doubt and struggle between men and himself," he said in explaining GQ style
"Our divorce surprised me: I'm going to do more."
"I want to do more for them."
"I have to show them."
"I've never been good at it."
"It's just a matter," he said of his so-called ability to drink Russian Vodka and treat with his own
"It's from a guy who won the lottery. I know it."



Number  324
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But the 89th Academy Awards this year are more important for her as she is set to make her Hollywood debut with Baywatch opposite stars Dwayne Johnson and Zac Efron.”
“At Oscars 2016, Priyanka was seen in a nude white gown and was quite a hit at the after party too.”
“But the singer has denied it.”
“Priyanka Chopra earlier confirmed that she was going to Oscars 2017 with Mick Jagger.”
“Priyanka Chopra was attending Oscars 2017 with the Rolling Stones singer Mick Jagger, isn’t it?”
“That’s what our desi girl and Baywatch star posted on Saturday while travelling to the Academy Awards, which confirmed that she is going to the prestigious event with Mick Jagger.”
“But a recent tweet from the singer has hinted that he is not attending the night with the Bollywood star.”
“Priyanka had shared a selfie with Mick Jagger, while enroute to Oscars and captioned the image as, “Change of plans !”
“Oscars here we come.. @mickjagger LA LA land…,” and we believed her that she was attending the ceremony with the 74 year old singer.”


"But this year's 89th Academy Award is more important for her because she will make her debut in Hollywood, partnering with rival stars Dwayne Johnson and Zach Efron of Gulf watch."
"At the 2016 Oscars, Priyanka was seen wearing a naked white robe and was popular at subsequent parties."
"But the singer denied it."
"Priyanka Chopra confirmed earlier that she would be in the 2017 Oscars with Mick Jagger."
"Priyanka Chopra and rolling stones singer Mick Jagger attended the 2017 Oscars, didn't they?"
"This is the announcement from our Desi Girl and Baywatch stars as they head to the Oscars on Saturday, confirming that she will be with Mick Jagger at the event."
"But a recent tweet from the singer suggested that he would not be at the show with the Bollywood stars."
On his way to the Oscars, Priyanka shared a selfie with Mick Jagger and used "change the plan!"
"Oscar, here we are.. @Mick Jagger Laran "We believe she was at the wedding with the 74 year old singer."



**Something goes wrong**
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“She’s the complete opposite &is the most generous,compassionate person I know!”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“Yesterday, her sister Kim Kardashian came to her defence after she was labelled 'despicable and self-absorbed', and alluded to Jenner's continuing battle with mental health issues.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“'I wouldn't change it for the world but there are days where I wish I could walk outside and nothing would be like it is right now.'”
“'I feel very, very blessed and I think that I live a very extraordinary life,' she gushed.”
“MIGUEL MEDINA Getty ImagesHowever, the model was quick to acknowledge how much she cherishes her family and career.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"She's the opposite & the most generous and compassionate person I know!"
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from twitter."
"Yesterday, her sister Kim Kardashian defended her after being labeled" mean and selfish "and hinted that Jenna had been fighting mental health problems."
"This content was imported from instagram."
"I won't change it for the sake of the world, but there will be days when I hope I can go out and nothing will be like this."
"I feel very, very lucky, I think I live a very extraordinary life," she said
"At the Miguel Madonna Getty show, the model quickly admitted how much she cherished her family and career."



**Something goes wrong**
“Citations: Leonardo DiCaprio Is So Chill He Reportedly Vapes And Wears Headphones While Having Sex (BroBible)”
“You do you, Leo.”
“Star magazine reported that during sex, Leonardo DiCaprio lies back, puts on headphones and lets the girl do all the work.”
“I can't confirm that any of it is true, but I really want it to be.”
“A source claims that her best friend slept with Leo.”
“The friend calls Leo "selfish, lazy and downright rude.” Here's what else she said her friend told her about the bedroom experience,She told me that during the act, Leo put on headphones and even started vaping!”
“Then he signaled her to keep going while he just laid back and zoned out.”
“Ouch.”
“Leo's sex partner supposedly felt very embarrassed because Leo was just, oh, you know, casually listening to some MGMT while she "carried on."”
“Hey, I'd feel embarrassed too.”


"Quote: Leonardo DiCaprio is so cold that he is said to smoke marijuana and wear headphones when he has sex (Bible)"
"It's you, Leo."
Star magazine reported that during sex, Leonardo DiCaprio would lie down, put on headphones and let the girl do all the work
"I'm not sure it's true, but I really hope it is."
"It's been reported that her best friend had sex with Leo."
This friend called Leo "selfish, lazy and rude.". She also said that her friends told her about her bedroom experience. She told me that during the performance, Leo put on headphones and even started smoking! "
"Then he motioned to her to go on, and he just lay down and rowed out."
"Ouch."
It's assumed that Leo's sexual partner is very embarrassed because Leo just, oh, you know, listens to some of the managers as she "goes on."
"Hey, I'll be embarrassed, too."



**Something goes wrong**
““Now she just tries to avoid her!””
““She’s tried several times to make peace, but it’s never worked.”
““Mayim doesn’t understand why Kaley hates her,” said the insider.”
“She thinks it’s just a case of sour grapes and jealousy.”Since then, things haven’t gotten any better!”
“...talking her earnings...”
“As earlier reported by The National ENQUIRER tensions had already flared up in 2016 when Mayim who was earning 100 000 an episode said We are ALL overpaid An on set insider dished Kaley is furious at Mayim for trash...”
“They’ve had huge catfights, and producers just try to keep them apart,” on-set sources dished.”
““Kaley and Mayim absolutely hate each other!”
“Rob Shuter reports… “Big Bang Theory” stars Kaley Cuoco and Mayim Bialik have been banging heads — and it’s not pretty!”


"Now she just wants to avoid her!"
"She tried several times to make up, but failed."
"Maim doesn't understand why Kelly hates her," the person familiar with the matter said
"She thinks it's just an example of sour grapes and jealousy," and things haven't improved since then
__ Talk about her income... "
"As the National Enquirer reported earlier, tensions have broken out in 2016. At that time, an episode with a revenue of 100000 said," we were all overpaid by insiders on the set, and dash Kelly was furious at maym's rubbish... "
"They had a fierce fight, and the producers just wanted to separate them," the set source said
"Kelly and maim absolutely hate each other!"
"Rob Shute reports..." "Big Bang Theory" stars Kelly Kuko and maim bialik have been banging their heads - it's not nice! "



Number  328
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But if you type in other names such as Arthur, you get a "Page Not Found" screen.”
“When the Daily Mail first tried to type in they received a page that looked exactly like Prince George and Princess Charlotte's.”
“But for those searching Prince George or Princess Charlotte, you may just find an "access denied" screen.”
“On the family's official website, there are pages dedicated to several family members including Prince Harry, Prince Charles and others.”
“That's what some fans are asking after the royal family's website developer reportedly suffered a technically glitch earlier this week.”
“The Internet is full of spoilers, but can it reveal the royal baby's name early?”


But if you type a different name, such as Arthur, the page not found screen appears
"As like as two peas, the first time the daily mail was tried, they received a page that was exactly the same as Prince George and princess Sherlock.
But for those who search for Prince George or Princess Charlotte, you may only find a "no access" screen
"On the official website of the family, there are special pages about Prince Harry, Prince Charles and other family members."
"It is reported that the developer of the Royal website had a technical failure earlier this week, which is what some fans asked."
"There are saboteurs all over the Internet, but can you disclose the name of the Royal baby earlier?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“James Brolin and Barbra Streisand are nearing their 20th wedding anniversary this year.”
“ET’s Katie Krause spoke with Brolin at the Hallmark Channel and Hallmark Movies & Mysteries winter Television Critics Association red carpet on Saturday, where he revealed that despite his decades-long romance, he still doesn't have all the answers.”
““I don’t know, because nobody trains you,” he said of the secret to his and Streisand's marriage.”
““This is my third time -- third marriage.”
“I picked difficult situations the first two times, but I think you learn with each one.”
“I’m a person that believes that if I’m wrong, that’s when I learn, and when I’m right, I haven’t learned a thing.”Noting that he takes his relationship “day to day,” Brolin revealed that he’s an advocate of marriage counseling.”
““I do believe in counseling if anybody ever has a problem in their marriage.”
“Bring in a referee, talk it over, and I swear to you, it will dispel by the end of the session, each time!” he said.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"James bullring and Barbara Streisand are getting married on their anniversary this year."
Katie Krause of ET, who spoke with Brolin on the hallmark channel and the hallmark movies & mysteries winter television criticism Association red carpet on Saturday, revealed that despite his decades of love, he still hasn't found all the answers
"I don't know, because no one trains you," he said of the secret of his marriage to Streisand
"This is my third - third marriage."
"The first two times I've chosen difficult situations, but I think you'll learn from them."
"I'm a person who believes that if I'm wrong, it's when I learn, and when I'm right, I don't learn anything." Brolling pointed out that he dealt with his relationship "every day" and revealed that he was an advocate of marriage counseling
"If someone has problems in their marriage, I believe counseling is OK."
"Please come to a referee and talk about it. I swear to you that every time the game ends, it will be dispersed! "He said



**Something goes wrong**
“...he joked with audience members about them being very lucky that particular night because Gwen Stefani was joining him for a duet even though she actually gave birth to twins yesterday...”
“I rarely even look at it anymore because I know it s mostly fake In his tweet he wrote that he felt disturbed with the false news reports now the change in his attitude is evident from the fact that while performing at his restaurant Ole Red in Tishomingo Oklahoma...”
“Rumors suggesting that Gwen Stefani is pregnant do not bother Blake Shelton anymore, a source close to him told Gossip Cop.”
“Shelton has often found himself confronting untrue reports about his relationship with Gwen Stefani ever since the two got together a few years ago.”
“Almost on a constant basis, one can find false reports claiming that Blake and Gwen are getting married, or that they have already split up.”
“Initially, Shelton found these reports so infuriating that they would get “under his skin,” making him feel angry about how the media was exploiting their relationship for their interests.”
“But it appears Shelton cannot be bothered anymore.”
“The source close to him said that one day he “just decided he can’t be bothered,” and that he has become “immune” to Gwen Stefani pregnancy rumors.”
“He has reportedly adopted a view that most of the stories about the couple are patently untrue and it is not something which he should actually get worked up about.”
“Even a brief glance into news stories about Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton’s relationship justifies this behavior.”


__︹ He joked to the audience that they were very lucky that night because Gwen Stephanie joined him in the duet, even though she did have twins yesterday... "
"I rarely watch it again because I know it's mostly fake on his twitter, he wrote. He's upset about fake news reports. Now his attitude changes obviously when he performs in OLE red, a restaurant in tismonigo, Oklahoma..."
"Rumors about Gwen Stephanie's pregnancy are no longer bothering Blake Shelton," a source close to him told gossip police
"Since they were together a few years ago, Sheldon has found himself constantly facing false reports about his relationship with Gwen Stephanie."
"There are almost always false reports that Blake and Gwen are going to get married or that they have broken up."
"At first, Sheldon found these reports so outrageous that he was" in the dark "and made him angry about how the media used their relationship for their benefit."
"But it seems Sheldon can't stand it any more."
"Sources close to him say that one day he" just decided that he couldn't be disturbed "and that he had become" immune "to Gwen Stephanie's pregnancy rumors
"It is reported that he has adopted the view that most of the stories about the couple are obviously untrue and he should not be excited about it."
"Even a brief glimpse of the news coverage of Gwen Stephanie's relationship with Blake Shelton justifies this behavior."



Number  331
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“...for her now unemployed costars execs are planning a spinoff that will center around Sara Gilbert who plays Darlene Roseanne s daughter on the show...”
“She s trying to explain that it was all a joke and she didn t know it would hit so close to home She s miserable and ranting and raving to friends who are sick of it She s angry and paralyzed about what to do On the brighter side...”
““She still has no self-awareness about what she did, and is rationalizing everything,” added the insider.”
“...year old former TV star doesn t really understand the gravity of her controversial comments that compared Valerie Jarrett one of Barack Obama s top advisers to an ape...”
“She s being told by close friends and family not to release emails But others are telling her from a PR perspective that when Kathy went scorched earth she only ended up being exiled for nine months Though she recently tweeted about gaining insight after her offensive tweets the 65”
““Roseanne thinks her career is over and she’s never going to work again,” said the insider.”
“She then had an on-camera meltdown that had her friends and family worried she had become “unhinged.”As for Barr, she’s still threatening to release emails of “support” by ABC and her co-stars, as Radar reported exclusively.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
__ For her now unemployed co stars, executives are planning a derivative that centers on Sarah Gilbert, who plays Darlene Rosanna's daughter in the play. "
"She tried to explain that it was all a joke, she didn't know it would hit so close to home, she was suffering, growling and raving friends who were sick, she was angry and paralyzed, how to do the bright side..."
"She is still not self-conscious about what she has done and is defending everything," the person familiar with the matter added
__ The 18-year-old former TV star doesn't really understand the seriousness of her controversial comments, which compare Valerie Jarrett, a senior adviser to Barack Obama, to an ape... "
"Friends and family told her not to email, but others told her from a PR point of view that when Kathy was burned, she was only exiled for nine months, despite the insight she gained after she recently tweeted her offensive comments."
"Rosani thinks her career is over and she will never work again," the person familiar with the matter said
"Then she broke down on camera, and her friends and family worried that she had become" insane. ". As for Barr, she's still threatening to release an email "supported" by ABC and her co star, radar exclusive



**Something goes wrong**
“Following the initial tirade, KB Homes’ board threatened to fire Mezger “if in the future there is any similar incident.””
“In October, Mezger filed for his own restraining order against Griffin — two weeks after she filed one against him.”
““We look forward to putting on sworn testimony tomorrow that completely contradicts the assertions.”The neighbors’ feud hasn’t simmered down since he was recorded hurling homophobic and sexist slurs at the comedian in September.”
““Moreover, the recording was apparently dated May 26, 2017, and hence does not reflect any statement ‘amid’ the so-called legal battle,” Slevin said in a statement.”
“F–king, f–king crap!”Mezger’s attorney, Pete Slevin, denied that it was his client heard in the recording.”
““F–king crap.”
““It’s f–king crap,” she reportedly said.”
“In another audio clip, Mezger’s wife was reportedly heard discussing how the comedian and her boyfriend called in a noise complaint about them.”
““Stupid b-tch,” he was recorded saying.”
“In a May 26 video obtained by The Blast, the CEO was shown shouting at Griffin about closing her door while standing at the fence between their yards.”


After the initial tirade, kbhomes' board threatened to fire Mezger "if something similar happens in the future."
"In October, Metzger applied to Griffin for her own restraining order - she applied to Griffin two weeks ago."
"We look forward to swearing in tomorrow to completely refute these claims." Since he was recorded in September as a homophobic and sexist libel against the comedian, the neighborhood feud has not subsided
"In addition, the recording is clearly dated May 26, 2017, so it does not reflect any statements in the so-called legal struggle," Slevin said in a statement
"King, king! "Metzger's lawyer, Peter Slevin, denied that it was his client who was heard in the recording."
"F-trump trash."
"It's ace crap," she was reported to have said
In another recording, Metzger's wife is reported to be discussing how the comedian and her boyfriend complained about them with noise
"Stupid b-tch," he said
In a video on May 26, the CEO stands in front of the fence between their yards and yells at Griffin about closing the door



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“Earlier this month she took a few of them to go see the new Tomb Raider reboot which stars Alicia Vikander as Lara Croft the iconic role she originally played in 2001 s Lara Croft Tomb Raider and again in 2003 for the sequel Lara Croft Tomb Raider The Cradle...”
“A source tells ET that although "it's not serious," the 42-year-old actress is "seeing" someone, marking her first potential relationship since calling it quits from her estranged husband, Brad Pitt, in September 2016 after two years of marriage.”
“"Brad and Angie are both very secretive about their dating life.”
“Angie has told some friends she isn't ready to date, but she has been seeing a handsome, older-looking man who is a real estate agent," the source claims.”
“"He isn't a celebrity or high profile in any way."”
“"Angie was in a very bad place after [her] split [from Brad]," the source adds.”
“"Just having another adult to spend time with has been helpful."”
“The source says that Pitt has also moved on, and any possibility of him getting back together with Jolie is highly unlikely.”
“"People talk about them reuniting, but it will never happen," the source tells us.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Earlier this month, she took some of them to see the sequel of Tomb Raider, in which Alicia vicander plays Laura Croft. She initially played an iconic role in 2001's" Laura Croft Tomb Raider "and in 2003 in the sequel" cradle of Laura Croft Tomb Raider... ""
"A source told et that while" it's not serious, "the 42 year old actress is" dating "someone, marking her first potential relationship since she announced her breakup two years after marrying separated husband Brad Pitt in September 2016."
"Brad and Angie are very secretive about their dating lives."
"Angie told some friends that she was not ready for a date, but she had seen a handsome, older looking man who was a real estate agent," the source claimed
"He's not a celebrity, he's not a high profile."
"Angie was in a very bad situation [after breaking up with Brad]," the source added
"It helps just to be with another adult."
"The source said that Pete has also moved, and the possibility of him and Julie getting back together is very small."
"People talk about their reunion, but it will never happen," the source told us



Number  334
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And check out Khloé and Tristan's cutest photos in the gallery below!”
“...newsstands now...”
“Tristan doesn t seem as convinced but he loves her and him really doesn t want to throw it all away For more exclusive details on the Kardashians be sure to pick up the latest issue of Life Style on...”
“"Khloé has seen Tristan since their fight and things have cooled in their relationship, but she is dying to make it work,” the source continued.”
“Even though the wedding is off (for now) Koko hasn't lost hope in her happily-ever-after.”
“He didn't play up to his potential and he got frustrated, then had a big blowup where he yelled at her that he wanted his space so he could focus on his career," the source said.”
“MORE: Khloé Kardashian Sports "Raw Sausage" Lips on Snapchat After Apparent Injections"Everyone kept talking about the 'Kardashian curse,' claiming that his fiancée is somehow to blame for his team's loss against the Golden State Warriors.”
“Fans criticized Tristan for choosing to date a Kardashian and even said he'll be affected by the so-called "Kardashian curse" that plagues exes of the famous family.”
“The negative attention the relationship has brought the 26-year-old Cleveland Cavaliers player is beginning to do its damage.”
“"Since he backed off so abruptly, Khloé feels as if she was left at the altar!"”


"Look at the cutest pictures of Heroe and Tristan in the gallery below!"
__ Newsstands now... "
"Tristan doesn't seem to believe that much, but he loves her. He really doesn't want to give up everything. For more exclusive details of the Kardashian family, he must pick up the latest issue of lifestyle in..."
"Since their quarrel, khlo 茅 has seen Tristan, and the relationship between them has cooled, but she is eager to make it go smoothly," the source continued
"Although the wedding is (now) over, coco has not lost hope of her happiness since then."
"He didn't reach his potential, he was frustrated, and then there was a big explosion, he yelled at her, he wanted his space so that he could focus on his career," the source said
"More information: Kardashian smeared" raw sausage "on snapchat's mouth, apparently injected. "Everyone is talking about the curse of Kardashian, claiming that his fiancee is somehow responsible for his team's loss to the Golden State Warriors."
"Fans criticized Tristan for choosing to date Kardashian, and even said he would be influenced by the so-called" Kardashian curse "that plagued the family's predecessor."
"The negative impact of this relationship on the 26 year old Cavaliers player has begun to hurt
"Now that he had stepped back so abruptly, Heroe felt as if she had been left on the altar!"



Number  335
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for the liquid and traditional marijuana the rapper used?”
“...a time and had a valid prescription...”
““Kanye needs professional help.”
“Though she later insisted she was joking, “They fight constantly — blow-out fights,” says an insider.”
“She called him out on her own Twitter account the same day for posting photos inside their home when they’d agreed not to.”
“But Kanye doesn’t listen to Kim most of the time.”
“In fact, roughly an hour after he professed his love for President Donald Trump online on April 25, Kanye, 40, admitted in another tweet that “my wife just called me” and told him to clarify that he doesn’t agree with everything Trump does.”
“There’s been no escaping his social media meltdown, though.”
“Things have gotten so bad that Kim and Kanye sleep in separate rooms.”When she needs even more time apart from her husband, Kim, 37, flees their home and takes the kids — North, 4, Saint, 2, and 3-month-old Chicago — to stay at mom Kris Jenner’s house.”
““Kanye’s acting more unpredictable than ever.”


"As for the liquid and traditional marijuana used by rappers?"
__ One time and one effective prescription... "
"Kanye needs professional help."
"Although she later insisted that she was joking," one insider said, "they often quarrel - explosive quarrels."
"On the same day, she called him on her twitter account because he posted photos at home and they agreed not to do so."
"But Kanye doesn't listen to Kim most of the time."
"In fact, about an hour after he expressed his love for president trump online on April 25, Kanye, 40, admitted on another tweet that" my wife just called me "and asked him to clarify that he didn't agree with what trump had done."
"However, his social media collapse is inevitable."
"Things got so bad that Kim and Kanye were sleeping in different rooms." When she needed more time to leave her husband, Kim, 37, fled their home to live with her children - North, 4, St., 2 and 3 months old in Chicago - at her mother's home, Chris Jenner
"Kanye's behavior is more unpredictable than ever."



**Something goes wrong**
“I really enjoy my serenity in Dubai ... you can go out and have fun, but it's a different kind of fun that you have."”
“The 'Mean Girls' star said: "I didn't really know how to have a private life, because I was so young.”
“Lohan currently splits her time between America and Dubai, and she has said that living out in the United Arab Emirates has allowed her to have more of a private life.”
“I'm not against movie stars, they're great, but you need somebody who's going to be just right."”
“This is somewhere where you go and find Batgirl and then you cast her.”
“Speaking about his casting process, he said: "I doubt it will be a name.”
“However, Whedon, 53, previously revealed he would like to cast an unknown actress as his leading lady.”
“If Lohan is going to be Batgirl then she is going to have to beat Emma Stone to the role, as she is currently believed to be the favourite for the Warner Bros. Pictures and DC Films project.”
“...fame...”
“Lohan and Affleck developed a friendship after the 45 year old actor visited her in rehab back in 2013 to share his own struggles with alcoholism in a bid to inspire her to get sober whilst coping with the pressures...”


"I really enjoy the peace in Dubai... You can go out and play, but that's another kind of fun you have
"I really don't know how to live a private life because I'm too young," said the star of the "mean girl."
"Rohan is currently living apart in the United States and Dubai, and she said that living in the UAE has given her more private life."
"I'm not against movie stars. They're great, but you need the right person."
"This is where you find Batman and throw her out."
Referring to his casting process, he said, "I suspect it will be a name."
"However, Wheaton, 53, previously revealed that he wanted to choose an unknown actress as the heroine."
"If Rohan is going to be Batman, she'll have to beat Emma stone because she's currently considered a favorite of Warner Bros. and Washington pictures."
__ Reputation... "
"Rohan and Affleck have established a friendship because the 45 year old actor visited her at the rehabilitation center as early as 2013 to share her fight against alcoholism, so as to encourage her to keep awake while coping with stress..."



Number  337
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I do it in a way that’s loving and it’s caring, and I try not to intimidate them or traumatize the kids.””
“This dance floor will always be my home and I ve got my eyes on that mirror ball she continued adding the hashtags bringonthespraytans dwts WATCH Chloe Lukasiak On New Dance Moms Coach Cheryl Burke She Was Incredible Burke who has taken home two Mirrorball Trophies throughout her time on...”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Season 25 of Dancing with the Stars premieres Sept. 18 on ABCShe’s back and ready to win that Mirrorball Trophy!”
“Cheryl Burke will be returning for the 25th season of Dancing with the Stars — her 20th season competing on the reality dance competition series — the pro dancer confirmed Monday on Instagram.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: Craig Sjodin/ABC via Getty“Guess who’s back in the ballroom?!”
“So excited to share that I’m officially back for my 20th season of Dancing With the Stars!” wrote Burke, 33.”
“...the ABC series season 2 with Drew Lachey and season 3 with Emmitt Smith last competed on season 23 with Olympic swimmer Ryan Lochte...”
““But don’t get me wrong, I’m still — from people that have seen me on Dancing with the Stars — I am still strict, I’m stern and I expect the best out of my students.”


"But I do it in a loving and caring way, and I try not to intimidate them or hurt the children."
"This dance floor will always be my home. My eyes have been staring at the mirror ball. She continues to add labels to bring on the sprayatans DWT and looks at Chloe lukasiak in the new dance mom coach Cheryl Burke. She is incredible Burke. She takes two mirror ball trophies home all the time on the dance floor..."
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
Season 25 of dance with the stars will premiere on ABC on September 18. She's back, ready to win the mirror ball trophy! "
"Cheryl Burke will confirm on instagram on Monday that she will return to the 25th season of dancing with the stars, her 20th season in the live dance competition series."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Credit for image zooming: Craig Hawking / ABC via Getty "guess who's back in the ballroom again?"
"It's a pleasure to share with you that I'm officially back for my season 20 dance with the stars! Burke, 33, wrote
__︹ The second season of ABC Series is against drew Lach and the third season is against Emmett Smith. The last time of ABC Series is against Olympic swimmer Ryan lochter in season 23. "
"But don't get me wrong, I'm still - from those who have seen me dance with the stars - I'm still strict, I'm strict, and I hope my students can do their best."



**Something goes wrong**
“In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list - and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics.”
“'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer.”
“'But they won't announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'”
“Another insider reportedly told the US publication, 'All the signs have been there for months now.”
“'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'”
“The Enquirer's shocking report claims 36-year-old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne.”
“'Harry and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells.”
“'They both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive - and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'”
“Along with fertility check-ups, Meghan also visited London-based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer.”


"In the latest episode of the New Creative Royal podcast, Frances sheen and royal expert Angela mollard will take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's amazing dress to the surprise guest list - and talk about all the highlights that keep us focused."
"The happiness of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex twins may be his genetic help."
"It's amazing It's incredible, "a friend gushed to the questioner
"But they don't announce it for a period of time, or until the end of the first three months of pregnancy, which is American custom."
"It is reported that another insider told the US media that all the signs have existed for several months."
"It's really good news, but it shouldn't shock anyone."
According to the shocking report of the inquirer, Megan, 36, secretly visited a fertility doctor before her wedding to Prince Harry, the sixth in line to the throne, on May 19
"Harry and Megan want to get pregnant as soon as possible after the wedding," a friend told reporters
"They all know that it's going to be harder and harder to get pregnant as Megan gets older - and they're acutely aware that the older Megan gets, the more likely she is to have health complications and miscarriage."
People familiar with the matter told inquirer that while checking her fertility, Megan also visited Melanie brown, a nutritionist at Kensington Palace in London



**Something goes wrong**
“...hots for Marshal Dillon...”
“And sexy Gwen who debuted her movie career in 2004 playing Jean Harlow opposite Leonardo DiCaprio in The Aviator loves the idea of playing hard ass sexy saloon owner Miss Kitty memorably played by Amanda Blake who famously had the...”
“Said My Spy Onda Lotalot: “Tons of movie idols — notably Bradley Cooper and Ben Affleck — are mulling the iconic role, but Blake’s country authenticity, good looks, humor and swagger make him a shoo-in!”
“Secrets Of Blake & Gwen’s Love Shack Gone Bad!”
“Western fans are thrilling at whispers that “Gunsmoke” — one of TV’s longest running series, with James Arness as Marshal Matt Dillon — will hit the big screen starring country crooner/“The Voice” stud Blake … and luscious squeeze Gwen Stefani!”
“Mike Walker Reports… There’s a new marshal galloping toward Dodge City, and his name’s … Blake Shelton!”


__ I'm very interested in Marshal Dillon... "
"Sexy Gwen made her debut in her film career in 2004. She played Jean Harlow and Leonardo DiCaprio in" the pilot ". She likes to play the sexy tavern owner Miss Katie. This is an unforgettable role played by Amanda Blake. She has..."
"A lot of movie idols - especially Bradley Cooper and Ben Affleck - are thinking about this iconic character, but Blake's rural realism, beauty, humor and swagger make him a blockbuster," my spy, Onda lotarot, said
"The secret of Blake and Gwen's love cabin has gone bad!"
"Fans in the West are thrilled by the murmur of gun smoke, one of the longest running TV series, featuring James Arnes as marshal Matt Dillon and country singer / voice actor black and sexy Gwen Stefani on the big screen!"
"Mike Walker reports that There is a new Marshal running to Dodge City. His name is Black Sheldon



Number  340
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In September 2017, Deadline reported that Engelson was shopping a fictional TV comedy with the description: “Divorce is hard.”
“Meghan married film producer Trevor Engelson in 2011; they split two years later.”
“I have always cared for my father and hope he can be given the space he needs to focus on his health.”
“She and Prince Harry ask again for understanding and respect to be extended to Mr. Markle in this difficult situation.”On Thursday, Markle finally weighed in: “Sadly, my father will not be attending our wedding.”
“Early in the week, the palace sidestepped commenting on this mess, as a spokesperson simply said, “This is a deeply personal moment for Ms. Markle in the days before her wedding.”
“Then, he contacted TMZ once more to say that he had to undergo heart surgery on Wednesday, and he would officially not be attending.”
“A day later, he changed his mind and said he would love to go.”
“On Monday, Thomas told TMZ that he regretted the photos, saying they were “stupid and hammy,” and said he would not be attending the wedding because of a recent heart attack.”
“This did not go over well, as the palace had chastised the media for badgering him.”
“However, things fell apart this week when it was revealed that Thomas Sr. had been working with the paparazzi to stage photos of himself: Reading a book on Great Britain, getting fitted for a suit, etc.”


"In September 2017, deadline reported that engelson was buying a fictional TV comedy, which was described as:" divorce is hard. "
"Megan married filmmaker Trevor engelson in 2011; they broke up two years later."
"I always care about my father and hope to give him enough space to pay attention to his health."
"She and Prince Harry once again asked for understanding and respect for Mr. markel in this difficult situation." On Thursday, markel finally broke in and said, "I'm sorry my father won't be at our wedding."
Earlier this week, the palace avoided comment on the chaos, as a spokesman said, "it's a very private moment for Ms. markel a few days before her wedding."
"Then he contacted TMZ again and said that he had to have heart surgery on Wednesday and that he would not officially participate."
"A day later, he changed his mind and said he wanted to go."
"On Monday, Thomas told TMZ he regretted the photos, saying they were 'stupid and hammy' and that he would not attend the wedding because of his recent heart attack."
"It didn't go well because the palace had accused the media of pestering him."
"This week, however, was not good, because it was reported that Thomas Sr. had been working with the paparazzi to take pictures of himself: reading a book about Britain, wearing a suit, and so on."



Number  341
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It can strengthen you instead.”Image zoom Taylor Swift | Credit: Kevin Winter/GettySwift has embraced the snake during her reputation era, and her stages, merch and album promo have all featured the slithery reptile.”
““I guess the snakes … I wanted to send a message to you guys that if someone uses name calling to bully you on social media and even if a lot of people jump on board with it, that doesn’t have to defeat you.”
““I went through some times when I didn’t know if I was gonna get to do this anymore,” she told her fans on Tuesday night before launching into “Long Live,” a track off her Speak Now album.”
“I made that bitch famous” — which Swift has consistently said is what upset her — the “Delicate” singer received a flood of backlash from fans calling her a liar.”
“RELATED VIDEO: ‘Deeply Sorry’ Katy Perry Sends Olive Branch and Sweet Letter to Taylor Swift Ahead of TourThough the entertainers were never heard discussing the specific lyric “Why?”
“You don’t get to control someone’s emotional response to being called ‘that bitch’ in front of the entire world,” the singer wrote on her Instagram account afterwards.”
“It doesn’t exist because it never happened.”
“...snake and posted videos on her Snapchat of a private phone call between the Grammy winner and West 40 discussing his song Famous Where is the video of Kanye telling me he was going to call me that bitch in his song...”
“And then a lot of people called me a lot of names on social media and I went through some really low times for a while because of it Image zoom Taylor Swift Credit Rick In July 2016 the Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star 37 branded Swift a...”
““Someone called me a snake on social media and it caught on,” she said while speaking to the record-breaking audience at the University of Phoenix Stadium.”


"It can strengthen you." Image zoom Taylor Swift | source: Kevin winter / gettyswift embraces snakes in her time of fame. Her stage, marsh and album promos feature this slippery reptile
"Snakes, I guess I want to convey a message to you that if someone bullies you with name abuse on social media, even if many people will bully you with name abuse, it doesn't have to beat you. "
"I've been through it for a while, and I don't know if I can do it again," she told her fans on Tuesday night, and then released "hooray," a track from her speak now album
"I've made that whore famous" - Swift has always said it's upsetting for her - the "tender" singer has been strongly opposed by fans, calling her a liar
Related video: "deeply sorry" Katie Perry sends out olive branches and sweet words to Taylor Swift before her tour, although she has never heard the artist discuss the specific lyrics "why?"
"You can't control a person's emotional reaction to being called 'that bitch' in front of the world," the singer later wrote on her instagram account
"It doesn't exist because it never happened."
__︹ On her snapchat, snake posted a personal phone video between the Grammy winner and West 40, discussing his song "famous." Kanye told me where the video he was going to call me that bitch in the song was... "
"Later, a lot of people gave me a lot of names on social media, and I also experienced a period of low ebb, because this picture was taken in July 2016 by Taylor Swift Rick, and the No. 37 star in" follow Kardashian reality show "branded Swift..."
"It's popular for people to say I'm a snake on social media," she told a record breaking audience at the University of Phoenix stadium



Number  342
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Write to Samantha Cooney at samantha.cooney@time.com.”
“Weinstein’s criminal attorneys Blair Berk and Benjamin Brafman have said that a fair investigation of the allegations of criminal wrongdoing will prove they are without merit,” a spokesperson for Weinstein told the Los Angeles Times of the Los Angeles investigation.”
“The Los Angeles Country District Attorney’s office did not immediately respond to TIME’s request for comment.”
“No charges have been filed against Weinstein in Los Angeles as of Friday.”
“Los Angeles Police Captain Billy Hayes confirmed on Oct. 19, 2017 that the department was investigating Weinstein after an unnamed woman told police that the Hollywood mogul sexually assaulted her in a hotel in 2013, according to the Times.”
“Los Angeles probe into Weinstein allegationsThe Los Angeles County District Attorney’s office is currently reviewing five investigations into Weinstein — two from the Beverly Hills Police and three from the Los Angeles Police department, according to the Los Angeles Times.”
“Weinstein’s attorney, Benjamin Brafman, told the Journal that he met with federal prosecutors to attempt “to dissuade them from proceeding.” According to the Journal, federal prosecutors had already been looking into Weinstein for potential fraud.”
“The investigation is being run by the U.S. District Attorney’s Office in the Southern District of New York.”
“The New York Times reported that the investigation will examine whether Weinstein violated federal stalking laws.”
“Here are the other probes:Federal probe into Weinstein allegationsFederal prosecutors opened a criminal investigation into Weinstein’s alleged sex crimes, the Wall Street Journal reported earlier this week.”


"To Samantha Kuni Samantha Kuni @ time.com."
"Weinstein's criminal lawyers, Blair Burke and Benjamin braffman, said a fair investigation of the criminal charges will prove that they are groundless," a Weinstein spokesman told the Los Angeles Times
"The Los Angeles District Attorney's office did not immediately respond to time's request for comment."
"As of Friday, there were no charges against Weinstein in Los Angeles."
"According to the times, Los Angeles police captain Billy Hayes confirmed on October 19, 2017 that the Department was investigating Weinstein after an unnamed woman told police that the Hollywood tycoon sexually assaulted her in a hotel in 2013."
The Los Angeles County Attorney's office is currently reviewing five investigations into Weinstein, two from Beverly Hills police and three from the Los Angeles Police Department, the Los Angeles Times reported
Benjamin Brafman, Weinstein's lawyer, told the Wall Street Journal that he met with federal prosecutors to try to "dissuade them from prosecuting.". Federal prosecutors are already investigating Weinstein's potential fraud, the Wall Street Journal reported
"The investigation is conducted by the U.S. district attorney's office in the Southern District of New York."
"The New York Times reported that the investigation will investigate whether Weinstein violated the federal tracking law."
"This is another probe: federal probe the Wall Street Journal reported earlier this week that federal prosecutors launched a criminal investigation into Weinstein's sex crime charges



Number  343
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared in the New York Post.”
“The cute couple was together on Sept. 30, when Johansson was spotted dropping Jost off at a star-studded “SNL” after-party at Tao Uptown that included guests like Beyoncé, Jay-Z, Ryan Gosling, Emma Stone and Dakota Johnson.”
“Johansson, who filed for divorce from French journalist Romain Dauriac in March, has been seeing “Saturday Night Live: Weekend Update” star Colin Jost since May, which was exclusively revealed by Page Six.”
““Simply put, they are friends as well as neighbors [in the Hamptons],” says ScarJo’s rep.Flay, who in 2015 had a publicly contentious split from his wife of 10 years, Stephanie March, was last linked to “Masters of Sex” actress Heléne Yorke.”
“Photographs of the pair strolling out of a restaurant late Sunday night sparked speculation, but a rep for the “Avengers” actress tells us that there’s no romance happening.”
“Scarlett Johansson had a friendly dinner with Food Network star Bobby Flay over the weekend.”


"This article was originally published in the New York Post."
"The lovely couple got together on September 30, when Johnson was found to drop Jost off at a party of guests in taushangcheng, including Beyonce, Jay-Z, Ryan Gosling, Emma stone and Dakota Johnson, after a star studded" SNL. "
"Johnson filed for divorce with Romain dauriac, a French journalist, in March this year. Since May this year, he has been watching Saturday night Live:Weekend Update 锛_tarring Colin Jost, which is exclusive on page 6. "
"In short, they are friends and neighbors (in Hampton)," said scaccio's friend. In 2015, Mr. Frye broke up with his wife Stephanie March, who had been in love for 10 years, in a public quarrel, and was last associated with Helene Yorke, the actress of "master of sex"
"The photos of the two walking out of the restaurant late Sunday night sparked speculation, but a representative of the avenger star told us that there was no romance."
"Scarlett Johnson had a friendly dinner with food network star Bob fry over the weekend."



Number  344
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Blake.””
““You guys are very lucky that [she’s here],” Blake told the very excited crowd as he spoke about Gwen.”
“Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are taking aim at the constant tabloid rumors claiming that they’re having children.”
“The country star poked fun at the seemingly never-ending speculation that Gwen may be pregnant with the couple’s child (or children) during a recent performance in Oklahoma, where he joked that his girlfriend of over two years had just given birth to twins.”
“Shelton made the joke about his girlfriend – who has three children with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale – while introducing her on stage to perform with him during a recent concert in his home state last week.”
“A video captured by concert goers, and obtained by PopCulture.com this week, shows the two teaming up to perform their 2016 duet “Go Ahead And Break My Heart” as they both stopped by Shelton’s restaurant and events space Ole Red in Tishomingo, Oklahoma, last week.”
“After Blake took the stage to perform a few of his hits, the crowd could then be heard chanting “Gwen!”
“Gwen!”
“Gwen!” as they encouraged the No Doubt singer to join her man on stage.”
“That’s when Blake invited Stefani to join him as he performed for fans, introducing her by joking to the crowd that they were all “lucky” to have her perform because she’d only just given birth to their twins the day before.”


"Black."
"You're lucky (she's here)," Blake told the excited audience of Gwen
"Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are targeting the constant tabloid rumors that they have children."
"At a recent show in Oklahoma, the country star joked about the seemingly endless speculation that Gwen might be pregnant with the couple's children. He joked that his girlfriend of more than two years had just given birth to twins."
"When Sheldon introduced his girlfriend to a concert in his hometown last week, he made a joke about her - she has three children with her ex husband Gavin Rossdale."
This week, the two performed the duet "go, break my heart" in 2016. They both stopped at Sheldon restaurant and activity space ole red in tishomigo, Oklahoma last week
After Blake performed some popular songs on stage, the audience could hear "Gwen!"
"Gwen
"Gwen! "When they encourage this unquestionable singer to join her male singer's stage."
"At that time, Blake invited Stefani to join him in his performance for his fans. When he introduced Stefani to the audience, Blake joked that they were" lucky "to have her perform because she had just given birth to their twins the day before."



Number  345
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Christian Petersen/Getty Images]”
“Although he may be moving to the Big Apple, the 42-year-old TV host revealed that he will still spend a lot of time in L.A. in an interview with Variety after he was named as the co-host for Live!”
“On Monday, Kelly Ripa and ABC has finally decided to make Ryan her permanent co-host and it seems like the ripple effect of this decision has reached the backyard of the Kardashians clan whose life is being featured on E!”
“...thanks to the former American Idol host.”
“In fact, a source revealed to Radar Online that the Keeping Up With the Kardashians momager Kris Jenner is “terrified” for their future as KUWTK producer Ryan Seacrest makes the big move.”
““Of course Kris is scared,” the insider who was reportedly close to the family declared.”
“According to the outlet, Seacrest was the one who was “almost single-handedly responsible for giving Jenner a spot on E!”
“...for KUWTK” which is why his decision to leave Los Angeles for New York seems to be something that may also affect the reality TV show.”
“The outlet further explained Kris’ fears, saying that the timing of Ryan’s move could “not be worse for the money-hungry momager” as less people tune in to watch the Kardashians go about their personal lives while on camera in Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“In fact, KUWTK producer Ryan Seacrest leaving L.A. might also be a sign that the reality show will soon be facing the end, according to Radar‘s source.”


"[Christian Peterson / Getty pictures]
"Although he may move to big apple, the 42 year old TV host revealed that he will still spend a lot of time interviewing variety in Los Angeles after he is appointed as co host of live shows!"
"On Monday, Kelly Ripa and ABC finally decided to let Ryan become her permanent co host. It seems that the chain reaction of this decision has spread to the backyard of the Kardashian family, and the Kardashian family's life is in E!"
__ Thanks to the former American Idol host. "
"In fact, a source told radar online that Kardashian's mother, Kris Jenner, was" scared "about their future because kuwtk producer Ryan Seacrest made a big move."
"Of course Chris is scared," a person close to his family reported
According to media reports, Seacrest is the one who "almost single handedly got Jenner on the E!"
__ For kutek, "that's why his decision to leave Los Angeles for New York also seems to affect reality TV
"The media further explained Chris's concern, saying that the timing of Ryan's move could not be worse for the money poor mother, because fewer and fewer people are watching the private life of the kardashians while keeping up with them in front of the camera."
"In fact, according to radar sources, kuwtk producer Ryan Seacrest's departure from Los Angeles could also be a sign that the reality show is coming to an end."



**Something goes wrong**
“Poor Jen, still being hounded by gossip!”
“He was always in New York or traveling for work.”
“They barely seemed to spend any time together, and it wasn’t like their time apart was just about competing work schedules at all.”
“Things got even stranger in the past week, with Jennifer celebrating her 49th birthday in Malibu, all while Justin was in New York, hanging out with his dog and not doing anything particularly important.”
“I told you guys I was getting a weird feeling about JustJen.”
“And look, I was right.”
“Justin and Jennifer are over.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have split after two and a half years of marriage — and seven years as a couple, the Associated Press reports.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months, with Theroux often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“They have also a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”


"Poor Jane, still haunted by gossip!"
"He's always in New York or on business."
"They don't seem to spend much time together, and they don't spend their time apart competing for work schedules at all."
"In the past week, things have become more strange, with Jennifer celebrating her 49th birthday in Malibu, and Justin in New York, with his dog, not doing anything particularly important."
"I told you I had a strange feeling about just Jen."
"You see, I'm right."
"Justin and Jennifer are over."
According to the associated press, Jennifer Aniston and Justin serrux broke up after two and a half years and seven years of marriage
"In recent months, the two have been separated for quite a long time, and selux is often seen in New York City, far away from his Los Angeles home."
Aniston signed up with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and "Dun Prince" in Atlanta, while serrux, 46, made the comedy "the spy who left me in Budapest."



Number  347
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
__ One month old... "
__ Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
__ Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  348
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's totally crazy, but Chris still holds out this belief that one day, somehow, he and Rihanna will get back together and live happily ever after," the source added.”
“Chris just can't help it though, even after all these years, and all the water that's passed under the bridge, he still loves Rihanna to pieces and he still thinks of her as being his girl.”
“"Chris just can't believe all the engagement rumours, he thinks there's no way Rihanna would marry this dude, which is kinda funny really as he doesn't know Hassan at all.”
“"Chris thinks Hassan is not good enough for Rihanna — but then, nobody would be good enough for her in his eyes," an insider told Hollywood Life.”
“However, the Loyal singer also believes the Saudi billionaire is not good enough for his ex-girlfriend, say reports.”
“Rihanna knows there is a whole other side to Chris though, and she'll always love him, even though they're not in contact anymore," the source added.”
“"Hassan's not a fan of Chris Brown — at all — he thinks he is a thug and a woman beater.”
“The insider even claimed Jameel is not a fan of Brown as he thinks Brown is a "woman beater" and a "thug".”
“"Rihanna knows she cannot ever get back with Chris, and she has totally moved on from that time in her life — but she cannot just close off those feelings she had for him," the source said.”
“The insider also said the Barbadian singer has "totally moved on" from the time she spent with Breezy and knows that they can never get back together.”


"It's crazy, but Chris still believes that one day, somehow, he and Rihanna will get back together and live happily ever after," the source added
"Even so, Chris can't help it. Even after so many years, the water under the bridge has passed, he still loves Rihanna and he still regards her as his daughter."
"Chris just can't believe all the engagement rumors. He thinks Rihanna can't marry this guy. It's really funny because he doesn't know Hassan at all."
"Chris doesn't think Hassan deserves Rihanna, but in his eyes, no one deserves her," one insider told Hollywood life
"However, it is reported that the loyal singer also thinks that the Saudi billionaire is not worthy of his ex girlfriend."
"Rihanna knows that Chris has a totally different side and that she will always love him even if they no longer contact him," the source added
"Hassan is not a fan of Chris Brown at all - he thinks he's a thug and a thug."
The insider even claimed that Jamie is not a fan of brown because he thinks Brown is a "female thug" and "thug"
"Rihanna knows she'll never be back with Chris again, and she's started her life since then - but she can't just close her feelings for Chris," the source said
The Barbados singer "completely left" from the moment she was with blaze and knew they would never be together again, the person said



Number  349
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Give us all your thoughts below!”
“Is she being too sensitive, or would you refuse to go too?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Vanessa’s decision not to go see Baywatch because of Zac’s lack of clothing in the film?”
“Along with Zac, Alexandra Daddario, Dwayne Johnson, Priyanka Chopra, Kelly Rohrbach, Ilfenesh Hadera, Jon Bass, Hannibal Buress, David Hasselhoff, Pamela Anderson, Charlotte McKinney, Belinda, and Izabel Goulart are bringing the fun to the flick.”
“The hype surrounding the film has been insane and the powerhouse cast — who recently all came together for the film’s Miami premiere — is already reason enough to run to the theater.”
“Whether or not Vanessa will be buying a ticket to see Baywatch, we aren’t too worried it’s going to affect its box office performance.”
“Even though the pair split over six years ago, your ex will always be your ex and it is especially hard dealing with your feelings toward that person when they were your first love.”
“29 flaunt his rock hard abs in front of a bunch of swooning members of the audience...”
“She still holds a little animosity and doesn t really want to spend time with an ex even when it is only on screen It s no surprise that Vanessa 28 isn t big on the idea of heading to the movies to munch on some popcorn while watching Zac...”
““She can’t bring herself to watch Zac [Efron] shirtless for two hours.”


"Tell us what you think!"
"Is she too sensitive, or won't you go?"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Vanessa's decision not to watch" Bay watch "because Zach has no clothes in the film?"
"With Zach, Alexandra dadario, Dwayne Johnson, Priyanka Chopra, Kelly robach, ilphinesh hadra, Jon bass, Hannibal braith, David Hasselhoff, Pamela Anderson, Charlotte McKinney, Belinda and Izabel gulat, we brought fun to the film."
"The hype around the film has been crazy, and this powerful actor - who recently got together for the film's premiere in Miami - has enough reason to go to the theater."
"Whether or not Vanessa will buy a ticket to see Bay watch, we are not too worried that it will affect its box office performance."
"Although the couple broke up six years ago, your ex girlfriend will always be your ex girlfriend. It's especially difficult to deal with your feelings for them when they are your first love."
"29 showing off his hard abdominal muscles in front of a group of faint audience..."
"She's still a little bit hostile, and even on screen, she doesn't want to be with her ex. No wonder Vanessa didn't want to go to the movies when she was 28, eating popcorn and watching Zach at the same time... "
"She can't allow herself to watch Zac (evron) go out naked for two hours."



Number  350
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Milos Bicanski/Getty Images]”
““There’s every chance the real drama won’t be onstage.”
“Gossip Cop summarizes a fabricated story that was in the print edition of OK!”
““Jolie, of course, starred in the original 2001 film and its 2003 sequel, but now [Alicia] Vikander will take over the actress’s role for a new installment.”
“A so-called ‘source,’ however, tells OK!”
“...that Jolie made her disapproval of the choice clear, hours after Alicia was cast last spring.”OK!”
“...adds that the outlet’s “insider” says Jolie told the studio she was backing out of a planned cameo to make it seem like she’s just looking out for the franchise, but the reality is that Jolie is jealous about Alicia’s current success.”
“However, in the same article, Gossip Cop claims the rumor is bogus.”
““Angelina Jolie did NOT drop out of a cameo in the upcoming Tomb Raider reboot because she’s upset about Alicia Vikander being cast as Lara Croft, despite a late and wrong tabloid report.”
“Gossip Cop can once again debunk this claim.”


"[close up of Milos bicanski / Getty]"
"It's quite possible that real drama won't be on stage."
"The gossip police summed up a fabricated story that was good in print!"
"Of course, Julie starred in the original film of 2001 and the sequel of 2003, but now (Alicia) vicander will take over the role of actress in a new issue."
"However, a so-called 'source' tells us, OK!"
__ A few hours after Alicia appeared last spring, Julie made it clear that she was against the choice All right
__ Added the store's "insider" that Julie told the studio that she had pulled out of a planned guest show, making it look as if she was just looking for a franchise, but the fact is that Julie is jealous of Alicia's current success. "
"However, in the same article, the gossip police claimed that the rumor was false."
"Angelina Jolie didn't quit as a guest star in the upcoming Tomb Raider because she was upset about Alicia wickander's role as Laura Croft, despite a recent false tabloid report."
"The gossip police can debunk that again."



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images and Theo Wargo/Getty Images]”
““Katie would go to Jamie’s house and lie down in the back of a car so she wouldn’t be seen on the way in.”
“According to the latest speculation into Katie and Jamie’s personal lives, the alleged couple is spending way too much money during this courtship.”
“After Katie Holmes decided to end her troubled marriage with the Top Gun star, rumors started to surface that she is having an on-and-off relationship with former Dawson’s Creek’s co-star Joshua Jackson.”
“After that, her name was linked with How I Met Your Mother star Jason Segel.”
“If that was not it, there were several rumors that indicated her inclination toward her The Kennedys: After Camelot co-star Matthew Perry.”
“From the past three years, there are rumors that the 38-year-old Katie is having a secret and serious relationship with 49-year-old Jamie Foxx.”
“According to an insider who spoke to Life & Style, the alleged couple has put a lot of work into keeping their romance out of the media.”
“Their secret romance is all about secret trips, sworn secrecy, and disguises.”
“Not only this, they have even asked their close friends not to reveal their relationship among the paparazzi.”


"(featured images of Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images and Theo Wargo / Getty Images)"
"Katie will go to Jamie's house and lie in the back of the car to avoid being seen on the way in."
"According to the latest speculation about Katie and Jamie's private lives, the so-called couple spent too much money on courtship."
"After Katie Holmes decided to end her troubled marriage to the top gun star, rumors began to surface about her off and on relationship with former Dawson Creek co star Joshua Jackson."
"After that, her name has something to do with how I met your actress Jason Segel."
"If not, there are several rumors that she's leaning towards her Kennedy couple: after carmelot co starring Matthew Perry."
"Over the past three years, there have been rumors that Katie, 38, has a secret and serious relationship with Jamie fox, 49."
"According to an insider interviewed by life and fashion, the accused couple spent a lot of energy keeping their relationship out of the media."
"Their secret relationships are all about secret travel, swearing secrecy and disguise."
"Not only that, they even asked close friends not to reveal their relationship with the paparazzi."



Number  352
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Some of the dead passengers’ relatives have criticized the plans for a new Titanic, but Blue Star has reportedly been flooded with requests for tickets — with some offering up to about $900,000 for a spot on the first trip.”
“Its maiden voyage will not be from Southampton to New York, but rather from Jiangsu, China, to Dubai in the United Arab Emirates, the paper reported.”
“Unlike the Belfast-built original, the Titanic II is under construction by the CSC Jinling Shipyard in Jiangsu, China.”
“It also will feature the same categories of passengers — from the first-class movers and shakers to the hoi polloi in third class, where poor Leonardo DiCaprio was berthed in the classic movie.”
“She will accommodate 2,400 passengers — 177 more than the RMS Titanic.”
“The new nine-deck ship will be 885 feet long, about two more than her doomed predecessor, 174 feet high and have a maximum speed of 24 knots.”
““The new Titanic will of course have modern evacuation procedures, satellite controls, digital navigation and radar systems and all those things you’d expect on a 21st-century ship,” James McDonald, global marketing director of Palmer’s company, Blue Star Line, told the paper.”
“More importantly, it will carry enough lifeboats for every passenger and its hull will be welded, not riveted, just in case it comes across a rogue iceberg, the Belfast Telegraph reports.”
“Australian tycoon and politician Clive Palmer — not J. Bruce Ismay — is at the helm of the ambitious project to faithfully recreate the luxury ship, which will be about 13 feet wider to meet current regulations.”
“A replica of the world’s most famous “unsinkable” ship — which struck an iceberg and sank on its maiden voyage on April 15, 1912, killing 1,503 people — is under construction, with a maiden voyage planned for 2018.”


"Some relatives of the passengers who died criticized the plan to build the new Titanic, but it is reported that Blue Star Airlines has received a large number of applications for tickets - some people have offered up to $900000 for parking spaces for their first trip."
"Its first flight will not be from Southampton to New York, but from Jiangsu, China to Dubai, the United Arab Emirates."
"Unlike the original Titanic II built in Belfast, Titanic II is under construction by China Shipbuilding Jinling shipyard in Jiangsu Province."
"It will also have the same kind of passengers - from first-class porters and shakers to third-class Highbury, where poor Leonardo DiCaprio is parked in this classic movie."
"She will hold 2400 passengers - 177 more than the Royal liner Titanic."
"The new nine deck ship will be 885 feet long, about 2 feet more than her shipwrecked predecessor, 174 feet higher, with a maximum speed of 24 knots."
"The new Titanic will of course have modern evacuation procedures, satellite control, digital navigation and radar systems, and everything you expect on board in the 21st century," James McDonald, global marketing director of Palmer's blue star line, told the paper
"More importantly, it will provide enough lifeboats for every passenger, and the hull will be welded, not riveted, in case it encounters a dangerous iceberg," the Belfast Telegraph reported
Clive Palmer, an Australian tycoon and politician, is not J. Bruce Ismay. He is at the helm of the grand project, which aims to faithfully transform the luxury yacht, which will be about 13 feet wide to meet current regulations
"A replica of the world's most famous unsinkable ship, which sank on April 15, 1912 when it hit an iceberg and killed 1503 people, is under construction and is scheduled for its first voyage in 2018."



**Something goes wrong**
“This didn't sit right with me because there was a wheelchair bound person in the room who was ignored.”
“"Some people went up and were 'healed'.”
“There are also calls on its website to set up a direct deposit or have an online account so cash can be sent electronically.”
“In Hillsong's own FAQs, there are six different ways to donate money listed - including using the church's own app to transfer money immediately.”
“Hillsong 'using selective Bible verses' to encourage hefty donations(Image: Splash News) (Image: Splash News)Those who have been to Hillsong services report that leaders are swift to imply followers must give as much money as they can to the church.”
“The commission's report found Frank had sexually abused the seven-year-old boy, and had later admitted it to an assembly of church executives.”
“An investigation by Australia's Royal Commission into Institutional Responses to Child Sexual Abuse found none of the allegations against Frank Houston were ever reported to police.”
“Fresh allegations that he'd molested six other children in New Zealand in previous decades continued to dog the organisation.”
“Frank would go on to leave Hillsong and died of a stroke in 2004.”
“"Sadly there are always one or two people with their own agendas who will try and get mileage from other people's pain," Brian's missive told ministers.”


"It's not for me because there's a wheelchair person in the room who's ignored."
"Someone went up and" cured. "
"There are also calls on its website for direct deposits or online accounts so that cash can be sent electronically."
"In his own FAQ, Hilson listed six different ways to donate money - including using the church's own app to transfer money immediately."
"Hillsong 'uses selective biblical scriptures' to encourage large donations (image: splash News) (image: splash News) those who have been to Hillsong's service report that leaders quickly hinted that believers must donate as much as possible to the church."
The committee's report found that Frank sexually abused the seven year old boy, which he later admitted at a meeting of church administrators
"The Royal Australian Commission's investigation into the agency's response to child sexual abuse found that the charges against Frank Houston were never reported to the police."
"New charges that he molested six other children in New Zealand over the past few decades continue to plague the group."
"Frank left hillsson and died of a stroke in 2004."
"Unfortunately, there are always one or two people who have their own plans and they will try to extricate themselves from the suffering of others," Brian told the ministers in the letter



**Something goes wrong**
“Silver produced The Matrix, V for Vendetta, and Lethal Weapon, among many other movies.”
“SIlver’s company, Silver Pictures, and Herold are also being sued over Musgrove’s death.”
“Us Weekly exclusively reported the surprise August 2015 wedding, where other guests included Lisa Kudrow, Howard Stern and Ellen DeGeneres.”
“They will all miss her dearly.”The honeymoon festivities, which were attended by Courteney Cox, Chelsea Handler and Jason Bateman, occurred just one day after Aniston and Theroux tied the knot at their Bel Air mansion.”
“Carmel was a dear friend and respected colleague with a very bright future ahead of her.”
“After Musgrove’s death, Silver’s publicist released a statement that said, “Joel Silver, his family and his staff are devastated by the passing of Carmel Musgrove.”
“It also states that Musgrove’s death was due in part to alcohol, cocaine, work fatigue, heat stroke and swimming in choppy waters.”
“The suit questions how an email managed to be sent from her account at 7:04 a.m., if she had died during a midnight swim.”
“After more than a day of searching, her nude body was found floating in a lagoon just 500 yards away from her bungalow.”
“The staff member who supplied the matches was allegedly the last person to see her alive.”


"Silver has starred in the matrix, V for Vendetta and lethal weapons."
"Silver's company, silver pictures and Harold were also charged with the death of Musgrove."
The surprise wedding in August 2015 was exclusively reported by us weekly, with other guests including Lisa Kudrow, Howard Stern and Alan DeGeneres
"They will all miss her very much." The honeymoon celebration was held one day after Aniston and seru got married at the bellell mansion, and was attended by Courtney Cox, chercy handler and Jason Bateman
"Carmel is a dear friend and respected colleague. She has a bright future."
After Musgrove's death, silver's public relations staff issued a statement saying: "Joel Silver, his family and his staff are shocked by the death of Carmel Musgrove."
The report also noted that Musgrove's death was due in part to alcohol, cocaine, work fatigue, heatstroke and swimming in rough water
"The question of the lawsuit is how an email was sent from her account at 7:04 a.m. if she died swimming in the middle of the night."
"After more than a day of searching, her naked body was found floating in a lagoon 500 yards from the bungalow."
"The match provider is said to be the last to see her alive."



**Something goes wrong**
““She would bring pictures of my mother and grandmother.”Odom’s tell-all will hit shelves in February 2019.”
“She played a major role in me getting my memory back,” he admitted.”
““Hell, yeah [I was surprised she was at my side].”
“...him stay clean...”
“We get to read about a side of Lamar Odom we never got to see on Keeping Up With the Kardashians or Khloe Lamar nor on the basketball court Odom opened up about his sobriety during a March 2017 interview with Us and revealed that the Revenge Body host helped...”
““He will also talk about … what really went on in those hospital doors and what the world didn’t get to see as well as rehab,” the source adds.”
“The Kardashian clan rushed to his side and helped aide him back to health.”
“The former Lakers star made headlines in October 2015 when he was hospitalized for a near-fatal drug overdose at a Nevada brothel.”
“An insider now tells Us that the basketball star will reflect on his tumultuous relationship with the Good American founder, 33, and discuss “what led to the end” of the marriage.”
““I hope to [be] an inspiration to many that you can overcome adversity and challenge no matter where you fall from.”Us broke the news in February that Odom’s “juicy” page-turner will cover his battle with drug use, his career in the NBA and marriage to Khloé Kardashian.”


"She'll bring pictures of my mother and grandmother." Odom's tell it all will be on sale in February 2019
"She played an important role in restoring my memory," he admits
"Hell, yes (I'm surprised she's standing next to me)."
__ Keep him clean... "
"We have read about Odom. We have never seen him keep up with Kardashian or heroramal, nor have we seen him on the basketball court. In an interview with us in March 2017, Odom disclosed his soberness and revealed that the vengeful host helped us..."
"He will also talk about What happened on the doors of those hospitals and what the world didn't see in terms of rehabilitation, "the source added
"The Kardashian family rushed to him to help him recover."
"The former Laker star made headlines in October 2015 when he was hospitalized with a drug overdose in a Nevada brothel."
"An insider told us that the basketball star would reflect on his troubled relationship with the 33 year old good American founder and discuss the outcome of the marriage."
"I hope to inspire many people to overcome adversity and challenges no matter where they fall." In February this year, the US media reported that Odom's "juicy" page will cover his fight against drugs, his NBA career and his marriage to Kardashian



**Something goes wrong**
“We’ll continue to follow Blake and Gwen’s adorable romance and we hope they continue living their best lives together if it makes them happy!”
“That would be awesome to see now wouldn’t it?!”
“There are even reports that they would love for him to propose to their mom so that they can call him their stepdad.”
“It seems Gwen’s boys, who she had with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 52, love Blake just as much as he loves them!”
“Although Blake doesn’t have any children of his own, his family outings with Gwen and her boys prove he’d be the best dad ever.”
“It’s always wonderful to see such love and support between families!”
“Gwen and Blake often express their admiration for each other in public interviews and Blake truly seems to love spending time with Gwen’s boys as if they were his own.”
“From fishing trips in Blake’s hometown in Oklahoma to other holiday outings like the one on Easter, it’s always amazing to see how in tune they all seem to be around each other!”
“The holiday outing is just one of many that Blake, Gwen and her boys have been on together since the loving couple started dating back in 2015.”
“The precious party of five were all dressed in business casual attire that included button-down shirts and pants for the boys while Gwen rocked a black jacket, a pair of black leggings and leopard print heeled boots.”


"We will continue to pay attention to Blake and Gwen's lovely romantic story, if it can make them happy, we hope they will continue to live the best life!"
"It's great to see that now, isn't it?"
"There are even reports that they want him to propose to their mother so they can call him stepfather."
"It seems Gwen's children, she and her 52 year old ex husband Gavin Rossdale, love Blake as much as he loves them!"
"Although black has no children of his own, his family outing with Gwen and his sons proves that he is the best father ever."
"It's always nice to see such love and support between families!"
"Gwen and Blake often express their admiration for each other in public interviews. Blake seems to really like being with Gwen's children as if they were his own."
"From Blake's fishing trip in Oklahoma to other holiday outings like Easter, it's always amazing to see them all together!"
"Black, Gwen and her children have been together since the couple started dating in 2015, and the holiday outing is just one of them."
"All five of the valuable parties wore business casual clothes, including button shirts and pants for boys, while Gwen wore a black jacket, a pair of black tights and leopard print high heels."



**Something goes wrong**
“One of the smartest human beings I’ve ever met and also an incredible mother.””
““She’s an amazing, amazing girl.”
““We’re having a great time,” A-Rod said of his budding romance with the entertainer, who shares 9-year-old twins Emme and Max with ex-husband Marc Anthony, during a March appearance on The View.”
“I feel really lucky right now, so I’m excited about life, but I’m more excited for people to get to see who he really is.”And the feeling is mutual.”
““He’s caring and sweet and capable and responsible and just all the beautiful things you would want a man to be.”
““He’s a generous human being with his family, with his friends, with me,” Lopez told the outlet.”
“Lo told Extra that her beau is “a beautiful person” and a “loving father” to his daughters, Natasha, 12, and Ella, 9, whom he shares with ex-wife Cynthia Scurtis.”
“Earlier this month, J.”
““So she’s trying to control as much as she can.”Despite the brief setback, the couple have had no problem gushing over each other in recent interviews.”
““She’s really into Alex and wants it to work,” the source adds.”


"One of the smartest people I've ever met is an incredible mother."
"She's a great girl."
"We had a good time," A-Rod said of his budding relationship with the artist, who shared nine year old twins Amy and max with his ex husband, Marc Anthony, on the March show viewpoint
"I feel really lucky now, so I'm very excited about life, but I hope people can see who he is." This feeling is mutual
"He is considerate, lovely, capable and responsible, which is all the good things you want a man to be."
"He was generous to his family, friends and me," Lopez told the media
Lo told extra that her boyfriend is a "beautiful man," the "loving father" of his daughters Natasha, 12, and Ella, 9, who share two daughters with his ex-wife Cynthia scutis
"Early this month, J."
"So she controls her emotions as much as she can." Despite a brief setback, in a recent interview, the couple had no problem talking to each other
"She really likes Alex and hopes it works," the source added



Number  358
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We’ll have to wait and see!”
“Perhaps they’ll take the step at a chapel in Vegas?”
“Although there’s been speculation that Gwen and Blake are thinking about possibly getting married in the near future, there’s been no official word yet.”
“She’s set to kick off a series of concerts at Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino on June 27 and a source previously told us that Blake can’t wait to babysit her boys when she’s off doing her thing!”
“When she’s not spending time with Blake and her kids, Gwen’s been preparing for her upcoming residency in Las Vegas.”
“Seeing the happy couple married seems like it would only intensify the cuteness!”
“From going on adorable fishing trips in Blake’s home state of Oklahoma to spending holidays such as Easter together, Gwen and Blake’s clan always look cozy and comfortable together.”
“With how much time Gwen’s boys and Blake spend together it’s not entirely surprising that they would love him to make things official.”
“Their bond is strong with Blake and the older boys are confused as to why mom and Blake aren’t married already.” Aw!”
“The kids put pressure on Blake and make it known to him that they wish he was their stepdad.”


"We can only wait and see!"
"Maybe they'll take a step in a chapel in Vegas?"
"Although there is speculation that Gwen black is considering a possible marriage in the near future, there is no official information yet."
"She will start a series of concerts at Hollywood planet Resort and casinos on June 27. A source told us before that Blake can't wait to take care of her children when she does her thing!"
"When Gwen didn't have time for Blake and her children, she was preparing for the upcoming trip to Las Vegas."
"To see this happy couple get married only seems to aggravate loveliness!"
"From a lovely fishing trip in black's home state of Oklahoma to holidays like Easter together, Gwen and black's tribe always seem very comfortable and comfortable together."
"It's not surprising that Gwen's children spend so much time with black that they want him to make it public."
"They are so close to black that the older boys don't understand why mom and black are not married yet." Ah
"The children put pressure on Blake to let him know that they want him to be their stepfather."



Number  359
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here's hoping "Gaga: Five Foot Two," which will be available on September 22 on Netflix, inspires others suffering to transform the pain.”
“In a press conference, Gaga said that the "pain is a microphone" and it "does me no good unless I transform it into something that is," Variety reports.”
“The singer has previously spoken about her battle with the disorder on social media.”
“Fibromyalgia causes widespread pain and is not curable.”
“In 2016, Lady Gaga revealed an Instagram post is 2016 that she suffers from "chronic pain" but never gave more details.”
“But in her upcoming documentary, "Gaga: Five Foot Two," the singer and actress dives a little deeper into the disease she's been battling for some time.”
“The singer recently tweeted that the chronic pain she deals with is fibromyalgia, a disorder that is more common than people may think.”
“In the tweet, she wrote that she wants to, " help raise awareness and connect people who have it," CNN reports.”
“Fibromyalgia is a chronic pain disorder that causes tenderness to touch or pain over the body.”
“According to the National Fibromyalgia & Chronic Pain Association, the disease can vary in intensity and affects people "physically, mentally, and socially."”


"I hope it's on Netflix on September 22_ Gaga:Five Foot  "Two" can inspire other suffering people to change their suffering
At a press conference, Gaga said that "pain is a microphone" and that "it's not good for me unless I turn it into something," the variety show reported
"The singer has previously talked on social media about her fight against the disease."
"Fibromyalgia causes extensive pain and cannot be cured."
"In 2016, Lady Gaga revealed on instagram that she suffered from" chronic pain, "but never gave more details."
"But in her upcoming documentary Gaga: five feet two, the singer and actress delve deeper into the diseases she has been fighting for some time."
"The singer recently tweeted that her chronic pain is fibromyalgia, a more common disease than people think."
"She tweeted that she wanted to" help raise awareness and connect with people who have it, "CNN reported
"Fibromyalgia is a chronic pain disorder that can lead to tenderness or general pain."
According to the national fibromyalgia and chronic pain Association, the intensity of the disease varies, affecting people's physical, psychological and social life



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments section below.”
“Selena feels the time in their relationship is right, they are happy, comfortably in love again, and she is really hoping that Christmas with Justin will happen.” We “They are trying to be extra cautious and careful with things this time around in their relationship.”
“A source close to her EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com that Selena wants to spend Christmas with Justin.”
“Selena Gomez, 25, is back together with Justin Bieber, 23, and while it was too soon for the two of them to spend Thanksgiving together, a source close to Selena EXCLUSIVELY told us she’s hoping he’ll be home for Christmas.”
““Selena is really hoping that Justin will spend Christmas with her and her family,” our source said.”
““The timing was not right for them to share Thanksgiving together, and Selena was a bit disappointed they were apart for the holiday.”
“She missed him terribly over Thanksgiving, and Selena doesn’t want to spend another holiday apart.”Selena are trying to take things slowly because it is important to her that her family approves of things.”
“They want to do things the right way and they both want to be very respectful of their families,” the source went on to say.”
““Christmas is her favorite holiday of the year, and her family means everything to Selena .”
“She feels it would be made more perfect if she could share the big day with both her family and Justin… the two most important things in her life.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Serena thinks it's time for them to fall in love. They are happy and comfortable again. She really wants to spend Christmas with Justin." We "they're going to be very careful this time."
An exclusive source close to her told reporters that Selena wants to spend Christmas with Justin
"Selena Gomez, 25, and Justin Bieber, 23, are back together again. Although it's too early for them to spend Thanksgiving together, a source close to Selena told us exclusively that she hopes he can go home for Christmas."
"Selena really wants Justin to spend Christmas with her and her family," our source said
"It's not the right time for them to share Thanksgiving together. Selena is a little disappointed that they are separated for the holiday."
"She missed him so much at Thanksgiving that Selena didn't want to spend another holiday apart." Serena is trying to take her time, because it's important for her to have family approval
"They want to do things the right way, and they all want to respect their families very much," the source added
"Christmas is her favorite holiday of the year, and her family means everything to Serena."
"She felt it would be more perfect if she could share this important day with her family and Justin These are the two most important things in her life



Number  361
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer thinks she can achieve that by finding “a younger guy [who] doesn’t want to settle down.” Get it, girl!”
“Jen’s all about having fun “without falling in love,” a source close to Jennifer EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
“Angie reportedly rejected meeting with Jen, as she’s livid that Brad Pitt and Jen are friends again!”
“Can we ever have peace in our time?”
“Jennifer Aniston, 49 reportedly “extended an invitation” to sit down with Angelina Jolie, 42, over dinner, sources tell In Touch magazine.”
““Jen thought it was finally time to resolve the past,” an insider said, adding that since her marriage with Justin Theroux, 46, is over, Jen “wants a fresh start on all fronts.” However, Angelina supposedly turned the invite down!”
“When Jen asked why Angie refused to meet her, the Girl, Interrupted star said “she didn’t owe her an apology,” per the source.”
““The whole idea to get together for dinner turned into a disaster.”So, why did Angie go all Maleficent on Jen’s attempt to squash their beef?”
“Well, Jen and Brad Pitt, 52, have reportedly rekindled their friendship following her spit from Justin.”
“The two supposedly have these late night meetings, all set up by Brad’s bud George Clooney, 56, and it’s like old times again.”


Jennifer thinks she can do it by finding "a young man who doesn't want to settle down!"
A source close to Jennifer told reporters exclusively: "everything about Jennifer is to have fun without falling in love."
According to reports, Angie refused to meet Jane because she was angry that Brad Pitt and Jane had become friends again
"Can there be peace in our time?"
According to reports, 49 year old Jennifer Aniston "invited" Angelina Jolie, 42, to dinner, the source told touch magazine
"Jane thinks it's time to solve the past," an insider said, adding that as her marriage to Justin seru, 46, has ended, Jane "hopes to have a new start in all aspects." However, Angelina should have declined the invitation! "
When asked why Angie refused to see her, the girl interrupted the starry sky saying, "she shouldn't apologize to her."
"The idea of getting together for dinner turned out to be a disaster." So why is Angie so hard on Jan trying to crush their beef? "
"Well, Jen and Brad Pitt, 52, are reported to have rekindled their friendship after Justin spat on her."
"These two people should have these late night meetings, arranged by Brad's bud George Clooney, 56, and now it's like it used to be."



**Something goes wrong**
“The bulk of which comes from her many endorsement deals with companies like Smart Water, Emirates airline and Aveeno Skincare.”
“Just last year, Aniston was ranked the second-highest paid actress on Forbes' annual list, earning $25.5 million.”
“We're breaking down Aniston and Theroux's multimillion dollar empire below:Together, the A-list pair is estimated to be worth upwards of $240 million, with Jennifer racking up a net worth of $220 million and Justin falling at a more modest $20 million.”
“So how will the breakup impact the health of their individual assets and overall worth?”
“Publicly at least, Jen and Justin have yet to file divorce documents.”
“In a joint statement released Thursday, the now-exes revealed they split at the conclusion of 2017 following a "mutual" decision to "lovingly" call it quits.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have separated after less than three years of marriage, leaving many to wonder what's at stake financially as the chips fall where they may.”


"Most of it comes from many endorsement agreements she signed with smart water, Emirates and Aveeno skincare."
"Just last year, Aniston ranked second on the Forbes annual list, earning $25.5 million."
"We're destroying the multi million dollar empire of Aniston and seru. Together, it's estimated that the A-class stars are worth more than 240 million dollars, Jennifer's net worth is 220 million dollars, and Justin's worth is down to 20 million dollars
"So how will the breakup affect the health and overall value of their personal assets?"
"At least in public, Jane and Justin haven't filed their divorce papers."
"In a joint statement released on Thursday, the two current ex boyfriends revealed that they broke up at the end of 2017 after the two sides" jointly "decided to announce their breakup" amicably. "
"Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru separated after less than three years of marriage, which makes many people wonder what their financial situation will be like as the chips go down."



**Something goes wrong**
“News, the couple spent Valentine’s Day house-hunting in L.A. “They visited two homes in the $8 million–$10 million range with a broker who gave them tours,” a source told the site.”
“Photo: SOVE, GICE/Stoianov/Max - Lopes/Geva / BACKAccording to E!”
“The Sun reported this weekend that one source of contention in his marriage to Aniston was his desire to party with the New York art scene Specifically Sun sources claimed that Aniston was upset over Theroux s desire to hang out with 25 year old photographer and art beauty Petra...”
“What life does he want to live?”
“So: Theroux initiated the breakup and took it public before Aniston was ready because … why?”
“), and Aniston agreed to release a statement the next day.”
““He wanted to make the announcement so he can live his life.” Theroux apparently flew to L.A. to talk to Aniston three days after her birthday (on Valentine’s Day!”
““Jen hoped that Justin would be low-key on her birthday so people weren’t wondering why he wasn’t with her, but that’s not Justin’s style,” People’s source said.”
“Instead, he walked around getting photographed in New York throughout Aniston’s birthday weekend, while Aniston celebrated at home with girlfriends in L.A. (We definitely noticed that last week.)”
“In one report, published Sunday, a source close to Aniston told People that “Jen didn’t want to announce [the split] for as long as possible, because she wanted to avoid the media attention.” But Theroux didn’t play ball.”


According to sources, the couple were looking for a house in Los Angeles on Valentine's day. "They visited two homes worth between $8 million and $10 million with an agent," a source told the website
"Photo: SOFF, GISE / Stoyanov / max Lopez / Geva / buck, according to e!"
The Sun reported this weekend that one of the sources of controversy in Aniston's marriage was that he wanted to have a party in the art world in New York. In particular, sources in the sun said that Aniston was upset that seru wanted to be with Petra, a 25-year-old photographer and artistic beauty
"What kind of life does he want?"
"So: before Aniston was ready, Cyrus broke up and made it public, because Why? "
He and Aniston agreed to make a statement the next day
"He wants to announce the news so that he can live his own life." Seru apparently flew to Los Angeles to talk to Aniston three days after her birthday
"Jennifer wants Justin to keep a low profile on her birthday so people won't wonder why he's not with her, but it's not Justin's style," the person familiar with the matter said
"On the contrary, on Aniston's birthday weekend, he was walking around New York to take pictures, while Aniston was celebrating at home with her girlfriend in Los Angeles (we must have noticed that last week)
In a report published on Sunday, a source close to Aniston told people, "Jennifer doesn't want to announce as long as possible because she wants to avoid media attention." But serrux didn't play



**Something goes wrong**
“AdvertisementIf Blake Shelton does pop the question to Stefani, they will surely let everyone know as soon as it happens, and there is no telling just how Miranda Lambert will react to the news.”
“While performing at Luke Bryan’s Crash My Playa festival in Mexico, he covered George Strait’s hit All My Exes Live in Texas.”
“New reports claims that they still get under each other’s skin, and Lambert “can’t stand” her ex’s high-profile romance with Gwen Stefani.”
“So, how will she react if Blake Shelton proposes to Gwen Stefani on Valentine’s Day?”
“That there is still animosity between the former couple and it is all because Shelton parades his relationship with Stefani around for the world to see.”
“An insider claims that seeing Shelton happy with his hot girlfriend “burns” Lambert.”
““I do this thing called whatever I want” pic.twitter.com/C3TawRy5FW — Miranda Lambert (@mirandalambert) February 7, 2018The insider went on to say that Shelton and Lambert have traded scathing messages, and she has accused him of using Stefani to make her jealous.”
“But, Shelton allegedly responds that Stefani has everything that Lambert doesn’t.”
“It seems the former couple may be still throwing jabs at each other even though they have both moved on to happy relationships.”
“Shelton and Stefani have been together since late 2015, and Lambert has been with Anderson East for about the same amount of time.”


"If Blake Sheldon really asked Stefani this question, they would let everyone know, and it's not clear how Miranda Lambert will react to the news."
"While performing at Luke Bryan's crash my playa festival in Mexico, he reported on all my exes live in Texas, a hit by George straight in Texas
New reports say they are still under each other's skin, and Lambert "can't stand" the high-profile romance between her ex boyfriend and Gwen Stephanie
"So if Blake Sheldon proposed to Gwen Stephanie on Valentine's day, how would she react?"
"There is still hostility between the first two because Sheldon shows the world his relationship with Stephanie."
A person familiar with the matter claimed that seeing Sheldon happy with his sexy girlfriend would make Lambert "furious"
"I do it, I do what I want" pic.twitter.com/C3TawRy5FW -On February 7, 2018, Miranda Lambert (@ Miranda Lambert) went on to say that Sheldon and Lambert exchanged stern messages, accusing him of using Stephanie to make her jealous. "
"But Sheldon is said to have responded that Stefani has everything Lambert doesn't have."
"It seems that the former couple may still be attacking each other, even though they have already started a happy relationship."
"Sheldon and Stefani have been together since the end of 2015, and Lambert and Anderson East have been together for about the same time."



Number  365
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What do you think Brad and Angie should do, HollywoodLifers?”
“So, don’t expect Ms. Jolie to join the Pitts for a Missouri-style family Christmas.”
“We’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned Brad Pitt fears Angelina Jolie will take their kids on a trip for the holiday, leaving him to spend Christmas alone!”
“Someone better cue up that Elvis Presley song, because Brad Pitt, 53, is headed for a “Blue Christmas,” especially if Angelina Jolie, 42, is particularly Grinchy when Christmas rolls around.”
“What Brad wants more for the holiday is not a present or a toy, but a chance to spend the time with his kids —Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
““The holidays are extra hard for Brad,” a colleague of the Fury star EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““He misses his kids more than ever.”
“He does get to see them but it’s not nearly as much as he would like and it’s always up to Angelina when it happens.”Brad and Angie’s custody setup isn’t just hard on him, but also on Brad’s parents.”
““They’re not seeing their grandchildren the way they would like to be,” the insider tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““They would love Brad to bring them all to Missouri for Christmas but it’s very unlikely Angelina will go for that, she’s not going to want to be without them on Christmas.”


"What do you think Brad and Angie should do, Hollywood stars?"
"So don't expect Julie and the Pitts to have a Missouri family Christmas together."
"We learned that Brad Pitt was worried that Angelina Jolie would take her children on holiday and leave him alone for Christmas!"
"It's better to be reminded of Elvis Presley's song, because Brad Pitt, 53, is going to have a" blue Christmas, "especially if Angelina Jolie, 42, grins at Christmas."
"What Brad wants most for his holiday is not a gift or toy, but an opportunity to spend it with his children - 16-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox."
"It's a very difficult holiday for Brad," an angry star colleague told reporters exclusively Hollywood life. "
"He missed his children more than ever."
"He does have a chance to see them, but it's not as much as he wants, and it's up to Angelina every time." Brad and Angie's custody arrangements are difficult not only for him, but also for Brad's parents
"The way they see their grandchildren is not what they want," the insider told reporters Hollywood life. "
"They want Brad to take them all to Missouri for Christmas, but Angelina is unlikely to do that. She doesn't want to be without them at Christmas."



Number  366
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Therefore, although Kate reportedly is also jealous of the attention that Meghan has received, the source clarified that Middleton has refrained from uniting with Beatrice and Eugenie.”
“She reportedly experienced her own share of jealousy and hostility from the two princesses when she first began to date William.”
““They were previously up in arms about Prince William marrying a commoner in Kate back in 2011, but apparently [that scenario] pales in comparison to Harry deciding to marry an American actress,” added the palace insider.”
“But this time Beatrice and Eugenie are even angrier.”
““[Beatrice and Eugenie are] taking their frustrations out on Meghan.”If this scenario sounds familiar, the princesses’ attitude toward Markle in 2017 parallels their jealousy toward Kate Middleton in 2011.”
“The two princesses even are reportedly complaining to their grandmother while aiming at Markle, according to the source.”
“Meghan has become a convenient scapegoat.”
“Their father, Prince Andrew, reportedly encouraged their snobbish behavior, even whining to the queen about the lack of attention given to his princess daughters.”
“The insider explained that Beatrice and Eugenie already have a reputation for being snobs.”
“That invitation reportedly angered Middleton, but Princess Beatrice and Princess Eugenie are even more irate than Kate, according to the source.”


"As a result, although Kate is also reported to be jealous of Megan's attention, the source clarified that Middleton is not associated with Beatrice and Eugenie."
"It is reported that when she first started dating William, she also experienced the jealousy and hostility of the two princesses."
"They've had a big fight about Prince William marrying a civilian of Kate in 2011, but it's obviously dwarfed by Harry's decision to marry an American actress," the palace insider added
"But this time Beatrice and Eugenie are more angry."
"(Beatrice and Eugenie) take their frustrations out on Megan. "If that sounds familiar, the Princesses' attitude towards markel in 2017 is similar to their jealousy towards Kate Middleton in 2011."
"It is reported that the two princesses even complained to their grandmother when they aimed at mackle."
"Megan has become a convenient scapegoat."
According to reports, their father Prince Andrew encouraged their snobbish behavior and even complained to the queen about the neglect of the princess's daughter
"The insider explained that Beatrice and Eugenie already have a snobbish reputation."
"Middleton is reported to have been infuriated by the invitation, but according to sources, Princess Beatrice and Princess Eugenie are even more infuriated than Kate."



**Something goes wrong**
“THR reports that he made a deal for $7 million per season.”
“Though this is considered normal for new coaches, it was $5 million less than Miley, who started on the same season.”
“Perhaps he should get wife Behati Prinsloo to join the show?”
“Unfortunately the duo isn’t as close as they once were, and their friendship now seems “forced” off-air.”
“The difference in pay might be at the core of their recent rift that Life & Style recently learned about.”
“He’s also been a coach since Season 1, and has won 3 seasons.”
“Adam Levine’s The Voice SalaryAdam was apparently being paid the same as Blake before the Gwen stuff came about according to The Wrap, so he is likely still around $13 million per season (which is $26 million per year!).”
“We’d be lying if we said watching their romance unfold on the show isn’t a huge draw when they appear together!”
“The Wrap reported that Blake made about $13 million per season as of 2016, but insiders told Radar that that number is even higher now because he and girlfriend Gwen Stefani negotiated together to get huge bonuses.”
“He’s a fan-favorite, he’s been there since the beginning, and his team has won five times!”


"Thr reports he's sold for $7 million a season."
"Although it's normal for the new coach, it's five million dollars less than Miley at the start of the same season."
"Maybe he should have his wife, Beth prinslow, on the show?"
"Unfortunately, the couple are not as close as they used to be, and their friendship now seems" forced "to stop."
"The pay gap may be at the heart of what life and fashion recently learned about their recent rift."
"He has been a coach since the first season and has won three seasons
According to reports, Adam Levine's "the voice salary Adam" is obviously the same as Blake's, so his pay per season may still be around $13 million (that's $26 million per year!)
"If we say it's not a huge attraction to see their romance on the show when they show up together, we're lying!"
"It is reported that Blake earned about $13 million a season as of 2016, but insiders told radar that the figure is even higher now because he negotiated with his girlfriend Gwen Stefani for a huge bonus."
"He's a fan's favorite, he's been there from the beginning, his team won five times!"



Number  368
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Kim teamed hers with a pair of snakeskin strappy sandals and matching bag, Khloe ramped up the glam factor with chunky gold jewels, cream jacket, white heels, and a head of bouncy curls.”
“And it's pretty much an identical look to the one Kimmy K wore when she and hubby-to-be Kanye West went out for dinner to Mr Chow in Beverly Hills a week ago.”
“The 29-year-old reality beauty posted a photo montage of her wearing a white ribbed crop top and white clinging pencil skirt to her 7, 593, 886 Instagram followers on Saturday.”
“(Image: Splash)It isn't only Bruce who is taking influence from Kim, sister Khloe pinched Kim's figure-hugging white outfit - apparently straight out of her wardrobe.”
“#KUWTK."”
“Let that sit with you for a minute.”
“One fan tweeted: "Bruce Jenner has his nails painted, and is wearing a pony tail and bobby pins.”
“Those eagle eyed fans spotted on Sunday night’s episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians, which was filmed before his October split from Kris, his nails looked odd.”
“Radar said Bruce has been "rocking" the delicate look for some time.”
“(Image: Splash)There was the announcement Bruce wanted to have his Adam’s Apple shaved down.”


"When Kim comes with a pair of snakeskin lace up sandals and a matching bag, Khloe uses chunks of gold jewelry, a cream jacket, white heels and a stretch curly hair to boost her appeal."
"It's as like as two peas in a week ago when Kimmy K and her husband Kanye West had dinner with Mr. Zhou at Beverly Hills."
On Saturday, the 29 year old reality TV beauty released a montage photo of her in a white rib jacket and a white tight pencil skirt to 7593886 instagram fans
"(image: splash) it's not just Bruce who is influenced by Kim. Sister Khloe holds Kim's figure and hugs her white suit - apparently straight out of her closet."
"Kutke."
"Let it sit with you for a while."
"Bruce Jenner has painted his nails and wears a ponytail and a pin," one fan tweeted
"Sharp eyed fans saw him in" follow Kardashian "on Sunday night, before he broke up with Chris in October, and his nails looked strange."
"Radar says Bruce has been" rocking "the delicate look for some time."
(image: splash) Bruce announced that he was going to shave his Adam apple



Number  369
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s hard.””
“I’ve never seen my thighs so big, and my boobs, they’re in the way of everything.”
““It’s not just your belly — everything gets bigger.”
““Everything’s uncomfortable,” she laments.”
““They were like, ‘Eva’s fat.’ ”Image zoom Credit: FLIGHTRELATED VIDEO: Eva Longoria Is Going to “Live in Leggings” for the Remainder of PregnancyThe star admits that even though she sometimes forgets she’s pregnant, expecting her first child has brought a ton of changes to her body.”
““And finally, the tabloids came out and they were like, ‘Eva’s gained weight.’ ”“And I was like, ‘I am pregnant!’ ” Longoria explains.”
“...had a pizza and they re like Baby bump she explains...”
“Image zoom The Desperate Housewives alum 43 jokes that it was easy to keep her news under wraps from the public since her pregnancy has been incorrectly reported every month for the last 20 years of my life I had a burger and they re like Eva s pregnant I”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”


"It's hard."
"I've never seen my thighs so big, and my breasts, they get in the way of everything."
"It's not just your stomach - it's getting bigger."
"Nothing is comfortable," she lamented
"They're like" EVA's fat. " Photo zoom: flight related video: Eva Longoria will "live in tights" for the rest of her pregnancy. The star admits that although she sometimes forgets that she is pregnant, having her first child has brought a lot of changes to her body
"In the end, the tabloids came out and they said," EVA's getting fat. " I said, "I'm pregnant! "Longoria explained
__ After eating a pizza, they were like baby bumps, she explained
"It's easy to hide her information from the public because her pregnancy was wrongly reported every month for the last 20 years of my life. I ate a hamburger and they were like EVA pregnant me," she joked
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"



**Something goes wrong**
““Colombia has come on to the radar recently.””
““We don’t know,” he admitted.”
“Abasolo previously teased the possibility of having two ceremonies: one in Dallas, where the couple lives, and one in Colombia, where he is from.”
“Weddings aren’t about you, they’re about the guests, so I want for our family and friends to come together and have an incredible time celebrating our love,” he said.”
““I want everyone to have a good time.”
““It’s about mixing our cultures, and he’s Colombian, and I want all of our cultures celebrated.”RELATED VIDEO: ‘Bachelorette’ Rachel Lindsay Reveals How Her Engagement Ring Was Partially Inspired by BeyoncéAs for what Abasolo wants?”
““I want it to have all of both of our families,” says Lindsay.”
““Now, I’m thinking, if the network is paying for it, I want a great band performing.”She also wants to make sure both of their different cultures are represented during the ceremony.”
““I never thought I would have a big wedding, I always thought that when I get married it would be a small, simple ceremony, and then have a big party afterward,” she said.”
“Image zoom Rachel Lindsay and Bryan Abasolo | Credit: Paul Morigi/WireImageAnd Lindsay, 32, does see some perks to letting ABC front the bill.”


"Colombia has recently received attention."
"We don't know," he admitted
Abasolo has previously teased the possibility of two Weddings: one in Dallas, where the couple live, and the other in Colombia, where he comes from
"The wedding is not for you, but for the guests, so I hope our family and friends can get together and have a good time celebrating our love," he said
"I hope you have a good time."
"It's about mixing our culture, he's Colombian, and I want all of our cultures to be celebrated." Related video: "Bachelor" Rachel Lindsay reveals how her engagement ring was partly inspired by Beyonce, and what does abasolo want? "
"I want it to have all our families," Lindsay said
"Now, I'm thinking, if the TV station pays, I want a great band to perform." She also wanted to make sure that their two different cultures were reflected in the ceremony
"I never thought I would have a big wedding. I always thought it would be a simple ceremony and then a big party," she said
"Picture zooming Rachel Lindsay and Brian abasolo | source: Paul morige / WireImage and Lindsay, 32, does see the benefits of getting ABC to pay in advance."



Number  371
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For a look back at J.Lo’s dating history, click through the gallery below!”
“Jen, who shares eight-year-old twins Max and Emme with Marc, “didn’t want to put the kids through the emotional turmoil of possibly getting back together with their dad if it wasn’t on solid ground,” the source added.”
“Just weeks after the “Ain’t Your Mama” singer was spotted getting cozy with the Canadian rapper on Instagram, sources are revealing exclusively to Life & Style that Marc Anthony is “absolutely devastated.”MORE: Jennifer Lopez Suffers Wardrobe Malfunction on the Red Carpet!”
“Marc and J.Lo, who divorced in 2014 after 10 years of marriage, shared a kiss at the Latin Grammys — and Marc, 48, was hoping to rekindle their relationship after filing for divorce from his fourth wife Shannon De Lima.”
“Marc “has never stopped loving her,” says an insider.”
““He wants her back.”Last month, Life & Style reported that Jennifer was talking marriage again with Marc, whom she called “the love of her life.” However, she’s hesitant to get back together with her ex and is currently smitten by Drake, 30.”
““She was having major doubts because of the trust issues she’s always had with Marc,” the source says.”
“MORE: Sign Up For Our Newsletter to Keep Up to Date On All Life & Style Exclusives!”
“Meanwhile, the brunette beauty has reportedly already introduced her kids to the Degrassi alum.”
“For more exclusive celebrity news, be sure to pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now.”


"To review J.Lo's dating history, please click on the gallery below!"
"Jennifer and mark share 8-year-old twins, Max and Amy, and she doesn't want the children to experience emotional chaos. Without a solid foundation, they may reunite with their father," the source added
Just a few weeks ago, after the "not your mother" singer was found on instagram to get along well with Canadian rappers, an exclusive source told life and fashion that Mark Antony "completely collapsed.". More information: Jennifer Lopez has a wardrobe problem on the red carpet
"Mark and J. law divorced in 2014 after 10 years of marriage, and they shared a kiss at the Latin Grammy Awards ceremony - mark, 48, hopes to rekindle their relationship after he filed for divorce from his fourth wife, Shannon Delima."
"Mark" never stopped loving her, "said one insider
"He wants her back." Last month, life and fashion magazine reported that Jennifer was talking about marriage with mark again. She called Mark "the love of her life". However, she hesitated to reunite with her ex boyfriend and is now fascinated by Drake, 30
"She has great doubts because she has been having trust issues with mark," the source said
"More: sign up for our newsletters and learn about the latest life and style exclusive!"
Meanwhile, it is reported that the brunette has introduced de grassie alum to her children
"To get more exclusive celebrity news, be sure to buy the latest issue of life and fashion at the newsstand immediately



**Something goes wrong**
““Years later, she’s planning a family, in a place and time in her life where she can support children.”
““After the Obamacare mandate, she was able to get an IUD,” Davis said.”
“Jennifer Lawson, 43, a best-selling author and blogger from San Antonio, used the hashtag to share how she used birth control in her youth to control excruciating cramps.”
“That was ramen noodle packages for a month.”Phipps, like many women, took to social media to express outrage, often using the hashtag #HandsoffmyBC.”
““For a generic mini pill, it was $30 a month, and with no job and student loans, that was a big deal.”
““I remember when I was in college and having to pay for it,” she said.”
““Personally, that’s why it’s important to me for birth control to be covered,” said Phipps, who works as an art director in Denver, “but I also believe it’s very important to women as a family planning method.”
“I might even have it, because many women don’t even know it’s there until the symptoms start.”Phipps herself was on the pill for 11 years and believes it might have protected her from developing the condition that has plagued the women in her family.”
“My mom had it when she was 27 and had a portion of both of her ovaries removed.”
““Endometriosis is a very common problem.”


"A few years later, she's planning a family, a place and a time in her life where she can support her children."
"With the authorization of Obamacare, she was able to get an IUD," Davis said
Jennifer Lawson, 43, a San Antonio best-selling writer and blogger, uses the label to share how she used contraception to control severe cramps when she was young
"That's a one month Ramen set meal." Phelps, like many women, expresses anger on social media, often using the label "hands of my BC."
"For an ordinary Mini pill, it's $30 a month, no jobs or student loans, which is a big deal."
"I remember when I was in college, I had to pay for it," she said
"Personally, that's why family planning is important to me, but I also believe that as a family planning method, family planning is very important to women," said Phelps, artistic director in Denver
"I may even have this disease because many women don't know where it is until the symptoms appear." Phelps, who has been taking the pill for 11 years, believes it may protect her from the diseases that afflict her family's women
"My mom got it when she was 27, and she had both ovaries partially removed."
"Endometriosis is a very common problem."



Number  373
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(I will not Google that)”
“..isn't Patty his fucking MOM'S name?!”
“During that journey to wealth and riches, you don't think he was a pass-around Patty to powerful men, like the execrable pervert Kevin Spacey, whose face has always been characterized by smugness and perversion?”
“With a very cute face and hairless young body and a stage mother who pushed her little boy into show biz.”
“He was the sacrifice.”
“Biebs is a bona-fide prolapsed asshole to be sure, but he is an uneducated high school dropout who came from a family that went for the money, and he became world-famous when he was a naive kid.”
“And the money beckons.”
“We all know that when you make it as massive as Biebs did, with no solid family to ground him, a lot of dark shit unfolds.”
“He was a cherubic kid with a lot of musical talent, and then the story goes that Usher "discovered" him on YouTube and the rest is history.”
“...and sons do and no hope in hell of a future...”


"I won't Google this"
"Isn't Patty his mother's name?"
"Don't you think he was a pass to the powerful people around patty, such as the hateful pervert Kevin Spacey, whose face was always characterized by pretentiousness and perversity?"
"She has a very lovely face, a hairless young body, and a stage mother who pushed her little boy into the show business."
"He's a victim."
"To be sure, Bibbs is a real dropout, but he's an uneducated high school dropout from a family struggling for money, and he's known around the world as a child."
"The money is waving."
"We all know that when you're a big man like Bibbs, without a stable family to protect him, a lot of dark things will show up."
"He's an angelic kid with a lot of musical talent, and then the story goes that Arthur found him on youtube, and the rest is history."
__ The sons will do this and have no hope for a hellish future... "



Number  374
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Following 2014’s elevator-gate, when video surfaced of sister Solange Knowles attacking JAY Z as Beyoncé stood and watched, reports circulated that the incident was related to JAY Z having a mistress, though the alleged “Becky” was never verified.”
“Image zoom Amber Rose | Credit: Leon Bennett/WireImageWhen Beyoncé released “Sorry,” she left all women named Becky cringing, and everyone else wondering who the mystery mistress she seemed to be referencing, could be.”
“Paltrow and her Coldplay frontman ex also were among the select few to attend Beyoncé and JAY Z’s low-key wedding in 2008.”
“The Goop creator even dedicated her 2016 cookbook, It’s All Easy, to Bey and Jay’s daughter Blue Ivy, now 6.”
“The music-mogul couple has been part of Apple, 14, and 12-year-old Moses Martin’s lives for a long time.”
“Image zoom Beyoncé, JAY Z and Gwyneth Paltrow in 200 | Credit: Dave M. Benett/GettyPaltrow has had a very public friendship with Beyoncé and JAY Z with both of their children growing up together.”
“But like Beyonce’s still with Jay,” she said.”
““They were like friends, and then, like, you don’t see Gwyneth Paltrow with Beyoncé anymore.”
“...f ing JAY Z Rose also speculated that Paltrow has not been seen publicly with Beyoncé and or JAY Z”
“She was only kidding Rose made the joke during the latest episode of Spencer and Heidi Pratt s podcast Make Speidi Famous Again telling The Hills couple I definitely think that Gwyneth Paltrow is Becky with the good hair I really feel like she s the one who was like...”


"After the elevator door incident in 2014, when Beyonce stood watching, the video of sister sorangie Knowles attacking jay z surfaced. It was reported that the incident was related to jay z's mistress, but the so-called" Becky "has never been confirmed."
"Image zooming amber rose | credit: when Leon Bennett / wiremegebeyonc 茅 released" I'm sorry ", she made all the women named Becky wince, and others were wondering who the mysterious mistress she was referring to might be."
"Paltrow and her Coldplay ex-wife are among the few to attend Beyonce and Jez's low-key wedding in 2008."
"The creator of goop even dedicated her 2016 recipe" it's easy "to be and Jay's daughter, blue ivy, now 6 years old."
"This music tycoon couple has long been part of the lives of 14-year-old apple and 12-year-old Moses Martin."
"Picture zooming Beyonce, jay z and Gwyneth Paltrow at 200 | credit: Dave M. Bennett / Getty Paltrow has a very open friendship. Beyonce and jay z grew up with their two children."
"But Beyonce is still with Jay," she said
"They're like friends, and then, like, you'll never see Gwyneth Paltrow with Beyonce again."
__︹ F ing jay z rose also speculated that Paltrow was not publicly associated with Beyonce and / or jay z "
"She's just kidding Ross in the latest episode of Spencer and Heidi Platt's podcast to make Spencer famous again. Tell the hill couple that I definitely think Gwyneth Paltrow is Becky with good hair, and I really think she's the one who looks like..."



Number  375
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Could this family get any cuter?”
“"It's a true art and an original style I've developed, years of dedication," Hemsworth wrote, along with the hashtag, "skippingworldchamps."”
“The clip, which has already been viewed a whopping 3.6 million times on Instagram, shows the Aussie actor and his wife, 41-year-old actress Elsa Pataky, manning a jump rope for five-year-old India Rose.”
“As mum encourage her to "jump!”
“...jump!”
“", Hemsworth ups the ante, wiggling his hips in what could only be described as a "dad dance".”
“(Minus the dadbod, of course.)”
“Meanwhile, Pataky skilfully manages to keep up the pace, holding a glass of wine - and not spilling a drop.”
“As if that wasn't cute enough, the trio then collapses into peals of - oh-so-contagious - laughter.”
“A post shared by Chris Hemsworth chrishemsworth on Mar 6 2018 at 3 43am PST While Hemsworth and Pataky have shared a number of other glimpses of their Aussie camping adventure over the past few days including snaps of their brood toasting marshmallows and telling stories by the campfire none...”


"Can this family be more lovely?"
"It's a real art and an original style that I've developed over the years," Hemsworth wrote, along with the label "skip the world champion."
"The video has been viewed 3.6 million times on instagram, in which the Australian actor and his wife, 41 year old actress Elsa Pataki, are preparing to jump rope for the five-year-old Indian rose."
When mom encourages her to "jump!"
__ Jump
__amsworth increased his bets and wiggled his hips. It was only a "Dad dance"
(not including dad, of course.)
At the same time, Pataki cleverly followed the rhythm, holding a glass of wine in his hand without spilling a drop
"As if it wasn't cute enough, the three fell into a burst of - Oh, so infectious - laughter."
"Chris Hemsworth Chris Hemsworth posted a post at 3:43 a.m. PST on March 6, 2018, while Hemsworth and Pataky shared some other scenes of their camping expedition in Australia in the past few days, including photos of their nests baking marshmallows and telling stories by campfires..."



Number  376
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Theroux 'crawling all over' Aniston's social circle since split.”
“RadarOnline.com learned exclusively Jennifer Aniston is beside herself with fury over Justin Theroux’s shameless networking within her social circle.”
““She was angry enough to see him at dinner with Emma Stone, whom she considers a friend.”
“But then she has to contend with new photos of him schmoozing all over Selena Gomez and it’s really tipped her over the edge,” spilled an informant.”
“As readers know, Theroux was causing chaos by sending flirty texts to Gomez in the wake of his split from Aniston.”
““It was kind of an open secret that Justin was sweet on Selena when he and Jen hung out with her,” a source revealed to Radar last month.”
“To be fair they did get on well but he s asking for major trouble by trying to hang out with her so soon after his and Jen s split Theroux was also caught canoodling with Stone when posted a photo of himself hanging out with her in April just...”
“...weeks after his split from Aniston...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"Since Aniston broke up, his social circle has been full of tramps."
_ RadarOnline.com The website, Jennifer Aniston, is very angry about Justin serrux's shameless network in the social circle. "
"She was very angry. Seeing him having dinner with Emma stone, she thought she was her friend."
"But then she had to face a new picture of him chatting about Selena Gomez, which really drove her crazy," one source revealed
"As readers know, Cyrus sent a flirting text message to Gomez after breaking up with Aniston, causing confusion."
Last month, a source told radar: "Justin is very gentle with Serena when they are together. It's an open secret."
"To be fair, they did get along well, but he wanted to get into big trouble because he wanted to go out with Jane so soon after they broke up. In April, he posted a picture of himself with stone and was found with stone
__ A few weeks after he broke up with Aniston... "



Number  377
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But there is always a spot in her heart for him.””
“...old school letters to one another monthly...”
“Ahead of the latest high-profile breakup, all eyes remained on Aniston’s ex, Brad Pitt, and his ongoing divorce battle with estranged wife Angelina Jolie.”
“Until a joint statement was released by Jen and Justin last week, there were rumors swirling that the two were on the rocks and that Aniston was finding comfort in Brad Pitt, so now the rumors are rampant that the former couple is looking to rekindle things.”
“Brad Pitt’s mother has even been dragged into the latest claims involving the Allied star’s dating life and the potential of a romantic reconciliation between him and Jen.”
“Radar Online shares words of a source who indicates that Pitt’s mom is reportedly hopeful that he and Aniston will get back together.”
“The source insists that Jane Pitt, Brad’s mother, is overjoyed that he and Jen are back in touch since the Friends star’s split from Justin Theroux.”
“The publication notes the words of the supposed source who states This is what she s dreamed of for over a decade she never lost faith and has stayed in touch with Jen for years The insider also reveals that Jane and Jen have maintained a good relationship and write...”
“Additionally, the two reportedly talk on the phone regularly and have never missed a birthday or anniversary.”
“A Jen Aniston source spoke exclusively with the publication, stating “Jen wouldn’t consider being with Brad in a romantic way.”


"But there was always a place in her heart where she liked him."
__ Letters from old classmates to each other every month... "
"Before the latest high-profile breakup, all eyes were on Aniston's ex girlfriend Brad Pitt and his ongoing divorce battle with separated wife Angelina Jolie."
"Before Jennifer and Justin made their joint statement last week, there were rumors that their relationship was on the rocks. Aniston found comfort in Brad Pitt, so now there are rumors that the former couple are planning to rekindle their relationship."
"Brad Pitt's mother has even been involved in the latest charges about the League star's dating life and the possibility of a romantic settlement between him and Jennifer."
Radar online shared the words of a source who said Pitt's mother was reported to want him and Aniston to get back together
"The source insists that Jane Pitt, Brad's mother, is overjoyed that he and Jane are back in touch as a friend of the star separated from Justin seru."
"This article records the words of a so-called source who said it was her dream for more than ten years. She never lost confidence and kept in touch with Jane for many years. People familiar with the matter also revealed that Zhen and Zhen have always maintained a good relationship and have been writing... "
"In addition, it is reported that the two often talk on the phone and never miss their birthdays or anniversaries."
In an exclusive interview with the magazine, a source for Jen Aniston said, "Jen won't consider being with Brad in a romantic way."



Number  378
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bump...”
“Related Stories Everyone Is Speculating About This New Photo of Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott Kylie Jenner Is Still Missing from the Kardashian Jenner Christmas Card and Fans Are Suspicious Kylie Jenner Claps Back at Paparazzi for Photoshopping a Baby...”
“And there's yet another theory about the Christmas card reveal.”
“Another, auxiliary, theory: Jenner is for sure going to announce the birth on New Year's Eve, so we won't have to wait too much longer.”
“...now...”
“Now twitterers are saying that based on the size of her supposed bump in those photos from three months ago which BTW is in no way proof of anything the youngest Kardashian Jenner sister must have had her baby by...”
“And then some very dedicated fans unearthed a couple blurry photos that appear to show her with a baby bump—dated from all the way back to September?”
“Remember how on Monday everyone was super bummed when the Kardashian family's Christmas card did not, as many hoped, confirm Jenner's rumored pregnancy?”
“But Kylie is a public figure, and Twitter exists.”
“Of course, let's remember that Kylie in no way is obligated to give us an explanation: It's completely up to her if and when she's comfortable sharing her own news.”


Collision
"According to related reports, everyone is guessing that this new picture of Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott Kelly Jenner is still missing from Kardashian Jenner's Christmas card. Fans suspect Kelly Jenner is filming the paparazzi for taking a picture of a baby..."
"There's another way of saying it's about Christmas cards coming out."
"Another supporting theory is that Jenner will definitely announce his birth on New Year's Eve, so we don't have to wait too long."
__ Now... "
"People on twitter now say that based on the size of the lump in her picture three months ago, by the way, it doesn't prove that the youngest Kardashian Jenner's sister must be..."
"Then some very enthusiastic fans found a few blurry photos showing a small lump that she had seen since September?"
"Remember everyone was very upset on Monday when the kardashians' Christmas card didn't confirm Jenna's pregnancy rumors as many people hoped?"
"But Kelly is a public figure and twitter exists."
"Of course, let's remember that Kelly has no obligation to give us an explanation: if she's willing to share her news, it's up to her."



Number  379
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“We’re told it’s “not true.” According to the […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim from one of this week’s foreign tabloids, but Gossip Cop can exclusively correct the report that alleges the 11-year-old will soon be running around L.A. on auditions.”
“Did Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise ’s daughter Suri sign with a top Hollywood talent agency for acting?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"We were told it wasn't true." According to ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a foreign tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police can completely correct the report that the 11 year old will be auditioning in Los Angeles soon."
Is Suri, the daughter of Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise, contracted with Hollywood's top acting agency? "



Number  380
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Holmes’ spokespersons did not comment on this rumor but Gossip Cop said that a “confidante” of Holmes already denied these claims.”
“And the report claimed that Katie Holmes is totally on board with Suri’s dream.”
“Meanwhile, rumors that her father, Tom Cruise, is fighting to get custody rights and that she allegedly dislikes Katie Holmes’ new relationship have been debunked.”
“Hollywood Life reported on Wednesday that a “source close to the [family]” claimed that the 12-year-old girl started taking acting classes recently.”
““She’s caught the acting bug.”
“She’s signed Suri up for one-on-one acting classes with an acting coach and she’s getting private singing and music classes too,” the insider added.”
“A post shared by Suri Cruise Holmes ????”
“(@suricruise.official) on Aug 22, 2018 at 9:32am PDTAs a daughter of two very popular actors, it should not be difficult for Suri to find inspirations leading to her dream of becoming an actress as well.”
“But Hollywood Life’s source claimed that the young lady started wanting to become an actress when she visited the set of “The Kennedys: After Camelot.” Holmes played the late Jackie Kennedy in the 2017 miniseries.”
“The insider stated further that Suri Cruise was fascinated with how the actors prepared for their scenes, especially with their “hair, makeup and wardrobe.” It is not strange for children of popular actors to follow their parents’ legacy.”


A spokesman for Sherlock Holmes did not comment on the rumors, but gossip police said a "close friend" of Sherlock Holmes had denied the claims
"It's reported that Katie Holmes fully supports Suri's dream."
"At the same time, rumors that her father Tom Cruise is fighting for custody and that she is said not to like Katie Holmes's new relationship have been exposed."
Hollywood life reported on Wednesday that a "close source" claimed that the 12-year-old girl had recently started acting classes
"She got sick of acting."
"She has signed up with a performance coach for one-on-one Performance classes, and she has also received private singing and music classes," the person said
"A post shared by Suri cruise Holmes"
"(@ official survey) at 9:32 a.m. on August 22, 2018, as the daughter of two very popular actors, it should not be difficult for Suri to find inspiration and realize her dream of becoming an actor as well."
But Hollywood Life sources said the young lady began to want to be an actress when she visited the Kennedy family: after Camelot. Holmes played the late Jackie Kennedy in the 2017 miniseries. "
Suri cruise is fascinated by how actors prepare for their scenes, especially their "hairstyles, makeup and wardrobe," the person said. It's not surprising that the children of popular actors follow their parents' traditions



Number  381
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Weigh in with your thoughts in the comments!”
““They are flirting with the idea of going on an actual date, and Liam’s leaning on his friend Pierre to help make it happen!”Do you think Liam and Jen would make a cute couple?”
“Now Garner’s film is now in post-production and she and Neeson have been talking more and more frequently, said the source.”
““She’s really captured his interest.”Neeson’s wife, Natasha Richardson, tragically passed away in 2009 after a freak ski accident, and Garner’s divorce from her husband, Ben Affleck, was finalized last year.”
““Even though they’ve crossed paths many times over the years, Jen has never been in Liam’s orbit like this before,” the insider told Radar.”
“Garner, who turns 46 on April 17, also used the franchise as a convenient excuse to consult the suave 65-year old actor on how to best portray her tricky role.”
““The fascination is mutual,” noted the insider, who adds Garner studied Liam’s Taken films to “crank up” her own revenge thriller expertise.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Add your thoughts to the comments!"
"They were flirting about going on a date, and Liam was counting on his friend Pierre to help! "Do you think Liam and Jane will be a lovely couple?"
"Now Ghana's films have entered the post production stage, and her conversation with Nissen is more and more frequent," the source said
"She really caught his interest." Natha Richardson's wife, Natasha Richardson, died in 2009 after an unusual skiing accident. Ghana's divorce from her husband Ben Affleck was finalized last year
"Although they have met many times over the years, Jen has never been in Liam's orbit like this," the person familiar with the matter told radar
Ghana, who turns 46 on April 17, also uses the franchise as a convenient excuse to ask the gentle 65 year old actor how to best play her tricky role
"The glamour is mutual," the person said, adding that Ghana studied Liam's films to "enhance" her own expertise in revenge thrillers



Number  382
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Come on Bradley, don't you know to dress for the weather.”
“In fact, the New York night looked rainy and cold.”
“But the weather was far from sunny.”
“Her on-off boyfriend was also casual, wearing a thick jacket and sunglasses.”
“(Image: INSTAGRAM)The supermodel was dressed down for a change in an all black ensemble and faded jeans.”
“Irina joined the Wet Hot American Summer actor to dinner with pal and fellow actor Jonah Hill.”
“But now, the A-list duo have been spotted together again and again and most recently in New York.”
“"Irina is a very strong, beautiful Russian woman who knows what she wants, and perhaps Bradley's mum saw that as something she didn't want for her son."”
“(Image: FLYNET)"That caused friction between Bradley and Irina as he is very close to his mum and the fact that Irina and her didn't get on put pressure on their relationship.”
“They continued: "Bradley's mum and Irina were quite close at the start of last year but the more time they spent together the more they realised that they didn't get on.”


"Come on, Bradley, don't you know what kind of clothes to wear to adapt to the weather?"
"In fact, the night in New York looks cold and rainy."
"But it's not sunny at all."
"Her intermittent boyfriend is also casual, wearing a thick jacket and sunglasses."
(photo: instagram) the supermodel was dressed in an all black suit and faded jeans, ready to change. "
"Elena and the hot, humid American summer actor have dinner with her friend and actor Jonah hill."
"But now, the pair of first-line stars have been found together again and again, most recently in New York."
"Irina is a very strong and beautiful Russian woman. She knows what she wants. Maybe Bradley's mother thinks it's something she doesn't want for her son."
(photo: flynet) "the friction between Bradley and Elena is because he and his mother are very close, and the fact that Elena and her mother are not getting along puts pressure on their relationship."
They went on: "Bradley's mother and Elena were very close at the beginning of last year, but the longer they were together, the more they realized they didn't get along well."



Number  383
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Watch below:”
“Griffin has since apologized for the photos, and burst into tears when asked by ET's Kevin Frazier at a press conference if she'd spoken with her former CNN New Year's Eve co-host, Anderson Cooper, after he condemned the photo shoot.”
“Trump's tweets about Morning Joe co-hosts Mika Brzezinski and Joe Scarborough on Thursday morning quickly went viral, when he called Brzezinski "crazy," said she has a "low I.Q."”
“...and claimed she had a facelift.”
“The tweets came after Scarborough and Brzezinski criticized him on their MSNBC show, Brzezinski saying he had "teensie" hands and that he was "lying every day and destroying the country."”
“Morning Joe & Mika thought it was hilarious to insult the president this am.”
“Wonder how they feel after his tweets.”
“...pic.twitter.com/IqxRELEduo — Corryn (@Corrynmb) June 29, 2017NEWS: Emma Thompson Says Donald Trump Asked Her Out Once -- 'I Didn't Know What to Do With Myself'"I heard poorly rated @Morning_Joe speaks badly of me (don't watch anymore)," Trump later tweeted.”
“"Then how come low I.Q.”
“Crazy Mika, along with Psycho Joe, came to Mar-a-Lago 3 nights in a row around New Year's Eve, and insisted on joining me.”


Watch below:
Griffin has apologized for the photos and cried when asked at a press conference by Kevin Fraser of ET if she had talked to Anderson Cooper, a former CNN new year co host
"Trump's tweet on Thursday morning about Joe's co hosts Mika Brzezinski and Joe Scarborough quickly became popular. He called her" Crazy "and called her" low IQ. "
__ And claimed she had a facelift
"These tweets came after Scarborough and Brzezinski criticized him on MSNBC. Brzezinski said that he had the hand of" teensy "and that he" lied every day, destroying the country. "
"Good morning. Joe and Mika think it's funny to insult the president this morning."
"I don't know how they feel after he tweeted."
_... pic.twitter.com/IqxRELEduo -Colin (@ corrynmb) June 29, 2017 news: Emma Thompson said that Donald Trump asked her out once - "I don't know what to do with myself." "I heard a very bad evaluation of" Morning Joe said bad things about me (don't watch any more) ", trump later tweeted
"How can I have a low IQ?"
"Crazy Mika and psycho Joe came to Malag for three consecutive nights around New Year's Eve and insisted on joining me."



Number  384
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, tell us, do you love Taylor’s new album?”
“But everyone’s saying she did and he’s stunned.”
“In the second verse, Tay sings about a “playboy” who she flew “around the world” with before she broke up with him.”
“The first verse is a nod to Kanye West, 40, where she sings about a “narcissist” who “talks sh-t.” Then, Tom came in.”
“The first Tom reference came on her track, “I Did Something Bad”, which is actually about two men who made a mark on her 2016 year.”
“And, here’s what we came up with.”
“As soon as Taylor’s sixth studio album dropped, at midnight on Nov. 10, fans instantly began dissecting each and every lyric, as did we!”
“He genuinely thought he was going to get spared.” Well, maybe next time, Tom.”
““He thought they were on good terms,” our insider says, adding, “After their break-up, he was always asked if he was worried she was going to write about him, and he always said no.”
“And, the rest was history, until they split just three months later in Sept. 2016.”


"Hollywood stars, tell us, do you like Taylor's new album?"
"But everyone said she did it, and he was shocked."
In the second section, Tai sings about a "playboy". Before she breaks up with him, she "travels around the world" with him
The first section is a tribute to Kanye West, 40, who sang a song about a "narcissist" who said "can speak sh-t". Then Tom came in
"Tom's first letter of recommendation appeared on her track," I did something bad, "and it was actually about two men's performance in 2016."
"And that's what we thought."
"As soon as Taylor's sixth studio album was released, at midnight on November 10, fans immediately began to analyze every lyric, so did we!"
"He really thought he would survive." Well, maybe next time, Tom
"He thought they had a good relationship," our insider said. "After the breakup, he was always asked if he was worried that she would write about him, and he always said no."
"And the rest is history, until three months later, in September 2016, they broke up."



Number  385
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That means, as of this writing (in April 2019), Corey Gamble is 38 years old.”
“Gamble graduated from Morehouse College in Atlanta with a degree in Business Management.”
“Corey Gamble is probably best known for being in a romantic relationship with celebrity mom Kris Jenner.”
“Rumors began swirling that Gamble and Jenner were dating after they were seen vacationing together in Mexico in 2014.”
“At the time, he was 33 years old and she was 58.”
“Corey was a star on his high school football team at Westlake High School in Atlanta.”
“His friends call him Mr.”
“Dependable because he doesn't party and is extremely responsible as a friend and business person.”
“He then moved to Los Angeles, California to try to make his name in the music business.”
“Corey Gamble age: Corey Gamble was born on November 8, 1980.”


"This means that as of the date of this writing (April 2019), Corey Gambo is 38 years old."
"Gambo graduated from Morehouse College in Atlanta with a degree in business management."
"Corey Gambo is probably best known for his romantic relationship with celebrity mom Chris Jenner."
"In 2014, Gambo and Jenna were seen on holiday in Mexico, and there were rumors that they were dating."
"At the time, he was 33 and she was 58."
"Corey is the star of the west lake high school football team in Atlanta."
"His friend called him sir."
"Reliable, because he doesn't go to parties. As a friend and businessman, he is very responsible."
Later, he moved to Los Angeles, California, to try to become famous in the music industry
Age of Corey Gambo: Corey Gambo was born on November 8, 1980



Number  386
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“SIGN UP for Gold Derby’s free newsletter with latest predictions...”
“Read more Gold Derby entertainment news.”
“ET on January 21.”
“Cable and satellite subscribers will once again be able to watch the two-hour event live on the apps for those Turner TV channels.”
“And for the first time in the 24-year history of these awards bestowed by the Screen Actors Guild, the ceremony will be available on a variety of streaming services: DirecTV Now, Fubo TV, Hulu Live TV, Sling TV, Sony PlayStation Vue, and YouTube TV.”
“Those who tune in by whatever means will get to see these women announcing the winners of the Screen Actors Guild Awards Rosanna Arquette Halle Berry SAG AFTRA President Gabrielle Carteris Dakota Fanning Mandy Moore Olivia Munn Niecy Nash Lupita Nyong o Gina Rodriguez Maya Rudolph Emma Stone Marisa Tomei...”
“...and Kelly Marie Tran...”
“As always, the telecast will open with various actors telling their stories of how they got their guild cards.”
“This year, it will only be women in the spotlight.”
“The only men you will see on the stage of the Shrine Auditorium will be the winners of the five races for male actors as well as those in the casts of the winning ensembles and the nominated films.”


"Sign up for the latest forecast free newsletters from Kingdee..."
"Read more golden Derby entertainment news."
"January 21 Eastern time."
"Cable and satellite TV users will again be able to watch two hours of live activity on Turner's TV channel app."
"This is the first time in the 24-year history of these awards presented by the cast union that they have been presented on a variety of streaming services: DirecTV now, Fubo TV, Hulu live TV, sling TV, Sony Playstation Vue and Youtube TV."
"Those who listen in any way will see these women announce the fall of screen guild prize winner Rosana aquite hallibery, AFTRA president Gabrielle katelis Dakota Fanning, Mandy Moore Olivia Munn neey Nash lopita NYO Gina Maya sythstone Tomi
__ And Kelly Mary Chen... "
"As usual, the TV show will start with different actors and tell the story of how they got the guild membership card."
"This year, only women will be the focus."
"On the stage of the Shrine Auditorium, the only men you can see will be the winners of the five actor competitions, as well as the actors of the winning companies and nominated films."



Number  387
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“The A-list couple announced they were heading toward a $225 million bust-up on Feb. 15 amid rumors of Theroux’s cheating and his disappointment over not having kids.”
“Exes Jen & Justin In Canine Custody FightDivorce Gone To The Dogs!”
“Exes Jen & Justin In Canine Custody Fight Aniston & Theroux are barking over who gets to keep their prized pooches.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux‘s divorce has turned into a real dog fight!”
“Sources close to Aniston, 49, and Theroux, 46, told RadarOnline.com that the battling exes have bared their fangs over the future of their four canines.”
““The custody of the dogs is a massive sticking point in their divorce agreement!” said a source.”
““Jen was hurt when she heard he’s been blaming her for them not having a family.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"The first-rate couple announced that they would break up on February 15 for $225 million, when there were rumors that Cyrus cheated and he was disappointed that he had no children."
"Ex girlfriend Jen and Justin fight under the custody of the dog and divorce the dog!"
"In the dog custody fight between ex girlfriends Jan and Justin, Aniston and seru are arguing about who can raise their precious dog."
"The divorce of Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus turned into a real dog fight!"
Sources close to 49 year old Aniston and 46 year old Cyrus told reporters RadarOnline.com "Their ex-wife has shown her teeth about the future of their four dogs
"Custody of dogs is the crux of their divorce agreement!"! "One source said
"Jane is sad to hear that he blames her because they don't have a family."
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_



Number  388
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Jenner is constantly hanging out with beautiful Hutchins, who, as Radar reported, was born a man but later transitioned to female.”
“Jenner and Hutchins were first seen together when they vacationed in Cabo, Mexico.”
““This is costing Caitlyn at least $50,000 each week but she thinks nothing of this weird arrangement.”“She’s desperate for Sophia to stick around and this is her way of sealing the deal.”Radar has followed Jenner’s increasingly close relationship with young blonde Hutchins for months.”
““Sophia is using Caitlyn’s cash to deck out her wardrobe with designer clothes and get her hair and nails done every week.”She’s also spending thousands on facials and massages!”
““She’s constantly treating her to drinks and dinners at the nicest restaurants in town and buys her jewelry and handbags all the time!”But it’s not just that she’s showering her with gifts – she’s also given Hutchins her own credit card and a weekly allowance.”
““Caitlyn is spending an absolute fortune on Sophia,” dished a source.”
“The two haven’t even been dating a year but the transgender star is already spending the big bucks to keep her gal pal sweet.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com 锛_
"We pay for interesting information!"
Jenna is often with the beautiful Hutchins, who, according to radar, was born a man but later became a woman
Jenna and Hutchins were first seen together on holiday in Cabo, Mexico
"It cost Caitlin at least $50000 a week, but she didn't care about this strange arrangement." "She really wants Sophia to stay, and that's how she makes a deal." For months, radar has been tracking Jenna's growing relationship with blonde Hutchins
"Sophia is using Caitlin's cash to buy designer clothes for her wardrobe and do her hair and nails every week." She also spent thousands of dollars on facial care and massage! "
"She often invites her to drink and eat in the best restaurants in the city, and often buys her jewelry and handbags!"! "But it's not just that she gave Hutchins a lot of gifts - she also gave Hutchins her own credit card and weekly allowance."
"Caitlin spent a lot of money on Sophia," one source said
"The two have been dating for less than a year, but the transgender star has spent a lot of money to keep her girlfriend sweet."



Number  389
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“How do those things stay [on]?” she admitted on Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen on Thursday.”
“So, who is a member of that inner circle?”
“And while Harry has chosen big brother Prince William as his best man, Meghan has decided not to have a maid of honor.”
““She has a very close-knit circle of friends and she didn’t want to choose one over another,” a palace spokesman said on Friday.”
““All have been actively involved in helping her prepare for the day and will be there in the days beforehand.”
“She’s very happy to have their support.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Meghan will not have a traditional American-style bridal party — royal weddings usually have younger attendants who serve as page boys and bridesmaids.”
“The palace revealed that Meghan will be joined by her little bridal party members (Prince George and Princess Charlotte are expected to have roles!)”
“...before she walks into the chapel.”
“The names of her page boys and bridesmaids will be released in the days before the wedding.”


"How do these things stay? "She admitted that in Thursday's live broadcast with Andy Cohen."
"So who's in the inner circle?"
"Although Harry chose his eldest brother, Prince William, as his best man, Megan decided not to invite a bridesmaid."
"She has a very close circle of friends and she doesn't want to choose one over the other," a palace museum spokesman said on Friday
"Everyone is actively involved in helping her prepare for the day and will be there a few days ago."
She was happy to have their support. "Get push notifications for news, features, etc."
"Megan doesn't have traditional American weddings - royal weddings usually have young Groomsmen and bridesmaids."
The palace revealed that Megan will join her little Bridal Party (Prince George and Princess Charlotte are expected to have roles!) "
"Before she walked into the church"
"The names of her boyfriend and bridesmaid will be announced a few days before the wedding."



**Something goes wrong**
“But an insider told People that the couple is not yet engaged.”
“She reportedly is not pregnant and not even trying to have a baby.”
“Rihanna had a 2018 Grammy Awards night to remember, from a performance that drew cheers from the audience to an award.”
“Her fans responded on Twitter and Instagram, but they seemed to be paying more attention to arguing whether Rihanna was pregnant or just thick than to her musical success, as the Inquisitr reported.”
“While social media was debating Rihanna’s rumored baby bump, the songstress was celebrating at 1Oak Nightclub in New York City with her rumored billionaire beau, Saudi businessman Hassan Jameel, according to People.”
“Hassan and Rihanna kept the party going until after 3 a.m. at the club.”
“The 29-year-old singer stunned in her third outfit of the evening, glittering in a gold crop top and gold jewelry.”
“Rihanna received her award at the Grammys for Best Rap/Sung Performance for her collaboration with Kendrick Lamar.”
“Although the songstress was immersed in celebrating with Jameel after the Grammys, she also reportedly became aware of the rumors soaring on Twitter and Instagram about her alleged pregnancy.”
“An insider told Hollywood Life that Rihanna had an unexpected reaction to the reports that she was sporting a baby bump rather than flaunting thicker curves during her Grammy Awards performance.”


"But a person familiar with the matter told people that the couple were not engaged yet."
"It's reported that she's not pregnant and doesn't even want to have a baby."
"Rihanna has a memorable Grammy night in 2018, from a performance that drew cheers from the audience to winning the prize."
Her fans responded on Twitter and instagram, but they seem to be more focused on arguing about Rihanna's pregnancy than on her musical success
The singer was celebrating with her rumored billionaire boyfriend, Saudi businessman Hassan Jameel, at the 1oak nightclub in New York City while social media were discussing the rumor of Rihanna's pregnancy, people reported
"Hassan and Rihanna keep the party until after 3 am."
"The 29 year old singer had a stunning third look that night, shining in a gold jacket and gold jewelry."
"Rihanna won the Grammy for best rap / singing performance for her collaboration with Kendrick Lamar."
"Although the singer has been in celebration with Jamie since the Grammy Awards, she has also been reported to have noticed rumors about her pregnancy on Twitter and instagram."
"An insider told Hollywood daily that during Rihanna's performance at the Grammy Awards ceremony, it was reported that she was playing with a small lump instead of showing off a thicker curve. She had an unexpected reaction to this."



Number  391
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Nick has slept with a good chunk of the contestants but she fell in love with him for other reasons.”Source: Getty...”
“And while there are always condoms in the house, with all the drinking going on, there’s really no remembering if they were actually used.”Article continues below advertisementSource: Getty“The winner is already not happy about how much of a pig Nick has been,” said the source.”
“Source: GettyThe insider told the mag, “When the booze is constantly flowing, protection is not usually on people’s minds.”
“Some of the women went to first base, some second base and other hit a home run.”Article continues below advertisementSource: Getty“Nick definitely sleeps with his three finalists and one other girl, and there are probably at least a few more,” dished a source.”
““But he definitely tried to make moves on every single girl.”
““Talk about a nightmare!”Source: GettyAnd when it comes to this mystery girl, “No one truly knows how many people Nick slept with during his Bachelor run,” a source revealed.”
“Life Style...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Getty Nick picks a good girl as the winner at the end of the series but what she doesn t know is that right now one of the other girls he slept with thinks she s pregnant and that it s his a source told...”
“...not his Bachelor winner...”
“Nick Viall may have thought he was living his nightmare with Liz the one night stand he booted on Monday night s episode but things are about to get even more nightmarish as Life Style recently reported that the reality star is having a baby with a woman that s...”


"Nick had sex with a lot of contestants, but she fell in love with him for other reasons."
"Although there are always condoms at home, as drinking goes on, people really don't remember whether they actually used them." The article continues with the following ad source: Getty "the winner has been unhappy about how much Nick is like a pig," the source said
Source: Getty the insider told the magazine, "people don't usually think about protection when the wine keeps flowing."
"Some women went to first base, some to second base, and some to home run." The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty "Nick must be sleeping with his three finalists and another girl, probably at least a few more," a source said
"But he certainly wants to take action against every girl."
"Tell me about nightmares! "When it comes to the mystery girl, no one really knows how many people Nick slept with when he was single," a source said
"Lifestyle..."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: Getty Nick picked a good girl as the winner at the end of the series, but what she doesn't know is that now one of the other girls he slept with thinks she's pregnant, which is what his source told..."
__ Not the winner of his bachelor... "
"Nick Villar may think he's living a nightmare life with Liz - he started a one night stand in the episode on Monday night, but it's going to get even more nightmarish, because lifestyle recently reported that the reality star is working with an S



Number  392
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Related: Angelina Jolie Says She Tried to Save Marriage to Brad Pitt with By The Sea...”
“What isn't true, though, is that it's because things are contentious, as Gossip Cop points out.”
“There have been rumors touching on everything from the actor's dating life to the future of his wine estate with Jolie, Miraval.”
“While the only people who know what's happening for sure with their marriage and divorce are Jolie and Pitt, there are some rumors floating around that have already been debunked.”
“Take a look below.”
“Brad Pitt is celibate.”
“It was recently reported by The Sun that Pitt is abstaining from sex for one year to work on himself, but E!”
“News claims that's not true.”
“Brad Pitt Is Studying the Kabbalah With Help From Demi Moore.”
“This is another lie, according to E!”


"Related story: Angelina Jolie said she was trying to save her marriage to Brad Pitt because she was on the beach..."
"But, as gossip police pointed out, it's not true that it's because things are controversial."
"From the date life of the hero to the future of his wine estate with Julie miravar, there are all kinds of rumors."
"Although only Julie and Pete know what happened to their marriage and divorce, some rumors have been exposed."
"Look down there."
"Brad Pitt is a celibate."
According to a recent report in the sun, Pete has been abstinent for a year in order to exercise herself, but she said, "I don't know who I am!"
"The news claims it's not true."
"Brad Pitt is studying Kabbala with the help of Demi Moore."
"That's another lie, according to e!"



Number  393
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...there so that there was some sort of protective mechanism in place where the family couldn t be tortured as much...”
“I m not going to let them disparage me embarrass me personally and professionally and not defend myself I can only hope she would respect and understand that In fact if I were Meg I would probably put something out...”
““Meghan is absolutely broken by the drama with her father,” a source close to the former “Suits” star told Us Weekly Wednesday.”
““There’s no way she can have a relationship with him or even reach out to him to stop him from speaking.”
“She knows he’ll record the conversation and sell it.”
“She has high anxiety wondering if this will go on forever.”Despite her public woes, the 37-year-old has received support from her grandmother-in-law, Queen Elizabeth II.”
““What may surprise some is just how supportive Her Majesty has been during the problems Meghan has faced with her family,” claimed a Buckingham Palace insider.”
““Meghan is in a tough place, and the queen knows it’s completely out of Meghan’s hands.”
“She has only sympathy for what s been a difficult and distressing situation for her The palace insider added the 92 year old monarch has great admiration for the American actress who became the newest member of the House of...”
“Windsor when she married Prince Harry in May...”


__︹ In this way, there will be some protection mechanism, and families will not suffer so much... "
"I won't let them slander me, embarrass me personally and professionally, or defend myself. I can only hope that she will respect and understand. In fact, if I were MEG, I might take out something..."
"Megan was completely broken by the drama with her father," a source close to the former "suit" star told us weekly on Wednesday
"She can't have sex with him, or even reach out to stop him talking."
"She knew he would record the conversation and sell it."
"She was very anxious and didn't know if it would last forever." Despite her public misfortune, the 37 year old is supported by her grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II
One Buckingham Palace insider said: "it's amazing to some how much her majesty supports Megan in the face of her family's problems."
"Megan is in a difficult situation. The queen knows it's not Megan's business at all."
"She just sympathizes with her difficult and painful situation. Palace insiders added that the 92 year old monarch admired the American actress so much that she became The newest member of the house. "
"Windsor married Prince Harry in May..."



Number  394
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Of course, the webloid has no real insight into the royal family and these articles are entirely made-up.”
“On the heels of Kensington Palace announcing Kate Middleton is pregnant with her and Prince William ’s third child, HollywoodLife has decided to exploit the big news by publishing a number of so-called “exclusives” about the topic.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
___ ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"Of course, webloid doesn't really know about the royal family, these articles are completely fabricated."
After Kensington Palace announced that Kate Middleton was pregnant with her third child with Prince William, the Hollywood film company decided to use the big news to publish some so-called "exclusive reports" on the topic



Number  395
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So long as Markle is healthy (and she's got a fiancé and a royal family to look out for her there), it's no one's business what size she'll be wearing.”
“Nonetheless, Star reported that an "insider" claims she has "lost a shocking amount of weight in just the last two weeks" and that she "seems obsessed with losing even more before the big day."”
“But tabloids are accusing Meghan Markle of starving herself for the royal wedding, and it's hugely problematic.”
“According to Star, Markle is a "shadow of her former self," and she "caused a stir" when she attended an Invictus Games reception with Prince Harry last month because she "couldn’t hide her frail frame and pin-thin legs."”
“Now, the tabloid reported, that she's "wasting away" and friends and family are "fretting" that she's "starving herself into emaciation."”
“The fact is that many women work out and change up their diets to feel their healthiest before their nuptials.”
“And this is nothing new.”
“A 2007 Cornell University study found that 70 percent of 272 engaged women said they wanted to lose weight — typically 20 pounds, according to The New York Times.”
“In the two months of fittings before most clients’ weddings at Kleinfeld Bridal in New York, for example, one seamstress told The New York Times that she's kept busy taking in gowns.”
“That's because brides-to-be say, “I don’t want the size 16; I want the 14 or the 12,’" Jennette Kruszka, Kleinfeld’s marketing director, reportedly told the outlet in 2007.”


"As long as markel is in good health (she has a fiance and royal family to take care of her), no matter what size she wears."
Still, according to the star, an "insider" said she "has lost an amazing amount of weight in the past two weeks" and that she "seems obsessed with losing more weight before the big day"
"But the tabloids accused Megan markel of starving herself for the royal wedding, which is a big problem."
According to the star, markel is "the shadow of the past". Last month, she attended an invitational reception with Prince Harry, which caused a "big stir" because she "couldn't hide her weak body and slender legs."
"Now, the tabloid reports that she is" losing weight "and that her friends and family are" worrying "about her" starving to become thin "
"In fact, many women exercise and change their eating habits before marriage to feel the healthiest."
"It's nothing new."
A 2007 Cornell University study found that 70 percent of 272 engaged women said they wanted to lose weight, usually 20 pounds, the New York Times reported
For example, in the two months before the wedding of most clients in Kleinfeld, New York, a seamstress told the New York Times that she had been busy dressing up
"It's because brides to be will say, 'I don't want the size 16, I want the size 14 or 12,'" Jennette kruszka, Kleinfeld's marketing director, told the media in 2007, according to reports



Number  396
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you glad that Brad and Angelina have finally put the needs of their kids first in their bitter divorce?”
“It’s so great to know that the kids weren’t sitting at a hotel with nannies but instead were at a resort under the loving care of their father, having a blast!”
“Her children did make a big public appearance with her at the film’s premiere, but then she continued on with her press responsibilities.”
“It worked out perfectly as Angie, 41, was able to spend time promoting her latest directorial effort First They Killed My Father while meeting with Cambodian dignitaries.”
“The kids and Brad were all very relieved and happy to be able to spend quality time together, out in the open, without drawing a ton of attention like the would in the states,” our insider adds.”
“He was able to play freely with his children in and around the resort, at the pool, without ever having his privacy being invaded by others.”
““Brad picked an obscure resort, in a foreign country, which helped protect his anonymity.”
“So Angelina OK’d Brad’s trip overseas to spend some time with them while she was busy with other obligations in Cambodia,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Brad was missing his children like crazy and Angie has actually been much more agreeable with him lately.”
“The former couple is finally playing nice for the sake of the children and he flew to Asia to help take care of their brood while she was busy working.”


"Hollywood stars, Brad and Angelina have finally put the needs of their children first in divorce. Are you happy?"
"I'm glad to know that the children are not sitting in the hotel with the nanny, but with their father's care, enjoying themselves in the resort!"
"Her children did make a public appearance with her at the film premiere, but then she continued to take on the responsibility of the media."
"It turned out to be perfect. Angie, 41, was able to spend time promoting her latest directing work. First, they killed my father when they met Cambodian dignitaries."
"The kids and Brad are very happy to have a good time together, in public, without as much attention as they did in the United States," our insider added
"He can play freely with his children in the resort and in the surrounding swimming pool without being invaded by others."
"Brad chose an unknown resort in a foreign country, which helps to protect his anonymity."
"So Angelina agreed to Brad's overseas trip to be with them while Cambodia is busy fulfilling other obligations," a source said Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Brad misses his children very much, and Angie has been more affable to him recently."
"For the sake of the children, the old couple finally became amiable. While she was busy working, he flew to Asia to help take care of their children."



Number  397
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ellen says that Earth is our eye, and we should protect it from pollution and other dangers.”
“#EarthDay #sale #Essentia pic.twitter.com/7127DAc6at — Essentia Paramus (@EssentiaParamus) April 21, 2017She posted an emoji of herself with earth-shaped hearts over her eyes, leaving a good message for her fans.”
“Join us 4/22!”
“We #MarchForScience.”
“We march for our future.”
“We march for our families.”
“We march for our communities.”
“This celebrity believes that we have a close link with the plants and animals, and should adequately protect them from being vanished.”
“Troian BellisarioTroian Avery Bellisario invited her fans to the marches and requested them to do something good for the environment.”
“He is one of the biggest supporters of the event and regularly participates in the March for Science.”


"Allen said the earth is our eye and we should protect it from pollution and other dangers."
"Earth Day sales" pic.twitter.com/7127DAc6at -Essentia Paramus (@ essentiaparams) on April 21, 2017, she released an emoticon of herself with a heart shaped like the earth over her eyes, leaving a good message for her fans. "
"Join us 4 / 22!"
"We work for science."
"We move forward for our future."
"We march for our families."
"We march for our community."
"The celebrity believes that we are closely related to animals and plants and should fully protect them from extinction."
"Troian Bellisario troian avery Bellisario invited her fans to the parade and asked them to do something good for the environment."
"He's one of the biggest supporters of the event and often takes part in science parades."



Number  398
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please try againTrending...”
““Hugh was on fire afterwards, and was super upset at his management team.”
“...links on this page...”
“Article content Hugh Jackman could not hide his true feelings after losing last night’s Golden Globes award for best actor in a comedy or musical to James Franco.”
“But RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned that The Greatest Showman star’s horrified on-camera face was nothing compared to the tantrum he threw behind-the-scenes!”
“Hugh Jackman’s face realizing he just lost to this guy: pic.twitter.com/nWPhWQvNzs — Kate Bennett (@KateBennett_DC) January 8, 2018 We apologize, but this video has failed to load.”
“...tap here to see other videos from our team.”
“Try refreshing your browser, or Hugh Jackman reportedly ‘flips out’ off-camera after losing best actor to James Franco Back to videoAdvertisement Story continues below This advertisement has not loaded yet, but your article continues below.”
“Article content “He thought he had the win in the bag, and wasn’t as visibly upset on-camera as he was off-camera,” an industry insider said.”
“Hugh was so sure of his win and had his acceptance speech ready Hugh Jackman s face upon seeing he lost Best Actor for his circus musical to James Franco imitating Tommy Wiseau is my new favorite reaction image to everything ever GoldenGlobes pic twitter com f5zH4Rgky4 Denizcan James MrFilmkritik...”


"Please try again..."
"Hugh got angry afterwards and was very upset with his management team."
__ Links on this page
"Hugh Jackman couldn't hide his true feelings after losing to James Franco at the Golden Globe for best actor in comedy or musical last night."
"But RadarOnline.com Website he exclusive know, the greatest performing star in front of the camera and his face in front of the rage behind the scenes compared to simply insignificant
"Hugh Jackman's face realized he lost to this guy: pic.twitter.com/nWPhWQvNzs -Kate Bennett (@ Kate Bennett / u DC) on January 8, 2018, we apologize, but this video could not be loaded. "
__ Click here to see other videos of our team. "
"Try to refresh your browser, or Hugh Jackman was reported as" flipping out "after the best actor lost to James Franco. Go back to the video ad story. Go on. This ad hasn't loaded yet, but your article goes on."
"Article content" a person in the industry said that he thought he was winning in hand, and he was not so obviously depressed under the camera
"Hugh is very positive about his victory and is ready for his acceptance speech. When I saw him lose his best actor due to the circus musical, Hugh Jackman's face was imitated by James Franco, which is my favorite reaction to everything picture goldenglobes pic twitter com f5zh4rgky4 denizcan James mrfilmkritik... "



Number  399
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thank you for showing us what unconditional love and loyalty is.””
“Jenner’s relationship with the Kardashian family has been rocky since April 2015 when she revealed her identity as a transgender woman.”
“She even included ex-wife Kris Jenner.”
““So blessed to have so many amazing moms in my life!” the 68-year-old Olympian gushed in her Instagram Stories on Sunday, May 13.”
“Pictures included a never-before-seen image of daughter Kylie Jenner cradling her baby girl Stormi and a snap of Caitlyn hugging Kris.”
“Though Caitlyn revealed in November 2017 that she hasn’t spoken to Kim Kardashian in a year, she shared a selfie of herself with the reality star, 37, and grandson Saint.”
“Khloe’s social media snub comes after a February interview with U.K. morning show Lorraine, where she opened up about her estranged relationship with Caitlyn.”
“When the then-pregnant 33-year-old was asked if having a child would mend her estranged relationship with Caitlyn, she replied: “I don’t think that affects anything with Caitlyn.”
“Things are just as they are.” (Khloe welcomed daughter, True, on April 12, with boyfriend Tristan Thompson.)”
“In her memoir, The Secrets of My Life, Caitlyn claimed that Kris, 62, was not supportive of her transition.”


"Thank you for showing us unconditional love and loyalty."
"Jenna's relationship with the Kardashian family has been unstable since she revealed her identity as a transgender woman in April 2015."
"She even includes her ex-wife Chris Jenner."
"I'm so lucky to have so many wonderful moms in my life! On Sunday, May 13, the 68 year old Olympian told her story on instagram
"There's a picture of a never seen daughter, Kelly Jenner, holding the baby girl, Tommy, and a snapshot of Caitlin embracing Chris."
"Although Caitlin revealed in November 2017 that she had not spoken to Kim Kardashian for a year, she shared a selfie with the 37 year old reality TV star and grandson saint."
Khloe's social media snub came after an interview with Lorraine in the British morning post in February, where she revealed her estrangement from Caitlin.
When the 33 year old girl, who was pregnant at the time, was asked if having a baby would improve her estranged relationship with Caitlin, she replied, "I don't think it would affect any of her relationship with Caitlin."
"That's what happened." (on April 12, Chloe and her boyfriend Tristan Thompson welcomed their daughter, really.)
In her memoir the secret of my life, Caitlin said that Chris, 62, did not support her transformation



Number  400
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have a suspicion that there's more than meets the eye when it comes to Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle's relationship.”
“Let's take a closer look at the royal women's bond, and figure out the truth about how these two duchesses really feel about one another.”
“After all, it's not exactly common to forge a friendship while leading lives in the spotlight and keeping up with royal traditions.”
“But how close are they really?”
“...royal events together and grown their respective families...”
“However Middleton and Markle had started getting to know one another back during the days of Markle and Harry s headline making engagement and they ve no doubt only continued to learn more about one another as they ve attended...”
“...to Prince William out of recent memory...”
“The Truth About Kate Middleton And Meghan Markle s Relationship Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle became sisters in law when the former Hollywood actress tied the knot with Prince Harry on May 19 2018 effectively bumping Middleton s 2011 wedding...”


"We suspect that there are different views on the relationship between Kate Middleton and Megan markel."
"Let's take a closer look at the ties between royal women and find out how the two Duchess really feel about each other."
"After all, living in the spotlight and keeping up with the royal tradition, building friendships is not common."
"But how close are they?"
“… The grand events of the royal family develop their respective families together... "
"However, Middleton and mark began to get to know each other on the day of mark and Harry's engagement. There is no doubt that they just continued to get to know each other when they joined..."
“… For the memory of Prince William... "
"The truth of the relationship between Kate Middleton and Megan markel Kate Middleton and Megan markel married Prince Harry on May 19, 2018, which has a strong impact on Middleton's wedding in 2011..."



Number  401
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, Jelena then ended things in early March 2018.”
““He was disgusted,” the source admits.”
“And, Bieber isn’t cool with Sel’s ex bringing up her near death experience.”
“Justin Bieber, 24, isn’t too fond of “Call Me By Your Name,” — The Weeknd‘s new track which seems to suggest that he [The Weeknd] almost donated his own kidney to Selena Gomez, 25, when she need one the most.”
““Justin thinks The Weeknd’s new song is petty, weak and makes him look bitter,” a source close to Justin tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY, adding that Justin is the one who has “real love” for Selena.”
““Whether they are together or not, in the past, present or in the future, Justin will always be there for Selena and he would gladly hand over one of his kidneys to save her life,” the source adds.”
“Additionally, “Justin feels like it would be an honor to help Selena with something major like that,” the insider says.”
“Therefore, when Justin caught wind of The Weeknd’s new track, he thought it was distasteful that Abel, 28, had the nerve to hash up Selena’s traumatic experience.”
“Although he’s not with Selena, for now, we hear JB will always has her back, and this time, The Weeknd didn’t.”
“She then got back together with Bieber following the breakup.”


"However, Jenna then ended things in early March 2018."
"He was disgusted," the source admitted
"What's more, Bieber doesn't like Searle's ex-wife to mention her near death experience."
Justin Bieber, 24, doesn't like "call me your name" - the new song of "weekend" seems to suggest that he almost donated his kidney to Serena Gomez, 25, who needs it most
A source close to Justin told reporters: "Justin thinks the new song of the weekend is very stingy and weak, which makes him look very bitter." He also said that Justin is the one who really loves Serena. "
"Whether they are together or not, in the past, now or in the future, Justin will always be there, and Serena and he will be happy to hand over one of his kidneys to save her life," the source added
"In addition, Justin feels it's an honor to help Serena with such a big task," the person said
"So when Justin heard about this week's new song, he thought it was disgusting that Abel, 28, had the courage to make a mess of Selena's painful experience."
"He wasn't with Serena, but now we hear that JB will keep her coming back, and this time, not at the weekend."
"After breaking up, she got back together with Bieber."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Meghan and her half-sister will reconcile in 2018?”
“While you wonder if Samantha and Thomas will be invited to the wedding, click here to see pics of celebs, including Meghan and Harry, who had the cutest engagements of 2017.”
“In addition to her plans to write a book about Meghan, Samantha recently slammed Harry for his remarks about her family.”
“We reported earlier how Meghan’s father Thomas Markle Sr., 73, was apparently “extremely hurt” by Prince Harry‘s remarks that the royals will become the family Meghan never had.”
““She’s been completely transparent about her past and has no skeletons in the closet, so unless Samantha intends to make things up, her book is going to make for pretty dull reading.” Well, it would seem the bad blood between Meghan and her family goes both ways.”
““There are no secrets about Meghan that can be revealed,” our source added.”
“...hide...”
“Samantha has been telling people that her upcoming memoir is going to contain explosive information about Meghan that will shock the royal family to the core which is utter nonsense Our palace insider went on to say that Samantha has no secrets about Meghan because Meghan has absolutely nothing to...”
““Meghan is really sad that her half-sister is trying to cash in on her relationship with Harry, but she realizes that it was fairly inevitable.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Hollywood, do you think Megan and her half sister will reconcile in 2018?"
"When you want to know if Samantha and Thomas will be invited to the wedding, please click here to see photos of celebrities, including Megan and Harry, who have the cutest date of 2017."
"In addition to planning to write a book about Megan, Samantha recently attacked Harry's comments on her family."
"We reported earlier that Megan's 73 year old father, Thomas Markle Sr., was clearly" deeply hurt "by Prince Harry's remarks that the royal family would become a family Megan had never had before
"She's very clear about her past, and there's no secret in her closet, so unless Samantha's going to make something up, her books will be boring to read." Well, it seems that the feud between Megan and her family goes both ways
"There's no secret about Megan," our source added
“… Hide
"Samantha has been telling people that her forthcoming memoir will contain explosive information about Megan, which will shock the core of the royal family. This is complete nonsense. Our palace insiders went on to say that Samantha has no secret about Megan, because Megan absolutely has nothing to do with..."
"Megan is really sad that her half sister is trying to make money out of her relationship with Harry, but she realizes it's inevitable."



Number  403
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But it affects my situation because I got a girl, who’s like ‘yo, who’s this b****?’.””
“Even if I was dating someone, no one would know anyway," he said.”
“I’m not the person who wants to be defined by anybody I date.”
“When quizzed about Katie during an appearance on Dish Nation , he said that she was an “old friend”.”
“While last year Jamie himself denying the persistent rumours and said they had started causing him problems with his actual girlfriend.”
“"And she definitely wouldn’t want to raise another child on her own, as she’s been forced to do with Suri since she left Tom [Cruise].”(Image: XPOSUREPHOTOS.COM)Rubbishing the reports, Katie’s spokesperson told Mirror Celebs that the story is “categorically untrue”.”
“"It’s understandable Katie would start to feel insecure about the relationship,” the source goes on.”
“That was said to have upset mum-of-one Katie, 37, who then decided to cancel it altogether.”
“The latest cover reads: “Jamie’s confession that changed everything.”Inside a source alleges that Jamie wanted to put off the nuptials “until they’d settle into life with a new baby”.”
“...magazine.”


"But it affected my situation, because I had a girl, like," Yo, who's this? " .””
"Even if I date someone, no one will know," he said
"I'm not the kind of person who wants to be defined by the person I date."
When asked about Katie on food country, he said she was an "old friend"
"Last year, Jamie himself denied these persistent rumors and said they had started to cause trouble for him and his real girlfriend."
"And she absolutely doesn't want to raise another child on her own, because since she left Tom (Cruise), she has been forced to raise it with Suri." Exposurephotos.COM A spokesman for Katie refuted the reports, telling the mirror celebrity that the report was "absolutely untrue."
"It's understandable that Katie will start to feel insecure about the relationship," the source continued
"It's said to upset Katie's 37 year old mother, so she decided to cancel it all."
The latest cover says, "Jamie's confession changed everything." Sources said Jamie wanted to postpone the wedding "until they settle down and have a new child."
“… Magazine. "



Number  404
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
““He’s now planning to overhaul his security, and not just at his Lake Como home.”
“Few celebs are as private as George, 56, and Amal Clooney, 39.”
“So when a photographer recently got onto their property in Lake Como, Italy to snap photos of their twin babies, Ella and Alexander, it drove the movie star right up the wall!”
“Not only is George considering pressing charges against Voici, the French magazine that acquired the images, our insider says the incident has him terrified and considering scaling up security for his family!”
“Does this mean the world-famous couple are about to turn their home into Fort Knox?”
“Head here for images of this picture-perfect couple!”
““This invasion of privacy has set off a huge chain reaction for George,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“He’s got five properties and he’s looking to beef up security on all of them.”
“HollywoodLifers, are you also worried about George and Amal’s twins’ safety?”


"Let us know!"
"He now plans to thoroughly check his safety, not just at his Lake Como home."
"Few celebrities are as private as George, 56, and Amar Clooney, 39."
"So when a photographer recently came to their property in Lake Como, Italy, to take pictures of their twins Ella and Alexander, it surprised the movie star!"
"George is not only considering making charges against voici, the French magazine that obtained the photos, but our insiders say that the incident scared him and he is considering strengthening the security of his family!"
"Does that mean the world-famous couple are going to turn their home into Fort Knox?"
"Come here and see a picture of the perfect couple!"
"This kind of invasion of privacy has caused a huge chain reaction for George," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"He has five properties and he wants to strengthen the security of all the properties."
"Hollywood stars, are you worried about the safety of George and Amar twins?"



Number  405
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meghan Markle and Prince Harry's Royal Wedding: Here's What Time Everything Is Happening...”
“See more on the couple in the video below, and keep up with all of ET's coverage of the royal wedding as we count down to May 19.”
“Then we were really by ourselves, which was crucial to me to make sure we had a chance to get to know each other."”
“We spent five days out there, which was absolutely fantastic.”
“"I think about three, maybe four weeks later, I managed to persuade her to come join me in Botswana and we camped out with each other under the stars.”
“Why Meghan Markle Won't Have a Maid of Honor for Her Royal Wedding With Prince Harry"We met once and then twice, back-to-back, two dates in London, last July," Harry said.”
“In the couple's first joint interview with BBC News after announcing their engagement last November, Harry revealed he and Meghan went camping together in Botswana early in their courtship, solidifying their relationship.”
“Harry and Meghan have spent time together in Africa before.”
“Travel + Leisure magazine reported last month that the twosome will stay at Namibia's newest luxury camp, Natural Selection's Hoanib Valley Camp.”
“...plenty of privacy as it s one of the least densely populated countries in the world...”


"The royal wedding of Megan markel and Prince Harry: Here's when it all happened..."
"More information about the couple can be seen in the video below. When we count down to May 19, please pay attention to all the reports about the royal wedding by et."
"We were really one person at that time, which was crucial for me to make sure we had a chance to get to know each other."
"We were there for five days. It was great."
"I think about three or four weeks later, I managed to persuade her to come camping with me in Botswana, and we camped together under the stars."
"Why didn't Megan Marcel have a bridesmaid at his royal wedding to Prince Harry?" "We met again and again in London last July, back-to-back, two dates," Harry said
"When they announced their engagement last November, the couple first accepted a joint interview with BBC news. Harry revealed that he and Megan had camped together in Botswana at the beginning of their love affair and consolidated their relationship."
"Harry and Megan have been together in Africa before."
Travel and leisure magazine reported last month that the couple will live in Namibia's newest luxury camp, the naturally chosen honib Valley camp
“…… This is one of the least densely populated countries in the world, with enough privacy... "



Number  406
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The site also pointed out how the tabloid is notoriously known for churning unreliable narratives about Pitt and Jolie.”
“...spin on it to increase its readership...”
“For some reason, NW magazine is claiming that Pitt is trying to prove in court Jolie cheated on him with a teacher when they were still together.”
“However, the tabloid’s story has now been debunked as false and proven to be a product of fabrications made by unreliable sources.”
“On Monday, Gossip Cop called out the magazine for publishing a baseless story in its latest issue.”
“According to the fact-checking celebrity reporting site, the tabloid fabricated the story by citing an unknown source who is claiming that Pitt is planning to file court documents to subpoena a person named Anna Kowalski to prove the “Maleficent” actress’ infidelity in court.”
“Kowalski is the woman identified by another tabloid, named Star, who can corroborate Jolie’s alleged affair with her dialect coach while she was filming her spy film “Salt” in 2009.”
“Kowalski was allegedly a housekeeper at New York’s Waldorf Astoria at the time and she allegedly witnessed the clandestine romance between the actress and the teacher.”
““Brad couldn’t believe it when he heard Anna’s claims,” NW quoted its source as saying.”
““You can bet that he’s going to have his lawyers use her anyway they can to get him equal custody of his kids.” The source’s claim, however, contradicts The Blast’s recent report that says the custody talks between the “Mr.”


"The website also points out that the tabloid is known for producing unreliable reports about Pitt and Julie."
“… Rotate it to increase its readership... "
"For some reason, NW magazine claims that Pete tried to prove in court that Julie cheated him when she was with a teacher."
"However, the tabloid report has now been exposed as false and has been proved to be the product of fabrication by unreliable sources."
"On Monday, gossip police denounced the magazine for publishing an unfounded report in its latest issue."
According to the fact finding of celebrity report website, the tabloid fabricated the story, citing an unknown source, claiming that Pete planned to file court documents and summon a man named Anna kovarsky to prove the "evil" actress's infidelity in court
"Kowalski is a woman identified by star, another tabloid, and she can confirm that Julie was suspected of having an affair with a dialect coach in the 2009 spy film salt."
"Kowalski was said to be a housekeeper at the Astoria Waldorf hotel in New York. She was said to have witnessed the secret love affair between the actress and the teacher."
"Brad couldn't believe what Anna said," NW quoted a source as saying
"You can bet he'll let his lawyers use her, and anyway, they can get equal custody of his children." However, the source's statement contradicts recent reports of the explosion, which said, "Mr



Number  407
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s just not possible.””
“...leaders to open its doors to Syrian refugees...”
“In an interview with Charlie Rose on US network CBS, the U2 front man said Trump is “potentially the worst idea that ever happened to America”.”
“Bono said America is different from other countries because it is “an idea”, one which Trump is “trying to hijack”.”
““That idea is bound up in justice and equality for all.”
“I think he’s hijacked the party.”
““I think he’s trying to hijack the idea of America.”
“And I think it’s bigger than all of us.”
“I think this is really dangerous In a separate interview with ATTN an online media company aimed at younger people Bono has recalled the historic struggle of Irish immigrants to the United States in calling on the country s political...”
“He said that to turn people away just because they are refugees was “a betrayal of the whole idea of America”.”


"It's impossible."
“…… Leaders open the door to Syrian refugees... "
"In an interview with Charlie Rose on CBS, the U2 leader said trump" may be the worst idea the United States has ever had. "
Bono said the United States is different from other countries because it is an "idea" and trump is "trying to hijack"
"This idea is closely related to justice and equality for all."
"I think he hijacked the party."
"I think he's trying to hijack American ideas."
"I think it's bigger than all of us."
"I think it's really dangerous. In another interview with Attn, an online media company for young people, Bono recalled the politics of Irish Immigration to the United States calling for the country..."
He said that to shut people out just because they are refugees is "a betrayal of the whole American philosophy."



Number  408
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We have no doubt that the rumor mill will continue to swirl, but as one person on Twitter wrote: Not everything from the ’90s needs a reboot.”
“— PINA (@PinaOnAir) February 15, 2018Brad Pitt turning up at Jennifer Aniston's place like pic.twitter.com/u4uGJ57NoO — Daniel (@Daniel_Reilly1) February 15, 2018Twitter, HAVE MORE CHILL!”
“Now, you might think this sounds like a decent idea ― if you ignore the couple’s very public breakup and subsequent divorce in 2005 that culminated with Pitt’s marriage to Angelina Jolie, which produced seemingly dozens of children.”
“You’d also have to ignore Aniston’s highly paparazzi-ed dating life that took her to a marriage with Justin Theroux ― and a split that she announced on Thursday.”
“Reuters Photographer / Reuters Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston, in this September 19, 2004 file photo.”
“Aniston filed for divorce on March 25, 2005.”
“And now, after her split from Justin Theroux, people are cheering for an Anniston-Pitt reunion.”
“Ignoring all of that, then sure.”
“A Jen and Brad reunion, 13 years, many children and much heartbreak later, would be fan-freakin’-tastic.”
“But we do not live in that fantasy world.”


"We have no doubt that rumors will continue to spread, but as one person on twitter wrote: not everything in the 1990s needs to be restarted."
"- Pina (@ pinaoneair) on February 15, 2018b, Brad Pitt showed up at Jennifer Aniston's house, like pic.twitter.com/u4uGJ57NoO -Daniel (@ Daniel / u reilly1) February 15, 2018 twitter, how calm
"Now, you might think that sounds like a good idea - if you ignore the fact that the couple broke up publicly in 2005 and then divorced, and eventually Pete married Angelina Jolie, who seems to have had dozens of children."
"You also have to ignore Aniston's paparazzi hit dating life, that's why she married Justin serrux, and that's what she announced on Thursday."
"Reuters photographer / Reuters Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston, September 19, 2004 information photo."
Aniston filed for divorce on March 25, 2005
"Now, after she broke up with Justin seru, people are cheering for Aniston Pitt's reunion."
"Ignore all this, and that's for sure."
"Jane and Brad reunion, 13 years, many children and many heartbroken, will be fans freak '- delicious."
"But we don't live in that fantasy world."



Number  409
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since HollywoodLies often speculates rather than actually reports the repeatedly discredited outlet asserted that that Berry had quite a glow about her as she rested her hands on the apparent bump with a huge smile on her face...”
“Similarly the fake news manufacturers at HollywoodLife maintained Berry is going to be a mama for the third time around They also cut and pasted the phrase that wrongfully alleged the actress was cradling a baby bump on the carpet...”
“'” The British tabloid further claimed Berry “has yet to publicly announce her pregnancy.” “When she stood to the side, the bump was even more apparent, and Halle made no effort to conceal her new curves,” added the misguided newspaper.”
“The Mirror, for example, wrote that the actress appeared on the “red carpet proudly cradling a ‘baby bump.”
“We’re told it’s “simply untrue.”According to a slew of speculative and incorrect stories, Berry is expecting her third child and debuted a “baby bump” at the 16th Annual Chrysalis Butterfly Ball in Los Angeles.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively correct this fake news.”
“Halle Berry is not pregnant at 50, despite a slew of inaccurate reports.”


"Because Hollywood stars often speculate rather than actually report, this repeatedly discredited media asserts that Berry has a bright smile on her face, hands on the obvious lump, and a bright smile on her face..."
"Similarly, the fake news producers of Hollywood life think that berry will be a mother for the third time. They also cut and pasted a sentence that wrongly alleges that the actress is holding a small lump on the carpet..."
"The British tabloids further claim that Berry has not publicly announced her pregnancy." "When she stood aside, the lump became more pronounced, and Harry didn't try to cover up her new curve," the misguided newspaper added
For example, the mirror wrote that the actress appeared "on the red carpet, holding a 'small lump' with pride."
"We were told it was' totally untrue '. According to a series of guesses and incorrect stories, Berry was pregnant with her third child and made her debut as a "baby lump" at the 16th pupa butterfly dance in Los Angeles
"The gossip police can completely correct this false news."
"Despite many inaccurate reports, Halle Berry wasn't pregnant when she was 50."



Number  410
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Brad, call us.”
“Perhaps he's just a single guy.”
“AdvertisementApparently that's untrue, too.”
“Since his split with Angelina Jolie, Brad has also been linked to Sienna Miller.”
“It could have been a dreamy coupling; Macpherson and Pitt first met on the set of Friends in 1999, when Brad guest starred on his then-wife Jennifer Aniston's hit show.”
“Brad Pitt’s rep has said that the report is “not true,” and that the actor and Macpherson are not dating.”
“Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston have reunited on-screen for the first time since their divorce STOP THE PRESS.”
“Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston have reunited on-screen for the first time since their divorce Jennifer Aniston OMG!”
“Read next OMG!”
“"He was laughing at everything she said and leaning in really close," they added.”


"Brad, call us."
"Maybe he's just a bachelor."
"Obviously, it's not true either."
"Brad has been in touch with Sienna Miller since breaking up with Angelina Jolie."
"It could be a fantastic couple; MacPherson and Pete first met in 1999 on friends, when Brad gaster starred in a hit show for his then wife, Jennifer Aniston."
Brad Pitt's agent said the report was "untrue" and that he had no date with MacPherson
"Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston meet again on screen for the first time after their divorce, and the media no longer pays attention to them."
Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston meet again on screen for the first time after their divorce. My God
"My God, read it!"
"He laughed at every word she said and was very close," they added



Number  411
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pictured inside: Sandra‘s boyfriend Bryan out on a photo shoot in Hollywood on Sunday (December 6).”
““If a traditional home is one that is filled with lots of love and poop jokes, no sleep, schedule books filled with more kids’ social events than adults’ and lots of yelling over who touched who first … then I have a very traditional family,” Sandra added.”
“Sandra also was asked if her family, including son Louis, 5, was traditional.”
“1 on the to-do list.”Sandra is reportedly currently dating photographer Bryan Randall (who actually photographed the cover story spread for People mag’s reveal).”
“When asked if she could see herself getting married again, the 51-year-old Oscar winner responded, “I don’t think so, but I can see myself in a committed, safe relationship where there is lots of love and laughter, and ‘making memories’ is No.”
“Sandra Bullock is opening up about her current views on marriage after adopting her second child (a little girl named Laila!)”


"Inside the picture: Sandra's boyfriend Brian took a picture in Hollywood on Sunday (December 6)
Sandra added: "if a traditional family is full of love and pranks, no sleep, more children's social schedules than adults, and yelling at who touches who first Then I have a very traditional family. "
Sandra was also asked if her family, including her five-year-old son, Louis, was traditional
According to reports, Sandra is currently on a date with photographer Bryan Randall (who actually shot the cover story for people magazine's uncover)
Asked if she could see her remarriage, the 51 year old Oscar winner replied: "I don't think so, but I can see that I am in a loyal and safe relationship, where there is love and laughter, and it's not OK to make memories."
After adopting her second child, a little girl named Lyra, Sandra Bullock disclosed her current views on marriage



Number  412
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The tabloid is claiming that Rocknroll was upset that DiCaprio barely acknowledged him last year and doesn't want to sit through another night where his wife will "fawn over" DiCaprio.”
“After last year's Oscars, Star posted a gallery of images of Winslet and DiCaprio hugging and kissing at the show, and speculated that the former costars may have sparked a romance.”
“The tabloid claims that Winslet's husband Ned Rocknroll is feuding with DiCaprio after seeing how the actor interacted with his wife at last year's ceremony.”
“Star Magazine is reporting that Kate Winslet is staying away from the Oscars to avoid her Titanic costar Leonardo DiCaprio, but GossipCop is calling bullshit on that story.”


The tabloid claimed that rocnoll was upset that DiCaprio barely admitted him last year, and he did not want to sit another night and let his wife "flatter" DiCaprio
"After last year's Oscars, the star posted pictures of Winslet and DiCaprio hugging and kissing at the awards ceremony, and speculated that the two former stars might have triggered a romance."
"The tabloid claimed that Winslet's husband, Ned rocnoll, was at odds with DiCaprio after seeing the interaction between DiCaprio and his wife at last year's wedding."
"Star" magazine reported that Kate Winslet to avoid "Titanic" star Leonardo DiCaprio away from the Oscar, but "gossip news" called it nonsense



Number  413
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“October 2013Foxx denied dating the “Batman Begins” actress while speaking with Entertainment Tonight in October 2013.”
“KATIE HOLMES, JAMIE FOXX LOOK LIKE A COUPLE AT PRE-GRAMMYS GALA“It’s amazing what people will do to sell you out,” he commented at the time.”
“January 2018Photos published by W showed Foxx and Holmes at the same table at a Grammys weekend event.”
““Did we lose him?” Smith asked.”
“Foxx didn’t comment and took off his headset before walking away.”
“Like some real ‘Love and Basketball?’” he quipped.”
““Did you and Katie Holmes play basketball for Valentine's Day?”
“February 2018During a live interview, ESPN’s Michael Smith asked Foxx about he and Holmes reportedly shooting some hoops on Valentine's Day.”
“June 2018Holmes' rep denied a report claiming she and Foxx had called off a wedding and split, according to W magazine, adding that the article was "100 percent untrue."”
“A rep for Holmes didn't respond to Fox News' request for comment on the reports.”


"In October 2013, fox denied dating the heroine of" Batman Begins, "which was on entertainment night in October 2013."
"Katie Holmes and Jamie fox looked like a couple before the Grammy Awards," he commented at the time. "It's amazing what people do to sell you."
"In January 2018, w published photos showing Fox and Sherlock Holmes sitting at the same table at a Grammy weekend event."
"Have we lost him? "Asked Smith
"Fox didn't comment and took off his headphones before leaving."
"Like true love and basketball? "He joked
"Did you play basketball with Katie Holmes on Valentine's day?"
"In February 2018, in a live interview, Michael Smith of ESPN asked fox about playing basketball with Holmes on Valentine's day."
According to W magazine, in June 2018, Holmes's representative denied a report that she and fox cancelled their wedding and broke up, adding that the article was "100% untrue."
"A representative of Holmes did not respond to Fox News's request for comment on the reports."



Number  414
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s deplorable that someone, for their own selfish reasons, leaked selective portions of the confidential and sealed court record to create an inaccurate and unfair picture of what is really happening.””
“Pitt has to designate one or two of the minor children to spend time with at a time.”
“A judge in the couple s ongoing divorce case said the six children not having a relationship with their father is harmful to them adding that it is critical that each of them have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother according to court documents obtained by...”
“The Blast...”
“The judge also ordered the “Maleficent” actress to provide her kids with cellphones that Pitt can call whenever he’d like without Jolie monitoring.”
“She’s also not allowed to read their text messages with their father.”
“The court also laid out a summer schedule for each of the children except Maddox, who is old enough to decide how much time he wants to spend with Pitt, the documents read.”
“Pitt will have custody from June 8 to June 17 for four hours per day while he stays in London, where Jolie is renting a house.”
“The “Ocean’s 13” star also has to spend time with each child at least twice during this 10-day period.”
““From the start, Angelina has been focused only on their health and needs, which is why it was so important that this last court hearing be conducted privately.”


"It's a pity that some people, for their own selfish reasons, leaked part of the confidential and sealed court records in order to create an inaccurate and unfair truth."
"Pete has to appoint one or two underage children to spend some time together."
"A judge in the divorce case being heard by the couple said that the six children had no relationship with their father, which was harmful to them, and added that according to Each of them must have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother, "he said
"Explosion..."
The judge also ordered the "evil" actress to provide her children with mobile phones so that Pitt could call them at any time without Julie's monitoring
"She's not allowed to read their text messages with her father, either."
"The court has also made a summer schedule for each child, and with the exception of Maddox, who has grown up to decide how much time to spend with Pete," the document wrote
"Peter will have four hours of custody a day from June 8 to June 17, during which time he will stay in London and Julie will rent there."
"In these 10 days, the star of ocean 13 has to get along with each child at least twice."
"From the beginning, Angelina only focused on their health and needs, which is why the last trial had to be held in private."



Number  415
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They also said that they intend to remain friends even though their romantic relationship has ended.”
“In the statement, they claimed that the decision to break up was “lovingly” made by both of them.”
“That’s according to an article in Radar Online where an alleged insider source claims that Jane wants Brad to get back with Jennifer now that her relationship with Justin Theroux is over.”
““Jane and the whole Missouri-based Pitt family haven’t been disrespectful about Jen and Justin’s marriage, but once it became apparent things wouldn’t work out they actively pushed Brad to get back in touch,” the source said to Radar.”
““Now they’re determined to see them back together for a second chance.”But celebrity rumor watchdog, Gossip Cop, is saying that the story is false based on their research.”
“They confirmed that the two exes communicate sometimes via text but they haven’t seen each other in a long time.”
“There was also no contact between them during the week since Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux announced their divorce.”
“This isn’t the first time that Radar Online has made allegations that Jane Pitt has tried to influence her son’s dating decisions.”
“They have previously reported that she called Aniston to help Brad “get back on his feet.” According to Gossip Cop, Radar Online’s sister publication has also made up stories about Brad Pitt’s mom.”
“They recently claimed that Jane Pitt moved into his home after his divorce from Angelina Jolie.”


"They also said that even if their romantic relationship is over, they still intend to maintain their friendship."
"In the statement, they claimed that the decision to break up was made 'lovingly' by the two of them."
"According to an article in radar online, a so-called insider claimed that Jane wants Brad and Jennifer to make up because her relationship with Justin serrux is over."
"Jane and the pitt family in Missouri are not disrespectful to Jane and Justin's marriage, but they will actively push Brad to get back in touch as soon as it becomes obvious that something is wrong," the source told radar
"Now they are determined to see them together again." But gossip police, the celebrity rumor watchdog, said the story was false based on their research
"They confirmed that the two ex girlfriends sometimes communicated through text messages, but they haven't seen each other for a long time."
"There has been no connection between Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus in the week since they announced their divorce."
"This is not the first time radar online has accused Jane Pitt of trying to influence her son's dating decision."
They previously reported that she called Aniston to help Brad "get back on his feet.". According to gossip police, radar online's sister magazine also made up the story of Brad Pitt's mother
"They recently claimed that Jane Pitt moved into her home after divorcing Angelina Jolie."



Number  416
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The most recent getaway for Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck with the little ones was a trip to Big Sky over the holidays[Featured Image by Jason Merritt/Getty Images]”
“Radar Online shares details about Jen and Ben’s current status.”
“Last week, Sienna Miller was the said woman who had Affleck’s attentions, yet this week, it is his “detox nurse” Elizabeth Weaver who the Live By Night star is said to be infatuated with.”
“Not only that, but Garner is reportedly “seeing red” over the relationship that her estranged husband has with the nurse.”
“Ben Affleck Enjoys Lunch Date With Mystery Blonde Amid Jennifer Garner Reunion Rumors https t co 3zcem61YZm celebrity gossip 100 Celeb News 24 7 celebnews1456 January 6 2017 Gossip Cop shares how the rumor came to be ignited and the culprit is none other than The National Enquirer a tabloid...”
“...known for its fabricated stories...”
“According to the National Enquirer an addiction challenged Affleck is hooked on Weaver who the magazine describes as his detox nurse A so called source tells the tabloid Ben is infatuated with her The magazine s supposed insider further contends He s feeling pretty vulnerable these days and Elizabeth has...”
“...helped him regain his confidence He adores her adds the publication s alleged tipster The story is completely inaccurate and as GC notes the tabloid simply used photos of Affleck and Elizabeth Weaver while in Los Angeles together to make it seem as though the two are dating...”
“The photos then became the catapult to the tabloid fabricating a whole story that is totally untrue.”
“As for Garner’s anger about the relationship Ben and Elizabeth have, these claims are also completely false.”


"The most recent trip that Jennifer Garner and Ben Affleck took with their children was a holiday trip to big sky (close-up photo courtesy of Jason Merritt / Getty pictures)"
"Radar online shared details of Jen and Ben's current situation."
Last week, Sienna Miller was the woman that Affleck focused on, and this week, the star of nightlife is said to be infatuated with his "detoxification nurse" Elizabeth Weaver
Moreover, Ghana is reported to be "blushing" because of her separated husband's relationship with a nurse
"Ben Affleck enjoys a lunch date with the mysterious blonde in the rumor of Jennifer Garner's reunion. HTTPS t Co 3zcem61yzm celebrity gossip 100 celebrity news 247 celebrity news 1456 January 6, 2017 gossip police share how the rumor was ignited. The culprit is national inquirer a tabloid..."
“… Famous for fictional stories... "
"According to the National Enquirer, a drug addicted Affleck fell in love with Weaver. The magazine said that she was his drug treatment nurse. A so-called source told the tabloid that she was infatuated with her. The magazine's insiders further claimed that he now feels very vulnerable and that Elizabeth has..."
“… To help him regain his confidence, he adores her, adding that the publication's so-called whistleblower story is totally inaccurate, as GC points out, the tabloid just uses the photos of Affleck and Elizabeth Weaver while in Los Angeles together, making it seem like two are dating... "
"These photos later became the trigger for tabloids to fabricate a completely untrue story."
"As for Ghana's anger over Ben's relationship with Elizabeth, these statements are also totally wrong."



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, who would you like to see Rihanna date?”
““He feels like Chris is capable of trying anything to win her back and that has him feeling uneasy,” the source admits.”
“He is feeling ‘tense’ over her ex, Chris Brown!”
“Despite keeping their relationship super private, Rihanna, 29, and Hassan Jameel, stepped out on Grammys night, proving they’re still going strong.”
“However, Hassan — a billionaire businessman and Toyota heir — is stressing over RiRi’s ex, Chris Brown, 28.”
““He is uncomfortable with her ex Chris lurking in her past,” a source close to Rihanna tells HollywoodLife.com.”
“As previously reported, Chris has been keeping a close eye on his ex and her new man, as he’s been known to have lingering feelings from their past romance.”
“With that being said Hassan doesn t trust Chris and he feels like he is unpredictable when it comes to Rihanna Although the insider says Rihanna has opened up to Hassan about her relationship with Chris and assured him that that s all part of her past Hassan isn t...”
“...entirely convinced...”
““Hassan tries not to worry about Chris, but knowing he may still love Rihanna makes him feel a bit tense.”Rihanna and Hassan have yet to confirm their relationship since they were first romantically linked in June 2017.”


"Hollywood actress, who do you want to see date Rihanna?"
"He felt that Chris had the ability to try anything to win her back, which upset him," the source admitted
"He's nervous about her ex girlfriend Chris Brown!"
"Although Rihanna, 29, and Hassan Jamil maintain a super private relationship, they came out on Grammy night, proving that their relationship is still very strong."
"However, Hassan, a billionaire businessman and successor to Toyota, is putting pressure on Riley's ex girlfriend, Chris Brown, 28."
A source close to Rihanna told reporters: "he feels uneasy about her ex boyfriend Chris lurking in her past life." Hollywood life. "
"As previously reported, Chris has been keeping a close eye on his ex and her new boyfriend because he is known to have a lingering relationship with their past relationships."
"In other words, Hassan doesn't trust Chris. When it comes to Rihanna, he feels very elusive. Although insiders say Rihanna has disclosed her relationship with Chris to Hassan and assured him that this is all she has in the past. Hassan is not..."
“… I totally believe... "
"Hassan tries not to worry about Chris, but knowing that he may still love Rihanna makes him feel a little nervous." Rihanna and Hassan have not confirmed their relationship since they first fell in love in June 2017



Number  418
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“SOURCE: Hollywood life.”
“I know I’d go back to you.” Well, she won’t go back Justin unless he’s ready to think about putting a ring on it!”
“We’ve got the EXCLUSIVE details.”
“Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber‘s latest go at love seemed so promising.”
“They’re both much more mature and have come so far since their days of teenage love in the past.”
“At 25, Selena was hoping that Justin could start thinking about a serious commitment in their future — marriage — but the Biebs, 24, wasn’t willing to go there yet.”
““He loved her very much and still does and she still has strong feelings for him.”
“But he wasn’t ready to settle down with her as soon as she wanted to and she couldn’t get him to actually think about marriage in a serious nature,” a source close to Justin tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Do you prefer a can or the bottle?”
“Check out these great Tusker Lite deals from Jumia.Shop here.”


"Source: Hollywood life."
"I know I'll come back to you." Well, she won't come back to Justin unless he's ready to put on the ring
"We have exclusive details."
"Serena Gomez and Justin Bieber's latest love affair seems promising."
"Both of them are much more mature. They have come so far from the past teenage love."
"At 25, Serena wanted Justin to start thinking about their serious commitment in the future - to get married - but the 24-year-old biebers didn't want to go yet."
"He loves her very much, and still does, and she still has strong feelings for him."
A source close to Justin told reporters: "but he's not ready to settle down with her when she wants to, and she can't make him really seriously think about marriage." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Do you like cans or bottles?"
"Look at these great tusk Lite deals from jumia. The shop is here. "



Number  419
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I wouldn't blame them.”
“Of course, while the two singers don't follow each other, they both have public accounts, so who's to say if they don't continue to Insta-stalk each other?”
“But this serves as an interesting reminder that Jelena is truly over (I will never be done mourning it).”
“Even when the two rekindled their romance back in 2017/2018, they didn't follow each other.”
“Justin hasn't actually followed Selena for a while.”
“And poor Biebs can't avoid his ex, as even Instagram is suggesting they reconcile.”
“As you can see in the pic, Justin isn't following Selena on Insta.”
“April 2019: Justin Reveals He Doesn't Follow Selena on InstagramJustin recently took to Instagram to call out an account that was bullying him online, but in the process he revealed something very interesting about his relationship with his ex.”


"I don't blame them."
"Of course, although the two singers don't follow each other, they both have public accounts. If they don't follow each other, who can say?"
"But it's an interesting reminder that yelina is really over (I'll never end it)."
"Even if the two rekindled their relationship in 2017 / 2018, they didn't follow each other."
"Justin hasn't been following Serena for a while."
"Poor Bibbs couldn't avoid his ex girlfriend. Even instagram suggested that they make up."
"As you can see in the photo, Justin didn't follow Serena on insta."
"April 2019: Justin revealed that he didn't follow Selena on instagram Justin. Recently, he raised an online bullying account on instagram, but in the process, he revealed some very interesting things about his relationship with his predecessor."



**Something goes wrong**
“While the actor hasn’t confirmed the romance, it appears he has decided to spend the majority of his free time with his children over the summer.”
“Photo: Jeff Spicer/Getty ImagesIn Pitt and Jolie’s previous custody agreement, there wasn’t “a set schedule” and the arrangement was “unorganized,” according to those close to the stars.”
“However, it appears the “Fury” actor is more thrilled about the perks that will come along with the new agreement.”
“Pitt, who shares Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9, with Jolie, is reportedly excited about being able to spend more time with his children following the previous arrangement, which damaged their relationship.”
““Brad was always an amazing dad.”
“The kids have always been his life.”
“He has flaws like most people, but so does Angie,” a source told People.”
““Brad must be so relieved that the court is now helping him,” the insider added.”
“However, the court has since ordered Jolie to allow the actor to repair his relationship with his children and has implemented a detailed schedule that divides custody between the parents.”
““Their busy schedules are going to be a huge challenge because Neri isn’t going to give up her life in Cambridge or her job at MIT for anyone, even Brad Pitt,” the insider said.”


"Although the actor has yet to confirm the relationship, it seems that he has decided to spend most of his free time with the children in the summer."
"Photo: according to people close to the star, Jeff Spicer / Getty Emma had no" fixed schedule "or" no organization "in the previous guardianship agreement between Pitt and Julie."
However, the anger hero seems to be more excited about the perks of the new deal
According to reports, Pitt and Julie have 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 12-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox. He is happy to spend more time with the children according to the previous arrangement, which has damaged their relationship
"Brad has always been a great dad."
"Children have always been his life."
"He has shortcomings like most people, but so does Angie," a source told people
"Brad must be pleased that the court is helping him now," the person familiar with the matter added
"However, the court later ordered Julie to allow the actors to repair their relationship with the children and implemented a detailed timetable to distribute custody between the parents."
"Their busy schedule will be a huge challenge because Neri won't give up her life in Cambridge or her job at MIT, or even Brad Pitt, for anyone," the person familiar with the matter said



Number  421
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Trump accused Graham of seeking publicity with his criticism, while he offered support for a GOP primary challenger to Flake.”
“C both of whom have criticized the president s remarks...”
“Trump said it was sad that the history and culture of the United States is being ripped apart by the removal of Confederate statues and monuments after ripping two GOP senators earlier in the morning over their criticism of his remarks this week blaming white supremacists and counterprotesters alike for...”
“Saturday s violence...”
“It was a defiant move by a president who has come under fierce criticism, even from members of his own party, for not placing enough blame on white supremacists who marched through the Virginia college town on Saturday.”
“ADVERTISEMENTYet in defending the Confederate statues, Trump could be seeking to consolidate support within at least a portion of his base, which has looked at the removal of Confederate statues and memorials with anger.”
“"Sad to see the history and culture of our great country being ripped apart with the removal of our beautiful statues and monuments," Trump tweeted.”
“"You can't change history, but you can learn from it.”
“"Robert E Lee, Stonewall Jackson — who's next, Washington, Jefferson?”
“So foolish!”


"Trump accused Graham of using his criticism to seek public attention, and he also expressed his support for Republican primary challenger frack."
"They all criticized the president's speech..."
"It's sad that the history and culture of the United States are being torn apart by the removal of the statues and monuments of the Confederacy, after two Republican senators tore them up in the morning for criticizing his remarks this week against white supremacists and anti protectionists..."
"Saturday's violence..."
"This is a provocative move by a president who has been severely criticized, even from members of his own party, for not blaming enough white supremacists who marched through the university town of Virginia on Saturday."
"However, in defending the Confederate statues, trump may seek to consolidate support in at least part of the base, which angrily watched the removal of the Confederate statues and monuments."
"It's sad to see the history and culture of our great country torn apart as our beautiful statues and monuments are demolished," trump tweeted
"You can't change history, but you can learn from it."
"Robert E. Lee, Stonewall Jackson - who's next, Washington, Jefferson?"
"What a fool



Number  422
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“They want him to stay far, far away from their family forever!”We pay for juicy info!”
“...in her recent memoir!”“O.J.’s release may bring Kris and Caitlyn closer because they spent many years fearing him for what they believe he did to Nicole.”
““Kris and Caitlyn both believe that he killed Nicole and they are terrified that he will come after them now that he is out,” the insider told Radar, adding that Caitlyn, “is especially concerned because of what she wrote about O.J.”
“...that Simpson is guilty of Brown s murder...”
“Although Jenner s ex husband the late Robert Kardashian Sr who is the father of Kim 36 Kourtney 38 and Khloe 33 was part of the legal Dream Team that got Simpson cleared of the murder conviction the 61 year old momager and her ex Caitlyn Jenner 67 both believe...”
“...more than anyone!”As the world knows, Jenner, 61, was best friends with Simpson’s ex-wife, Nicole Brown Simpson, who was brutally murdered at her home in Los Angeles in 1992.”
“All The Prison Release Details RevealedOur snitch spills, “She [Kris] was hoping that she would never have to see him for the rest of her life and she despises O.J.”
“Simpson Go Free?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"They want him to stay away from his family forever! "We pay for interesting information!"
“… In her recent memoirs! "The release of O.J. may bring Chris and Caitlin closer together because they've been worried about what he's done to Nicole for years."
"Chris and Caitlin both think he killed Nicole, and they're afraid he's gone now and will catch up with them," the person told radar, adding Caitlin was "particularly worried about what she wrote about O.J."
“… Simpson is guilty of the murder of brown... "
"Although Jenner's ex husband, the late old Robert Kardashian, was king 36's father, coultney 38 and Khloe 33 were part of the legal dream team, Simpson was convicted of murder, and her 61 year old mother and her former Caitlin Jenner 67 believed that..."
“… More important than anyone else! "As we all know, Jenna, 61, is Simpson's best friend to his ex-wife Nicole Brown Simpson, who was brutally killed at her home in Los Angeles in 1992."
"All the details of the prison release reveal the informant's secret," she (Chris) hoped she would never see him again, and she despised O.J
"Simpson is free?"



Number  423
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Harry’s uncle Prince Andrew is said to have offered up his £13 million chalet at the spot for the stag party.”
“Harry will most likely celebrate there alongside brother Prince William and friends.”
“It is believed a spot has been decided on: a luxury ski resort in Verbier, Switzerland.”
“While the location of Harry and Meghan’s honeymoon is not yet confirmed, there have been rumours regarding Harry’s stag do – which is sure to be a raucous affair.”
“There is even a volcano – Nevis Peak – for some honeymoon photos.”
“And as it is one of the more secluded islands, Nevis would offer the privacy the couple crave, as well as the chance to explore acres of rainforest.”
“...the honeymooning couple who have become one of the most photographed couples on the planet...”
“Speaking about his hopes for a royal honeymoon visit CEO of the Nevis Tourism Authority Greg Phillip said As it is one of the most romantic islands in the world we are quietly confident that Nevis guaranteed privacy will attract the royal newlyweds Privacy will be a top priority for...”
“(Image: PAUL J RICHARDS / Getty)When Harry returned to Nevis in 2016, he made a trip to the aptly named Lovers Beach, known as one of the most romantic destinations in the world.”
“Diana and Harry stayed at the Montpelier Plantation and Beach, a historic former sugar plantation on the Montpelier Estate.”


"It is said that Harry's uncle Prince Andrew took out a 13 million pound cabin on the spot to attend the Bucks Party."
"Harry will probably be there with Prince William and his friends to celebrate."
A site is believed to have been selected: a luxury ski resort in Weber, Switzerland
"Although the location of Harry and Megan's honeymoon has not been determined, there are rumors that Harry's" bucks Tour "will be very lively."
"There's even a volcano - Nevis - that can take some honeymoon photos."
"As Nevis is a relatively secluded island, Nevis will provide the couple with the privacy they desire and the opportunity to explore the vast rainforest."
“… A couple on their honeymoon, they have become the most photographed couple on the planet... "
"Speaking of his hope for the Royal Honeymoon, Greg Phillips, chief executive of Nevis tourism, said that as Nevis is one of the most romantic islands in the world, we quietly believe that Nevis' privacy protection will attract the royal family and that privacy will be the top priority for newlyweds..."
(photo: Paul J Richards / Getty) when Harry returned to Nevis in 2016, he went to the right named lover's beach, known as one of the most romantic destinations in the world. "
Diana and Harry live at Montpellier manor and beach, a historic former sugar plantation on Montpellier manor



Number  424
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Foxx once referred to Cruise as his “good friend” and even commended the actor on his divorce etiquette during a 2012 interview with Extra.”
“News of Jamie Foxx’s relationship with Katie Holmes comes as a surprise to many due to his relationship with her ex-husband, Tom Cruise.”
“...the knot in Paris and having Holmes close friend Zac Posen design her wedding gown...”
“Opening up about the couple s alleged plans to get married the source added There s talk of a small intimate ceremony but of course they want to make sure whatever they do goes off without a hitch The source went on to allege that the couple was considering tying...”
““They had some struggles after they decided to go public… It changed the dynamic of their relationship and briefly shook Katie’s identity as a proud single mom who didn’t need a man,” the source disclosed.”
“Sources close to the couple announced their alleged plans to wed to Radar Online.”
“The elusive couple has rarely been spotted out together in public, but now they’re reportedly getting ready to take their love to the next step.”
“Jamie Foxx and Katie Holmes have been the subject of dating rumors for years now.”


Fox once called cruise his "good friend" and even praised Cruise's divorce etiquette in an interview with extra in 2012
"Jamie Fox's relationship with Katie Holmes surprised many people because of his relationship with her ex husband Tom Cruise."
“… The knot in Paris and Sherlock Holmes' close friend Zach Posen designed her wedding dress... "
"The couple's so-called marriage plan was made public, and the source added that there was a small intimacy ceremony, but of course they wanted to make sure everything they did went smoothly. The source went on to say that the couple were considering getting married..."
"They were struggling after they decided to go public This has changed the dynamics of their relationship and briefly shaken Katie's identity as a proud single mother who doesn't need men. "
"Sources close to the couple announced their so-called plan to marry radar online."
"The elusive couple are rarely found together in public, but they are now reported to be preparing to take their love to the next step."
"Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes have been the subject of dating rumors for years."



Number  425
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 02077824220”
“Kim Kardashian steals the show in daring mesh dress as she watches Gigi Hadid at Balmain THE ULTIMATE GIRLBAND Kim and Kourtney Kardashian stun in co ordinated skimpy metallic outfits at Balmain afterparty GOING DOWN UNDER Robbie Williams makes crude joke about Kylie Minogue while addressing Spice Girls sex rumours...”
“In the documents, filed on September 19 in LA, Angelina has asked for "miscellaneous jewellery and other personal effects" as part of the split.”
“8 Angelina has requested to keep the jewellery she has accumulated during her marriage to Brad Credit Getty Images WireImage 8 She also wants to keep her white diamond engagement ring that was designed to suit her fingers Credit The Communications Group The Hollywood stars shocked the world when they...”
“...announced their divorce after 12 years together and two years of marriage...”
“According to The Hollywood Reporter, the battle of the bling will include many expensive jewels that Brad, 52, gave Angelina, including her impressive £194,000 ($250,000) engagement ring designed by Robert Procop.”
“The World War Z actor worked with Robert for more than a year to create the perfect engagement ring for Angelina.”
“The design featured a graduated white-diamond which Procop said would flatter Angelina's fingers.”
“8 Angelina's Lorraine Schwartz earrings cost almost £2million Credit: Getty Images - WireImageBrad and Angelina had a long-running partnership with Procop and even collaborated with him on the Style of Jolie collection in 2010.”
“The proceeds of her collection were donated to the Education Partnership for Children of Conflict, which she founded in 2006.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207782420 directly
"Kim Kardashian stole the show" the ultimate girl "while watching Gigi Hadid in balman in a bold mesh dress. Kim and Courtney Kardashian dressed in coordinated light metal costumes at balman's party. Led by Robbie Williams, Kim and kurtany Kardashian took over Kylie Minogue made a vulgar joke and made a speech on the hot girl's sexual rumors at the same time... "
In a filing filed in Los Angeles on September 19, Angelina asked for "miscellaneous jewelry and other personal effects" as part of the breakup
"8 Angelina asked to keep the jewelry she had accumulated during her marriage to Brad. She also wants to keep her white diamond engagement ring, which is designed to fit her fingers. Thanks to the communications group, Hollywood stars have shocked the world. They... "
“…… We've been together for 12 years, and we'll divorce after two years of marriage. "
"According to the Hollywood Reporter, the jewelry war will include a lot of expensive jewelry that Brad, 52, gave Angelina, including her impressive 194000 pounds (250000 dollars) engagement ring, which was designed by Robert Prokop."
"The World War II actor worked with Robert for more than a year to create the perfect engagement ring for Angelina."
"The design features a white diamond, which procop says will make Angelina's fingers smoother."
"8 Angelina's Lorraine Schwartz Earrings cost nearly 2 million pounds. Credit: Getty Images wire magebrad and Angelina have a long-term relationship with procop and even launched the Julie collection with him in 2010."
"Her collection was donated to her partnership for education for children in conflict, which she founded in 2006."



Number  426
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The former couple shares a daughter, Dream Kardashian.”
“Rob has denied the physical and verbal assault claims brought against him by his ex.”
“Blac Chyna is reportedly accusing the Kardashian family of conspiring to cancel her show.”
“Chyna, 30, claims the family threatened to pull their show Keeping Up with the Kardashians from E!”
“...if the network did not cancel her show Rob & Chyna, according to a new legal filing obtained by TMZ.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The model and entrepreneur reportedly goes on to claim that the first season of the reality show, in which she starred with her ex Rob Kardashian, 31, outperformed Keeping Up with the Kardashians’ ratings, and was in the midst of filming its second season when it was canceled.”
“Chyna claims that a “key meeting” between the Kardashian family and E!”
“...executives in January 2017 led to the show’s cancellation, according to TMZ.”
“She also reportedly alleges that the Kardashians “falsely” accusing her of physically abusing Rob contributed to the show’s demise.”


"The old couple have a daughter, dream Kardashian."
"Rob denied that his ex boyfriend accused him of physical and verbal assault."
"Blake ziner is reported to have accused the Kardashian family of conspiring to cancel her show."
"Chener, 30, claimed that their family threatened to overtake the kardashians in their show!"
"If the station doesn't cancel her show, according to a new legal document obtained by TMZ, rob & Chyna."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to reports, the model entrepreneur also claimed that the first season of her reality show, CO starring 31 year old former rob Kardashian, exceeded Kardashian's ratings, and that the show was canceled in the process of filming the second season."
Chener claimed that the kardashians and E! "
"According to TMZ, executives in January 2017 led to the cancellation of the show."
"According to reports, she also claimed that Kardashian" wrongly "accused her of physical abuse of rob, which led to the demise of the play."



Number  427
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s simple: it all comes down to Harry’s place in the line of royal succession.”
“Image zoom Credit: Chris Jackson/Getty ImagesSo why can they show off their love but Will and Kate can’t?”
“(Although they have reportedly been pulling off secret, incognito airport pick-ups for quite some time.)”
“Image zoom Credit: Chris Jackson/Getty ImagesAs Vogue noted, Harry and Meghan have been showing their love for each other all over the 2017 Invictus Games, with photos showing the couple holding hands, kissing, and smiling at one another.”
“...show they do not feel the need to show their love for each other to the world And while this royal pair is semi banned from being lovey dovey in public there is at least one royal couple who isn t Prince Harry and his girlfriend Meghan Markle...”
“As Kermode noted It is very clear that William and Kate are emotionally close however they do not seem to feel the need to prove their love particularly when on official state business The expert added They come across as a strong independent couple and while they are always on...”
“And don’t let this refusal to hold hands in front of the world confuse you or make you think the royal couple isn’t as strong, committed, and loving as the rest of us.”
““The Queen rarely holds hands with her husband in public and this seems to have set an unwritten precedent for the other royals,” Kermode said.”
““The couple are likely to show very little PDA, if any, to remain professional during their designated roles abroad.”Beyond looking professional, Robin Kermode, a body language expert, told the Daily Mail that the couple may also refrain from any displays of affection because the Queen herself told them to.”
““There is no actual etiquette or royal protocol that says the couple must refrain from PDA,” Myka Meier, a royal etiquette expert and founder and director of Beaumont Etiquette, told People in 2016.”


"It's simple: it all boils down to Harry's position as heir to the royal family."
"Image zooming credit: Chris Jackson / Getty imageso why can they show off their love, but will and Kate can't?"
(although it is reported that they have been picking up the plane secretly and anonymously for some time.)
"Credit for image zooming: Chris Jackson / Getty Images as vogue points out that Harry and Megan have been showing their love for each other at the inviolable games in 2017. The photos show the couple holding hands, kissing and smiling."
“… It shows that they don't feel the need to show their love to each other to the world. Although the royal family members are half forbidden to be lovely pigeons in public, at least one of them is not Prince Harry and his girlfriend Megan markel... "
"As kimod points out, it's clear that William and Kate are emotionally close, but they don't seem to have to prove their love, especially in business," the expert added, adding that they are a strong and independent couple, although they are always together... "
"Don't let this pair of people who refuse to hold hands in front of the world confuse you, and don't let you feel that this royal couple is not as strong, loyal and loving as the rest of us."
"The fact that the queen rarely holds hands with her husband in public seems to set an unwritten precedent for other members of the royal family," he said
"During their assigned roles abroad, the couple may rarely show PDAs (if any) in order to maintain their professional standards." In addition to looking professional, body language expert Robin Kermode told the daily mail that the couple might also restrain themselves because the queen told them to do so herself
MYKA Meier, a royal etiquette expert and founder and director of Beaumont etiquette, told people in 2016: "there is no actual etiquette or royal etiquette that requires the couple to avoid PDAs."



Number  428
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The tweet against Curry came as stars were already ripping Trump for saying NFL players who kneel during the National Anthem should be fired.”
“George Takei said to he president And just when you thought he couldn t get any more petty Ava DuVernay also wrote to him Man nobody with any sense or self respect considers it an honor to be within a...”
“So therefore ain’t no invite.”
“Going to White House was a great honor until you showed up!” Andy Cohen replied “HAHAHAHHA AMEN,” while Chrissy Teigen laughed over the “U bum” line.”
“Cohen also pointed out, “HOUSEWIVES PLAYBOOK: rescind invitations liberally!”
“(See: Bethenny re LuAnn, Mexico; Bethenny & Ramona, Mexico.”
“)” Seth Meyers also quipped about Trump, “Somebody’s got their laid back weekend vibe working!”“Perhaps it’s not a great honor while your stench is there,” slammed John Legend.”
“Don Cheadle sarcastically replied to Trump, “I’m sure he’s crushed.” Jeffrey Wright praised, “Well done @StephenCurry30.” Joked Trevor Noah, “‘You’re not breaking up with me, I’m breaking up with you!”
“10 mile radius of you...”
“!” She included a link to UNICEF.”


"The anti curry tweet comes as stars are already laughing at trump, saying NFL players who kneel during the National Anthem should be fired."
"George Takei told the president that just when you thought he would never be stingy again, EVA duvinai wrote to him and said that no one with any sense and self-esteem thought that he could It's an honor. "
"So there was no invitation."
"Before you show up, it's a great honor to go to the White House! Andy Cohen replied, "hahaha, Amen," while Chris tegan said "U bum" with a smile
Cohen also pointed out, "housewife script: free to cancel the invitation!"
"(see: beseni Reruan, Mexico; beseni and Ramona, Mexico."
"Seth Meyers also teased trump, saying," someone's leisurely weekend atmosphere is at work! "When you stink, maybe it's not a great honor," attacked John regand
Don Cheddar sarcastically replied to trump, "I'm sure he's crushed." Jeffrey Wright praised, "well done @ Stephen curry 30." Trevor Noah joked, "you're not breaking up with me, I'm breaking up with you!"
"Ten miles around you..."
"!" she joined the link to the United Nations Children's Fund. "



Number  429
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“...we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT Younes Bendjima Lashes Out at Media After Kourtney Kardashian Split You Guys Failed Kourtney Kardashian Splits From Younes Bendjima Kourtney Kardashian Spars With Kim and Khloe While Live Tweeting KUWTK Premiere Kourtney Kardashian and Younes Bendjima Split After Nearly 2 Years of Dating This video is unavailable because...”
“See more on the pair in the video below.”
“"Younes is young, and although mature for his age, he and Kourtney are at different stages in their lives."”
“"Near the end of the relationship, the two weren't getting along and the age difference ultimately played a part," the source added.”
“According to the source, Kourtney was the one to initiate the split.”
“InstagramKourtney, 39, and Younes, 25, started dating in 2016, but "recently broke up after [they] decided it wasn't workout out," ET's source said.”
“A source told ET, meanwhile, that Younes and Jordan aren't romantically involved.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
“… We can't load sponsor's email... "
"After kurtany Kardashian broke up, younes bendjima lashed out against you and failed. Kourtney Kardashian broke up with younes bendjima, Kourtney Kardashian broke up with Kim and Khloe on kuwtk premiere live twitter, Kourtney Kardashian broke up with younes bendjima and dated for nearly two years. This video is not available because..."
"Please see more about the couple in the video below."
"Younes is very young, although more mature than his age, but he and Courtney's life is at different stages."
"At the end of the relationship, they don't get along well, and the age difference eventually plays a role," the source added
"According to the source, kurtni is the one who initiated the split."
"Instagram Kourtney, 39, and younes, 25, have been dating since 2016, but" the ET source said, "recently [they] didn't think it was a break-up after exercise."
"Meanwhile, a source told et that younes and Jordan are not in love."



Number  430
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1983 classic All Night Long All Night while dressed in some Santa themed sleepwear minus the pants...”
“The onlooker added Sofia even placed Disick s phone in his back pocket before giving him a sweet kiss on the cheek First Christmas The lovebirds went on to celebrate their first Christmas season together with Sofia getting into the holiday spirit by dancing around the kitchen to Lionel s...”
“Scott takes care of her, opens the car door and pays for everything.”Instagram OfficialThe two made things official on Instagram days later, when videos surfaced of the two sharing a kiss and receiving a “congratulations” cake during a trip to Miami.”
“They are very flirty.”
““She constantly giggles around him.”
“Sofia seems smitten.”“It’s obvious she looks up to Scott,” said another source.”
““They are spending every day together.”
““Since returning to L.A., Scott and Sofia are inseparable,” said the source.”
“Image zoom Credit: SplashNews‘Inseparable’Things started to heat up in September, when sources told PEOPLE the two had grown closer.”
“The very next day, Sofia joined the self-proclaimed “lord” in Las Vegas for a late dinner at Stack restaurant along with a group of friends.”


"Classic 1983, wearing Santa Claus themed pajamas all night without pants..."
"Bystanders added that Sofia even put desik's cell phone in his back pocket and gave him a sweet kiss on his cheek. On the first Christmas, the couple continued to celebrate their first Christmas. Sophia danced for Lionel s in the kitchen to blend in the festive atmosphere.... "
"Scott takes care of her, opens the door and pays for everything." The official announcement was made on instagram a few days later, when a video of the two sharing a kiss and receiving a "Congratulations" cake while traveling in Miami surfaced
"They're flirting."
"She's always giggling around him."
"Sophia seems to be fascinated." "It's clear that she respects Scott," another source said
"They're together every day."
"Since returning to Los Angeles, Scott and Sofia have been inseparable," the source said
"Image scaling credit: when the source told people that these two" inseparable "things began to heat up in September."
The next day, Sofia had dinner with a group of friends at the stark restaurant in Las Vegas



Number  431
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...revealed the reason why she is not taking part in the show...”
“So don t come to China sic Another posted As a Chinese we don t welcome racist to China A third claimed they had reported her to the Chinese authorities writing I have reported to the Chinese government and I hope you can not come to China Hadid has not...”
“And Chinese do not welcome you.”
“What you have done made us unhappy.”
“One person commented: “We like some people who respects us, not you.”
“Gigi Hadid accused of being racist in Instagram videoIn September, critics warned Hadid not to attend this year’s show beneath her Instagram post announcing that she had been selected to take part again.”
“The video was posted online by her sister.”
“...her eyes as she held up a Buddha cookie and appeared to impersonate the face...”
“Can t wait to tune in with everyone to see the beautiful show I know it will be and already can t wait for next year Hadid who is dating former One Direction star Zayn Malik was warned not to take part in the show after she was filmed squinting...”
“Love my VS family, and will be with all my girls in spirit!!”


“…… She revealed the reason why she didn't take part in the performance.... "
"So don't come to China to post another post as a Chinese. We don't welcome racists to China. The third one claimed that they reported her to the Chinese authorities. I've already reported her to the Chinese government. I hope you can't come to China. Hadid didn't..."
"The Chinese don't welcome you."
"What you have done makes us very unhappy."
"We like people who respect us, not you," one commented
"Gigi Hadid was accused of being racist in the instagram video in September, and critics warned Hadid not to show up under instagram's post announcing that she was chosen to be on this year's show again."
"The video was posted online by her sister."
“… Her eyes, as she held up a Buddha biscuit, seemed to mimic the face... "
"I can't wait to watch this beautiful TV show with you. I know it will be very good. I can't wait to see Hadid dating former one-way star Zane Malik next year. After she was filmed squinting, she was warned not to participate in the show..."
"Love my family, will be with all my girls in spirit!"



Number  432
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Daily Mail has updated their original story to reflect this.”
“Ben was also spotted getting a suite at the Beverly Hills hotel with a “hot blonde.” I suspect there’s more than just one.”
“...had a slave owning ancestor...”
“That’s what came to mind when I saw these exclusive Daily Mail photos (we don’t have access to them, you can see them on the Daily Mail) of Affleck out with a “mystery blonde.” The two went out to lunch, for sushi, and to a bookstore.”
“The woman is grabbing his arm like she wants to indicate that they’re together and is looking at Ben for validation.”
“He’s trying to look away and frown but he’s grinning slightly, like he’s trying to frown, but is happy to be caught out with her.”
“In other photos he just looks defeated, like he knows he was busted and there’s no way out of this one.”
“So is this a business thing and are they just playing up for the cameras?”
“I would say that the woman could be an industry-type person, like a producer, or she might be staff.”
“She’s wearing jeans and he’s in corduroys, which isn’t particularly business-y, but people keep it casual in LA.”


"The daily mail has updated their original report to reflect that."
Ben was also found booking a suite with a "sexy blonde" at Beverly Hills Hotel. I suspect more than one
“… There is an ancestor of slaves... "
"I thought of that when I saw the exclusive photos of Alfred dating a 'mystery blonde' in the daily mail (we don't have them, you can see them in the daily mail). They went out for lunch, sushi and a bookstore
"The woman grabbed his arm as if to show they were together and was looking at Ben for confirmation."
"He tries to look away and frown, but he smiles a little, just as he tries to frown, but is glad to be found out by her."
"In other photos, he just looks like a failure, as if he knows he's been caught, and this photo has no way out."
"So, is it a business thing, is it just for the camera?"
"What I want to say is that this woman may be an industry type person, such as a producer, or she may be an employee."
"She's wearing jeans, he's wearing corduroy, it's not particularly business, but in Los Angeles people stay casual."



Number  433
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...pregnant with their first child If she isn t preggo and they really wanted the gossip to stop they would just issue a denial but we think it s telling that they haven t...”
“The only things left are a wedding and a baby In fact rumors are swirling that the couple plan to tie the knot in Hawaii by the end of summer adding fuel to the growing speculation that she s indeed...”
“Not only did they move in together, but the A-list actor has been spending time bonding with her daughter Madeline, and he recently spent the weekend with her parents when they came into town.”
“To us, those are two huge signs that she's got a bun in the oven!The Oscar winner and the SNL producer have been busy crossing off some major milestones on their relationship checklist recently.”
“...and her boobs have gotten a lot bigger...”
“Her maybe baby bump just keeps getting bigger Ben Affleck s girlfriend Lindsay Shookus left their shared Pacific Palisades mansion over the weekend with suitcases in hand and we couldn t help but notice that her midsection looked noticeably fuller...”


“… Pregnant with the first child, if she is not pregnant, they really want the rumors to stop, they will only deny it, but we think it means they are not... "
"There's only one wedding and one child left. In fact, the rumor is that the couple plan to get married in Hawaii before the end of the summer, which makes more and more people guess that she really..."
"Not only did they move together, but the A-level actor has been with his daughter Madeleine, who recently spent the weekend with her parents when they went to town."
"For us, these are two huge signs that she has a loaf in the oven! Oscar winners and SNL producers have recently been busy crossing out some important milestones on their relationship list
“… Her breasts are getting bigger... "
"Her stomach is getting bigger and bigger. Lindsay shookus, Ben Affleck's girlfriend, left their apartment in Pacific Palisades with a suitcase last weekend. We can't help noticing that her abdomen looks obviously fuller..."



Number  434
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Schmidt was a pilot, and, according to the friend, he encouraged other Google executives to indulge their desires for yachts and planes.”
“A year later, Wojcicki gave birth to their first child just as Google executives started enjoying life as some of the richest people in the world.”
“...in an esoteric journal...”
“In Brin Wojcicki found another child of baby boomer academics who could see beyond academia s cautious elitist approach to discovering new knowledge a slow process in which researchers propose a hypothesis organize an experiment to collect data submit findings to peer review and finally many months later gain publication...”
““People were like, ‘Oh, Anne, you Wall Street girl.’ ” (Neither Brin nor Wojcicki responded to questions from Vanity Fair.)”
““It was always embarrassing to come home,” she has said.”
“Her parents weren’t entirely pleased.”
“After graduation she worked as a health-care investment analyst on Wall Street for 10 years.”
“A lightly tanned brunette who was high-energy, athletic, and popular in school—a sort of Jennifer Aniston in Birkenstocks—Wojcicki figure-skated as a child and played ice hockey at Yale, where she majored in biology.”
“Wojcicki’s father was the chairman of Stanford’s physics department, and her mother is a journalism teacher.”


"Schmidt is a pilot, and according to his friends, he encourages other Google executives to indulge their desire for yachts and airplanes."
A year later, Waukee gave birth to their first child, when Google executives were beginning to enjoy the lives of the world's richest people
“… In a profound diary... "
"In Brin, voicic found another baby boomer. Scholars can go beyond the cautious elitism method of academia to discover new knowledge. This is a slow process. In this process, researchers put forward a hypothesis, organize an experiment to collect data, submit the research results to peer review, and finally publish them in a few months..."
"People say," Oh, Annie, you wall street girl. "(neither brin nor Waukee answered Vanity Fair.)
"It's always embarrassing to go home," she said
"Her parents are not entirely satisfied."
"After graduation, she worked as a healthcare investment analyst on Wall Street for 10 years."
"A girl with light brown hair, energetic, athletic and popular at school, a bit like Jennifer Aniston of bill kenstock, who skated as a child, majored in biology and played ice hockey at Yale University."
His father is the head of the physics department at Stanford University, and his mother is a journalism teacher



Number  435
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Earlier this year, Bush told the Hollywood Reporter that hearing the leaked tape left him “totally and completely gutted.””
“Bush apologized for his conduct and departed the Today show 10 days later.”
“Image zoom Credit: Charles Sykes/Getty ImagesBush, 45, has kept a low profile since the Washington Post published a recording of a lewd conversation he had with Donald Trump in 2005 on the set of Access Hollywood.”
“Amid denials from both Fox and Bush’s publicist, the Daily Mail updated the report to say that Bush is “in talks for other possible projects” at Fox — an assertion Fox also refuted.”
“The Daily Mail initially reported that Bush — who was ousted from NBC’s Today show in October over his involvement in Donald Trump’s Access Hollywood hot-mic scandal — would be hosting Top 30 when it launches in the fall.”
““There is absolutely no truth to this whatsoever,” a spokesperson for Fox Television Stations said in a statement to EW on Thursday.”
“The former 'Today' host has been unemployed since his ouster over Trump bus tapesBilly Bush will not be returning to the small screen as the host of Fox’s news magazine show Top 30 and is not in talks for another role with the company, contrary to reports.”


Earlier this year, Bush told the Hollywood Reporter that hearing the leaked video, he was "thoroughly, thoroughly frustrated."
"Bush apologized for his behavior and left today show 10 days later."
"Credit for image zooming: Charles Sikes / Getty imagesbush, 45, has kept a low profile since the Washington Post released a recording of his obscene conversation with Donald Trump on Access Hollywood in 2005."
Among the denials from Fox and Bush's PR staff, the daily mail updated its report that Bush was "negotiating on other possible projects" in fox, which Fox also refuted
"The daily mail initially reported that Bush, who was ousted from NBC's" Today Show "in October, will host the top 30 when it starts broadcasting this autumn due to his involvement in Donald Trump's Hollywood microphone scandal."
"This is absolutely not true," a fox spokesman said in a statement to EW on Thursday
"The former" today "host has been unemployed since trump stepped down on the bus. Contrary to the report, Bush will not return to the small screen of Fox News Magazine's" top 30 "host, nor will he discuss another role with the company."



Number  436
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Jen will go on to find true love again after her split from Justin?”
“While the now former couple vowed to remain close friends despite the breakup, numerous sources out of his NYC circle seem to be feeding the media that artsy Justin felt stifled by Jen’s easy, breezy California lifestyle and longed to be back home full-time in the Big Apple.”
“We’ve got the EXCLUSIVE details why she’s not shocked by their separation.”
“Jennifer Aniston, 49, and Justin Theroux‘s sudden split shocked the world, with the exception of her arch-enemy Angelina Jolie.”
“While the 42-year-old humanitarian has long been blamed for the former Friends star’s 2005 divorce from Brad Pitt, 54, she’s now feeling a sense of vindication that she had nothing to do with America’s Sweetheart’s latest heartbreak.”
““Angelina makes a point to not read or follow any celebrity gossip, but it was inevitable she would hear about Jennifer and Justin’s break-up at some point.”
“Angelina has never cared for Jen, even before she started dating Brad.”
“She’s always thought of her as very vanilla and shallow, and not on her level intellectually.”
“Whereas Justin is quirky and edgy and super smart, so Angelina wasn’t surprised at all to learn they had split,” a source close to the Maleficent star tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“He always did seem like a somewhat strange fit for Jennifer, as the actor constantly wore nothing but black motorcycle jackets and had a gold gun pendant around his neck at all times.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Jane and Justin will continue to look for true love after they break up?"
"Although the current ex couple vowed to break up, many of his sources in the New York circle seemed to be inculcating in the media that artsy Justin was suffocated by Jennifer's relaxed, relaxed California lifestyle and eager to go home full-time in New York."
"We got exclusive details of why she wasn't shocked by their separation."
"The sudden breakup between 49 year old Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru shocked the world, except for her arch rival Angelina Jolie."
"Although the 42 year old humanitarian has been accused of divorcing 54 year old Brad Pitt in 2005, she now has a feeling that she has nothing to do with the recent heartbreak of the American sweetheart."
"Angelina stresses that she doesn't watch or pay attention to any celebrity gossip, but she will inevitably hear that Jennifer and Justin break up at some time."
"Angelina never cared about Jane, even before she started dating Brad."
"She always thought she was ordinary, superficial and not intelligent."
"And Justin is eccentric, avant-garde and super smart, so Angelina is not surprised to learn that they have broken up," a source close to the malicious star told reporters exclusive Hollywood life
"For Jennifer, he always seems a little strange, because the actor always wears a black motorcycle jacket and a gold gun pendant around her neck."



Number  437
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — were you surprised to see Pax at the Golden Globes rather than Maddox?”
“Clearly Angie has some very helpful children on her hands!”
“HL learned, Maddox is ‘the man of the house,’ so he was caring for Shiloh!”
“Angelina Jolie, 42, had her son Pax Jolie-Pitt, 14, accompany her to the 2018 Golden Globes on Jan. 7.”
“But while some may have been surprised she didn’t bring her eldest, son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, 16, Maddox wouldn’t have wanted it any other way!”
“In fact, the teen is now apparently “the man of the house” since Angie’s split from Brad Pitt, 54, and he was put in charge of taking care of his injured sister, Shiloh Jolie-Pitt, 11.”
“After all, Shiloh reportedly broke her collarbone this past week during a family vacation to Lake Tahoe.”
“Click here to see pics of Maddox.”
“Maddox has taken on the role of caretaker in the family and just like his mom he s not a huge fan of awards shows and the red carpet so he preferred to stay home and look after his little sister Shiloh rather than go to the Golden Globes with...”
“Angelina a source close to Angie told HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY”


"Tell us, Hollywood stars - are you surprised to see parks instead of Maddox at the Golden Globes?"
"Angie obviously has some very helpful children on hand!"
"I know that Maddox is' the man of the family ', so he's taking care of Shiloh!"
"Angelina Jolie, 42, asked her 14-year-old son Pax Jolie Pitt to accompany her to the 2018 Golden Globe Awards on January 7."
"But while some may be surprised, she didn't bring her 16-year-old eldest son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, and Maddox wouldn't want any other way!"
"In fact, since Angie broke up with Brad Pitt, 54, the teenager is now clearly the" man of the family "who is responsible for taking care of his injured sister, Shiloh Jolie Pitt, 11."
After all, Shiloh's clavicle was reported to have broken when his family went to Lake Tahoe on holiday last week
"Click here to see a picture of Maddox."
"Maddox plays the role of a gatekeeper at home, just like his mother. He doesn't like the awards ceremony and the red carpet very much, so he would rather stay at home to take care of his sister Shiloh than with Let's go to the Golden Globes. "
"Angelina, a source close to Angie, told Hollywood life exclusively"



Number  438
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Get the exclusive celebrity scoop on all the stars you love before any of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast Straight Shuter below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Britney's Family 'Desperately Worried' She'll Have Another MeltdownOne More Time?”
“Britney's Family 'Desperately Worried' She'll Have Another Meltdown Spears locked in litigation with K-Fed and begging Sam Asghari to propose.”
“Britney Spears has more than a brutal custody fight with her ex, Kevin Federline, to blame for her recent mood swings, RadarOnline.com has learned.”
“According to an insider, Spears is “desperate” for Sam Asghari, to propose, “but he’s dragging his feet and stalling.”As Radar reported, Spears, 36, immediately turned her attention to tying the knot with her 23-year-old boy toy, Asghari, after she recently wrapped her Las Vegas residency.”
“The reason?”
“Spears wants to start a family as soon as possible with the dancer.”
““All she can talk about right now is having a baby,” a source told Radar.”


"Get exclusive news of all your favorite stars in front of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast below!"
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Is Britney's family 'extremely worried' that she will collapse again?"
"Britney Spears' family is' extremely worried 'that she will collapse again. Spears and K-Fed are involved in lawsuits and beg Sam asgali to marry them."
"Britney Spears' custody fight with her ex boyfriend Kevin Federline is not just the cause of her recent mood swings, RadarOnline.com The website has learned. "
According to a person familiar with the matter, Spears was very keen on Sam asgali's proposal, "but he's holding back, holding back." Spears, 36, turned her attention to marrying her 23-year-old boy toy, Ashley, immediately after finishing her residence in Las Vegas, radar reported
"Why?"
"Spears wants to get married with the dancers as soon as possible."
"All she can say now is to have children," a source told radar



Number  439
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A representative for the "Ocean's Eleven" star tells the site that the story made by National Enquirer "is fabricated."”
“The site can confirm that there's no real probe or scandal, and Clooney has not attracted any "federal attention."”
“However, Gossip Cop has debunked all of the above allegations.”
“He's got twins on the way and G-men at his proverbial doorstep!"”
“The insider asserts, "This is the last thing that George needs right now.”
“...million in cash not to mention a designer bag...”
“There is a protocol and the FBI would ve been called in to question the depositor the insider continued before adding But in the end it was proven that George did in fact throw a party and gave everyone 1”
“...to deposit the money at a bank...”
“It goes on citing a so called source as saying Being the practical joker he is George would ve known that doling out 1 million in cash to each guest would ve caused some intrigue and embarrassment when they went...”
“The publication further contends Clooney, who is known for his "generous nature," had a "desire to spread the wealth."”


A representative of ocean eleven said on its website that the national inquirer report was "fabricated"
"The website can confirm that there is no real investigation or scandal, and Clooney has not attracted any" federal attention. "
"However, the scandal police have exposed all the above charges."
"He has twins on the way, and g-men is in front of his house!"
"This is the last thing George needs right now," the insider asserted
“… Millions of cash, not to mention the nomination pack... "
"There's an agreement that the FBI will be asked to ask depositors, and those in the know will continue to add, but it turns out that George did hold a party and give everyone 1"
“… Put money in the bank... "
"It continues to quote a so-called source saying that as an actual clown, he is George will know that distributing a million dollars in cash to each guest will cause some conspiracy and embarrassment when they go..."
The publication further argues that Clooney, known for his "generosity," has a "desire to spread wealth."



Number  440
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They look at her like she’s the Messiah,” Rodriguez told PEOPLE exclusively in October of Ella and Natasha.”
“Still, the 48-year-old singer’s version of events is pretty similar.”
“Embarrassed Jennifer Lopez may be one of the most recognizable stars in the world but Alex Rodriguez had to do a double take during their first encounter before becoming one of Hollywood s A list couples...”
“The former New York Yankees slugger recently visited The Ellen DeGeneres Show, during which the host decided to make him tell the story of how he reconnected with Lopez — a story she compared to the actress’ own retelling of their fateful meeting.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I describe it as the luckiest day of my life,” Rodriguez said.”
“The 42-year-old athlete said that after a lunch meeting in Los Angeles, he was searching the parking lot for his car when someone tapped him on the shoulder.”
““I turn around, and I do not recognize this person,” he explained.”
““And it’s Jennifer, but she’s dressed up as Harlee from Shades of Blue and she’s in her jeans and her big boots.”
“And it took me about four or five seconds.”


"They see her as a savior," Rodriguez said of Ella and Natasha in an interview with people magazine in October
"However, the 48 year old singer's view of the event is quite similar."
"The embarrassed Jennifer Lopez may be one of the most famous stars in the world, but Alex Rodriguez had to take two pictures when they first met before he became one of the most popular couples in Hollywood..."
"The former New York Yankees hitter recently visited Ellen DeGeneres' performance, where the host decided to let him tell the story of how he reestablished his connection with Lopez - a story she likened to the actress's own retelling of their fate."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I described it as the luckiest day of my life," Rodriguez said
The 42 year old athlete said he was looking for his car in the parking lot after a luncheon in Los Angeles when someone patted him on the shoulder
"I turned around and didn't recognize the man," he explained
"It's Jennifer, but she's dressed up as Harry from blue shadows, in jeans and big boots."
"It took me about four or five seconds."



Number  441
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sign up here to get INSIDER's favorite stories straight to your inbox.”
“It’s her home and she would love to go there with Harry after the wedding.”Odds are Americans would be very happy to see their princess return home, too.”
“It was announced recently that Prince Harry would become the patron of "Walk Of America."”
“A team of six veterans from the United States and the UK will walk 1,000 miles from the West to the East Coast of the US in 14 weeks.”
“Though it's not confirmed that the couple will make an appearance, their staff is reportedly hard at work planning their first overseas trip.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle aren’t even married yet, but that isn’t stopping Kensington Palace from planning out their every move post-wedding.”
“Kensington Palace announced on Thursday that Prince Harry would become the patron of “Walk Of America,” the latest expedition from the armed forces charity Support The Walk.”
“As part of his duties, Harry will launch the expedition at an event in London on Wednesday, April 11.”
“The palace further explained that this summer a team of six veterans from the United States and the U.K. will walk 1,000 miles from the West to the East Coast of the U.S. in 14 weeks.”
“During that time, the expedition will also raise vital funds for veterans both sides of the Atlantic.”


"Register here to send insider's favorite stories directly to your in box."
"This is her home and she'd love to go there with Harry after the wedding." It's likely that Americans will also be happy to see their princess go home
Recently, it has been reported that Prince Harry will be the patron of the "trip to America"
"A team of six veterans from the United States and Britain will walk 1000 miles from the west coast to the east coast in 14 weeks."
"Although it's not sure whether the couple will show up, it's reported that their staff are trying to plan their first overseas trip."
"Prince Harry and Megan Marcel are not married yet, but that doesn't stop Kensington Palace from planning their every move after marriage."
The Kensington Palace announced on Thursday that Prince Harry would be the patron of "a trip to America," the latest expedition supported by the armed forces charity
As part of his duties, Harry will launch the expedition at an event in London on Wednesday, April 11
"The palace further explained that this summer, six veterans from the United States and Britain will travel 1000 miles from the United States to the west coast in 14 weeks."
"In the meantime, the expedition will also raise important funds for veterans on both sides of the Atlantic."



Number  442
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more about Khloé and Tristan in the latest issue of In Touch on newsstands now!”
“She found it in her heart to forgive him.”
“Even though the reality star and NBA baller have officially returned to Los Angeles with their precious daughter, Tristan feels “dumped” since she’s not letting him move in with them.”
““She still wants him in her life, and she wants True to have a father,” a source tells In Touch exclusively.”
““He may not be the best boyfriend, but he’s a good father.”“She’d been planning to ask him to move in when she returned home from Cleveland with True,” our source explained.”
““But then the cheating scandal happened, and she had to rethink everything.”
“There obviously are trust issues now.”
“But Khloé still hasn’t kicked him to the curb.”
“She just doesn’t think it’s the right time for them to be moving in together.”It looks like Khloé is trying to put the drama behind her once and for all, as she was spotted out with the Cavaliers star on June 18.”
“Time will tell if they can work through their differences!”


"Now read more about Heroe and Tristan in the latest issue of contact at the newsstand."
"She wanted to forgive him."
"Although the reality star and NBA Ballerina have officially returned to Los Angeles with their baby daughter, Tristan feels dumped because she won't let him move in with them."
"She still wants him in her life and she wants to really have a father," a source told exclusive in contact
"He may not be the best boyfriend, but he is a good father." "When she brought true home from Cleveland, she had been planning for him to move in," our source explained
"But then the cheating scandal happened and she had to rethink everything."
"There is obviously a problem of trust now."
"But Heroe still didn't kick him to the side of the road."
"She just doesn't think it's the right time for them to move together." It seems that Heroe is trying to put the play behind her because she was found with the Cavaliers star on June 18
"Time will tell us if they can overcome their differences!"



Number  443
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was always part of my plan."”
“"For me I was going to continue doing movies while I made this album.”
“"I always thought I could do both and there was no switch [from acting to singing]," she told People.”
“Not before long, the star was pulling triple duty as an actress, dancer and singer as her debut studio album, On the 6, charted in the Billboard 200 top 10 and was certified triple platinum in the United States in 1999.”
“By 27, she was a Golden Globe nominee.”
“She inched closer toward movie star with films like Money Train and Jack before landing the role of a lifetime as Selena Quintanilla in the eponymous 1997 film.”
“"I watched a lot of musicals because of my mom and that influenced me very much in the fact that a career in this business would have to be all three," she explained to James Lipton on Inside the Actors Studio.”
“But, as a self-described "camera hog" influenced by the movie musicals of her childhood, it wasn't long before she was on the silver screen and in the studio.”
“United Archives/ullstein bild via Getty ImagesInstead, she first broke ground in her early career as a member of the early '90s dance troupe, The Fly Girls, on the sketch comedy TV show, In Living Color.”


"It's always been part of my plan."
"For me, I'm going to continue to make movies while I'm making this album."
"I always thought I could have both," she told people magazine. "There was no transition [from acting to singing]
Soon after, the star, as an actor, dancer and singer, starred in her first studio album "on the 6th", ranked in the top 10 of the billboard 200, and won triple platinum certification in the United States in 1999
"By the time she was 27, she had become a golden globe nominee."
"Before playing Serena kuntanilla in the 1997 films of the same name, money train and Jack, she approached the stars step by step."
"Because of my mother, I watch a lot of musicals, which has a great impact on me, because a career in this industry must be in these three aspects," she explained to James Lipton in inside the Actors Studio
However, as a self styled "camera maniac" influenced by childhood musicals, she soon appeared on the screen and in the studio
"Ullstein Bild via Getty Images instead, who made her debut in the comedy tv show color of life for the first time in her early career as a Dance Troupe" flying girls "in the early 1990s."



Number  444
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's just very, very jarring for the kids, to suddenly have their family ripped apart."”
“And fortunately my partner in this agrees.”
“I just refuse.”
“And it seems to be true, you spend a year just focused on building a case to prove your point and why you're right and why they're wrong, and it's just an investment in vitriolic hatred.”
“I heard one lawyer say, 'No one wins in court—it's just a matter of who gets hurt worse.'”
“We're both doing our best.”
“"And you know, after that, we've been able to work together to sort this out.”
“"I was really on my back and chained to a system when Child Services was called," he noted to the mag.”
“He also seemed intent to move forward with the least amount of strife inflicted on his offspring.”
“And I haven't been great at it."”


"It's very disharmonious for children to suddenly break up their families."
"Fortunately, my partner agreed."
"I just refused."
"It seems to be true that you spent a year focusing only on building a case to prove your point of view, why you are right, why they are wrong, it's just an investment in mean hatred."
"I heard a lawyer say," no one wins in court. It's just a matter of who is more seriously injured. "
"We did our best."
"You know, after that, we can solve the problem together."
"When the children's service center got the call, I was really busy and tied to a system," he told the magazine
"He also seems to want to move on with the least amount of conflict."
"I've never been good at it."



Number  445
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more in the video below.”
“"He's got a full career (including something huge that's new) and works hard for it.”
“The Modern Family star took to Instagram on Wednesday to slam a tabloid report claiming that she gives her boyfriend, Levi Meaden, an allowance.”
“WATCH: Ariel Winter Dishes on Living With Boyfriend Levi Meaden: 'He Takes Care of All That Handy Stuff'"Seriously, how dare you make up stuff that you have no idea about?"”
“Winter began her post, calling the tabloid a "trash magazine."”
“"I have a BOYFRIEND and a PERSONAL ASSISTANT who are NOT the same person.”
“I would NEVER pay my boyfriend ANY sort of allowance, nor would he EVER accept if I offered."”
“"He BUYS his own stuff whether it's for me or himself, and he more than pulls his weight for our life," she continued.”
“"I HATE fake news, but I guess that's what our world has come to.”
“Get your sh*t straight.”


"Please see more in the video below."
"He has a whole career (including some big new ones) and works hard for it."
"The modern family star attacked a tabloid on instagram on Wednesday for giving her boyfriend levy midden pocket money."
"Observation: Ariel winter lives with her boyfriend Levi midden:" he handles everything that's convenient. " "Seriously, how dare you make up something you don't know?"
Winter started posting, calling the tabloid "junk magazine"
"My boyfriend and personal assistant are not the same person."
"I will never give my boyfriend any form of pocket money, and he won't accept it if I want to."
"He buys things for himself, whether it's for me or for himself, and he puts more effort into our lives," she continued
"I hate fake news, but I think that's how our world is."
"Keep your legs straight."



Number  446
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Kourt using her pregnancy scare with Younes to tease Scott?”
“The next generation of Kardashians are well on the way!”
“Kourtney Kardashian, 38, won’t be joining her pregnant sisters Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Kylie Jenner, 20, with bringing another baby into the world, but the thought did cross her mind.”
““Kourtney thought she was pregnant for a minute this month and it completely freaked her out,” a source close to the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She was afraid to tell Younes [Bendjima] because she did not know how he would react.”
“He comes from a strict family who would insist he get married right away and Kourtney is not sure she is ready for that.”
“Ultimately it was a false alarm and she told Younes after she figured out what was going on with her body.”
“They were both a little sad and relieved at the same time.” Woah!”
“Kourtney took the pregnancy scare as an opportunity to mess with Kourtney would introduce a different father into Kourtney enjoyed torturing Scott with the news for a few days letting him freak out about the news before letting him off the hook with the information that it was all a...”
“...false alarm Way harsh Kourt...”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Scott making fun of her fear of pregnancy?"
"The next generation of Kardashian is on her way!"
"Kourtney Kardashian, 38, won't bring another child into the world with her pregnant sister, Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Kylie Jenner, 20, but she does have that in mind."
"Courtney thought she was pregnant for a minute this month, which completely freaked her out," a source close to keeping up with Kardashian star told reporters exclusive to Hollywood life
"She didn't dare tell Younis (benjima) because she didn't know how he would react."
"He comes from a strict family, he will insist on getting married immediately, Courtney is not sure if he is ready to get married."
"In the end, it was a false alarm. She told younes after finding out her physical condition."
"They were both a little sad and relieved at the same time." WOW
"Courtney took the pregnancy scare as an opportunity to make trouble with Courtney. He would introduce a different father to Courtney. Courtney likes to torture Scott with this news for several days, make him crazy about it, and then get him out of trouble and tell him it's all true
“… A false alarm, colt... "



Number  447
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Night out: Eva skipped Oscar night with Ryan, who can be seen here with his La La Land co-star Emma Stone...”
“The dedicated pair met and fell in love while costarring in The Place Beyond The Pines together in 2011.”
“Homebody: The star recently opened up about why she'd rather skip the red carpet, saying that she'd prefer to spend the night in with her daughters than go outInside the magazine, the star looked remarkably slimmed down just one year after welcoming her second child.”
“'Instead of hitting the red carpet, I’d rather be with our girls.'”
“'What people don’t know about me is that I love being home,' said the mother to Esmeralda, aged two, and Amanda, 11 months.”
“Premiere: Ryan looked dapper at the premiere of the experimental romance directed by Terrance MalikThe Hitch star recently opened up about why she feels better out of the camera's eye in an interview with Shape Magazine.”
“The film is directed by Terrence Malik and gets a wide release March 17 2017.”
“Ryan's latest film Song To Song is an experimental tale of love and music set in Austin and co-starring Rooney Mara, Michael Fassbender, and Natalie Portman.”
“Eva didn't walk the red carpet, but did show that she was in attendance with her social media, which she captioned with a simple heart.”
“Pictured 2012Eva and Ryan have two children together; Esmeralda Amada, aged two, and Amada Lee, who will be one in April.”


"Night Tour: EVA skipped the Oscar night with Ryan, who can see Emma Stone Co starring here with him in Los Angeles..."
"In 2011, the two dedicated lovers met and fell in love in the cooperation of the story of the pine forest."
"Homebody: the star recently disclosed why she would rather jump the red carpet, saying that she would rather spend the night with her daughters than go to the magazine. The star looks surprisingly thin one year after having her second child."
"Instead of walking on the red carpet, I'd rather be with our girls."
"What people don't know is that I like to stay at home," my mother told Esmeralda, two, and Amanda, 11 months old
"Premiere: Ryan was dashing at the premiere of experimental romance directed by Terence Malik. Recently, in an interview with body magazine, the hitchhiker revealed why he felt better off camera
"Directed by Terence Malik, the film was released in full on March 17, 2017."
"Ryan's latest movie" song by song "is a love and music experimental film set in Austin and co starred by Rooney Mara, Michael faspin and Natalie Portman
"EVA didn't walk on the red carpet, but she did use her social media to show her participation. She wrote her social media inscription with a simple heart."
"Photo 2012eva and Ryan have two children together; Esmeralda Amada, 2, and Amada Lee, who will have one in April."



Number  448
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Cute haircut, V-Hudge!”
“Oh oops!”
“Not to show off my ring that I happened to throw on that finger after a long day of filming but to show off my haircut Lol."”
“I posted a pic.”
“I’m not engaged!”
“On Tuesday, Vanessa took to Twitter to clarify the Internet sleuths' find and explain the sitch: "Guysssss.”
“But it turns out that sometimes a ring on a ring finger is just a convenient place to place your baubles after an exhausting day on set.”
“The Twittersphere went into overdrive after Vanessa Hudgens posted an Instagram photo on Sunday and fans were quick to notice that the actress, who is in a relationship with actor Austin Butler, was wearing a big ring on that finger.”
“Not so fast...”


"Lovely haircut, v-hodge!"
"Oh, no!"
"Not to show off the ring I happened to throw on my finger after a whole day's movie, but to show off my hairstyle."
"I posted a picture."
"I'm not engaged!"
On Tuesday, Vanessa tweeted clarifying the Internet detective's findings and explaining the scene: "guysss."
"But it turns out that sometimes the ring on the ring finger is just a convenient place to put Christmas ornaments after a hard day on the set."
"After Vanessa Hudgens posted a picture on instagram on Sunday, twittersphere went into overdrive, and fans soon noticed that the actress, who has a relationship with Austin Butler, had a big ring on her finger."
"Not so fast..."



Number  449
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“HEREWe pay for juicy info!”
“LISTEN TO STRAIGHT SHUTER!”
“Still, Kardashian may want to figure out the state of her relationship with her cheating baby daddy, Tristan Thompson, 27, before she sends out any save-the-date cards!”
“Unfortunately for Kardashian, her dream of walking down the aisle at St George’s Chapel is a long shot since she would have to get permission directly from the Queen of England.”
“'”According to the source, while Kardashian, 33, loved the gospel choir and reverend, she was especially smitten with the sleek May event and now “wants to get her hands on” Prince Harry and Markle’s production company for her special day.”
““She is now eyeing up Windsor Castle as a place for her to say ‘I do.”
““Like everybody else, Khloe watched the royal wedding on TV and thought it was spectacular,” a source told Shuter.”
“On the latest episode of the popular podcast Straight Shuter!, host Rob Shuter reveals the reality star’s desperate to literally follow in Markle’s footsteps .”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Here, we pay for interesting information!"
"Listen to the blunt Shute
"However, Kardashian may still want to find out about her relationship with her cheating baby dad, 27 year old Tristan Thompson, and then send a" save date "card!"
"Unfortunately for Kardashian, her dream of going down the aisle of St. George's church is a long way off, because she has to get permission directly from the queen of England."
"Although 33 year old Kardashian loves the evangelical Choir and pastor, she is particularly fascinated by the fashion events in May and now" wants to prepare for her special day at Prince Harry and Marcel's production company, "according to the source
"She's staring at windsor castle now, trying to make her say 'I do.'
"Like everyone else, Chloe watched the royal wedding on TV and thought it was a spectacular wedding," a source told Shute
"In the latest episode of popular podcast zhishute! Host rob Schutter revealed that reality TV stars are desperate to follow in Marcel's footsteps



Number  450
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A rep for Hasselhoff did not immediately return our request for comment.”
“In addition to Bach’s payments, as well as his own expenses, Hasselhoff is responsible for daughters Hayley, 23, and TaylorAnn, 25, who live under his roof.”
“Though he is set to make an appearance in next year’s “Baywatch” reboot, it’s unclear if that paycheck will ease his stress.”
““I am 63 years of age, and am at an age when I should be preparing for retirement and not having to continue working in order to pay [Bach’s] support,” Hasselhoff said in papers filed in April.”
“Though Bach’s team alleges that Hasselhoff’s net worth is more than $120 million, the newly engaged star has already nixed retirement plans to stay afloat.”
“While the documents obtained by the website noted that Hasselhoff’s assets, including real estate, cars, jewelry and retirement savings, among others, total $1.79 million, the cash flow is drying up.”
“Hasselhoff’s European tour was cut short due to poor ticket sales, and he’s reportedly unsure if his new reality show, “Hoff the Record,” will find the same success as his previous small-screen endeavors.”
“And while a court hearing has been set for the end of May, Hasselhoff isn’t sure if his current endeavors will be enough to salvage the payments.”
“Though Hasselhoff spends $66,000 of it, with living expenses, taxes and Bach’s payments, he has minimal funds to save.”
“Bach, 52, receives $252,000 per year from Hasselhoff, but the singer/actor only grosses $112,000 a month.”


"A representative of Hasselhoff did not immediately respond to our request for comment."
"In addition to Bach's payments and his own expenses, Hasselhoff is responsible for his 23-year-old daughter Haley and 25-year-old tyleland, who live under his roof."
"Although he will appear next year when Gulf watch restarts, it is not clear whether the salary will relieve his pressure."
"I'm 63 years old and should be ready for retirement. I don't have to work to pay alimony," Hasselhoff said in a filing in April
"Although Bach's team claims that Hasselhoff's net worth exceeds $120 million, the newly engaged star has cancelled his retirement plan to make a living."
"Although documents obtained from the website indicate that Hasselhoff's assets, including real estate, cars, jewelry and retirement savings, total $1.79 million, but the cash flow is drying up."
"Hasselhoff's European tour has been shortened due to poor ticket sales, and it is reported that he is not sure whether his new reality show" Hoff records "will achieve the same success as his previous small screen performance."
"Although the court hearing is scheduled for the end of May, Hasselhoff is not sure whether his current efforts are sufficient to recover the money."
"Although Hasselhoff spent $66000 of it, including living expenses, taxes and Bach's payments, he could save very little."
Bach, 52, gets $252000 a year from Hasselhoff, but the singer / actor earns only $112000 a month



Number  451
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I just knew one thing: I didn’t want a breakup record.””
““I walked in with guns blazing,” she shared.”
“There’s no mystery anymore — take from it what you will.” She also revealed she co-wrote “Vice” the very day the split went public in 2015.”
“Lambert continues, “If you want to hear my side of the story or my opinion of what happened, it’s all on there.”
““I just didn’t need to talk about the record,” she told the magazine.”
“Elsewhere in the Billboard story, Lambert also discusses her decision not to do press for her last album, The Weight Of These Wings, to avoid discussing her divorce from Blake Shelton.”
“As Gossip Cop reported in February, Reba McEntire argued on “The View” that entertainers shouldn’t talk politics.”
“We talk about tears in our beers.”Lambert’s stance is in-line with that of another female country icon.”
“It doesn’t do any good.” Lambert added, “I’m a country singer.”
““For someone to agree with you, and now you’ve spoken your piece and pissed off many other people, just for one person to go, ‘She’s right’?”


"I only know one thing: I don't want a breakup record."
"I came in with a gun," she said
She also revealed that on the day of the public breakup in 2015, she co authored vice
Lambert went on, "if you want to hear my opinion or my opinion of what happened, it's all there."
"I just don't need to talk about records," she told the magazine
"Elsewhere in the billboard story, Lambert also discussed her decision not to do media coverage for her final album, the weight of these wings, to avoid discussing her divorce from Blake Shelton."
"As gossip police reported in February, Reba mciller argued that" artists should not talk about politics. "
"We talk about tears in beer." Lambert's position is consistent with that of another female country idol
"It's useless," Lambert added. "I'm a country singer."
"Some people agree with your point of view, and now you say your own point of view, angering a lot of people, just for one person to say 'she's right'



Number  452
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Zayn debuts drastic new ‘do as he bleaches hair and beard in wake of Gigi Hadid splitMORE : Gigi Hadid and Lewis Hamilton ‘sending flirty texts’ days after Zayn Malik split...”
“Bella Hadid’s sister announced the news earlier this month by sharing a statement on Twitter.”
“The Little Mix singer was spotted touching down in Tokyo with her bandmates – rocking a very similar pair of black sunglasses to ones the Victoria’s Secret supermodel was photographed in recently.”
“She nailed airport chic as she headed to Japan, opting for a pair of tiny specs for the day.”
“And eagle-eyed fans wondered if she was making a point with her choice of eyewear – with Gigi constantly pictured in tiny sunnies, and even launching her own collection filled similar shades for Vogue Eyewear.”
“Perrie Edwards followed suit in a pair of mini shades (Picture: Sato)AdvertisementAdvertisementIt seems they’ve both been getting style tips from Kanye, who famously said told wife Kim Kardashian that ‘big glasses are out’.”
“This isn’t the first time the two have been compared over their fashion choices, with the Shout Out To My Ex singer sharing snaps of herself on Instagram wearing an outfit very similar to those from Gigi’s collection with Tommy Hilfiger.”
“However, the X Factor star later deleted her upload, after fans questioned whether she was ‘shading’ the 22-year-old.”
“Gigi Hadid recently made headlines after confirming her split from Zayn, after two years together.”
“Zayn and Gigi dated for two years (Picture: Getty)‘Breakup statements often seem impersonal because there is really no way to put into words what two people experience together over a few years,’ she told her 8.81million followers.”


"More information: for the first time, Zane has released a brand new series," with the arrival of Gigi Hadid split, he bleached his hair and beard. ". More information: Gigi Hadid and Lewis Hamilton sent flirting text messages a few days after Zahn Malik broke up... "
"Bella Hadid's sister announced it in a twitter statement earlier this month."
"The little Remix singer was found meeting with her band mates in Tokyo - she was wearing a pair of black sunglasses very similar to Victoria's Secret Supermodel's recent shoot."
"She was very fashionable on her way to Japan and chose a pair of small glasses that day."
"Sharp eyed fans want to know if she makes sense in choosing glasses - Gigi often takes pictures in the small sun and even launches her own series to fill vogue glasses with similar hues."
"Perrie Edwards also took an ad for a pair of mini Sunglasses (picture: Sato). It seems that they all got the fashion secret from Kanye, who famously told his wife, Kim Kardashian," the big glasses are broken. "
"It's not the first time the two have compared their fashion choices. My former singer shared her photo on instagram, wearing a dress that is very similar to that of Gigi and Tommy Hilfiger."
"However, the X factor star later deleted her upload because fans questioned whether she was" shading "the 22-year-old girl."
"Gigi Hadid recently made headlines after confirming her break-up with zayn, who has been together for two years."
"Zayn and Gigi have been dating for two years (photo source: Getty)," breakup statements tend to be impersonal because they can't express their experiences together in words, "she told 8.81 million fans



Number  453
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“By the way, while HollywoodLies is also maintaining a “devastated” and “distraught” Hadid has been “crying a lot” over the situation, she actually looks pretty happy in the above photo from yesterday.”
“That is all that’s going on here.”
“But far from being pieces of genuine reporting, these are often fake news stories that contain information anyone could guess.”
“As Gossip Cop has repeatedly pointed out, HollywoodLies likes to take hot topics (in this case, Hadid doing the fashion show in China) and craft “exclusives” around it (Malik wanting to defend Hadid from haters) for the sake of traffic.”
“(As previously reported, Malik said he was called “ignorant” and a “terrorist.”) Because Malik did that before, it’s not exactly a stretch to think he’d be upset now and want to defend her again.”
“He tweeted in defense of Hadid during the original controversy earlier this year, which led to additional angry messages as the backlash grew.”
“The assertion that Malik wants to go on a Twitter rant defending Hadid isn’t really coming from a “source.” It’s coming from the singer’s own past.”
“But HollywoodLies can’t cover up the fact that this story is inauthentic.”
“If he doesn’t, the site can claim it was right about Hadid requesting he “hold back.” Just like the tabloids, the bad blog often tries to cover itself.”
“If Malik does tweet, it can claim it was right about him wanting to defend Hadid.”


"By the way, although Hollywood is still in a state of" devastation "and" anxiety ", Hadid has" cried many times "for this, but from the above photos yesterday, she actually looks quite happy."
"That's what's going on here."
"But these reports are far from true reports. They are often false news reports, containing information that anyone can guess."
"As gossip police has repeatedly pointed out, for the sake of traffic, Hollywood people like to take hot topics (in this case, Hadid is doing a fashion show in China) and create" exclusive news "around it (Malik wants to protect Hadid from haters)
(as previously reported, Malik said he was known as "ignorant" and "terrorist.") Because Malik has done this before, it's not too much to think that he will be upset and want to defend her again
"In the initial controversy earlier this year, he defended Hadid on twitter, which led to more angry messages as the rebound intensified."
"Malik's claim that he wants to defend Hadid on twitter does not come from the real" source ", but from the singer's own past."
"But Hollywood can't hide the fact that this story is not true."
If he doesn't, the site can claim that Hadid was right to ask him to "restrain.". Like tabloids, bad blogs often try to cover themselves up
"If Malik does tweet, it can claim that he's right to defend Hadid."



Number  454
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Caitlyn’s reported push present for Kylie?”
“The 20-year-old is due to give birth in February, but we haven’t seen much of her baby bump throughout her pregnancy (unless you count those leaked pics from September).”
“A new report claims Caitlyn Jenner is gifting her $50,000 for a ‘full mommy makeover’ as a push present.”
“Kylie Jenner, 20, has been keeping her baby bump under wraps (literally), but after giving birth, she might emerge looking just like her pre-pregnancy self.”
“That is, with the help of a possible gift from Caitlyn Jenner, 68, who is reportedly going to give her daughter a $50,000 coupon for plastic surgery as a push present.”
““Ever since Caitlyn transitioned, the only thing they have in common is makeup and cosmetic procedures, so this gift is Caitlyn’s warped way of bonding,” a source close to Kylie told Star magazine.”
““She’s promised Kylie that she would pay for a full mommy makeover: tummy tuck, breast lift and as much liposuction as she wants!” However, don’t hold your breath for this to actually happen.”
“A rep for Caitlyn tells HollywoodLife.com that this isn’t true.”
“She starred in a Calvin Klein ad campaign with her sisters including an already pregnant Khloe Kardashian and while Koko flaunted her tummy in a bra and underwear Kylie managed to keep her stomach hidden with the strategic placing of...”
“...be complicated and Kylie s feelings about her own stomach are entirely valid...”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Caitlin's gift to Kelly?"
"The 20-year-old is due to give birth in February, but we haven't seen many lumps in her baby during the entire pregnancy (unless you count in the photos leaked in September),"
"A new report says Caitlin Jenner will give her $50000 as a promotional gift for a" Mummy facelift. "
As like as two peas, Kelly Jenna, 20, kept her secret to her tiny lump, but after she gave birth, she looked just the same as her own before pregnancy.
"In other words, with the help of a possible gift from 68 year old Caitlin Jenner, it is reported that she will give her daughter a $50000 plastic surgery coupon as a push gift."
"Since Caitlin's transformation, the only thing they have in common is make-up and cosmetic procedures, so this gift is Caitlin's twisted combination," a source close to Kelly told Star Magazine
"She promised Kelly that she would pay for her mother's plastic surgery: abdominal plastic surgery, breast augmentation and any liposuction she wanted!"! "But don't hold your breath and wait for this to happen."
A representative of Caitlin said it's not true
"She and her sisters starred in Calvin Klein's ad campaign, including a pregnant Khloe Kardashian. While Koko was showing off her belly in a bra and underwear, Kelly managed to put it strategically To hide her stomach. "
“… To be complicated, Kelly's feeling of her stomach is absolutely right... "



Number  455
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ll probably just do all that stuff.””
“I’ve been practicing for a long time,” he told PEOPLE, joking, “I’ve done every schtick you can do with a baby on TV … all the bits and jokes and diaper gags.”
“...for John Stamos since welcoming his son Billy...”
“The Fuller House star, 54, spoke about being a first-time dad during On Air with Ryan Seacrest Thursday, revealing that his wife Caitlin McHugh had a positive — and super quick — childbirth experience.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“He told Seacrest’s co-host Sisanie, who is pregnant with twins, “I hope you have a delivery like she did because it was about 20 minutes.”
“It was weird.”
“It was super fast.”Stamos then joked, “A little baby came out and he looked just like [late comedian and close friend] Don Rickles.”Born at 8:32 p.m., William Christopher Stamos arrived on Tuesday, April 10 in Los Angeles, PEOPLE confirmed via his birth certificate.”
“Image zoom Credit: Richard The actor also praised 31-year-old McHugh, whom he wed Feb. 3 after two and a half years together.”
““You know, people are probably sick of me saying I’ve always wanted a kid, but it just happened.”


"I might do all these things."
"I've been practicing for a long time," he jokingly told people. "I've done everything you can on TV about babies All the trivia, jokes and diaper gags. "
"Since John Stamos welcomed his son Billy..."
"The 54 year old fullerhouse star told Ryan Seacrest on Thursday that he was a father for the first time and revealed that his wife Caitlin McHugh had an active, super fast birth experience."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
He told Seacrest's co host, sisani, that she was pregnant with twins. "I hope you give birth like her, because it's about 20 minutes."
"It's strange."
"Too fast." Stamos went on to joke, "a little baby came out and he looked like [the late comedian and close friend] don Rickles." William Christopher Stamos was born at 8:32 p.m. and arrived in Los Angeles on Tuesday, April 10, as confirmed by his birth certificate
"Credit for image zooming: actor Richard also praised 31 year old McHugh, who married him on February 3 after two and a half years together."
"You know, people may hate me saying I always wanted to have a child, but it just happened."



Number  456
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  457
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dancing with the Stars Season 25 premieres on September 18.”
“I danced as a little kid but this is nothing like what I'm going to expect, I'm sure."”
“[It's] definitely not in my wheelhouse.”
“"This is going to be a challenge for me, definitely.”
“"He said it's going to be a lot of work but I expect nothing different," Owens said.”
“Owens, whose 15-year career in the NFL has included time with the Philadelphia Eagles, Dallas Cowboys, and San Francisco 49ers, says that he reached out to Ochocinco for advice on joining the dance competition.”
“Yesterday we got our first start at trying to learn some steps, so that's the challenge."”
“"It's going to be a challenge.”
“"If I can handle [Dallas Cowboys Coach] Bill Parcells, then I can handle Cheryl," Owens told Good Morning America.”
“Owens will be accompanied by Cheryl Burke, who has previously been partnered up with Chad 'Ochocinco' Johnson and Emmitt Smith.”


"Dance with stars season 25 premieres on September 18."
"I've been dancing since I was a kid, but I'm sure it's totally different from what I expected."
"(it) must not be in my cab."
"It's definitely a challenge for me."
"He said it would be a big job, but I hope it's no different," Owens said
Owens spent 15 years in the NFL, playing for the Philadelphia Eagles, the Dallas Cowboys and the San Francisco 49ers. He said he had asked ochoshenko for advice on participating in the dance competition
"Yesterday, for the first time, we tried to learn some steps, so that's the challenge."
"It's going to be a challenge."
"If I can deal with (Dallas Cowboys coach) Bill Parsons, then I can deal with Cheryl," Owens told Good Morning America
"Owens will be accompanied by Cheryl Burke, who previously worked with chad'ochocinco'johnson and Emmit Smith."



**Something goes wrong**
“Read more about:”
“The Canadian is up for eight awards, including album of the year.”
““Perhaps whoever made up this story should spend more time learning about other cultures and less time trying to divide us.”Now, Drake will likely focus his attention to the Grammy Awards this weekend.”
““I am proud that my closest friends and fans come from all different religions and races,” Drake continued.”
“Drake wrapped up the post with a call for unity.”
“...social media...”
“I am well aware of what a hijab is and I would never make a disrespectful comment like that in my life towards someone who is wearing one After videos surfaced of the rapper telling the fan to take off the scarf some called for a boycott his concerts on...”
““I make a point every night to end my shows on tones of unity and love, so, to find out that I am being utilized in a fake media story about me disrespecting Muslims is devastating to me,” Drake wrote in the post.”
“The rapper posted on Instagram that he was talking to four women, one of whom was wearing a winter scarf, and he told her to take it off.”
“Toronto’s very own Drake says he was a victim of a “fake media story” after rumours surfaced online that he told a fan to take off her hijab at one of his concerts.”


Learn more:
The Canadian will receive eight awards, including album of the year
"Maybe the people who make up this story should spend more time learning about other cultures than trying to divide us." Now, Drake is likely to focus on this weekend's Grammy Awards
"I'm proud that my closest friends and fans come from different religions and races," Drake continued
"Drake ended the job with a call for unity."
“… Social media... "
"I know very well what a headscarf is, and I will never make such disrespectful comments on people wearing headscarfs, because the video of the rapper telling fans to take off the headscarf has surfaced, and some people call for boycotting him in The concert at the concert
Drake wrote in his post: "I end the show every night with a tone of unity and love, so it's devastating for me to find that I was used in a false media report about my disrespect for Muslims."
"The rapper posted on instagram that he was talking to four women, one of whom was wearing a winter scarf, and he asked her to take it off."
Toronto's own Drake said he was a victim of a "fake media story" because of online rumors that he had a fan take off her headscarf at one of his concerts



**Something goes wrong**
“Trabajo A post shared by champagnepapi (@champagnepapi) on Aug 21, 2017 at 2:06pm PDTHollywoodLifers, do you think it was lame of Drake to send out such an obvious public display of attention towards Rihanna?”
“The pair has kept their relationship fairly private, but when we saw the massive makeout session the two had in a Spanish pool back in June, it’s obvious there’s a whole lot of passion in this relationship!”
“Now that Rihanna has found happiness with handsome billionaire Hassan Jameel, her ex Drake is filled with regret.”
“We’ve got details on how he can’t stop lusting after her now.”
“Drake‘s still got love on the brain when it comes to his ex Rihanna.”
“Even though they broke up in the fall of 2016, he’s still carrying a torch for the 29-year-old singer.”
“He let the world know that she’s still on his mind — and his feet — after posting an Aug. 21 Instagram photo wearing a pair of her “Rihannaxstance” socks just four days after she debuted them.”
““Drake has always had a thing for Rihanna, and still does.”
“They’ve hooked up and tried dating numerous times over the past, but it’s never worked out to be a permanent thing, and that’s something he regrets to this day,” a Drizzy insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““The socks photo was his way of ruffling Rihanna’s feathers, and letting her know he’s still out there and thinking of her,” our source continues.”


"Trabajo shared a post by champagnepapi (@ champagnepapi) at 2:06 p.m. on August 21, 2017. Do you think it is untenable for Drake to pay so much attention to Rihanna openly?"
"They've always had a very private relationship, but when we saw the massive intimacy they had in the Spanish swimming pool in June, it was clear that the relationship was full of passion!"
"Now Rihanna and the handsome billionaire Hassan Jamil have found happiness, and her predecessor Drake is full of regrets."
"We've got the details of how he can't stop lusting for her now."
"Drake's mind is still full of love when he talks about his ex Rihanna."
"Although they broke up in the fall of 2016, he is still carrying the torch for the 29 year old singer."
He posted a picture on instagram on August 21, wearing Rihanna's socks. Just four days after her debut, he let the world know that she was still in his mind - and his feet
"Drake has always loved Rihanna, and he still does."
A hairy insider told reporters: "they have been dating many times in the past, but the result is not a permanent thing. This is something he regrets so far." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"This sock photo is a way for him to annoy Rihanna and let her know that he's still out thinking about her," our source continued



Number  460
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think Gaga is making the right choice by not attacking Donald during the Super Bowl, HollywoodLifers?”
“After Donald defeated Hillary Clinton, 69, in the presidential election, Gaga was one of the first protestors outside of Trump Tower in New York City.”
“Lady Gaga could land the most brutal hit of Super Bowl 51 on Donald Trump!”
“Gaga is not a fan of the incoming president, and HollywoodLife.com has the EXCLUSIVE scoop if she’ll use her halftime show performance to attack Trump!”
“Fans better not expect Lady Gaga, 30, to pull a Meryl Streep, 67, and blast Donald Trump, 70, when she headlines the Super Bowl 51 Halftime show.”
“Instead of focusing on how much she disagrees with Trump and his administration’s policies, the Mother Monster will go in a different direction.”
““Lady Gaga is looking to show a message of peace and love with her performance at the Super Bowl,” a source close to Gaga EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““She doesn’t want to alienate a portion of the audience and use her time to bash Donald Trump.”
“It is her time in the spotlight and to her he doesn’t need anymore press so she isn’t going to focus her performance on him.”Let’s make it clear – Gaga does not like Donald Trump and what he stands for.”
““I want to live in a country of kindness where love trumps hate,” she told her fans.”


"Do you think Gaga was right not to attack Donald during the super bowl, Hollywood star?"
"Gaga was one of the first group of protestors outside the trump building in New York City after Donald defeated Hillary Clinton, 69, in the presidential election."
"Lady Gaga could have shot down Donald Trump with the cruelest of the Super Bowl 51!"
"Gaga is not a fan of the new president. Hollywood life has an exclusive. If she will use her performance at half-time to attack trump!"
"It's better for fans not to expect 30-year-old Lady Gaga to pull 67 year old Meryl Streep and 70 year old Donald Trump into the headlines of the Super Bowl 51 half show."
"Instead of focusing on how much she disagrees with trump and her government's policies, the mother monster will go in another direction."
"Lady Gaga hopes to convey a message of peace and love through her performance in the super bowl," an exclusive source close to Gaga told Hollywood life
"She doesn't want to alienate a part of the audience and use her time to attack Donald Trump."
"This is her time in the spotlight. For her, he doesn't need more media, so she won't focus on him." Let's be clear - Gaga doesn't like Donald Trump and what he stands for. "
"I want to live in a good country where love is better than hate," she told fans



Number  461
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...quickly before that nonsense, we referred to as out the publication for arbitrarily alleging that Jolie changed into in the midst of a “profession disaster.” Regardless, Jolie is very happy with her properly-acquired Cambodian drama, and she doesn’t want a gold statue to sense verified.”
“Gossip Cop lately busted the tabloid for making up a story about the actress being on a food regimen which includes best espresso and cigarettes.”
“...does seem determined to disparage Jolie’s person.”
“...on the other hand, good enough!”
“The actress became determined to shed a mild on the brutal history of the poverty-stricken usa, now not to collect accolades.”
“The actress followed her oldest son Maddox from Cambodia in 2002, after which she became pressured to inform the tale of the united states’s genocide underneath the Khmer Rouge regime.”
“...getting awards...”
“She s simply devastated but Gossip Cop checked in with a supply close to the actress and filmmaker who brushed off the tabloid s record as absolutely fake First They Killed My Father changed into a ardour challenge for Jolie now not a movie she made for the sake of...”
“She takes her filmmaking very severely.” The meant insider adds, “An Oscar nod might had been a triumph for her.”
“Directing way greater to Angie than performing ever did.”


“…… Not long before that nonsense, we mentioned a publication that arbitrarily claimed that Julie had become an actor in a "career disaster.". Anyway, Julie is very satisfied with her Cambodian drama. She doesn't want a gold statue to feel real. "
"Recently, gossip police exposed the tabloid because it made up a story about the actress's diet regimen, including the best espresso and cigarettes."
“… Someone who seems determined to belittle Julie. "
“… On the other hand, good enough! "
Determined to make a mild comment on the cruel history of American poverty, the actress stopped collecting praise
In 2002, the actress followed her eldest son, Maddox, from Cambodia, after which she was forced to tell the story of genocide in the United States under the Khmer Rouge regime
“… Award winning... "
"She just broke down, but the gossip police checked close to actresses and filmmakers who had absolutely fake tabloid records. The first time they killed my father turned into a passionate challenge. Julie is not a movie now, she's for..."
"She's very strict with her film making," the caustic insider added. "The Oscar nomination could be a victory for her."
"Coaching Angie is more important than ever."



Number  462
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read more about Kim Kardashian and North West:Every product in this beauty blogger's $32K beauty collection:Don't forget to follow Allure on Instagram and Twitter.”
“She loved it, but she loves her curly hair, too."”
“The latest instance of mommy-shaming plaguing Kardashian was sparked by a throwback photo of her husband and daughter that she posted on Instagram on Tuesday.”
“In the pic, North West cuddles up to Kanye West and gives her smiling dad a kiss on the cheek.”
“"I can still feel the love ," Kim K captioned the adorable snapshot, quoting Kanye's recently released song "Feel the Love."”
“Almost immediately, critics began pouncing on Kardashian over the fact that, in the picture, North is wearing her naturally curly hair straight.”
“"I can feel the heat damage from here!”
“Leave your [kid's] hair alone let her have the choice to damage it when she's older," one person commented.”
“"Stop straightening her hair," someone else wrote, while another added, "That poor baby's curl pattern is gonna be all jacked up from the heat damage she's putting on her hair at a young age."”
“Others, however, defended Kardashian, citing both her right to parent her children however she wants and the well-documented fact that North is already a burgeoning style star at just five years old.”


"Learn more about Kim Kardashian and North West: 32000 dollars per product in this beauty blogger's beauty C attention: don" don't forget to follow temptation on instagram and twitter. "
"She likes it, but she also likes curly hair."
"The latest incident of mother humiliating Kardashian was triggered by a retrospective photo of her husband and daughter that she posted on instagram on Tuesday."
"In the picture, northwest holds Kanye West and kisses her smiling father on the cheek."
"I still feel love," Kim K. wrote for the lovely snapshot, citing Kanye's recently released song "feel love."
"Almost immediately, critics attacked Kardashian because in the photo, North combed her naturally curly hair straight."
"I can feel the heat here!"
"Leave your (child's) hair alone and let her choose to damage it when she grows up," one commented
"Leave her hair alone," another wrote, adding, "that poor child's curly hair will curl because of the heat damage on her hair when she was young."
"Others, however, defend Kardashian, who has both the right to be a parent for her children at will and the evidence that North was a rising star at the age of five."



Number  463
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ET.”
““I think Milo does a great job portraying a good father who wants the best for his kids and wants his kids to be better than him.”
““I don’t know if I like the word bromance.”
“People seem to like that word,” Hartley, 40, exclusively tells Us Weekly.”
““I love those guys though.”
“We all get along.”
“They are two of my best friends.”
“I really do love both those dudes.”
“They’re great.”Hartley and Brown, 41, play Kevin and Randall, respectively, on the NBC drama, with Ventimiglia, 40, as their dad, Jack Pearson.”
“The pair don’t share too much air time with the Gilmore Girls alum (Jack died when their characters were in high school), but the trio take advantage of their time off-camera.”


"Wait a minute."
"I think Milo has done a good job playing a good father and he wants the children to live better than him."
"I don't know if I like the word bromance or not."
"People seem to like the word," Hartley, 40, told us exclusively weekly
"But I like those guys."
"We all get along well."
"They are my two best friends."
"I really like these two guys."
"They're great." Hartley, 41, and brown play Kevin and Randall on NBC, respectively, while wendimilia, 40, plays their father, Jack Pearson
"The two didn't share much broadcast time with Gilmore alumni (Jack died in their character's high school), but the three took advantage of their off camera time."



Number  464
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Vivien Killilea/Getty Images]”
“She was spotted on Thursday wearing a black mini dress and thigh-high boots, according to People, that showed off her post-baby body.”
“The 28-year-old shared photos earlier this week while taking her 4-year-old son King Cairo to visit Santa at the mall.”
“Blac Chyna, real name Angela White, posed with King as they sat next to the jolly man himself.”
“She wore a skin-tight nude jumpsuit that flaunted her curves.”
“In true Chyna fashion, the mom-of-two was in full glam for the fun family outing.”
“While big brother King visited with Santa, his baby sister Dream was not in attendance.”
“However, it appeared to be a special mother-son moment as Chyna stood in line to determine if she had been naughty or nice this year.”
“Her full outfit — curves included— was on display in the video post as she laughed and talked with Santa’s helpers.”
“Before she even gave birth, Chyna was posting throwback photos of her pre-pregnancy body as she told fans she couldn’t wait to slim down again.”


"[Vivien kirileya / Getty pictures close up]"
"On Thursday, she was found wearing a black miniskirt and thigh high boots, revealing her postpartum figure, according to people
"Earlier this week, the 28 year old shared photos with her 4-year-old son, the king of Cairo, when she went to the mall to see Santa Claus."
"Blake chener, real name Angela white, with Kim, they're sitting next to the happy man."
"She's wearing a tight naked jumpsuit, showing off her curves."
"In real China fashion, the mother of two is glaring at the fun filled family outing."
"When big brother Kim took Santa to see him, his sister Meng didn't show up."
"However, it seems to be a special time for mother and son. Zina is queuing up to decide whether to be naughty or amiable this year."
"As she talks and laughs with Santa's assistants, her entire outfit - including the curves - is shown in the video post."
"Before she had a baby, Chyna had released retro photos of her body before she became pregnant, and she told fans that she couldn't wait to lose weight again."



Number  465
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So if he is thinking of getting back with Kourtney she wants none of it.”HollywoodLife.com has reached out to Younes Bendjima’s and Scott Disick’s reps for a comment.”
“...in 2015 haven t publicly taken a family vacay with the kids in Mexico since 2016”
“Is it her ex, Younes Bendjima?”
“Here’s another plot twist in Kourtney Kardashian’s love life.”
“The KUWTK star is allegedly pregnant after publicly being seen with “what appeared to be a bump” in L.A. on July 30, a new report by OK!”
“...magazine claims!”
““It was strange to see because she’s usually so perfectly svelte,” a source told the outlet, and a friend to Kourt added, “Everyone is whispering that she’s pregnant with her fourth child.” If Kourtney is supposedly pregnant, then who on Earth is the father to baby number four?”
“And by that, we mean, is it once again baby daddy Scott Disick, 35, or ex-boyfriend Younes Bendjima, 25?”
“Naturally, one would assume it’s the younger model, who to the world was Kourtney’s boyfriend up until recently.”
“But Kourtney’s anonymous friend makes a shocking claim — it’s more than likely Scott!”


"So if he wants to go back with Courtney, she doesn't want it at all." Hollywood life has contacted representatives of younes bendjima and Scott disc for comments. "
“…… In 2015, since 2016, I have never had a family holiday with my children in Mexico in public. "
"Is it her ex boyfriend yones benjima?"
"This is another turning point in Courtney Kardashian's love life."
According to the latest report of OK, the Kuyt star is said to be pregnant after taking a photo with look like a lump in Los Angeles on July 30
“… The magazine claims
"It's strange, because she's usually very slim," a source told the media, adding that a friend of curt's "everyone is whispering that she's pregnant with a fourth child." If Courtney is thought to be pregnant, who is the father of baby number four? "
"We mean, another 35 year old father, Scott Disick, or 25-year-old ex boyfriend, yones bengima?"
"Naturally, people think it's a young model, and until recently, she was Courtney's boyfriend."
But Courtney's anonymous friend came up with a shocking statement - probably Scott! "



Number  466
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“Jennifer Aniston vs. Anti-Trump Celebrities: Is 'Friends' Star Going After POTUS Critics?”
“Email Print Img No-img Menu Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin CommentHas Jennifer Aniston been going after anti-Trump celebrities?”
“Reports stated that the "Friends" star allegedly slammed Celine Dion for her remarks against America and President Donald Trump.”
“Dion, a Canadian, supposedly made a comment that she's done performing in the United States while Trump is president.”
“She also allegedly insulted the American flag and exclaimed that she hates the country because of its poor governance, according to the printed tabloid Daily News for American.”
“The report also cited that Aniston took issues with Dion's comments and attacked the singer.”
“Gossip Cop, however, debunked the publication's claims as the actual report had no concrete proof that the stars said any statements, either for or against President Trump and America.”
“The baseless story ran without confirmations from both stars' camps.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
"Jennifer Aniston vs anti trump celebrities: are friends stars chasing botos' critics?"
"Email print img has no img menu WhatsApp Google reddit Digg stump LinkedIn comment has Jennifer Aniston been chasing anti trump celebrities?"
The friends star is reported to have attacked Celine Dion's remarks about the United States and President Donald Trump
"It is speculated that Dion, a Canadian, commented that during Trump's presidency, she finished performing in the United States."
According to the US daily news, a print tabloid, she also insulted the US flag and said loudly that she hated the country because of its poor governance
"Aniston was also quoted as objecting to Dion's remarks and attacking the singer," the report said
"However, the gossip police exposed the statement of the journal, because the actual report has no specific evidence to prove that the stars said anything in support of or against President trump and the United States."
"This groundless story has not been confirmed by the two star camps."



Number  467
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RB RB”
“This is how people on, this has been going on behind closed doors," he added.”
“"But on the other side, this has been going on.”
“"Everyone feels anger but after the anger it's really hurtful because he's looking down on a whole population of people and he's so misinformed because these places have beautiful people," he said.”
“Jones also asked Jay-Z about US President Donald Trump's recent comments about the African countries, to which Jay-Z said the remarks were "hurtful".”
“Jay-Z's extramarital affairs came into light after Beyonce's autobiographical album 'Lemonade' dropped in 2016, and contained many of her intimate thoughts and feelings towards her cheating husband.”
“For us, we chose to fight for our love, for our family to give our kids a different outcome to break that cycle for black men and women," he added.”
“"You can either address it or pretend until it blows up at some point.”
“Jay-Z, who shares three children -- two girls and a boy -- with his Beyonce, said fighting for his marriage meant breaking the cycle of the past.”
“If you have and experienced love and if you don't understand it or have the tools to move forward, then you're going to have complications," said Jay-Z.”


“RB RB”
"That's what people do, behind closed doors," he added
"But on the other hand, it's happening all the time."
"Everyone will feel angry, but it really hurts after anger because he looks down on the whole population, he is misled because there are beautiful people in these places," he said
"Jones also asked Jez about President Trump's recent comments on African countries, which Jez said were" hurtful. "
"After the release of Beyonce's autobiographical album lemonade in 2016, Jay-Z's extramarital affair came to light, including her many private thoughts and feelings about her cheating husband."
"For us, we chose to fight for our love, to give our children a different ending for our families, to break the cycle of black men and women," he added
"You can say it or pretend it until it explodes at some point."
"Jay-Z and Beyonce have three children - two girls and a boy, and he says fighting for marriage means breaking the cycle of the past."
"If you have and have experienced love, if you don't understand it, or if you don't have the tools to move forward, then you have complications," Jay-Z said



**Something goes wrong**
“Didn’t think anything could beat kicking off the new year with the #TIMESUP initiative, but then... pic.twitter.com/WLbtL6f8qV — Amber Tamblyn (@ambertamblyn) January 2, 2018Watch the Tonight Show clip above.”
“Earlier this year, Tamblyn shared a photo on Instagram of the foursome reuniting that came with a nod to the Time's Up movement.”
“Meanwhile, co-star Blake Lively added during a separate appearance: "'Deadpool' is all thanks to the fans.”
“So I'm saying we'll do it."”
“Jimmy Fallon has made it clear in the past that he’s a big fan of Gilmore Girls.”
“But on Thursday’s Tonight Show, he revealed to Alexis Bledel that he is also a fan of one of her other projects.”
“"[The Sisterhood of the Traveling Pants] is my jam,” Fallon said.”
““I love you.”
“I love that movie.”
“I love everyone in it.”Bledel agreed that she loves it, too.”


"I didn't expect anything better than starting a new year with the timesup plan, but... pic.twitter.com/WLbtL6f8qV -Amber TAMBLYN (@ ambertamblyn) watch the above clip of "Tonight Show" on January 2, 2018. "
Earlier this year, TAMBLYN shared a picture of four people reunited on instagram, in which the four people agreed with the progress of the times
Meanwhile, CO star Blake Lively added in another appearance: "dead pool is all about the fans."
"So I said we would do it."
"Jimmy Fallon has made it clear in the past that he is a big fan of Gilmore Girls."
"But on Thursday's tonight show, he revealed to Alexis Bradell that he was also a fan of one of her other projects."
"The sisterhood of travel pants is my wish," Fallon said
"I love you."
"I love that movie."
"I love everyone in it." Bradell agreed that she loved it, too



**Something goes wrong**
“With reporting by Nicholas Hautman and Jennifer Heger.”
““She wasn’t looking for a relationship.”
“So on February 5, she took to Instagram and Twitter for a shoutout to her boyfriend, Sam Asghari.”
““I’ve been with this man for over a year… everyday (sic) he inspires me to be a better person and that makes me feel like the luckiest girl in the world!”
“!” she wrote on a #relationshipgoals snap of the couple in front of a waterfall.”
“What would make her feel even luckier — an insider reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly — is having a baby with her beau.”
““Britney has talked with Sam about having babies together,” says the insider.”
““She was young when she had Sean and Jayden, and she feels much more mature now.”The “Piece of Me” songstress first became a mom in 2005 when she welcomed son Sean Preston, now 12, with then-husband Kevin Federline.”
“She had Sean’s brother, Jayden, almost exactly a year later.”
“Spears, 36, met Iranian fitness model Asghari, 23, on the set of her steamy “Slumber Party” video in 2016.”


"Nicholas hotman and Jennifer Hager."
"She's not looking for relationships."
"So on February 5, she called to her boyfriend Sam asghari on instagram and twitter."
"I've been with this man for more than a year He inspires me to be a better person every day, which makes me feel like the luckiest girl in the world! "
"!" she wrote a snapshot of her relationship in front of the waterfall. "
A person familiar with the matter revealed in the new issue of us weekly that what made her feel more fortunate was that she had a baby with her boyfriend
"Britney and Sam talked about having a baby together," the person familiar with the matter said
"She was young when she had Sean and Jaden, and now she feels much more mature." The part of me singer first became a mother in 2005 when she and her then husband Kevin Federline met her 12-year-old son Sean Preston
"Almost a year later, she gave birth to Sean's brother, Jaden."
"Spears, 36, met Iranian fitness model askari, 23, in the steaming" sleep party "video of 2016."



Number  470
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell Us about the night you ended up at the brothel.”
“The only time you can f–k is when you take coke.”
“I’m not going to say she accepted it because that would be the wrong word.”
“It was my drug of choice.”
“She knew I was doing cocaine the whole time after that.”
“The sad thing about it is, I don’t know if I was disappointed because I was actually doing the drug or because she caught me.”
“So was I.”
“She was disappointed.”
“Around two years before we split up [in 2011], I was in the man cave she had made for me and she caught me.”
“I was hiding it for a while, but then I got frustrated and was like, f–k it.”


"Tell me about the night you were in a brothel."
"You get F-K only when you drink coke."
"I won't say she accepted because it's the wrong word."
"This is the drug of my choice."
"She knows I've been taking cocaine."
"Sadly, I don't know if it's because I'm really taking drugs or because she caught me and was disappointed."
"Me too."
"She was disappointed."
"About two years before we (2011) broke up, I was in the man's hole she made for me, and she caught me."
"I kept it from you for a while, but then I was depressed and thought, f – K, it."



**Something goes wrong**
“We're told that at a point in the tape when the action is the heaviest, you cannot actually see Kevin.”
“We are told it is NOT a sex tape, but looks like it is a prelude to sex.”
“Sources tell TMZ a woman has allegedly demanded money from Kevin after shooting a video with him in which Kevin and the woman are engaged in "sexually suggestive" conduct.”
“Kevin profusely apologized to his pregnant wife, Eniko Parrish, and his kids on Instagram Saturday ... saying he recently made some mistakes he deeply regrets.”
“Kevin Hart is getting out in front of a messy situation by apologizing publicly to his wife and kids, and TMZ has learned it's all over a video that looks like he's cheating.”
“We're told the person allegedly extorting Kevin has demanded payment from him to avoid the tape's release.”
“The 3rd clip shows 2 people milling around a room, one of them looks vaguely like Kevin.”
“You never see Kevin in the 2nd clip.”
“The tape then cuts to a bed, where you don't see the people in the bed ... but hear creaking and what could be people having sex.”
“The first appears to show a woman and Kevin in a club getting cozy.”


"We've been told that you don't actually see Kevin at the top of the video."
"We were told it wasn't a sex video, but it looked like a prelude to sex."
"The source told TMZ that a woman was said to ask for money from Kevin after filming a video with him, in which Kevin and the woman were" sexually suggestive. "
"Kevin apologized to his pregnant wife, iniko Parrish, and his children on instagram on Saturday... He said he had made some mistakes recently, which he deeply regretted
"Kevin Hart apologized publicly to his wife and children in the face of a chaotic situation, and TMZ has learned that it was all through a video that looks like he was cheating."
"We were told that people suspected of extorting Kevin asked Kevin to pay to avoid the video being released."
"The third clip shows two people walking around a room. One of them looks like Kevin."
"You'll never see Kevin in the second clip."
"And then the tape cuts to a bed where you can't see the people... But you'll hear squeaks and people having sex. "
"The first picture shows a woman and Kevin getting comfortable in a club."



Number  472
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Blue Ivy’s Reaction to the Twins Is Absolutely Adorable...”
“(EXCLUSIVE)10 Best Beauty Products to Get You Glowing This Summer!”
“More From Life & StyleMiley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth — the Wedding’s Off!”
““He’ll do whatever it takes to keep them safe.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style magazine, on newsstands now!”
““He’s waited so long for this family,” the insider continues.”
“Find out If She’ll Welcome a Baby in 2017!”
““His mansion in Studio City [Calif.] was deemed the most secure, and it’s within minutes of an LAPD station.”MORE: Is Jennifer Aniston Pregnant?”
““As soon as Amal found out she was pregnant, he hired former Secret Service agents to assess all his properties and make recommendations for improvement,” the insider adds.”
“When George learned that he was going to be a father, those concerns went into overdrive.”
“And Amal’s work as an international human rights lawyer, along with her public pleas for foreign governments to prosecute terrorists, has made her a potential target.”


"Blue Ivy's response to twins is absolutely lovely..."
(exclusive) 10 best beauty products, let you shine this summer
"More from life and fashion, Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth - the wedding is over!"
"He will make every effort to protect their safety." To learn more, buy the latest issue of lifestyle magazine at the newsstand
"He's been waiting for the family for so long," the person familiar with the matter continued
"See if she'll have a baby in 2017!"
"His mansion in Studio City [California] is considered the safest, and it's only minutes from the LAPD station." More: is Jennifer Aniston pregnant? "
"As soon as Amar found out he was pregnant, he hired a former secret service agent to assess all his property and make suggestions for improvement," the person added
"When George learned that he was going to be a father, those concerns went too far."
"Amar's work as an international human rights lawyer, coupled with her public appeal to foreign governments to prosecute terrorists, makes her a potential target."



Number  473
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Feature Image by Frederick M. Brown/Getty Images]”
“Exclusive!”
“Most recently one outlandish claim was made about the star and her attempts to make some cosmetic adjustments for a steep price.”
“As Gossip Cop notes, rumor had it that Holmes was set to pay $20,000 to fix her teeth.”
“The gossip policing site shares the rumor that was spread by an unreliable tabloid.”
““According to the repeatedly discredited National Enquirer, the actress needs major dental work to fix her “‘twisted’ teeth.”
“A so called source tells the outlet She grinds her teeth in her sleep and they re in bad shape Katie is so self conscious she often smiles with her mouth closed further contends the magazine s clearly ill informed insider adding She wants something to smile about and she...”
“...s willing to break the bank to get it...”
“'”The publication notes that a real source close to the star has stated that the rumor is absolutely false and that Holmes is in no way self-conscious of her smile, nor is she so concerned that she smiles with her mouth closed.”
“Although this rumor has turned out to be a fabrication, the rumor regarding Jamie Foxx and Katie has been given new life since the two were spotted holding hands in Miami on New Year’s Eve.”


"[close up of Frederick M. Brown / Getty pictures]"
"Exclusive!"
"Recently, some people have made a strange statement about the star, she tried to make some cosmetic adjustments for the high price."
"As the gossip police said, there's a rumor that Sherlock Holmes is going to pay $20000 to have his teeth fixed."
"The gossip police website shared rumors spread by an unreliable tabloid."
"The actress needed a lot of dental surgery to repair her" twisted "teeth, according to the repeatedly discredited National Enquirer
"A so-called source told the media that she was grinding her teeth in her sleep and her teeth were not in good condition. Katie was very self-conscious. She often smiles with her mouth closed. She further retorted that the magazine's insiders were obviously not very clear. She added that she wanted something to smile, she..."
“… He's willing to break the bank to get it... "
"According to the publication, a real source close to the star said that the rumor was absolutely false. Holmes didn't realize his smile and didn't worry about smiling with his mouth closed."
"Although this rumor has been proved to be fabricated, the rumor about Jamie Fox and Katie has been given new life since they were found holding hands in Miami on New Year's Eve."



Number  474
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“‘Kylie is definitely not taking any chances when it comes to her unborn baby!’MORE : The Kardashian baby boom: Everything you need to know about the Kim, Kylie and Khloe rumoursMORE : Kylie Jenner needs to stop taunting the heck out of us with these ‘pregnancy’ pictures...”
“Fans are clearly eager to know what s going on as they have been flooding Khloe s Instagram every time she posts a picture convinced they can see a baby bump Khloe is reportedly pregnant with Tristan Thompson s child Picture Splash News The family s radio silence suggest there...”
“The 33-year-old, who is reported to be ‘four months pregnant’, according to TMZ, joined sisters Kim and Kourtney in San Francisco where they are filming for Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“Khloe, who is dating Tristan Thompson, walked beside her older sisters in an oversized coat and baggy clothes on Saturday.”
“If she is with child, any hint of a bump was well-hidden, apart from a slight curve that could be seen underneath her jeans as she walked.”
“A rumoured pregnant Khloe Kardashian walks solo in the San Francisco (Picture: Splash News)Keeping her alleged baby bump hidden, we can’t help but feel taunted with all the pregnancy suggestions, with no actual confirmation.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThe sisters, who usually dress in coordinated outfits, looked like a far cry from their usual uniform as Kim and Kourtney flaunted their flat tummies too.”
“Khloe has so far refused to confirm or deny whether the reports of her pregnancy are true.”
“Kim and Khloe enjoying the sun (Picture: Backgrid)Appearing at an event last weekend, Khloe commented on her curvier size and added according to People: ‘When I was bigger and wore bigger clothes, I looked even bigger.”
“I love embracing my curves no matter what size I am.’Khloe covers her body completely sparking more rumours (Picture: Splash News)If the rumours are true, Khloe and her NBA star boyfriend, who have dated for one year, will be expecting their first child together.”


"Kelly will never risk her unborn child! "More: Kardashian baby boom: all the rumors you need to know about Kim, Kelly and Chloe more: Kelly Jenner needs to stop teasing us with these 'pregnant' photos..."
"Fans obviously want to know what's going on, because every time Khloe publishes a picture on instagram, they rush in because she's sure she can see a small lump. It's reported that Khloe is pregnant with a picture of Tristan Thompson's children, and the silence of home radio suggests that..."
The 33 year old, who is four months pregnant, joined Kim and Kourtney sisters in San Francisco to keep up with the kardashians, TMZ reported
"Chloe is on a date with Tristan Thompson, and she walks next to her sister on Saturday in an oversized coat and baggy clothes."
"If she's with a child, any sign of a bulge is hidden, except for the slight curves she can see under her jeans when she walks."
"A rumored pregnant Khloe Kardashian walks alone in San Francisco (image: splash News) conceals her so-called baby lump. We can't help but ridicule all the pregnancy suggestions without actual confirmation."
The sisters usually wear coordinated clothes. Kim and Courtney show off their flat bellies. They look very different from their usual uniforms
"Khloe has so far refused to confirm or deny whether reports of her pregnancy are true."
"Kim and Khloe enjoy the sunshine (photo source: backgrid) appeared at an event last weekend, Khloe commented on her curvy figure and added according to people:" when I'm bigger and wear bigger clothes, I look bigger. "
"No matter how old I am, I like to embrace my curves." If the rumors are true, Khloe and her NBA star boyfriend, who has been dating for a year, will look forward to their first child together



Number  475
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's still unclear how much contact she's had with MJ's children.”
“Worth noting ... Katherine had not seen her grandchildren for several months earlier this year.”
“She also points to her own age, 87, as a reason she's stepping down.”
“Both Paris and Prince are adults now, but Katherine says because Blanket has reached his adolescence ... TJ can handle guardianship on his own.”
“Katherine had been appointed joint guardian -- along with TJ Jackson -- of all 3 of Michael's kids in 2012.”
“According to docs filed by Katherine ... there's no longer any need for her to be the 15-year-old's guardian.”
“EXCLUSIVEKatherine Jackson is bowing out of the guardian biz when it comes to Michael Jackson's youngest child, Blanket.”


"It's not clear how much contact she had with MJ's children."
"It's worth noting that... Earlier this year, Catherine hadn't seen her grandson for months
"She also pointed out that her 87 year old age was the reason for her resignation."
"Paris and Prince are both adults now, but Catherine said, because the blanket has reached puberty... TJ can handle custody on its own. "
"In 2012, Catherine and TJ Jackson were appointed co guardians of Michael's three children."
"According to Catherine's submission... She no longer needs to be a guardian of a 15-year-old
"When it comes to Michael Jackson's youngest child blanket, Katherine Jackson will quit the guardian business."



Number  476
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It wasn’t very hard because he loved whatever I brought to him.””
“Next.’ That can sound a little abrupt, so I had to retool my attitude a bit.”
“The two, who had been together as a couple for seven years, had been spending quite a bit of time apart in recent months, with Theroux often spotted in New York City away from their Los Angeles home, People reported.”
“The couple issued a statement through Aniston’s longtime publicist, saying that the decision to separate “was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year,” Page Six reported.”
“The couple also said they were making the announcement publicly, “in an effort to reduce any further speculation.”“Normally we would do this privately, but given that the gossip industry cannot resist an opportunity to speculate and invent, we wanted to convey the truth directly,” the statement read.”
““Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else’s fictional narrative.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”The “Friends” star, 49, and Theroux, 46, a screenwriter and actor lauded for his performance in HBO’s “The Leftovers,” were engaged in August of 2012.”
“They married in August 2015 in an intimate but star-studded in the garden of their $21 million minimalist estate in Bel-Air.”
“Jimmy Kimmel officiated, according to Harpers Bazaar.”
“Aniston was previously married to Brad Pitt from 2000 to 2005.”


"It's not hard because he likes what I bring him."
"Next." It sounds a bit abrupt, so I have to adjust my attitude
The couple, who have been together for seven years, have been separated for quite a long time in recent months and are often seen in New York far from their home in Los Angeles, people reported
"The couple issued a statement through Aniston's long-term public relations that the decision to separate" was a joint and loving decision made by both sides at the end of last year, "page 6 reports
"The couple also said that they were making a public announcement to" try to reduce any further speculation, "the statement said
"Other printed materials about us do not come directly from us, but from other people's fictional stories."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other." The 49 year old "friends" star was engaged in August 2012 to writer and actor Cyrus, who was acclaimed for her outstanding performance in HBO's "leftover women."
"They had a close but starry wedding in August 2015 at Bel Air's $21 million minimalist manor garden."
According to Harpers bazaar, Jimmy Kimmel officiated
"Aniston married Brad Pitt from 2000 to 2005."



Number  477
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's put up with some stuff that was unfair in her life, and I'm really pleased to see her successful."”
“I like her.”
“Weeks later, Lopez reunited with ex Marc Anthony and the two wed after several months and later welcomed twins, Max and Emme, who are now 8.”
“Lopez and Anthony split in 2011.”
“That year, she started dating backup dancer Casper Smart, 28.”
“Affleck went on to date his Daredevil co-star Jennifer Garner.”
“The two wed in 2005 and had three children, Violet, 10, Seraphina, 7 and Samuel, 4.”
“The couple announced last June they planned to divorce.”
“No papers have been filed.”
“In 2014, Lopez said on the Today show her and Affleck's split was probably her "first big heartbreak."”


"She put up with some unfair things in her life, and I'm really happy to see her succeed."
"I like her."
"A few weeks later, Lopez reunited with former Mark Antony, they married a few months later, and then they had twins Max and Amy, who are now eight years old."
"Lopez and Anthony broke up in 2011."
"That year, she started dating Casper smart, a 28 year old dancer
"Affleck continues to date his expendables partner, Jennifer Garner."
They married in 2005 and have three children: Violet, 10, Serafina, 7 and Samuel, 4
"The couple announced last June that they planned to divorce."
"No documents have been submitted yet."
"In 2014, Lopez said on the today show that her breakup with Affleck may be her" first big sadness "



Number  478
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I appreciate any and every person reading this and I’m grateful for everything in my life, positive and negative.””
“I will always have love and respect for my family.”
“Icon Award fans questioned her family loyalty...”
“Paris, the 20-year-old daughter of the late Michael Jackson, address her critics on social media, telling them not to worry about her or her family’s business.”
“Dear social media followers friends stalkers lovers and haters and fellow moonwalkers Please do not tell me demands try to control how I handle my relationship with the people in my life specifically my family she wrote in an Instagram...”
“Story...”
““As amazing and as s—-y as things can be, it is no one’s business but ours.”
“I understand that some of you feel some sort of connection or need to be a part of our lives considering you watched us grow up.”
“However, I am handling my situation exactly how my father did.”
“And I am happy keeping it that way.”


"I am very grateful to everyone who read this article. I am very grateful for everything in my life, positive or negative."
"I will always love and respect my family."
"Idol fans question her loyalty to her family..."
Paris, the 20-year-old daughter of the late Michael Jackson, spoke to her critics on social media, telling them not to worry about her or her family's business
"Dear social media followers, friends, followers, lovers, haters and peers, please don't tell me that I try to control how I deal with people in my life, especially my family, she wrote in instagram..."
"Story..."
"No matter how amazing it is, how amazing it is, it's none of people's business, it's only our business."
"I know some of you feel connected or need to be part of our lives because you're watching us grow up."
"However, my situation is exactly what my father did."
"I'm happy to keep it that way."



Number  479
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Well, despite earlier reports to the contrary, it seems that Angelina Jolie did not take her kids to see Tomb Raider, as they saw Love, Simon instead.”
“Many people still identify Angelina Jolie with the role, so you might think that she would want to check out the reboot starring Alicia Vikander, which debuted in theaters last weekend.”
“The actress starred as Lara Croft in two films that still stand as some of the few decent video game movies.”
“The Oscar-winning actress really became a big name thanks to her starring role in the video game adaptation, Lara Croft: Tomb Raider.”
“Although she is a household name now and the perpetual focus of celebrity coverage, there was a time when Angelina Jolie's star was much dimmer.”


"Well, despite earlier reports to the contrary, Angelina Jolie didn't seem to take her children to the Tomb Raider because they saw love, but Simon."
"A lot of people still think Angelina Jolie is the spokesperson for the role, so you might think she would want to see" restart, "starring Alicia wickander, which premiered in theaters last weekend
"The actress played Laura Croft in two films, which are still one of the few decent video game films."
"Because of her starring role in the video game Laura Croft adapted from tomb raider, the Oscar winner has really become a big shot."
"Although she is now a household name and has always been the focus of celebrity coverage, there was a time when Angelina Jolie's star image was much dimmer."



Number  480
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rob Threatens To Take Away Dream[Featured Image by Frazer Harrison/Getty Images]”
““Women, stand up for our rights!”As the Inquisitr previously reported, on Wednesday, Rob Kardashian went on a rampage against the mother of his child on Instagram and Twitter.”
“I represent Blac Chyna.”
“As Gossip Cop reported, one of Chyna’s other attorneys, Walter Mosley, made a statement on her behalf soon after Kardashian’s tantrum cooled down.”
“In response, Chyna posted a now deleted Snapchat where she accused Rob of abusing her physically.”
“Rob’s Instagram account was eventually suspended because of his posts, but then he continued his tirade on Twitter.”
“He also shared nude pictures of her and revealed that he had paid for her weight loss surgery after her pregnancy.”
“His social media posts blasted Chyna for allegedly cheating on him in his bed.”
““My take: what Rob Kardashian did to Blac Chyna could be ‘revenge porn,’ and illegal,” she wrote.”
“More to come — Lisa Bloom (@LisaBloom) July 7, 2017My take: what Rob Kardashian did to Blac Chyna could be ‘revenge porn,’ and illegal.”


"Rob threatens to take away the dream (close up by Fraser Harrison / Getty pictures)"
"Women, defend our rights! "As prosecutors previously reported, rob Kardashian was furious with his child's mother on instagram and twitter on Wednesday."
"I represent Blake chener."
Shortly after Kardashian's anger subsided, another lawyer for Gina, Walter Mosley, made a statement on her behalf, gossip police reported
"In response, Zina released a now deleted snapchat, accusing rob of abusing her."
"Rob's instagram account was eventually suspended because of his post, but then he continued to make long comments on twitter."
"He also shared her nude photos and revealed that he paid for her weight-loss surgery after she became pregnant."
"His social media post attacked ziner for being suspected of cheating him in bed."
"My view is that what rob Kardashian did to Blake chener may have been 'revenge porn' and illegal," she wrote
"More information - Lisa bloom July 7, 2017 my opinion: what rob Kardashian did to Blake chener may be 'vengeful porn' and illegal."



Number  481
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I feel like I want kids before I’m 30.””
“I feel like seeing you guys go through everything, it’s great knowledge,” the lip kit queen said during a February 2016 episode of Kocktails With Khloé.”
““I want kids for sure.”
“It’s like a really big step.”For her part, Kylie has always wanted to have kids sooner than later.”
“But now knowing I’m not on birth control is just like — it’s scary.”
“We could start at one and we could grow from there.”
““[Tristan] wants to have five or six kids with me and that’s lovely.”
““Tristan and I definitely talk about starting a family,” Khloé said on the last season of KUWTK.”
“However, it seems that both reality stars are looking forward to first-time motherhood.”
“Though both Keeping Up With the Kardashians beauties have buns in the oven, neither have confirmed the exciting baby news themselves.”


"I feel like I want to have children before I'm 30."
"I want to see that you have gone through all kinds of things, this is great knowledge," said the queen of lipstick, a February 2016 episode of Kocktails and Khlo.
"Of course I want children."
"It's like a big step." Kelly has always wanted to have a baby early
"But now knowing I didn't have birth control is like - it's terrible."
"We can start from the beginning and grow from there."
"(Tristan) it's lovely to want to have five or six children with me."
"Tristan and I are definitely talking about forming a family," said Heroe at Kuyt last season
"However, both reality TV stars seem to be looking forward to being a mother for the first time."
"Although both of the men who followed Kardashian's steps had bread in the oven, they didn't confirm the exciting baby news themselves."



Number  482
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“At least she collaborated with DJ Khaled on 2017’s “Wild Thoughts,” but that just left us wanting more!”
“Her last studio release was Jan. of 2016’s Anti and fans have been dying for a new album.”
“She recently revealed that she FINALLY back in the studio again and hinted that she might have new music for fans before Christmas time.”
“Ri is one busy lady, with her cosmetics line Fenty Beauty, her lingerie line Savage and there’s that main gig as a singing sensation that she’s had on the back burner for several years.”
“So it looks like, for now at least, they’ll have to continue trying to fit each other in as and when they have a break in their schedules,” our source adds.”
“Conversely, Hassan isn’t about to cut back on his work commitments so he can fit in with Rihanna’s life.”
““Rihanna really is crazy about Hassan, but it’s hard to see how they can make their relationship work long term unless she is willing to scale back on her career, which isn’t likely to happen.”
“When they are together everything is amazing, but as they have such busy schedules they’re forced to be apart a lot, and that’s when the problems start, as they both have trust issues,” our insider continues.”
““Both Rihanna and Hassan suffer from a jealous streak, and as they lead very independent lives it can cause problems between them a lot.”
“They have a very strong physical connection, and when they fight it can get pretty heated, but then they have crazy good make-up sex and everything is great between them, until they fight again,” a source close to the 30-year-old superstar tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"At least she worked with DJ Khalid on fantasy in 2017, but it made us want more!"
"Her last studio release was anti in January 2016, and fans are eager for a new album."
"She recently revealed that she has finally returned to the studio and hinted that she might be preparing new music for her fans before Christmas."
"Li Jiaxin is a busy lady, her cosmetics series is Fenty beauty, underwear series is savage, and that major concert is a sensation that she has been in a secondary position for several years."
Our source added: "so, for now at least, they have to continue their efforts to adapt to each other's schedules."
"On the contrary, Hassan will not cut back on his work in order to adapt to Rihanna's life."
"Rihanna really likes Hassan, but it's hard to see how they can make their relationship work for a long time, unless she's willing to downsize her career, which is unlikely to happen."
"When they are together, everything is amazing, but because they have such a busy schedule, they are forced to separate a lot, and the problem begins because they all have trust problems," our insider continued
"Rihanna and Hassan have a tendency to be jealous. Because they live very independently, it will bring a lot of problems between them."
A source close to the 30-year-old superstar told reporters: "they have a very strong physical connection. When they quarrel, they will become very fierce, but then they will have crazy make-up sex. Everything between them is very good until they quarrel again." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  483
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her friends have lately expressed their concern regarding these two getting back together.”
“He was recently spotted leaving her apartment building.”
“Did he remember his romance with Selena Gomez?”
“‘I know this is like a long distance relationship here,’ The Weeknd told his fans while performing in Sydney, Australia.”
“Love this side of the world ??”
“??”
“A post shared by The Weeknd theweeknd on Dec 3 2017 at 5 31am PST Daily Mail reported this and it seems that the singer continued and stated that But I feel like I ll come to Sydney every year at least once He was probably referring to the fact...”
“...that he is not able to come to Australia and sing just as much as he would want to...”
“On the other hand, let’s not forget that The Weeknd aka Abel Tesfaye just came out of a long distance relationship with Selena.”
“These two dated for about ten months but according to sources, the main thing that led to their breakup is the long distance that was between them most of the time.”


"Her friends recently expressed their concerns about the two people's reunion."
"He was recently discovered to have left her apartment."
"Does he remember his relationship with Selena Gomez?"
"I know it's like a long-distance relationship," he told his fans during a performance in Sydney, Australia, this weekend
"Love this side of the world?"
“??”
"At 5:31 a.m. on December 3, 2017, an article in the PST Daily Mail reported this. It seems that the singer continues to say, but I think I will come to Sydney at least once a year. He may be referring to the fact that..."
“… He can't come to Australia to sing. He can sing as much as he wants. "
"On the other hand, let's not forget that this week, also known as Abel tesfield, just walked out of a long-distance relationship with Selena."
"The two dated for about 10 months, but according to the source, the main reason for their breakup was the long distance between them most of the time."



Number  484
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“...couple...”
“Getty Images And while the same source said that Koko is happy in their relationship a separate insider told Us Weekly that their romance is on shaky ground rn and that the pair are finding it difficult to leave the cheating ordeal in the past and move forwards as a...”
“She knows they don't approve and its extremely uncomfortable to bring anything up."”
“: “Khloe just avoids talking about him and doesn't bring him up.”
“You've been patient long enough.”It’s no secret that the Kardashian-Jenner gang aren’t exactly Tristan’s number one fans, with an insider telling E!”
“You've had enough lessons.”
“InstagramJust yesterday, Khloe shared a cryptic passage on Instagram that implied fate will reward her for how she’s handled the past few months: “Something you've been praying for is about to happen for you.”
“Love KoKo and True,” the message reads.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
“… Couple... "
"Getty Images and the same source said that Koko was happy in their relationship, but another person familiar with the matter told us weekly that their relationship was unstable and they found it difficult to get rid of the past torture of cheating as a..."
"She knows they don't approve of it and it's very uncomfortable for her to mention anything."
Khloe just avoided talking about him, not mentioning him. “
"You have enough patience." It's no secret that the Kardashian Jenner Gang is not Tristan's number one fan, an insider told me! "
"You've had enough lessons."
Yesterday, Khloe shared a mysterious message on instagram, suggesting that fate would reward her for the way she has handled the past few months: "what you have been praying for is about to happen."
"Love Koko and truth," the message reads



Number  485
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Beautiful but I’m going with a babe that starts with a T — Khloé (@khloekardashian) March 19, 2018HollywoodLife has reached out to Khloe and Tristan’s reps for comment.”
““She and Mindy are already going over mood boards and talking about Khloe’s vision,” the source added, noting that there will likely be “about 150 people” invited to her nuptials.”
“A new report says she’s already started ‘going over mood boards’ for a wildly expensive celebration!”
“Khloe Kardashian, 33, isn’t even engaged to her boyfriend Tristan Thompson, 27, but they’ve started planning their wedding, according to a new report.”
““Khloe is ready to go all-out,” a source told InTouch about the extravagant ceremony that will be at a “private estate in Bel Air” during the summer of 2019.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star is apparently not sparing any expense for her future nuptials.”
““The whole thing will cost about $2 million,” the insider said.”
“Khloe has also enlisted the help of her baby shower planner Mindy Weiss to help figure out all the wedding details.”
“She’s even considered what she wants to wear on the special day.”
“On March 19, she even said that she wants her daughter’s name to start with a “T.” While she hasn’t spoken publicly about a future wedding, we’re sure that if the time comes to say “I do,” she’ll let her fans know!”


"It's beautiful, but I'm going to be with a baby that starts with t-khlo é (@ KhloeKardashian). On March 19, 2018, Hollywood has contacted representatives of Khloe and Tristan for comments. "
"She and Mindy are already discussing the mood board and Khloe's vision," the source added, noting that "about 150 people" are likely to be invited to her wedding
A new report says she has started "checking the mood board" for an extremely expensive celebration
Carol Kardashian, 33, is not even engaged to her boyfriend Tristan Thompson, 27, but they are already planning their wedding, according to a new report
"Khloe is ready to go all out," a source told touch, adding that a grand ceremony will be held in the summer of 2019 at "Bel Air's private estate."
"Keeping up with Kardashian's star pace obviously doesn't save any money for her future wedding."
"The whole thing is going to cost about $2 million," the person familiar with the matter said
"Khloe also got help from her baby shower planner, Mindy Weiss, to help her figure out all the details of the wedding."
"She even thought about what she wanted to wear on this special day."
"On March 19, she even said that she would like her daughter's name to start with" t ". Although she has not publicly talked about the future wedding, we believe that if she says" I do ", she will let her fans know!"



Number  486
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Rich Polk/Getty Images]”
“Gossip Cop, however, claims this is nothing more than a “ridiculous tabloid report” and describes the rumor as “nonsense.” The inside source the tabloids claim to have received this information was quoted saying Stewart will “go weeks” without washing her hair.”
“Unfortunately, the actress has recently been slammed by tabloids for her poor hygiene and her putrid body odor.”
“Is there any truth to this latest celebrity slam?”
“A quick search of Google will reveal a story by Hollywood Life from seven years ago which claims part of the reason why Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart made such a great couple is because they both had poor hygiene and rank body odor.”
“Digging a little deeper into the sources used for the story, however, you will find a second story which claims that while Kristen’s ex Robert looks a little rough around the edges at time – he doesn’t have a funky smell.”
“In fact, the sources in the story claiming Robert and Kristen smell bad note Pattinson wasn’t too pleased with the circulating rumor that he had a body odor problem.”
“So, is what tabloids are saying about Kristen Stewart true?”
“Does she stink?”
“Gossip Cop caught wind of the story roughly three hours after tabloids began to slam the Twilight actress for her putrid body odor.”


"[rich Polk / Getty Images selected pictures]"
However, the gossip police claimed that it was just a "ridiculous tabloid report" and described the rumor as "nonsense". An internal source who claimed to have received the news was quoted as saying Stewart would not wash his hair "for a few weeks."
"Unfortunately, the actress has recently been attacked by tabloids for her poor hygiene and bad smell."
"What's the truth about the recent celebrity grand slam?"
"A quick Google search reveals a story about Hollywood life seven years ago, which claims that Robert Pattinson and Kristen Stewart are such a great couple partly because of their poor hygiene and bad smell."
"However, if you dig deeper into the source of this story, you will find that the second story says that although Christine's former Robert looked a little rough at that time, he didn't have a strange smell."
"In fact, the source who claimed Robert and Christine smelled bad in the report said Pattinson was not very satisfied with the rumor that he had body odor problems."
"So is the tabloid's comment on Kristen Stewart true?"
"Does she stink?"
"Gossip police started attacking the Twilight star's stink in the tabloids and learned about it about three hours later."



Number  487
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple has reportedly been spotted house hunting near New York's Central Park and the Brentwood area of Los Angeles where he and Garner shared a home.”
“But the magazine has pointed out that has been seen wearing a diamond ring on her right hand and this could be an engagement ring.”
“This comes after his rep denied to DailyMail.com that he was engaged to Lindsay Shookus.”
“On Wednesday Life & Style claimed the couple, who have been dating for six months, are making plans to walk down the aisle.”
“'He's fallen hard,' an insider told the publication.”
“'It's no surprise that they're now taking their relationship to the next level.'”
“Scroll down for video New York state of mind Ben Affleck arrived into the Big Apple on Saturday Not Lindsay The Justice League actor was spotted with an unidentified woman at the airport but it is believed he is in town to see his rumored fiance Shookus a TV producer...”
“...for Saturday Night Live has yet to be seen with an engagement ring on her wedding finger...”
“Even though he was accompanied by an unidentified woman, he is more than likely in town to see his lady love, 37, who lives in the metropolitan city.”
“He knows Lindsay is "the one," and the feeling is mutual.'”


"It's reported that the couple were found looking for a house near New York's Central Park and Los Angeles' Brentwood area, where he and Ghana live together."
"But the magazine pointed out that she was seen with a diamond ring on her right hand, which could be an engagement ring."
"It's after his representative denied that he was engaged to Lindsay schokus in the daily mail."
"The couple, who have been dating for six months, are planning to get married," life & style magazine said on Wednesday
"He had a terrible fall," an insider told the magazine
"It's no surprise that they're taking the relationship to a new level now."
"Rolling down the state of mind video of New York State Ben Affleck arriving at big apple on Saturday, not Lindsay Justice League actor was found at the airport with an unidentified woman, but it is believed that he was in town to see his fiance shaukus, a TV producer..."
“… I haven't seen her with an engagement ring on her finger when she got married on live broadcast on Saturday night. "
"Although he is accompanied by an unidentified woman, he is likely to meet his 37 year old lover in the city, who lives in metropolis."
"He knew Lindsay was the only one, and the feeling was mutual."



Number  488
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He loves kids, and would be happy to have more–especially with Jen.” Pitt already has six children with his ex-wife Angelina Jolie.”
““Jen didn’t have to ask Brad twice,” the insider adds.”
“...the final months of her marriage and decided she wanted him to be her sperm donor...”
“She wants her baby daddy to be the perfect man and in her mind that s Brad She wants her child to be just like Brad in not just looks but also the personality and charm that won her over 20 years ago Aniston allegedly leaned heavily on Pitt in...”
““Jen never felt completely comfortable with Justin being the father to her children,” a source says.”
“Radar Online is claiming that Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux separated because she kept stalling their plans to have children.”


"He loves children and is happy to have more children, especially Hezhen." Pete has six children with his ex-wife Angelina Jolie
"Jane doesn't have to ask Brad twice," the person familiar with the matter added
“… In the last few months of her marriage, she decided to make him her sperm donor... "
"She wants her baby dad to be a perfect man, Brad in her mind. She wants her children not only in appearance, but also in personality and charm, just like Brad. It is said that more than 20 years ago, Aniston was in "We are heavily dependent on Pete."
"Jen never felt comfortable that Justin was the father of her children," a source said
"Radar online claims that Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus are separated because she has been delaying their plans to have children."



Number  489
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Blake.””
““You guys are very lucky that [she’s here],” Blake told the very excited crowd as he spoke about Gwen.”
“Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are taking aim at the constant tabloid rumors claiming that they’re having children.”
“The country star poked fun at the seemingly never-ending speculation that Gwen may be pregnant with the couple’s child (or children) during a recent performance in Oklahoma, where he joked that his girlfriend of over two years had just given birth to twins.”
“Shelton made the joke about his girlfriend – who has three children with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale – while introducing her on stage to perform with him during a recent concert in his home state last week.”
“A video captured by concert goers, and obtained by PopCulture.com this week, shows the two teaming up to perform their 2016 duet “Go Ahead And Break My Heart” as they both stopped by Shelton’s restaurant and events space Ole Red in Tishomingo, Oklahoma, last week.”
“After Blake took the stage to perform a few of his hits, the crowd could then be heard chanting “Gwen!”
“Gwen!”
“Gwen!” as they encouraged the No Doubt singer to join her man on stage.”
“That’s when Blake invited Stefani to join him as he performed for fans, introducing her by joking to the crowd that they were all “lucky” to have her perform because she’d only just given birth to their twins the day before.”


"Black."
"You're lucky (she's here)," Blake told the excited audience of Gwen
"Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are targeting the constant tabloid rumors that they have children."
"At a recent show in Oklahoma, the country star joked about the seemingly endless speculation that Gwen might be pregnant with the couple's children. He joked that his girlfriend of more than two years had just given birth to twins."
"When Sheldon introduced his girlfriend to a concert in his hometown last week, he made a joke about her - she has three children with her ex husband Gavin Rossdale."
This week, the two performed the duet "go, break my heart" in 2016. They both stopped at Sheldon restaurant and activity space ole red in tishomigo, Oklahoma last week
After Blake performed some popular songs on stage, the audience could hear "Gwen!"
"Gwen
"Gwen! "When they encourage this unquestionable singer to join her male singer's stage."
"At that time, Blake invited Stefani to join him in his performance for his fans. When he introduced Stefani to the audience, Blake joked that they were" lucky "to have her perform because she had just given birth to their twins the day before."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Reps for Shayk and Cooper did not respond to requests for commentWe pay for juicy info!”
“Now, the wait is over and they are reportedly proud parents!”
“Shayk covered up her baby bump at the Victoria’s Secret Fashion Show, and as Radar reported, adjusted her diet and fitness routine for her pregnancy.”
““Bradley has never looked so miserable,” a source told Radar about witnessing the way the Silver Linings Playbook star acted around his model fiancée.”
“According to Radar sources, Cooper and Shayk secretly got engaged, but before the birth, the couple’s relationship had hit a low point.”
“Cooper, 42 and Shayk, 31, welcomed their child after about two years of dating.”
“So far, the sex of the baby hasn’t been divulged.”
“Incredibly, the birth took place two weeks ago and the secretive duo’s happy news hadn’t leaked out until now, the publication reported on Sunday.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"The representatives of Shayk and Cooper didn't reply to the request for comment. We pay for interesting information!"
"Now, the wait is over, they are said to be proud parents!"
Shaq covered up her small lump at Victoria's Secret Fashion Show and adjusted her diet and fitness plans for pregnancy, according to radar
"Bradley has never been so miserable as he is now," a source told radar magazine, witnessing the promising drama star's behavior around the model's fiancee
"According to radar sources, Cooper and Shayk were secretly engaged, but before they were born, the couple's relationship was at a low ebb."
Cooper, 42, and Shayk, 31, had their baby after two years of dating
"So far, the gender of the child has not been revealed."
"It's incredible that the good news about this mysterious combination was born two weeks ago, and it's only now that it's leaked," the magazine reported on Sunday



Number  491
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“The Insane Demands Kim Kardashian Gave Her Surrogate The contract states she was allowed 'no more than 6 ounces' of tuna per week.”
“Being pregnant is no easy task – especially if it’s Kim Kardashian West‘s baby you’re carrying.”
“Radar exclusively viewed the contract signed by Kardashian’s surrogate – and it reveals an entire list of insanely bizarre demands Kardashian put in place that governed what the carrier of her baby could and could not do, wear and eat!”
“As Radar exclusively reported, Kim and her “Famous” rapper husband Kanye West paid their surrogate a mere $68K for carrying and delivering their baby girl.”
“On her app on Friday, Kardashian revealed her baby girl’s name is Chicago West, sending fans into a social media frenzy over the wacky name.”
“The agreement, signed by the surrogate and her husband in March 2017, included a long list of foods the surrogate had to refrain from eating.”
“And hopefully the surrogate isn’t a lover of cheese!”
“According to the contract the surrogate agreed to refrain from consuming at any time mold ripened soft cheese including but not limited to brie camembert chevre blue cheese and gorgonzola The surrogate s new Kardashian inspired diet also meant raw or partially cooked eggs raw or undercooked meat cold deli...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Kim Kardashian's crazy demand for surrogate mothers, according to the contract, can only eat 'no more than 6 ounces' of tuna a week."
"It's not easy to get pregnant - especially if you're pregnant with Kim Kardashian West's baby."
"Radar looked exclusively at the contract signed by Kardashian's surrogate mother - it revealed Kardashian's crazy set of strange demands that determine what her child carrier can and cannot do, what to wear and what to eat!"
According to the exclusive report of radar, Kim and her "famous" rapper husband Kanye West paid only $68000 for their surrogate mother because they conceived and gave birth to a baby girl
"On Friday, Kardashian revealed on her app that her baby girl's name was West Chicago, which led fans into a social media frenzy about this strange name."
"This agreement, signed by the surrogate mother and her husband in March 2017, includes a long list of foods that surrogate mothers are not allowed to eat."
"I hope surrogate mothers are not cheese lovers!"
"According to the contract, the surrogate mother agrees not to eat moldy and ripe soft cheese at any time, including but not limited to briar Carmen Belcher blue cheese and gorgonzola. The surrogate mother's new Kardashian diet also means raw or partially cooked eggs, raw or undercooked meat, and cold cooked food..."



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s time for her to move on.””
“It’s no exaggeration to say that Ben broke her heart and left her in a terrible place emotionally, [but] it’s been almost three years since they called it quits.”
“He has reportedly been ‘begging’ her to take him back, but we’ve got an EXCLUSIVE scoop on if he’s really looking to reunite!”
“Ben Affleck, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, broke the hearts of fans everywhere when they split in 2015.”
“Despite some hoping they’d work it out, the two filed for divorce in April 2017.”
“Supposedly Ben wasn t ready to let go as Us Weekly reports that since they filed the papers he s begged her to come back several times but she has no interest Though Ben has moved on to date Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus 37 he was reportedly at...”
“...one point telling friends he wanted his ex back...”
“Despite two years of trying to fix things – Jennifer “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and so desperately wanted to turn things around for the children’s sake, as well as theirs,” a fiend told Us – it was all in vain.”
“Supposedly, there was a hopeful moment in 2017.”
“After Jennifer reportedly helped Ben during his stint in rehab for alcohol abuse, a source claims he said, “He didn’t want to live without her.”


"It's time for her to go."
"It's no exaggeration to say that Ben broke her heart and put her in a terrible emotional situation, (but) it's almost three years since they announced their breakup."
"It is reported that he has been 'begging' her to take him back, but we have an exclusive report on whether he really wants to reunite!"
"When Ben Affleck, 45, and Jennifer Garner, 45, broke up in 2015, it broke the hearts of fans everywhere."
"Although some people hoped to solve the problem, they filed for divorce in April 2017."
"According to us weekly, Ben was not ready to let go because they submitted documents and he begged her to come back several times, but she was not interested. Although Ben had already started dating Lindsay shokus, producer of live on Saturday night, it was reported that he was..."
“… One thing is to tell a friend that he wants his ex back... "
"Although it took two years to try to solve the problem - Jennifer" devoted herself to solving the relationship, for the sake of the children, and for them, she wanted to turn the situation around very much, "a demon told us - it was all in vain."
"It should be said that 2017 has a moment of hope."
According to reports, Jennifer helped Ben when he was sent to rehab for drinking too much. It is said that he said, "he doesn't want to be without her."



Number  493
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Molly Given is a writer living in Philadelphia and lover of all things to do with mystery and magic in life.”
“Jonathan also responded on Twitter, “#TabloidsNeedBetterSources.” The brothers have not commented on the recent reports of fighting but we'll see if they chime in anytime soon and update this post with any new developments.”
“They're extremely competitive with each other.”
“2.”
“Ouch.”
“Johnathan has gotten very heated over this issue and threatened to not attend his brother's wedding if his ex is still on the guest list.”
“...of Kuznetsov in the breakup and is more sympathetic to her...”
“Jonathan is going through a rough time right now and feels left in the shadow of Drew As a result it s causing a rift between the two and things have gotten so bad they ve stopped talking at times The source also hinted that Drew has taken the side...”
“Johnathan's heartbreak has served as a divide between the brothers, according to a source.”
“Johnathan, on the other hand, just went through a bad breakup with longtime girlfriend Jacinta Kuznetsov.”


"Molly given is a writer who lives in Philadelphia and loves everything about mystery and magic in life."
Jonathan also tweeted: "the tabloid nedbettersources said," the brothers haven't commented on recent reports about the fighting, but we'll see if they'll cut in soon and update this article to see if there's any new developments. "
"The competition between them is very fierce."
“2.”
"Ouch."
"John Nathan became very heated on this issue and threatened that if his ex boyfriend was still on the guest list, he would not attend his brother's wedding."
“… I feel more sympathy for Kuznetsov when she breaks up... "
"Jonathan is going through a difficult period now, feeling that he is shrouded in the shadow of drew. As a result, there is a rift between them. Things have become so bad that they stop talking, and sometimes the source suggests that drew is on the side..."
"According to a source, John Nathan's heartbreak has become a difference between the two brothers."
"On the other hand, John Nathan has just had a bad break-up with his long-time girlfriend yasinta Kuznetsov."



Number  494
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Who knows, but it looks like they're pretty happy right now and that's all that matters.”
“Could this be the real deal for Rih and Jameel?”
“After Drake and Rihanna played with fans' heart strings with their on-off romance, they just want her to be with someone who really makes her happy.”
“And some new photos of Rihanna and a mystery man in a pool seemed to hint that she was pretty happy.”
“The Daily Mail posted photos of Rihanna making out with a man in a pool in Spain on Tuesday, and according TMZ, the mystery of who this guy is may now be solved.”
“TMZ reports that Rihanna's pool man is Hassan Jameel, and he happens to be worth a lot of money.”
“Rih's fans are ecstatic to see her frolicking, laughing, and making out with a very good-looking man while on vacation.”
“In addition to the pool photos, the two have now been spotted smiling while walking around in Ibiza.”
“A source told The Sun about Jameel and Rihanna,“They’ve been spending a lot of time together away from prying eyes and are really serious.”
“They’re really enjoying each others’ company.”That sounds like a pretty ideal situation, and quite frankly, Rihanna deserves it.”


"Who knows, but it seems that they are happy now, that's the most important thing."
"Is this the real deal between Ryan and Jamie?"
"After Drake and Rihanna play with fans' heartstrings in their off and on relationship, they just want her to be with someone who really makes her happy."
"Some new photos of Rihanna in the pool with a mysterious man seem to suggest she's happy."
The daily mail published photos of Rihanna making out with a man in a Spanish swimming pool on Tuesday, and TMZ reported that the mystery of who the man is may now be solved
"TMZ reports that Rihanna's pool man is Hassan Jamil, who is worth a lot of money."
"RIH's fans were overjoyed to see her playing, laughing and making out with a very beautiful man on holiday."
"In addition to the photos of the swimming pool, it is now found that the two are walking in Ibiza with a smile on their face."
A source told the sun about Jamil and Rihanna. "They've been together for a long time, away from prying eyes. They're really serious."
"They really enjoy each other's company." It sounds like an ideal situation, and frankly, Rihanna deserves it



Number  495
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But he’s come to learn that Live is really Kelly’s show.” The next few months should be very interesting!”
““Ryan thought the gig would very much be a joint co-hosting effort with Kelly.”
“...feels he s not getting the most out of his Live With Kelly and Ryan experience...”
“Kelly really thought Live would be Ryan s focus MORE Kelly Ripa Is Faced With Low Ratings After Adding Ryan Seacrest as Her Live Co Host And while the back and forth may seem doable to Ryan now he could potentially get tired of being so busy especially since he...”
““Kelly is truly pissed that, after all the time ABC spent negotiating with Ryan for Live, they would then buy the show that made him a household name, and take him away,” another source told Life & Style.”
“But, Kelly isn’t too happy about his complex schedule.”
“Although he’s attended the nationwide auditions in the past, he won’t be doing that for the revival to avoid conflicting with his Live With Kelly and Ryan role too much.”
“It’s been said that he will host Idol in LA on Sunday nights and then quickly jet back to NYC to be there for Live With Kelly and Ryan for Monday through Friday.”
“MORE: Michael Strahan Reveals How He Really Feels About Ryan Seacrest as Kelly Ripa’s New ‘Live’ Co-HostKelly is scared she’s going to experience déjà vu again with Ryan this time, however, according to multiple reports, Ryan will balance both of the gigs just fine.”
“She was devastated and even took a few days off from work to cope.”


"But he came to realize that live is really Kelly's show," and the next few months should be very interesting! "
"Ryan thinks the concert is likely to be co hosted with Kelly."
“… I don't think his life experience with Kelly and Ryan has been paid the most back... "
"Kelly really thinks that the scene will be the focus of Ryan. After facing low ratings, Kelly Ripa joined Ryan Seacrest as her live co host. Although it seems feasible to go back and forth, Ryan may be tired of being so busy now, especially because of him..."
Another source told life and fashion: "Kelly is really angry that after ABC has spent so much time negotiating live with Ryan, they will buy the show that makes him a household name and take him away."
"But Kelly is not satisfied with his complicated schedule."
"Although he has participated in nationwide auditions in the past, in order to avoid too many conflicts with Kelly and Ryan's live roles, he will not participate in the comeback."
"It's said that he will host idol in Los Angeles on Sunday night, then fly back to New York soon and live with Kelly and Ryan from Monday to Friday."
"More: Michael Strahan revealed his true feelings about Ryan Seacrest because Kelly Ripa's new" live "partner, Kelly, was afraid that she would experience deja vu with Ryan again this time. However, according to many reports, Ryan would balance the two concerts well."
"She was so sad that she even took a few days off to deal with it."



Number  496
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He said: "It’s hit me smack in the face with our divorce: I gotta be more.”
“...replied Yeah before adding that it has made him want to be a better father...”
“...my family...”
“In his first interview since the separation Pitt told GQ Style he was a professional drinker saying I can t remember a day since I got out of college when I wasn t boozing or had a spliff or something I mean I stopped everything except boozing when I started...”
“The Hollywood star also said he slept on the floor of a friend’s house for six weeks after his wife filed for divorce, because he could not bear to be in their family home.”
“(Photo by Jason Merritt/Getty Images)Meanwhile, Pitt admitted earlier this year that he was “boozing too much” in the months before his split from Angelina Jolie, and has turned to therapy to help him through.”
“(Photo by Jason Merritt/Getty Images) / FacebookTwitterEmailWhatsapp Actor Brad Pitt (L) and actress Angelina Jolie arrive at the 84th Annual Academy Awards held at the Hollywood & Highland Center on February 26, 2012 in Hollywood, California.”
“Expand Close Actor Brad Pitt (L) and actress Angelina Jolie arrive at the 84th Annual Academy Awards held at the Hollywood & Highland Center on February 26, 2012 in Hollywood, California.”
“Aniston wed actor and screenwriter Justin Theroux in 2015.”
“He also made amends for leaving her for Angelina," the source said.”


"Our divorce surprised me: I had to do more," he said
“… Yes, and then add that it makes him want to be a better father... "
“… My family... "
"In his first interview with GQ style, Pete said that he was a professional drunkard. He said that I don't remember one day after graduating from university when I didn't drink, vomit or anything. I mean, I stopped everything except drinking..."
The Hollywood star also said that after his wife filed for divorce, he slept on the floor of his friends' house for six weeks because he couldn't bear to stay in their house
(Jason Merritt / Getty pictures) meanwhile, Pitt admitted earlier this year that he had "drunk too much" in the months before breaking up with Angelina Jolie and had turned to treatment to help him through
On February 26, 2012, the 84th Academy Awards ceremony was held in Hollywood Highland Center, California
"Actor Brad Pitt (left) and actress Angelina Jolie appear at the 84th Academy Awards ceremony at Hollywood Highland Center, California, on February 26, 2012."
"Aniston married actor and screenwriter Justin Cyrus in 2015."
"He also made up for leaving her to Angelina," the source said



Number  497
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I was never a secret.””
“They were separated living in separate homes.”
“And recently, I didn’t.”
““And because of that I should make smart decisions.”
“Image zoom Eniko Parrish | Credit: Instagram“I’m at a place in my life where I feel like I have a target on my back,” Hart, 38, said in the clip.”
“Hart Apologized for His ‘Mistakes’ in an Emotional VideoBefore news of the alleged extortion broke, Hart shared an Instagram video in which he revealed that a person was trying to make “financial gain” off of his past misbehavior and apologized to his family.”
“The person also claimed to have seen Hart partying in Las Vegas last month, and accused the actor of cheating on Parrish with several women.”
“The alleged extortionist reportedly told TMZ that he or she was trying to get money and expose Hart for cheating.”
“Officials have reportedly identified the woman in the alleged footage, and believe she or someone else attempted to blackmail the star.”
“...with a woman at a club and then in a bedroom...”


"I've never been a secret."
"They live in separate homes."
"Lately, I haven't."
"That's why I should have made a wise decision."
Image zooming Eniko Parrish | image source: instagram Hart, 38, said in the clip: "I live in a place and feel like I have a goal on my back."
"Hart apologized for his" mistake "in an emotional video. Before the news of alleged extortion came out, Hart shared an instagram video in which he revealed that a person tried to gain" economic benefits "through his past misconduct and apologized to his family."
The man also claimed to have seen Hart partying in Las Vegas last month and accused him and several women of cheating on Parrish
"It is reported that the alleged blackmailer told TMZ that he or she was trying to get the money and exposed Hart's cheating."
"It is reported that officials have confirmed the identity of the woman in the so-called video and believe that she or others are trying to blackmail the star."
“… In the club with a woman and then in the bedroom... "



Number  498
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hart has been making the media rounds recently promoting her book, "Melissa Explains It All: Tales From My Abnormally Normal Life."”
“Just by saying I was voting."”
“Fox News spoke with the former child star this week and broached the subject of her political stance.”
“The interview recounted the time Hart said her "Sabrina the Teenage Witch" costars were shocked to learn she voted for Bob Dole over Bill Clinton during the 1996 presidential election.”
“"Yeah there were some jaws dropping on the set that day," Hart, who was 20 at the time of that election, told Fox in an interview published Tuesday.”
“"These days I find more [Republicans] in Hollywood and I love having a healthy debate with anyone.”
“Nobody's one way or the other.”
“I feel that unfortunately in this country there are only two parties.”
“I wish there were more because nobody fits into one or the other."”
“When asked how things have changed politically in the industry during the last 20 years, Hart responded: "There's definitely been some fellowship, which is nice.”


"Hart has been promoting her book in the media recently," Melissa explained. "It's all: the story of my extraordinary normal life."
"It's just that I'm voting."
"Fox News interviewed the former child star this week and talked about her political stance."
In the interview, Hart said that in the 1996 presidential election, she voted for Bob Dole instead of Bill Clinton, which shocked her star Sabrina the young witch
"Yeah, there was a big surprise on the set that day," Hart told Fox in an interview published on Tuesday, when he was 20
"These days, I find more [Republicans] in Hollywood, and I like to have healthy debates with anyone."
"No one is this or that."
"I feel unfortunate that there are only two political parties in this country."
"I want to have more because no one can fit in."
When asked how the political situation in the industry has changed over the past 20 years, Hart replied, "there must be some partnerships, which is good."



**Something goes wrong**
“Play slideshow PA 1 of 10 The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge arrive for Prince Louis' christening...”
“Etiquette expert William Hanson told Harper’s Bazaar: “It's a very English thing to dress a young boy in shorts.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Regardless of the weather, The Duke and Duchess’ eldest son always wears shorts during public appearances.”
“According to a royal expert, young boys wear shorts as a sign of being a member of the upper class British elite.”
“Prince George, 4, is a member of the royal family and third in line to the throne, so much uphold this tradition.”


"Slide 1 of 10 The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge arrive at the baptism of Prince Louis..."
"It's a very British thing to wear shorts for a little boy," etiquette expert William Hansen told Harper market
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Whatever the weather, the Duchess' eldest son always wears shorts in public."
"According to a royal expert, young boys wearing shorts is a sign of becoming the top class in the UK."
"Four year old Prince George is a member of the royal family and the third in line to the throne, so he sticks to this tradition very much."



Number  500
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you ship this couple?”
“Scott and Sofia also traveled to Miami together in Sept. 2017.”
“A new report claims to know about two family members who are NOT happy, and when they’ll announce the news!”
“Uh, congrats?”
“— Scott Disick, 34, and Sofia Richie, 19, are reportedly engaged!”
““They’ve fallen in love,” a source tells Life & Style in the magazine’s latest issue.”
“Scott proposed during a “candlelit dinner” when he and Sofia jetted off to Italy for a romantic getaway in early Oct., as reported by the mag.”
“And, despite Scott’s admitted failed attempts at an engagement with his ex, Kourtney Kardashian, 38, and his multiple rehab stints, a source tells the mag that “he claims he’s a changed man.” The insider says “Scott is more well-behaved” when he’s with sofia.”
“And, despite the 15-year age gap, “he feels that Sofia is the only person who understands him.” Yikes.”
“However, his alleged proposal didn’t involve a ring.”


"Holly bug, you'll deliver this, right?"
"Scott and Sophia also went to Miami together in September 2017."
"A new report claims to know that two family members are unhappy. When will they announce the news?"
"Well, congratulations?"
"Scott Disick, 34, is reported to be engaged to Sophia Ritchie, 19!"
"They have fallen in love," a source told reporters in the latest issue of life and fashion magazine
Scott and Sophia proposed at a candlelight dinner in early October when they were flying to Italy for a romantic holiday, the magazine reported
Moreover, although Scott admitted that he was not engaged to his 38 year old ex girlfriend Courtney Kardashian and had received many drug treatment, a source told the magazine that "he claimed to be a different person." "Scott and Sophia are more decent together," people familiar with the matter said
"And, despite the 15-year-old gap," he felt that Sophia was the only one who understood him
"But his so-called proposal does not involve rings."



Number  501
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“3am has contacted Bieber for a comment.”
“(Image: Youtube)She said: "I was sleeping, and woke up, he was sleeping and I was speaking with a girlfriend."”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailThe girl who filmed Justin Bieber sleeping has spoken for the first time about her night with the Canadian superstar.”
“When model Tati Neves, 26, was asked if she kissed the Baby singer , she coyly answered: "What do you think, if I was sleeping in the bedroom, just me and him?"”
“That really clears it up then.”
“Before the interview on Brazilian TV the model allegedly told friends she saw Bieber smoke weed and spent the night with him.”
“On Globo TV's Fantastico she was asked if she saw a bevy of girls arrive at 3am the same night, believed to bussed in from a nearby club, she replied: "No.”
“So, I'd already gone into the bedroom with him."”
“She also claimed she had taken the video of Bieber asleep, with his beloved baseball cap nearby, the following morning after waking up first.”
“Tati, who appears naked on some adult Brazilian websites, is thought to have met Bieber in the Centaurus club in Rio which is notorious for being a brothel.”


"Bieber was contacted at 3 a.m. for advice."
"(image: YouTube) she said," I'm sleeping, I wake up, he's sleeping, I'm talking to a girlfriend. "
"Thank you for subscribing. We have more newsletters to show me our privacy statement. The girl who filmed Justin Bieber sleeping talked for the first time about her night with the Canadian superstar
When asked if she had kissed the singer, 26 year old model tatty Nevis shyly replied, "what do you think if I sleep in my bedroom, just me and him?"
"That's really clear."
"Before being interviewed on Brazilian television, the model told a friend that she saw Bieber smoking marijuana and spending the night with him."
In the fantasy co show on universal TV, she was asked if she saw a group of girls arriving at 3 a.m. on the same day, believed to have come by bus from a nearby club. She replied, "No."
"So, I've been in the bedroom with him."
"She also claimed that when she woke up the next morning, she took a video of Bieber sleeping with his beloved baseball cap nearby."
Tati appeared naked on some adult websites in Brazil. It is said that he met Bieber in Rio Centaurus club, which is notorious for brothels



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, what are your resolutions for 2018?”
“2018 is going to be all about positivity for Kim and that includes her self-talk.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how for 2018, she’s going to stop obsessing about her booty.”
“There’s little doubt that Kim Kardashian, 37, might not be the household name she is today without her infamous giant booty.”
“But with a second daughter coming into her family in 2018, she’s resolved to stop being so hyper focused on her body and not be so consumed with what the world thinks of her famous figure.”
““Kim’s vowed to give up obsessing over her butt, that’s one of her New Year’s resolutions, she’s going to totally love and accept her body exactly as it is.”
“She’s under so much pressure and scrutiny to be perfect and there have been times she’s been really hard on herself,” a Kardashian insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““But no more.”
“She’s working on her self-love, that’s one of her big resolutions.”
“Kim looks better than ever these days and it’s great that she wants to focus on body positivity instead of obsessing over figure flaws.”


"Hollywood fans, what are your resolutions for 2018?"
"2018 is positive for Kim Jong Il, including her self talk."
"We have exclusive coverage of how she will no longer be obsessed with her booty in 2018."
"There's no doubt that Kim Kardashian, 37, might not have become a household name today without her infamous huge spoils."
"But with her second daughter coming to her home in 2018, she's determined not to be so focused on her body or so obsessed with what the world thinks of her famous figure."
"Kim vowed to give up her obsession with her ass, which is one of her new year's resolutions. She wants to completely love and accept her body."
"She's under too much pressure and scrutiny to be perfect, and sometimes she's really hard on herself," an insider of Kardashian told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"But no more."
"She's trying to love herself, which is one of her greatest resolutions."
"Kim looks better now than ever, and she wants to focus on physical motivation rather than obsession with body defects, which is good."



Number  503
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Beckgrid Sheldon, who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015, is also fascinated by Stephanie."
"Recently they were found wandering on Carmen beach in Mexico and even met Sheldon's friend Luke Bryan."
Stefani wore a white bikini top with a black sarong and Tan sweater, while Sheldon wore a blue trucker hat to match his board shorts and button down shirt
"Although they may have been an unexpected couple when they first started dating, Sheldon and Stephanie have been gone for some time."
"Background" Gwen really loves black because of who he is and has never tried to change him or anything about him
"She even likes his style!"
“… Source tells et
"She thinks he's a very manly person and is fascinated by that."
"When they don't take romantic walks on the beach, the couple often visit Sheldon's house in Oklahoma with Stefani's three sons, as well as Gavin Rossdale, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9 and Apollo, 3."



Number  504
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But maybe only now are we allowed to start talking about it.””
““I’m just trying to acknowledge that fluidity, that greyness, which has always existed.”
“I don’t want to seem presumptuous, because everyone has their own experience,” she explained.”
““I mean, it’s hard to talk about.”
“In a previous interview with The Guardian, Kristen added that her experience since coming out has been nothing but positive.”
““I’m glad that it’s gotten attention, it matters, it’s important,” she said in a video interview with the news outlet before walking off somewhat stony-faced.”
“At the New York screening of her movie Personal Shopper in March (17), Kristen was asked by The Associated Press how she felt about the widespread media coverage regarding her sexuality.”
“The bisexual actress tends to be guarded when it comes to her private life, but after publicly calling out President Donald Trump about nasty tweets he sent about her split from Pattinson in 2012, Kristen has been more open than ever about her sexual preferences.”
“The 27-year-old actress’ romance comes after failed relationships with stars including Robert Pattinson and, since going public with her sexuality, musicians Stephanie Sokolinski and St. Vincent.”
““They’re both so busy with work but try to be together when they can,” a source told Us Weekly.”


"But maybe only now can we start talking about it."
"I just want to admit that this liquidity, that grey, has always existed."
"I don't want to be self righteous because everyone has their own experience," she explained
"I mean, it's hard to say."
"In a previous interview with the guardian, Christine added that her career was just positive."
"I'm glad it's getting people's attention, it's important, it's important," she said in a video interview with the news media, then left with a bit of a straight face
"When her film" personal shopper "was shown in New York on March 17, the associated press asked Christine how she felt about the widespread media coverage of her sexual orientation."
"The bisexual actress tends to be cautious about her private life, but after publicly calling on President Donald Trump to tweet about her breakup with Pattinson in 2012, Christine is more open about her sexuality than ever before."
"The 27 year old actress's love affair came after a failed relationship with stars including Robert Pattinson, along with musicians Stephanie sokolinski and St. Vincent, after she revealed her sexuality（ St.Vincent ）。”
"They're all busy at work, but together as much as possible," a source told us weekly



**Something goes wrong**
“As many of you may know, she recently got out of a relationship with Nas.”
“Plus, she’s single!”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why he loves the wardrobe malfunction and her style in general!”
“Drake is Nicki Minaj’s biggest fan!”
“If you keep up with either rapper, you know they have quite a history.”
“From their feud in the past, their rumored romance, Drake’s beef with Nicki’s ex-boyfriend Meek Mill, to their many collaborations including “No Frauds,” it’s clear these two are always going to be in each other’s lives.”
“So, it’s no surprise that when everyone trolled Nicki for her unfortunate wardrobe malfunction at the BET Awards on June 24, Drake would come to her defense.”
““Drake thinks Nicki’s style and her camel toe are sexy AF.”
“He thinks she is beautiful, talented, and confident enough to rock an outfit even if it highlights her camel toe,” a source close to Drake tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“For those of you who need a refresher, it all happened when Nicki took the stage at the Staples Center to perform “Chun-Li” and “Rich Sex”.”


"As many of you know, she recently broke up with NAS."
"Besides, she's single!"
"We have an exclusive report on why he likes the wardrobe breakdown and her overall style!"
"Drake is Nicky Minagi's biggest fan!"
"If you can keep up with one of the rappers, you know they have a long history."
"From their past grudges, legendary romance, Drake's grudge with Nikki's ex boyfriend Mick mill, to their many collaborations, including no fraud, it's clear that the two will always be in each other's lives."
"So it's no surprise that Drake will defend Nicky when everyone criticizes her at the lottery awards ceremony on June 24 for her unfortunate wardrobe failure."
"Drake thinks Nicky's style and her camel toes are sexy."
"He thinks she's beautiful, talented, confident, and even if she has a prominent hump toe, she can move a suit," a source close to Drake told exclusive Hollywood life
"For those in need of further education, it all happened when Nicky performed Chunli and rich sex at Staples Center."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““This is costing Caitlyn at least $50,000 each week but she thinks nothing of this weird arrangement.”We pay for juicy info!”
““She’s constantly treating her to drinks and dinners at the nicest restaurants in town and buys her jewelry and handbags all the time!”“Sophia is using Caitlyn’s cash to deck out her wardrobe with designer clothes and get her hair and nails done every week,” the source explained.”
““Caitlyn is spending an absolute fortune on Sophia,” another source told Radar.”
“...luxury...”
“Fame has destroyed Cait s relationship with her grown children and she s not letting that happen again if she and Sophia adopt As Radar previously reported exclusively Jenner s been shelling out thousands of dollars a week to keep her 21 year old girlfriend living in the lap of...”
““Cait’s made it clear to Sophia she doesn’t want the baby to have anything to do with television or reality TV,” the source added.”
“...and if she brings a new child into her life she d raise it completely different from how Kendall and Kylie Jenner 22 and 20 respectively were raised...”
“She s always wanted to be a mother and raise a little girl and have the opportunity to do fun girly things like get her hair and nails done with her and take her shopping for her prom dress According to the insider Jenner s gung ho about the possibility...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"It costs Caitlin at least $50000 a week, but she doesn't care about this strange arrangement." We pay for interesting information! "
"She often invites her to drink and eat in the best restaurants in the city, and often buys her jewelry and handbags!"! "Sophia is using Caitlin's cash to buy designer clothes for her wardrobe and do her hair and nails every week," the source explained
"Caitlin spent a lot of money on Sophia," another source told radar
“… Luxury... "
"Fame has ruined Kate's relationship with her adult children. If she and Sophia adopt her, she won't let it happen again, because according to radar's exclusive report, Jenna spends thousands of dollars a week to let her 21-year-old girlfriend live in..."
"Kate has made it clear to Sofia that she doesn't want the child to have anything to do with TV or reality shows," the source added
“…… If she brings a new child into her life, the child she raises will be totally different from the 22-year-old and 20-year-old raised by Kendall and Kelly Jenner respectively... "
"She has always wanted to be a mother, raise a little girl, and have the opportunity to do some interesting girl things, such as fixing her hair and nails, and taking her to buy her prom dress. According to Jenna s gung ho, a person familiar with the situation, this possibility..."



**Something goes wrong**
“...by Cara Mason for www.femalefirst.co.ukfind me on and follow me on...”
“...embarks on a relationship with a 16 year old boy and she was worried Dax would be uncomfortable with the intimate scenes she had to shoot...”
“Bell who gave birth to her and her fiancé Dax Shepard's first child, Lincoln Bell Shepard, in March has confessed they gave her the name because during the pregnancy she "vibed" their child was going to be a boy.”
“Kristen got pregnant while she was shooting her new movie The Lifeguard Kristen got pregnant while she was shooting her new movie The Lifeguard Kristen added He Dax always wanted his first to be named Lincoln and so we got...”
“...lazy when we found out she was a girl and said Hey why not Lincoln...”
“"Kristen has loved every minute of motherhood since four-month-old Lincoln was born and admits she and the tot share a very special bond.”
“Kristen has loved every minute of motherhood since four-month-old Lincoln was born Kristen has loved every minute of motherhood since four-month-old Lincoln was bornShe explained: "She's so delicious, she's wonderful.”
“She's my best friend."”
“Kristen got pregnant while she was shooting her new movie The Lifeguard in which she portrays 29 year old reporter Leigh who quits her job in New York City and returns to her hometown to work as a lifeguard and...”
“But sure enough I came home pregnant.”


“… By Carla Mason www.femalefirst.co.ukfind I'll go on with the company, follow me... "
“… Having started a relationship with a 16-year-old boy, she worried that Dukes would be uncomfortable with the intimate scenes she had to shoot... "
Bell gave birth in March to her first child, Lincoln bell Shepard, with her fiancee, Darth Shepard. She admitted that they gave her the name because during her pregnancy, she "hinted" that their child would be a boy
"Christine got pregnant when she was making a new movie lifeguard Christine got pregnant when she was making a new movie lifeguard Christine added that he always wanted his first name to be Lincoln, so we..."
“… When we found out that she was a girl, we said, "Hey, why not Lincoln..."
"Since the birth of Lincoln, who is four months old, Christine has enjoyed every minute of being a mother. She admits that she has a very special relationship with her child."
Christine has loved every minute of motherhood since four month old Lincoln was born. Christine has loved every minute of motherhood since four month old Lincoln was born. She explained, "she's delicious. She's wonderful."
"She's my best friend."
"Christine got pregnant when she was making the new film lifeguard, in which she played the role of 29 year old journalist Lee, who quit his job in New York and went back to his hometown to be a lifeguard, and then..."
"But I'm pregnant."



**Something goes wrong**
“Can we slap a ™ on that ... just in case?”
“JamKat?”
“Still, the relationship was no secret to most in Hollywood -- JamKat just never let on in public.”
“A year before that, Jamie denied they were even a thing.”
“As we reported ... Katie was seen with a ring on her finger in March 2016, but Foxx's rep said it wasn't from him.”
“Though they've allegedly been together since 2013 -- about a year after her split from Tom Cruise -- this is the first time they've been seen doing what lovebirds do.”
“It took 4 years, but Hollywood's most top secret couple finally packed on the PDA Monday in Malibu ... hand in hand in the sand.”
“Until now, seeing Jamie Foxx and Katie Holmes out together as a couple was as common as a Bigfoot sighting or riding a unicorn ... but not anymore!!!”


"Can we have a slap ™  About this... Just in case? "
"Jim Carter?"
"Still, it's not a secret to most people in Hollywood - Jim Carter just never reveals it in public."
"A year before that, Jamie even denied that they were the same thing."
"As we reported... In March 2016, Katie was seen wearing a ring on her finger, but a representative of fox said that the ring was not from him. "
"Although they are said to have been together since 2013 - about a year after she broke up with Tom Cruise - this is the first time they have been seen as lovers."
"It took four years, but one of Hollywood's top secret couples finally packed on Malibu's PDA on Monday... Hand in hand on the beach. "
"Until now, seeing Jamie Fox and Katie Holmes out together is like seeing Bigfoot or riding a unicorn... But not anymore! "



Number  509
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“GettyImages/Instagram...”
“Speaking of Bey’s love of music… Hit the flip for some recently posted pics of her from a Michael Jackson/Prince party.”
“Silent birth is a real thing though – something that Scientologists practice and Katie Holmes even did when she gave birth to Suri, but as much as Bey loves music we don’t really see her doing a silent birth.”
“THAT doesn’t take an exclusive source to figure out.”
“EVERYBODY knows Beyoncé is private.”
“This will be of utmost importance for her when giving birth.”This story is almost like opening up a fortune cookie or visiting your average storefront psychic.”
“She likes to be surrounded with peaceful colors and soft sounds.”
“She is very guarded and protects her privacy at all cost.”
““You can only get into her private life if you are invited.”
“And you can expect the same will be true when she gives birth to the twins,” sources tell Straight Shuter.”


"Get pictures / instagram..."
"Speaking of Bei's love of music Some of her recent photos at the Michael Jackson / Prince party were amazing
"But silent childbirth is a real thing - both the Scientologists and Katie Holmes did it even when she gave birth to Suri, but we didn't really see her in silent childbirth, despite Bei's love of music."
"It doesn't take an exclusive source to figure it out."
"You know Beyonce is private."
"It's the most important thing for her to have a baby." The story is like opening a fortune cookie or visiting an ordinary store wizard
"She likes to be surrounded by peaceful colors and soft voices."
"She's very cautious, protecting her privacy at all costs."
"You can only enter her private life if you are invited."
"You can expect it to be the same when she gives birth to twins," the source told strickleshott



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow us:”
“Get our Free Daily Newsletters Here!”
““This transition has been harder on me than anything I could imagine,” Jenner told the audience at the Microsoft Theater Wednesday night.”
““That’s the case for so many others besides me.”
“For that reason alone trans people deserve something vital.”
“They deserve your respect.”Jenner, formerly known as 1976 Olympic decathlon champion Bruce Jenner, received the award to recognize “the courage to embrace a truth that had been hidden for years,” according to ESPN.”
“Bruce Jenner, who said he has long suffered from gender confusion and told ABC earlier this year that he identifies as a woman, was re-introduced to the world as Caitlyn Jenner on June 1 with a flashy photo spread and feature story in Vanity Fair magazine.”
“Later that day ESPN announced plans to give Jenner the Arthur Ashe Courage Award which is presented to individuals whose contributions transcend sports Bruce has received many accolades over the years for being one of the greatest Olympians of our time but the ESPYs are honored to celebrate Bruce becoming...”
“Caitlyn ESPYs executive producer Maura Mandt said...”
“She has shown the courage to embrace a truth that had been hidden for years and to embark on a journey that may not only give comfort to those facing similar circumstances but can also help to educate people on the challenges that the transgender community faces Previous recipients of...”


Follow us:
"Get our free daily newsletter here!"
"This transformation is more difficult for me than anything I think," Jenner told the audience at the Microsoft theater on Wednesday night
"Everyone else is like this except me."
"It's for this reason that cross-cultural people deserve something that matters."
According to ESPN, Jenner was hailed as the 1976 Olympic decathlon champion Bruce Jenner. He won the award in recognition of his "courage to accept a truth that has been hidden for many years."
Bruce Jenner, who has long suffered from gender confusion, told ABC earlier this year that he was a woman. On June 1, Vanity Fair magazine re introduced Caitlin Jenner with a gorgeous photo and a special report
"Later that day, ESPN announced its plan to award the Jana Ashe courage award to those who have contributed to sports. Bruce has won a lot of praise for being one of the greatest Olympic athletes of our time over the years, but ESPN is honored to celebrate Bruce as..."
"Caitlin espys executive producer Mora Mander said
"She showed courage, accepted a truth that had been hidden for many years, and embarked on a journey that not only comforted those facing similar situations, but also helped to educate people about the challenges faced by the transgender community, the former recipients..."



**Something goes wrong**
“They want to make money for Themselves, and if the product isn't breaking even time and again, the stars are not gifted with large salaries in the amounts making more than the studios.”
“Jolie turned in the same salary for three years in a row for Salt to Forbes.when that was the only film she'd done in that time period.”
“Why come out with a story about it if everyone is so sure she's sitting on a pile o' cash already?”
“Weren't we told she's supposedly worth "200 mil" or some such inexplicably high figure??”
“Now we are hearing "The ho is 'cash-strapped' " stories!”
“Funny, that!”
“I would tend to believe THEM more than I would any of that hype about her "mega-net worth" that we have repeatedly been hearing about, despite her ongoing state of UNEMPLOYMENT for YEARS now!”
“The fact that she's kissing up to DADDY would tend to support this notion!”
“We've always said she was cash strapped.”
“Her estimated salaries were always inflated also by Jolie and her loonies to try to keep her on top of the pay scale in some insane competition with every other actress in Hollywood.”


"They want to make money for themselves, and if the product doesn't break even over and over again, the stars won't make a lot more money than the producers."
"Julie gave the same salary to Salter Forbes for three years in a row: when was the only film she made at that time."
"If everyone is so sure that she's already sitting on a pile of cash, why make up a story?"
"Didn't we tell her that her worth should be $200 million, or an inexplicably high number?"
"What we hear now is the story of" Mr. Ho's "cash strapped"
"How interesting
"I'm more inclined to believe them than any hype we've heard about her 'super net worth' over and over again, even though she's been unemployed for years!"
"In fact, her father would be inclined to support the idea!"
"We always said she was short of money."
"Julie and her lunatics always exaggerate her salary estimates and try to keep her at the highest wage level in the fierce competition with other Hollywood actresses."



**Something goes wrong**
“This whole world right now is so divided, in the arts, fashion -- everything.”
“I love seeing these kids on Instagram that dress fucking dope.”
“I was crazy about making the tongue slide work.”
“I was so ­embarrassed to be on the red carpet and so many of those fucking disgusting ­photographers would tell me to blow a kiss, and that’s not me!”
“I don’t want to blow you a kiss.”
“I didn’t know what to do with my face, so I stuck my tongue out, and it became a rebellious, punk-rock thing.”
“The Dead Petz track “BB Talk,” which calls out a man for his “baby ­talking,” seems to reject a similar kind of ­gender standard.”
“I wish it would’ve gotten some ­attention.”
“No one saw the video!”
“It was a real rant.”


"Now the whole world is so divided in art, fashion - everything."
"I love to see these kids on instagram wearing their damn drugs."
"I want my tongue to work."
"I'm so embarrassed on the red carpet, those disgusting photographers will tell me to blow kisses, it's not me!"
"I don't want to give you a kiss."
"I don't know what to do with my face, so I stick out my tongue and it turns into a rebel, punk rock thing."
"BB talk, the dead Petz track, calls a man" baby talk "and seems to reject a similar gender standard."
"I hope it gets some attention."
"No one saw the video!"
"It's a real roar."



**Something goes wrong**
“One of the scenes included her character Rachel Zane having sex with a colleague against a filing cabinet.”
“The Sun newspaper had that week published a front-page story that some of Meghan’s racy scenes from Suits were being trailed on a porn Web site.”
“...other in late October 2016 and then a week later when Harry took the unprecedented step of releasing an official statement from Kensington Palace asking the press to respect Markle s privacy...”
“Their relationship had flourished in private since they first met in July of that year, but when the eyes of the world turned to the prince and his potential bride-to-be, the couple was forced to work hard for their peace and quiet.”
“OCTOBER 2016Like his brother, Harry enjoyed outfoxing the media, and while he was disappointed the story had broken, he knew he was lucky to have enjoyed several months getting to know Meghan without press scrutiny.”
“When the story broke, Harry happened to be with Meghan in Toronto.”
“He was apparently taken by surprise when his aides called to tell him the story was going to be front-page news and knew that very soon he and Meghan would be under siege.”
“A story was leaked that Harry had canceled a flight to Toronto to try and make it look like he was in the U.K., but photographers and reporters descended on Meghan’s home regardless.”
“When Meghan suggested they go to stay with her friends Ben and Jessica Mulroney, Harry agreed.”
“The Mulroneys were two of the few friends who knew about the romance, and they were more than happy to let the couple take shelter from the paparazzi at their Toronto house.”


"One of the scenes involves her character, Rachel Zane, having sex with a colleague in front of a filing cabinet."
The sun ran a report on the front page that week that some pornographic scenes of Megan's suits were followed up by a pornographic website
“…… The other was in late October 2016. A week later, Harry took unprecedented measures and issued an official statement from Kensington Palace, asking the media to respect markel's privacy... "
"Since they first met in July that year, their private relationship has been very harmonious, but when the eyes of the world turned to the prince and his potential bride to be, the couple were forced to work for their peace and tranquility."
"In October 2016, like his brother, Harry liked to play up in front of the media. Although he was disappointed with the breakdown of the story, he knew that he was very lucky. Without media supervision, he enjoyed a few months to get to know Megan."
"Harry happened to be in Toronto with Megan when it came to light."
"When his assistant called to tell him that the story was going to be front page news, he was obviously surprised. He knew that soon he and Megan would be under siege."
"A story was leaked that Harry canceled his flight to Toronto to try to make him look like he was in the UK, but photographers and journalists ignored Meghan's home."
"When Megan suggested they go and live with her friends Ben and Jessica muroni, Harry agreed."
"The Moroni couple are one of the few friends who know about the relationship. They are very happy to let the couple avoid the paparazzi at their home in Toronto."



**Something goes wrong**
““She’s forgetful I guess.””
“If you’ve not seen the GIF, you’ve probably not spent a lot of time on the web.”
“...the Lambs Recently...”
“I think it s kind of from word of mouth of things that have happened in the past that I m not really aware of Then last year Carey was doing an interview with The Cut in which she was asked about gifts she receives from her army of fans...”
““Like, we don’t know each other.”
““I know from back in the day, I’ve read things that she’s said about me that were not the greatest, but we have never met,” Lopez, who is no amateur at delivering a verbal knockout, said.”
“...the shade of it all...”
“The Aftermath It is years later I don t know her has become perhaps the most iconic words to come out of Mariah Carey s mouth since all I want for Christmas is you It was Andy Cohen in 2014 who was the first to ask J Lo directly about...”
“And, immediately, a meme was born.”
“[yawns] I’m sorry, I’m having a “sleep” moment…Well, there was a very interesting shirt that a fan made with a quote that I said years ago that, when I said it, I really wasn’t trying to be funny.”


"I guess she's forgetful."
"If you haven't seen GIF, you probably don't spend a lot of time online."
“… The nearest lamb... "
"I think it's from word of mouth that something happened in the past, I really don't know, and then last year Kelly was doing a cut interview and she was asked about the gifts she received from her fans..."
"For example, we don't know each other."
"I know, from that day on, I've read what she said about me, and although it's not the best, we've never seen it," said Lopez, who is not good at knocking down opponents verbally
“… The shadow of all this... "
"In the aftermath of many years, I don't know that she may have become the most representative word in Maria Kelly's mouth, because at Christmas, I just want you, Andy Cohen of 2014, to be the first to ask J. Rowe directly..."
"And then a meme was born."
(yawns) sorry, I have a "sleep" time Well, there's a very interesting shirt. A fan made it with a sentence I said a few years ago. When I said it, I didn't really mean to be funny. "



**Something goes wrong**
“We're having twins!'"”
“I was like, 'OK, fine.”
“"I kind of liked it.”
“"It was kind of an awesome rumor," the actress joked.”
“Pitt, who remains single, isn't the worst person to be falsely associated with, of course.”
“"As a matter of fact," Hudson said, "I hadn't actually seen him in, like, four years."”
“"There's nothing true to that."”
“"That was the craziest rumor of all time," said Hudson, who was promoting her book.”
“So, when Hudson appeared on Bravo's Watch What Happens Live With Andy Cohen Tuesday, she was more than happy to set the record straight, once and for all.”
“News the romance rumors were false—but still, they persisted.”


"We're going to have twins!"
"I said," OK, good. "
"I kind of like it."
"It's a terrible rumor," the actress joked
"Pete is still single and, of course, he's not the worst person to be wrongly associated with."
"In fact," Hudson said, "I haven't seen him in four years."
"Nothing is true."
"That's the craziest rumor ever," says Hudson, who is promoting her book
"So when Hudson appeared on Bravo's watch and what happened live with Andy Cohen on Tuesday, she was very happy to break the record once and for all."
"The rumors about romance are false, but they stick to it."



**Something goes wrong**
“On Friday, she live-streamed clips of his concert on her Instagram account — singing along to his songs and smiling wide throughout.”
“Image zoom Credit: Erika Goldring/Getty ImagesRELATED VIDEO: How Gwen Stefani Surprised Herself as a Mom of Three BoysAnd Stefani has turned into Shelton’s biggest fan too.”
“Shelton and Stefani, 47, met as coaches on The Voice and started dating not long after Shelton’s divorce from fellow country crooner Miranda Lambert and Stefani’s divorce from husband Gavin Rossdale.”
““You know, texting each other,” he said.”
“But Shelton, with the cheers of the audience behind him, quickly recovered from the apparent snafu.”
“In video captured of the moment and shared online by her fans, Stefani can be seen lifting her head from Shelton’s shoulder and flashing him a shocked expression.”
“...whose oldest sons Zuma 8 and Kingston 10 were in the audience shook...”
“In between songs like Neon Light A Guy with a Girl The Baby Every Time I Hear That Song and fittingly Ol Red Shelton joked about the origins of their relationship explaining they started hanging out together and messing around Image zoom Credit Kevin Mazur WireImage His admission had Stefani...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Reaching Out, a local charity that provides assistance to family members of people battling cancer — was a prelude to Saturday’s block party, which will officially open the venue.”


"Last Friday, she showed live footage of his concert on her instagram account - singing along with his songs, smiling all the way."
"Credit for image zooming: Erica godlin / Getty Images related video: Gwen Stephanie surprised herself as the mother of three boys, and Stephanie became Sheldon's biggest fan."
Sheldon and Stephanie, 47, met as coaches on the sound and began dating shortly after Sheldon divorced fellow singer Miranda Lambert and Stephanie divorced her husband Gavin Rosedale
"You know, texting each other," he said
But Shelton, cheered by the crowd, soon recovered from the apparent chaos
"In the video taken at this moment, Stefani can be seen looking up from Sheldon's shoulder and showing him a look of shock."
“…… Their eldest sons Zuma 8 and Kingston 10 were shocked in the audience
"In the middle of a song like neon, a boy and a girl, every time I hear that song, she jokes about the origin of their relationship, explains that they started to get together, messed up the picture, zoomed in the picture of Kevin mazul, who admitted to having Stephanie..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Helping out, a local charity that helps families of cancer patients, is a prelude to Saturday's block party, which will officially open."



**Something goes wrong**
“Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“But without even a draft of the settlement being written by either side, it just goes to show ‘how at odds they continue to be,’ the report continued.”
“But their divorce still isn’t final, a new report says, because they still haven’t agreed to terms about their six children.”
“According to E!”
“News, Jolie is resentful of Pitt for essentially locking her down in Los Angeles, because he’s chosen a film that will be shot in LA to be near his kids.”
“Jolie, meanwhile, had planned on taking them to Europe.”
““Brad is opposed to that and is blocking it from happening.”
“Brad will be filming in LA for the summer and wants to see the kids on his regular custody schedule,” a source told E.He currently sees his children - Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Knox and Vivienne - a few times a week.”
“Jolie, according to the report, is ‘furious’ at the situation.”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie split in September 2016.”


"Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more..."
"But neither side has drafted a draft settlement agreement, which only shows that their differences continue to exist," the report continued
"But their divorce is still not final, a new report says, because they haven't reached an agreement on their six children."
"According to e!"
"The latest news is that Julie is outraged that Pete has locked her up in Los Angeles because he has chosen a film to be shot in Los Angeles close to his children."
Meanwhile, Julie plans to take them to Europe
"Brad was against it and prevented it from happening."
"Brad will be filming in Los Angeles this summer and he wants to see his children in his regular custody schedule," a source told E. He currently sees his children - Maddox, parks, Zahara, Shiloh, Knox and Vivian - several times a week
"Julie is reported to be 'angry' about the situation."
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie broke up in September 2016."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo credit: Getty Images...”
“But according to sources, her recent spree is less about the money and more about having separate residences as she and Portia inch closer toward officially separating.”
“Photo credit: Getty Images/InStarThe National ENQUIRER has learned Ellen left In a bombshell world exclusive,has learned Ellen left the couple’s love nest and has agreed to an off-listing sale of the marital estate they bought together just eight months ago!”
“Photo credit: Mega“It’s all very shady and ominous.”
“Ellen went to great lengths to keep the news from their close friends to avoid being asked questions,” an insider claimed.”
““She and Portia were fighting more and more.”
“Eventually, what normally would have been a routine back-and-forth turned nasty .” Photo credit: MegaEllen has publicly insisted the couple’s marriage is on solid ground.”
“But sources have exclusively told The ENQUIRER the pair have been spending nights alone, and now they appear to be living completely apart.”
“Photo credit: MegaProperty records show Ellen and Portia — who will be married for ten years on Aug. 16 — maintained two separate residences on the six-acre equestrian estate in exclusive Montecito, Calif., which recently sold for $11 million.”
“Photo credit: FilesIn yet another clue to their marital woes , just weeks after they paid $7.2 million for the sprawling property last September, Ellen quietly snapped up a place of her own nine miles away in Carpinteria!”


"Photo source: Getty pictures..."
"But according to the source, as she and Portia are getting closer to their formal separation, her recent revelry is no longer about money, but about having an independent home."
Photo source: Getty Images / instar the national inquirer learns that Ellen has left a sensational exclusive news, learns that Ellen has left the couple's love nest, and agrees to sell the married property they bought together eight months ago! "
"Photo source: Mega" it's all very dark and ominous
"Allen spared no effort to hide the information from their close friends to avoid being asked questions," a person familiar with the matter said
"She's playing more and more with Portia."
"In the end, things that used to be routine became very bad." Photo source: megalon said publicly that the couple's marriage was based on a solid foundation
"But a source told the inquirer exclusively that the two had spent the night alone, and now they seem to live completely separate."
Photo source: megaproperty records show that Ellen and Portia, who will be married for 10 years on August 16, own two homes at the six acre Equestrian Estate in Montecito, California, recently sold for $11 million
Photo source: film is another clue to their unhappy marriage. Just a few weeks after they spent $7.2 million on this chaotic property in September last year, Allen quietly snapped up a house of his own in cabentia, nine miles away



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kim was trying to shade Taylor, or does she just approve of Selena’s new blonde hair?”
“Kim liked Sel’s photo showing off the new ‘do and it’s left fans puzzled.”
“Why’s she hanging around her nemesis’ best friend’s Instagram?”
“Blondes against blonde!”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, more than approves of Selena Gomez‘s pretty peroxide hair that she debuted at the 2017 American Music Awards on November 19!”
“Selena, 25, actually posted a photo of her new bombshell look on Instagram right before strutting the red carpet, and five million people liked the photo, including Kim!”
“It can’t be a coincidence that Kim’s liking a photo posted by Taylor Swift‘s good friend.”
“Kim and Selena don’t really have a relationship (as far as we know) so it’s a little random that she’d be following her on Instagram.”
“Was this a little shot at her nemesis, Taylor, 27?”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Kim wants to shade Tyler, or does she just approve of Serena's new blonde hair?"
"Kim likes sel to show photos of the new 'do', which puzzles fans."
"Why does she hang out on her arch enemy's best friend's instagram?"
"Blondes against blondes!"
"Kim Kardashian, 37, is very supportive of Selena Gomez's beautiful hair, which she made her debut at the 2017 American Music Awards on November 19!"
"Before walking down the red carpet, Serena, 25, posted a picture of her new explosive look on instagram. Five million people like this picture, including Kim!"
"It can't be a coincidence that Kim likes photos posted by Taylor Swift's good friends."
"Kim and Selena don't really have a relationship (as far as we know), so it's a bit random for her to follow her on instagram."
"Is this a small blow to her 27 year old nemesis, Tyler?"



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“What are your thoughts on Selena's spiral?”
“So she’s essentially lost the two main influences in her life, which could be a recipe for disaster.”
“The source added, “Selena now feels a lot of resentment toward Mandy about the decision she made, and they're barely speaking.”
“Unfortunately, that choice backfired.”
“She feels so demoralized and alone.” On top of that, because her mother Mandy doesn’t particularly like Justin, Selena reportedly chose to end things because she could not take the burden of having her mom at odds with her.”
“Says the insider, “She went from being on top of the world to dealing with nonstop relationship drama.”
“Article continues below advertisementAnd the split, which of course happened in front of the world, didn’t help matters.”
“Even prior to her breakup, Selena’s been very open about struggles she faces, including depression and anxiety, and goes to therapy on a regular basis to work on her battles.”
“Magazine.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"What do you think of Selena's spiral?"
"So she basically lost the two main factors in her life, which may be the cause of the disaster."
The source added, "Selena is very dissatisfied with Mandy's decision now. They hardly speak."
"Unfortunately, this choice is counterproductive."
"She felt so depressed and lonely." In addition, because her mother Mandy didn't particularly like Justin, it was reported that Selena chose to end the affair because she couldn't bear the burden of discord between her mother and her
"She's gone from the top of the world to an ongoing emotional drama," the person said
The article continues in the following ads and splits, which of course happens in front of the world and doesn't help things
"Even before the break-up, Selena was very open to the difficulties she faced, including depression and anxiety, and went to regular treatment to fight for her life."
"Magazine."



**Something goes wrong**
“In exchange, she received $11.4 million for her discretion.”
“She looked smitten."”
“Though we've seen them spending time together, the pair hasn't offered any obvious public displays of affection until now.”
“Foxx and Holmes were spotted having a romantic time at the beach.”
“Onlookers watched them wrestle in the sand and share a bottle of champagne in between make-out sessions.”
“One of the beachgoers dished about how happy they seemed:"They were totally engaged with each other.”
“They were never on their phones.”
“She had this incredible smile on her face.”
“Sources close to Holmes have commented on the lovers' connection.”
“She agreed to keep her next relationship under wraps for 5 years following the divorce.”


"In exchange, she received $11.4 million in discretionary power."
"She looks crazy."
"Although we have seen them spend time together, up to now, they have not shown any obvious love in public."
"Fox and Sherlock Holmes were found to be very romantic on the beach."
"The onlookers watched them wrestle on the beach and share a bottle of champagne between two intimacies."
One of the beach visitors said they looked happy: "they're totally engaged."
"They never called."
"There was an incredible smile on her face."
"Sources close to Sherlock Holmes commented on the couple's connection."
"She agreed to keep her next relationship secret for five years after the divorce."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“The two reportedly parted on bitter terms after Drake was pictured showing some sexy PDA with Jennifer Lopez!”
“Leonardo & Drake Avoid Each Other At Pre-Oscars Bash DiCaprio stayed in a private booth with pals, away from the rapper.”
“Rihanna’s been linked to various hot Hollywood hunks, but recently, her two most notorious conquests were caught in an awkward run-in during a pre-Oscars party!”
“Leonardo DiCaprio and Drake acted like total strangers when they bumped into each other at an LA nightclub before the 2018 Oscars.”
“A source told RadarOnline.com that Leonardo, 43, went straight to his VIP dining room with pal Tobey McGuire, while Drake, 31, hung out on the other side of the club!”
““Leo is always in the main room with his crew and sits in the same booth, but he stayed away the whole night and ignored Drake who took his spot,” said the insider.”
““His friends kept coming through but none of them spoke to the rapper and everyone thought it was odd considering they are all meant to be friends,”As RadarOnline.com readers know, Leonardo was first liked to Rihanna, 30, in 2016, when the two were caught canoodling at Coachella.”
“Her fling with Drake happened later on, and was very short-lived.”
“Rihanna is now dating billionaire Hassan Jameel and has evidently moved on, but can her exes say the same?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
According to reports, Drake and Jennifer Lopez broke up in agony after they were photographed showing a sexy PDA together
"Leonardo and Drake avoid each other before the Oscars, DiCaprio stays in a private box with his friends, away from rappers."
Rihanna has always been associated with Hollywood's handsome guys, but recently, her two most infamous conquests have been embarrassed at the pre Oscar Party
"When Leonardo DiCaprio and Drake collided in a nightclub in Los Angeles before the 2018 Oscars, they acted completely strange."
A source told reporters RadarOnline.com Leonardo, 43, went straight to his VIP restaurant with his friend Toby McGuire, while Drake, 31, was hanging out on the other side of the club
"Leo is always in a big room with his staff, sitting in the same booth, but he's away all night, ignoring Drake, who occupies his place," the person familiar with the matter said
"His friends kept coming, but no one talked to the rapper, and everyone was surprised because they were all destined to be friends," he said RadarOnline.com Readers of the website know that Leonardo first liked Rihanna in 2016, when they were caught on a canoe in cochella
"Her relationship with Drake happened later, and it was very short."
Rihanna is dating billionaire Hassan Jamil and has apparently left, but can her predecessors say the same? "



**Something goes wrong**
“Yet, without making any sound, the Oscar winner stood up, removed his headphones, pulled up his hood and walked off - refusing to answer the question.”
“However, the duo are believed to have been dating in secret since 2013, a year after Katie split from her husband Tom Cruise, who allegedly included a clause in the divorce settlement banning her from publicly dating for five years.”
“So Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx opted to leave Carbone restaurant in New York separately on Tuesday, after enjoying a low-key dinner date.”
“The couple - who confirmed their relationship in September last year - looked in good spirits as they made their exits from the eatery, with Katie, 39, reportedly heading home while Jamie, 50, finished off the evening at a bar.”
“On the move Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx opted to leave Carbone restaurant in New York separately on Tuesday after enjoying a low key dinner date Looking effortlessly stylish Katie donned a pair of cropped black trousers with a floral hem whilst she boosted her frame with a pair of...”
“...court heels...”
“She teamed the garment with a black square neck vest, layering up with a cropped leather jacket.”
“The mother-of-one finished off the look with a black clutch bag adorned with intricate gold embroidery.”
“On the move Katie 39 reportedly headed home after the dinner date no doubt to see daughter Suri while Jamie 50 finished off the evening at a bar Making an exit The couple who confirmed their relationship in September last year looked in good spirits as they made their exits...”
“...from the eatery Leggy lady...”


"However, the Oscar winner didn't make a sound, stood up, took off his headphones, pulled up his hood and left - refusing to answer that question."
"However, the two are believed to have been dating secretly since 2013, when Katie broke up with her husband Tom Cruise a year ago. It is said that there is a clause in the divorce agreement prohibiting her from dating publicly for five years."
As a result, Katie Holmes and Jamie fox, after a low-key dinner date, chose to leave New York's Cabernet restaurant on Tuesday
"The couple confirmed their relationship in September last year. They came out of the restaurant looking in good spirits. According to reports, Katie, 39, was getting ready to go home, while Jamie, 50, finished the evening at the bar."
"On Tuesday, Katie Holmes and Jamie fox chose to leave New York's Cabernet restaurant separately because they enjoyed a low-key dinner date and looked very fashionable. Katie was wearing a pair of irregular black trousers with flowered hems and a pair of black trousers
“… High heels... "
She paired it with a black square necked vest and a cropped leather jacket
"The mother of a child completed the design with a black handbag decorated with intricate gold embroidery."
"It's reported that Katie, 39, went home after dinner to meet her daughter Suri, while Jamie, 50, left a bar after finishing the night's activities. The couple, who confirmed their relationship in September last year, looked in good spirits when they left... "
“… From the long legged lady in the restaurant... "



**Something goes wrong**
“For example, Prince Harry has four: Henry Charles Albert David while Kate and Will's children have three: Prince George Alexander Louis, Princess Charlotte Elizabeth Diana and Prince Louis Arthur Charles.”
“Royals typically have four names.”
“Despite reports that Pippa Middleton threw a party for Kate before Prince George's birth in 2013 many royal experts believe this wasn't the case.”
“While the royals are "very wealthy... a lavish baby shower would be seen as highly inappropriate...There's nothing they can't go out and buy themselves".”
“According to royal expert Victoria Arbiter, throwing an elaborate baby shower is unheard of for members of The Firm.”
“7 Kate visited Norway with Prince William during her third pregnancy Credit: ReutersRoyal mums-to-be don't have baby showersIt was speculated that the Duchess of Sussex would probably have to give a pre-birth party a miss due to royal tradition.”
“In February 2019, just weeks away from giving birth, Meghan and Harry stopped in Morocco for a short official visit.”
“Kate did travel to Norway while pregnant with Prince Louis - but she's said to have kept other trips to a minimum.”
“While royal women usually conduct engagements up until the end of their pregnancy (they usually don't have an official "maternity leave" until after the baby is born) they're encouraged to stay as close to home as possible so emergency help is more readily available.”
“According to reports, pregnant royals are encouraged to keep travelling abroad to a minimum - and it's all to do with safety measures.”


For example, Harry has four sons: Henry Charles Albert David, Kate and will have three: Prince George Alexander Louis, Princess Charlotte Elizabeth Diana and Prince Louis Arthur Charles
"Royal family members usually have four names."
"Despite reports that Pippa Middleton held a party for Kate before Prince George was born in 2013, many royal experts believe that is not the case."
Although the royal family is "very rich... A luxurious baby shower would be considered very inappropriate There's nothing they can't go out and buy themselves
"According to Victoria arbitration, a royal expert, the baby shower is unheard of as a member of the company."
"7 Kate visited Norway with Prince William during her third pregnancy. It is speculated that the Duchess of Sussex may have to miss a prenatal party because of the royal tradition. "
"In February 2019, just a few weeks before delivery, Megan and Harry will stop in Morocco for a short official visit."
"Kate did go to Norway when she was pregnant with Prince Louis - but she is said to have kept other trips to a minimum."
"Although royal women are usually engaged before the end of pregnancy (they usually have formal 'maternity leave' after the birth of the child), they are encouraged to stay as close to home as possible in order to get more emergency help."
"It's reported that pregnant royal family members are encouraged to travel abroad as little as possible - it's all about safety measures."



**Something goes wrong**
“We’re just happy this fight is over and we can go back to living our lives in peace.”
“After the back-and-forth with Selena, Bieber simply deleted his Instagram account, erasing any evidence of the former couple’s feud with it.”
“Drama, drama, drama!”
“He responded by saying that she stepped out on him with singer Zayn Malik.”
“Things got even messier when she accused Bieber of cheating on her.”
“Gomez decided to stir up drama by telling her ex in a comment on Instagram that he should respect his fans.”
“SnapchatThe incident started when Bieber asked his fans to be nice to his new love interest, 17-year-old Sofia Richie.”
“On Tuesday, the singer wrote, “What I said was selfish and pointless,” set against a dark background.”
“But according to a new message on Snapchat, it seems Gomez regrets fighting with her ex.”


"We are happy that the battle is over and we can return to a peaceful life."
"After dealing with Selena, Bieber simply deleted his instagram account, erasing any evidence of discord between the first two people."
"Drama, drama, drama!"
"He responded that she stepped on him with singer zayn Malik."
"Things got worse when she accused Bieber of cheating on her."
"Gomez decided to provoke the farce by commenting on instagram and telling her predecessor that he should respect his fans."
"It started when Bieber asked his fans to be nice to his new lover, 17-year-old Sophie arici."
On Tuesday, the singer wrote in a dark background: "what I say is selfish and meaningless."
"But according to a new message on snapchat, Gomez seems to regret quarreling with his ex girlfriend."



**Something goes wrong**
“As per Page Six, negative comments poured in as many readers think that the magazine should have featured South Asian personalities instead of someone from a famous celebrity clan from the U.S. Plus, it should be noted that Kim is of Armenian descent.”
“Vogue India faced an overwhelming backlash after it chose the 37-year-old reality star to be on its March 2018 cover.”
“Kendall says she's 'way too old' for such big projects.”
“Kendall Jenner is not happy that her older sister, Kim Kardashian West, is getting major modeling jobs these days.”
“For her, Kim is too old for this type of gig so she wants her sibling to leave modeling to her.”
“Radar Online reported that a rivalry is brewing between the Keeping Up With the Kardashians stars as the younger one of the two siblings appeared to be jealous of her older sister’s current works in modeling.”
“Allegedly, Kendall Jenner and Kim Kardashian are clashing over the latter’s sudden wave of Vogue bookings.”
“Kim has recently been chosen to be on the cover of Vogue India, and this made Kendall furious.”
“In the Kardashian family, it is Kendall who dominates the modeling world, so it upsets her that Kim is now getting major projects in the same field.”
“The 22-year-old KUWTK star and model also criticized her sister Kim for appearing on the magazine cover.”


"According to page 6, negative comments are pouring in, because many readers think that the magazine should publish South Asian celebrities rather than people from famous families in the United States. In addition, it should be noted that Kim Jong Il is of Armenian origin. "
"After vogue India chose the 37 year old reality star for its march 2018 cover, it got an overwhelming backlash."
"Kendall said she was too old for such a big project."
"Kendall Jenner is not happy that her sister Kim Kardashian West has got the main modelling job these days."
"For her, Kim is too old for this type of performance, so she wants her brothers and sisters to leave her models."
"Radar Online reported that the competition between the two brothers and sisters is brewing because the younger brother of the two brothers and sisters seems to be jealous of their sister's current work on modeling."
"Kendall Jenner and Kim Kardashian are said to be in conflict over the latter's sudden wave of fashion bookings."
"Kim's recent selection for the cover of fashion India made Kendall furious."
"In the Kardashian family, it's Kendall who dominates the modeling world, so Kim is upset that she's now getting major projects in the same field."
"The 22-year-old kuwtk star and model also criticized her sister Kim for appearing on the cover of the magazine."



**Something goes wrong**
““But they are a bad storm and you’d best believe there aren’t any blue skies hovering over them.””
““Bey and Jay are two flawed people who make everyone believe they’re perfect,” spilled a source.”
“The couple also relocated from the Big Apple to a pricey Beverly Hills spread in a bid to shore up their rocky union.”
“Beyonce Gives Birth To Twins With Jay ZAs The ENQUIRER has reported, their marriage has been rocked by a notorious paternity scandal involving a New Jersey man, Rymir Satterthwaite, claiming he is Jay-Z’s love child.”
“The video even ended with Bey flinging her wedding ring to the ground!”
“Beyoncé put the spotlight on her eight-year troubled marriage in a promotional clip for her blockbuster 2016 album, “Lemonade.” Swinging a baseball bat, Beyoncé called out her tycoon husband for multiple affairs.”
“Now, with any ugly love child scandal and endless cheating allegations surrounding Jay-Z, a billion-dollar split appears more likely, insiders said.”
“The 35-year-old singer and hip-hop mogul husband Jay-Z have secretly split twice and were “literally signatures away from a divorce” together, sources told The National ENQUIRER.”
“Megastar Beyoncé is privately trapped in a nightmare marriage!”


"But it's a serious storm, and you'd better believe there's no blue sky hovering over it."
"Bei and Jay are two flawed people who make everyone believe that they are perfect," a source said
"The couple also moved from big apple to an expensive place in Beverly Hills to support their rocky alliance."
Beyonce and Jay ZAS have given birth to twins, and their marriage has been rocked by a notorious parent-child scandal involving a New Jersey man, remille satsvait, claiming he is Jay ZAS' beloved son, inquirer reported
"The video even ends with Bei throwing his wedding ring on the floor!"
"Beyonce focused on her eight years of marriage in her 2016 hit album lemonade. Beyonce is waving a baseball bat, and the tycoon's husband is yelling to deal with a lot of things. "
"Now, with any ugly Aiko scandal and endless fraud charges surrounding Jay-Z, a billion dollar breakup seems more likely," insiders said
"The 35 year old singer and hip-hop tycoon's husband, Jay-Z, have split up secretly twice, and they are" far away from divorce "together," the source told the national inquirer
"Superstar Beyonce fell into a nightmare like marriage in private!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Garner meanwhile has yet to be romantically linked to anyone post break-up...”
“Since their split, Affleck has moved on with Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus in Manhattan.”
“...according toTMZ”
“Hood nick Ben looked fit in a dark grey t shirt with baggy jeans and sneakers Fine form Jen also 45 looked fitter again in jeans and a light white pullover The Daredevil co stars requested joint custody of their three children but they re still negotiating a financial settlement...”
“Ben and Jen filed for divorce in April 2017; it has yet to be finalized.”
“The couple's youngest and only boy, Sam also has two older sisters: 12-year-old Violet, and nine-year-old Seraphina.”
“...be finalized Samuel who turns six later this month didn t look two bothered in his Wolverines kit as he enjoyed a post game Sonic the Hedgehog ice cream...”
“Batman V Wolverine The former couple brought the five year old to play for his team Barrington Rec Center Wolverines Done The couple split in 2025 one day shy of their ten year anniversary One more thing Ben and Jen filed for divorce in April 2017 it has yet to...”
“Jen, also 45, looked fitter again in jeans and a light white pullover.”
“Ben looked fit in a dark grey t-shirt with baggy jeans and sneakers.”


"At the same time, Ghana has not had any romantic contact with anyone after the breakup..."
"Since their breakup, Affleck and Saturday night live producer Lindsay schokus have continued to work together in Manhattan."
“… According to "MZ"
"Hood Nick Ben looks healthy in a dark grey T-shirt, baggy jeans and sneakers. Jen, 45, also looks healthy in jeans and a light white pullover. Daredevil and his co stars want to raise their three children together, but they are still negotiating a financial solution.... "
"Ben and Jen filed for divorce in April 2017; it has not yet been finalized."
"The couple's youngest and only boy, Sam has two older sisters: Violet, 12, and Serafina, 9."
“…… Later this month, Samuel, who turned six, wore a Wolverine suit and enjoyed hedgehog sonic ice cream after the game. He didn't look upset at all.... "
"Batman v. Wolverine: the former couple with their five-year-old played for his team at the Barrington recreation center. The Wolverines split up in 2025, one day before their 10th wedding anniversary. One more thing, Ben and Zhan filed for divorce in April 2017, but they haven't yet... "
Jen, also 45, looks healthy again in jeans and a light white pullover
"Ben looks healthy in a dark grey T-shirt, baggy jeans and sneakers."



**Something goes wrong**
“The government has imposed limits on how much spectrum an individual mobile carrier can pick up in the auction.”
“...instalment at the end of January following a restructure its existing debt facilities by its owners Vodafone and Hutchison...”
“The merged group will be owned 49.9 per cent by TPG shareholders and 50.1 per cent by VHA shareholders: Vodafone and Hutchison Telecommunications Australia.”
“The new ASX-listed group will be named ‘TPG Telecom Limited’ and have approximately 20 per cent of the Australian mobile market share and 22 per cent of the fixed line broadband market share.”
“Together, the new company would have some 6.4 million mobile subscribers and 1.9 million fixed line broadband customers.”
“The group will have an implied enterprise value of $15 billion and have revenues in the region of $6.02 billion and EBITDA of $1.86 billion.”
“TPG and VHA have entered into a scheme implementation deed, with the proposal having the unanimous backing of TPG’s board.”
“If the deal goes ahead mdash and it is subject to a number of approval processes including a TPG shareholder vote and sign off from the Australian Competition and Consumer Commission and the Foreign Investment Review Board as well as court approval mdash then the merger is expected to be...”
“...implemented next year...”
“Last week the pair acknowledged that they had been engaged in “exploratory discussions” about a potential merger.”


"The government has limited the spectrum that a single mobile operator can obtain in the auction."
“…… After Vodafone and Hutchison Whampoa, its owner, restructured its existing debt arrangement, it will pay in installments at the end of January... "
"The combined group will be 49.9% owned by TPG shareholders and 50.1% owned by VHA shareholders: Vodafone and Hutchison Telecommunications Australia."
"The new group listed on the Australian Stock Exchange will be named TPG Telecom Limited, with a market share of about 20% in the mobile market and 22% in the fixed broadband market in Australia."
The new company will have a total of 6.4 million mobile users and 1.9 million fixed broadband users
"The group will have an implied enterprise value of $15 billion, revenue of $6.02 billion and EBITDA of $1.86 billion."
TPG and VHA have entered into a plan execution deed, which is unanimously supported by TPG's board of directors
"If the transaction goes through a series of approval procedures, including TPG shareholder voting, signing by the Australian Competition and Consumer Commission and foreign investment review board, and court approval, then the merger is expected to be..."
“… Implementation next year... "
"Last week, the two admitted that they had been having 'exploratory discussions' about a possible merger."



**Something goes wrong**
“The judge said, “If the minor children remain closed down to their father and depending on the circumstances surrounding this condition, it may result in a reduction of the time they spend with [Jolie] and may result in the Court ordering primary physical custody to [Pitt].””
“If Angelina does not allow her children to spend more time with Brad, she may lose primary custody.”
“Because Maddox is older, he will get to decide how much time he spends with his father.”
“Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 12 and nine year old twins Vivienne and Knox while they are in London where Angelina is shooting Maleficent 2”
“She also must arrange a call between the kids and their doctors so it can be explained to them that the court has determined that each of them are safe with their father A visitation schedule has been laid out for Brad to spend time with the kids Maddox 16”
“She is not allowed to read text messages between him and the children.”
“Angelina must give Brad the cell phone numbers for each child and he is allowed to call them whenever he wants.”
“A judge in the former couple’s divorce case says that the children “not having a relationship with their father is harmful to them” and “it is critical that each of them have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother,” according to The Blast.”
“Brad Pitt will be getting visitation time with his children this summer as a judge has ordered Angelina Jolie to repair his relationship with their six kids.”


"If these minor children are still not open to their father, and as the case may be, it may reduce the time they spend with (Julie) and may lead to the court ordering (Pete) to obtain primary actual custody," the judge said
"If Angelina doesn't allow her children to spend more time with Brad, she may lose primary custody."
"Because Maddox is old, he has to decide the time with his father."
"Parks 14, Zahara 13, Shiloh 12 and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox are in London, and Angelina is shooting maleficent 2"
"She also had to arrange a phone call between the children and their doctor so that she could explain to them that the court had determined that each of them was safe with their father. A visit schedule has been set up for Brad to stay with the children, Maddox 16
"She's not allowed to read messages between him and the child."
"Angelina has to give Brad each child's mobile number, and he can call them at any time."
"A judge in the previous couple's divorce case said that the children 'have no relationship with their father, which is harmful to them' and that 'it is vital that each of them maintain a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother," the source said
"Brad Pitt will have time to visit his children this summer because the judge has ordered Angelina Jolie to repair his relationship with their six children."



**Something goes wrong**
“She has been doing a lot of crying on Keith’s shoulder.’”
“‘With all the commotion caused by her appearance on The Bachelorette, Sophie has been thinking about getting out of Australia for a while.”
“‘They met in Los Angeles when Sophie was trying to forge a career in Hollywood, and they have stayed friendly over the years,’ says an insider.”
“And it seems she’s turned to four-time Grammy winner Keith to help make her singing dreams come true.”
“Sources tell New Idea that the 38-year-old blonde has decided to put her search for Mr Right on hold after her failed romance with Stu, and is now focusing on reviving her music career in 2018.”


"She's been crying on Keith's shoulder."
"Sophie's appearance in Bachelor caused a stir. She has been thinking about leaving Australia for some time."
"They met in Los Angeles, when Sophie was trying to start a business in Hollywood, and they've been friendly for years," one insider said
"It seems that she has turned to four time Grammy winner Keith to help her realize her dream of singing."
"It is reported that the 38 year old blonde has decided to postpone her search for the right one after her failed relationship with stu and is now working to revive her music career in 2018."



**Something goes wrong**
“A post shared by Christian Slater (@realchristianslater) on Nov 16, 2016 at 11:11am PSTGrades: Glenn Close A; Film BOscar Potential: A probable Best Actress nomination for Close if the film finds distribution in time.”
“Björn Runge a Swedish director making his first English language film doesn t find many ways to visualize all of the drama it s mostly two or more characters arguing in rooms planes or hotels but he s great with the actors who all deliver in this adaptation of Meg...”
“An abdriged version of this review was originally published in Nathaniel's column at Towleroad.”
“Film festivals nearly always provide curious dialogues between films that you weren't expecting.”
“On the same day on the exact same screen at TIFF I managed to see two films about female writers and the male writers in their lives who take up all the oxygen (and praise) in the room.”
“Who would have thought that a film about the origins of Frankenstein (just discussed) and a star vehicle for Glenn Close in Stockholm would have so much in common?”
“THE WIFE (Björn Runge)Joan Castleman (Glenn Close) is a longsuffering wife who would bristle at that very description.”
“She's married to a famous novelist Joe Castleman (Jonathan Pryce) and their homophonic names are no coincidence.”
“The silver-haired couple have been together for nearly half a century and are inseparable if not quite interchangeable...As The Wife begins we learn that Joe has just been named the Nobel prize winner in literature and the couple are to travel to Stockholm together for the ceremony.”
“They're so happy they actually jump on their bed together in a singularly charming scene.”


"Christian Slater (@ realcristianslater) shared a post at 11:11 a.m. on November 16, 2016: Glenn Close a; film boscar potential: if the film can be released in time, it may be nominated for best actress in close."
"BJ ó RN Runge is a Swedish director. His first English film didn't find many ways to visualize all the plays - mainly two or more characters quarreling in a room, a plane or a hotel - but he was very good at working with the actors, who were adaptations of MEG..."
"An abridged version of this review was originally published in Nathaniel's column at towroad."
"Film festivals almost always offer interesting conversations between films you don't expect."
"On the same day, on the same screen of tiff, I successfully saw two films about female writers and male writers, whose lives occupied all the oxygen (and praise) in the room."
"Who would have thought that a film about the origin of Frankenstein (just discussed) and a Glenn cross star vehicle in Stockholm would have so much in common?"
"Wife (Bjorn Langer) Joan castelman (Glenn cross) is a long-term patient wife, and she will be furious at this description."
"She married the famous novelist Joe casterman (Jonathan price), and their homophonic names are no coincidence."
"This silver haired couple has been together for nearly half a century. If they can't completely swap, they are inseparable When his wife started, we learned that Joe had just been named the Nobel Prize winner for literature and that the couple would go to Stockholm to attend the wedding together
"They were so happy that they jumped on the bed together. The scene was very charming."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Or will he play her all over again?”
“Now, a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that the former co-stars used to be ‘friends with benefits’ but Jared wouldn’t commit.”
“Here’s what we know!”
“It’s hard to imagine a better looking couple than Brangelina, but since Angelina Jolie, 41, and Brad Pitt, 53, are officially over we have to open our minds to seeing her with someone else.”
“And if that someone else is Jared Leto, 45, we’re not mad at it.”
“We absolutely loved them in Alexander and who could forget Girl, Interrupted.”
“But it tuns out these two shared more than just the screen.”
““Jared and Angelina had a very casual relationship years and years ago, it was a friends with benefits situation,” a source tells HollywoodLife.comSo, why didn’t they ever get serious?”
“According to our source Jared was just too much of a player.”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Or will he play her again?"
"Now, a source told us that Hollywood Life exclusive reported that the former co star used to be a 'friend with interests', but Jared would not promise
"We know that!"
"It's hard to imagine a more beautiful couple than brengelina, but since Angelina Jolie, 41, officially broke up with Brad Pitt, 53, we have to open up to see her with other people."
"If it's Jared Leto, 45, we won't be angry."
"We absolutely love them in Alexandria and who can forget the girl, interrupted."
"But it turns out that these two people share more than just the screen."
A source told reporters: "many years ago, Jared and Angelina had a very casual relationship. It was a friendly relationship with interests." Why haven't they ever been serious? "
"According to our sources, Jared is too many players."



**Something goes wrong**
“Click here to upload yours.”
“We pay for videos too.”
“Co-star Rick Hoffman recalls offering some sage advice when she confessed her new flame was in fact royalty.”
“4 Rick Hoffman remembers being stunned by the extraordinary news Credit: Getty - ContributorHoffman said: “I had gotten the news early and I was like, you’ve got to be kidding me?”
““It was like both of us in the trailer, just kind of like ‘you’re dating a prince?’…and then I was just like take it slow, be careful, don’t let him hurt you.”The actor made the revelation as he was interviewed on NBC News’ TODAY.”
“Along with Meghan’s former Suits stars, Gina Torres, Sarah Rafferty, Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb, he was speaking live from an exclusive location overlooking Windsor Castle.”
“4 Meghan Markle starred as Rachel Zane in the law series Suits Credit: AFP or licensorsMeghan's other co-star Sarah Rafferty said at the time the cast were very close.”
“She said: “We called ourselves the sister wives…we were with each other for longer than we went to college or high school with our friends so we became family.”
“"We’re still family so this is a wonderful family affair.”4 Courting couple...”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle Credit Getty Images Getty 4 Suits co stars Sarah Rafferty Gina Torres and Rick Hoffman interviewed in Windsor MOST READ IN NEWS TRUCKING HELL Mum finds terrifying Huntsman spider guarding 200 BABIES in son s toy truck BABY BOOMER Mum of 11 is so addicted...”


"Click here to upload your."
"We also pay for video."
"Co star Rick Hoffman recalled that when she admitted that her new lover was actually a member of the royal family, she made some wise suggestions."
Rick Hoffman remembers being stunned by this extraordinary piece of news: Getty's contributor Hoffman said, "I got the news early, and I think you must be kidding?"
"It's like we're in the trailer, like, 'are you dating the prince? "Then I want to take my time and be careful not to let him hurt you." The actor revealed the news in an interview with NBC news today
"With Megan's former suit stars Gina Torres, Sarah Lafferty, Savannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb, he was broadcast live from an exclusive location overlooking Windsor Castle."
"4 Megan Marcel played Rachel Zane in the legal series: the cast was very close at the time," said Sarah Lafferty, another co star of AFP or licensing agent smegan
"We call ourselves sister wives We spent more time together than we did in college or high school with our friends, so we became a family
"We're still a family, so it's a wonderful family event." Pursuing lovers
"Prince Harry and Megan markel credit Getty pictures Getty 4 suit co stars Sarah Ferdinand Torres and Rick Hoffman in Windsor for the most read news truck hell mom finds the terrible Hunter spider guarding 200 babies in the son's toy truck baby boom generation 11 year old mom is so addicted..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Hopefully Kanye can learn to tolerate Tristan as long as Khloé has decided to give him another shot!”
“Kendall already seems to be dating her own baller, 76ers player Ben Simmons.”
“"He told Khloé that her sister Kendall is looking up to her and that by getting rid of Tristan she’d be setting a strong example," said the source.”
“Yeezy thinks that Khloé staying with Tristan will give her younger sisters the wrong idea.”
“If you don’t ball like him or Kobe, guarantee that b—h gon’ leave you," he said, which made it seem like he thought KoKo was only staying with TT because of his career.”
““All these thots on Christian Mingle, that’s what almost got Tristan single.”
“Yeezy definitely has a sore spot when it comes to ballers (Kim married one before him, after all) an he even rapped about Khloé's situation on his new album, Ye.”
“However, the source said she didn't "go in on him too much" because it was still his special day.”
“"Obviously Khloé was offended and gave Ye a piece of her mind."”
“"He asked how many times does she want to be heartbroken," the insider continued.”


"I hope Kanye can learn to tolerate Tristan, as long as Heroe decides to give him another chance!"
"Kendall seems to be dating his 76ers player Ben Simmons
"He told Heroe that her sister Kendall respected her and that she would set a strong example to get rid of Tristan," the source said
"Yeezy thinks that khlo é and Tristan together will make her sisters think the wrong way."
"If you don't play like him or Kobe, make sure B-H leaves you," he said, which made him feel like coco stayed at TT just because of his career
"Christine Minger's Thongs almost made Tristan single."
"When it comes to ballet dancers, there must be a pain in Jesse (after all, king married one before him), and he even mentions the situation of Heroe in his new album Jesse."
"However, the source said that she was not" too close to him "because that day was still his special day."
"It's clear that Heroe was offended. She said a word to you."
"He asked her how many times she wanted to be sad," the insider continued



**Something goes wrong**
“Another source reportedly said that Affleck was “happy all weekend.”“He spent a lot of time at the family house," the insider added.”
“"They had a great time."”
“"They spent it as a family unit -- all for the kids," a source told People on Monday.”
“Recently, it was reported that Affleck and Garner spent Thanksgiving together along with their three children and Affleck’s side of the family.”
“...and that their characters get physically intimate in the movie...”
“Ben Affleck Sienna Miller Caught Kissing According to Radar Online Affleck and Miller had quite the chemistry However the two were only shooting for their upcoming movie Live By Night Gossip Cop dismissed Radar Online s report saying that Garner was 100 percent aware that Affleck was shooting with Miller...”
“Radar Online had carried a report Monday with the headline: “Does Jennifer Know?”
“Jennifer Garner was not upset after Ben Affleck and Sienna Miller, his co-star in “Live By Night,” were photographed together kissing, Gossip Cop reported Tuesday.”


According to another source, Affleck "had a great weekend." "He spent a lot of time at home," the person familiar with the matter added
"They had a good time."
"They spend money as a family unit - all for the children," a source told people on Monday
Recently, it was reported that Affleck and Ghana spent Thanksgiving with their three children and the Affleck family
“… And their characters are physically intimate in the movie... "
"According to radar online, Ben Affleck Sienna Miller was caught kissing. There was a considerable chemical reaction between Affleck and Miller, but the two were just filming for the upcoming film" live at night ". Police refuted radar online's report, saying Ghana knew 100% that Affleck and Miller were shooting together..."
Radar online ran a report on Monday with the headline: "does Jennifer know?"
Jennifer Garner was not upset after being photographed kissing together in Ben Affleck and Sienna Miller's live by night, gossip police reported on Tuesday



**Something goes wrong**
“Funny there's no dad-shaming.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“And to think, Taylor and her “friend” Kanye’s united front at the VMAs, #yeezy2020, and Kanye’s flower delivery happened just last year!”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”
“...your fame...”
“As the first woman to win Album of the Year at the Grammys twice I want to say to all the young women out there there are going to be people along the way who are going to try to undercut your success or take credit for your accomplishments or...”
“At the Grammys later that month, Taylor delivered a speech likely meant for Kanye.”
“Kanye later explained in a series of tweets that the idea initially came from Taylor, that they had an “hour long convo” about the lyric, and that the song got Kim’s blessing.”


"Funny, there's no father to lose face."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
Think about Taylor and her "friend" Kanye in the united front of Vmas. Kanye's flower delivery took place last year
"This content was imported from YouTube."
“… Your reputation... "
"As the first woman to win the album of the year award twice at Grammy, I want to say to all young women that along the way there will be some people trying to undermine your success, or win glory for your achievements, or..."
"At the Grammy Awards later that month, Taylor delivered a speech that was likely to be written to Kanye."
"Kanye later explained on a series of tweets that the idea first came from Taylor, who had a 'one hour team' about the lyrics, and the song was blessed by Kim Jong Il."



**Something goes wrong**
“But if you talk about my dad, I will cut you.”Despite their estrangement, in April of last year Kardashian West told Ellen Degeneres that she would “always love her” for helping raise her and her sisters.”
““I was just trying to be respectful.”
““My relationship with Caitlyn was strained,” the mother of three said during the episode, which aired October of last year.”
“Simpson was guilty of having killed wife Nicole Brown Simpson and waiter Ron Goldman — despite having served as the NFL star’s defense attorney in his 1994 murder trial.”
“In an episode of KUWTK, the KKW Beauty mogul also revealed that she had been hurt by a chapter in the memoir in which Jenner implied that her late father Robert Kardashian thought his friend O.J.”
“Although Kardashian West publicly supported Jenner’s journey, she cut ties after reading her book, which alleged Kris Jenner — Caitlyn’s ex-wife and Kim’s mom — knew more about her gender identity crisis than she’s admitted.”
“Kim, I haven't talked to in a year," Jenner said while discusing her memoir at the U.K.’s Cambridge Union, according to Cambridge News.”
“"To be honest, I don't talk to [the Kardashians] anymore.”
“Last November, Jenner revealed she hadn’t spoken to Kim Kardashian West in a year.”


"But if you talk about my father, I'll cut you off." Despite their estrangement, last April, Kardashian West told Ellen DeGeneres that she would "always love her" because she helped raise her and her sisters
"I just want to show respect."
"I have a very tense relationship with Caitlin," the mother of three said in a broadcast last October
"Simpson is guilty of killing his wife Nicole Brown Simpson and waiter Ron Goldman - even though he served as a defense lawyer for the NFL star in the 1994 murder trial."
In an episode of kutke, the kkw beauty tycoon also revealed that she was hurt by a chapter in her memoir, in which Jenner hinted that her late father, Robert Kardashian, thought his friend O.J
"Although Kardashian West openly supported Jenner's journey, she broke off contact after reading her book, which says that Chris Jenner, Caitlin's ex-wife and Kim's mother, knows more about her gender identity crisis than she admits."
"Kim, I haven't talked about it in a year." According to Cambridge news, Jenner said in a memoir of the Cambridge Union in the UK.
"To tell you the truth, I won't talk to (the kardashians any more."
"Last November, Jenner revealed that she had not spoken to Kim Kardashian West for a year."



**Something goes wrong**
“Kardashian stars in her own show, Revenge Body, to inspire others to follow her healthy lifestyle.”
““Tristan lives and breathes nutrition as well as fitness and he’s put himself in charge of Khloe’s entire diet.”Gossip Cop speculated that “most” of the report is likely not true.”
“...to the source the NBA star has provided a great influence when it comes to helping Khloe get back on track with a nutritional diet...”
“Khloe was snacking really badly on Kettle chips chocolate chip cookies and ice cream While it might sound harsh for Kardashian s baby daddy to force her to avoid her favorite fattening foods the insider clarified that Thompson doesn t want her to beat up on herself by overindulging According...”
“The source also shared what Kardashian was enjoying before Tristan’s diet intervention.”
“But he is so into nutrition and fitness that he is now supervising Khloe’s diet and exercise.”
“The insider revealed that Thompson knows of Kardashian’s fondness for fattening foods.”
“Khloe Kardashian Gives Up Revenge Body Weight Loss For Baby?”
“Refusing to indulge Kardashian, Tristan has created a new routine for Khloe after putting himself in charge of her diet, according to the source.”
“But it’s not easy for Khloe, who craves fattening foods, added the insider.”


"Kardashian plays in her own show vengeance, inspiring others to follow her healthy lifestyle."
"Tristan's life and breathing, nutrition and fitness, he put himself in charge of Khloe's entire diet." The police speculated that "most" of the reports may be untrue
“… For sources, NBA stars have played a huge role in helping Khloe recover from a nutritious diet... "
"Khloe is eating very bad kettles, chips, chocolate biscuits and ice cream, which may sound harsh. Kardashian's little father forced her to avoid her favorite fattening food. To clarify, Thompson didn't want her to play her own overindulgence according to..."
"The source also shared Kardashian's enjoyment before Tristan's dietary intervention."
"But he's very committed to nutrition and fitness, and now he's monitoring Khloe's diet and exercise."
"Thompson knows that Kardashian likes fattening food," people familiar with the matter said
"Kardashian gave up revenge weight loss for her baby?"
According to sources, Tristan refused to indulge Kardashian, and after leaving herself in charge of her diet, she developed a new routine for Chloe
"But it's not easy for Khloe, who craves fat food," the source added



**Something goes wrong**
“Back in January, Kidman ate a four-course meal of bugs with chopsticks on Vanity Fair’s “Secret Talent Theatre.”After eating her first course of hornworms, Kidman says “Two billion people in the world eat bugs and I’m one of them.””
“Image zoom Nicole Kidman | Credit: Steve Granitz/WireImageInterestingly, there’s a reason Kidman is so comfortable around bugs — she eats them.”
“Catch and release… spider released unharmed and healthy ❤️Happy Sunday,” Kidman captioned the image.”
““House guest!”
“Despite getting caught, the spider was very lucky as the star opted to release it rather than kill it.”
““I’m having to take care of this spider, help,” Kidman says at the end of the video.”
“The other then yells, “It’s a tarantula, right mom?”Showing her laidback Australian attitude towards creepy crawlies, Kidman then turns the camera to face her, showing fans she has the spider trapped inside a glass.”
“Step back!” one of the girls shouts.”
““Get back, mom!”
“In the clip posted to Instagram, Kidman’s daughters Faith Margaret, 7, and Sunday Rose, 10, can be heard screaming in horror as she approached the eight-legged creature with no apprehension.”


"As early as January, Kidman ate a four course insect meal with chopsticks on Vanity Fair's Secret talent theater. After eating the first dish of hornworms, Kidman said, "there are two billion people in the world who eat worms, and I'm one of them."
"Image zooming Nicole Kidman | image source: Steve granitz / wire images interestingly, Kidman is comfortable with worms for a reason - she eats worms."
"Seize and release The spider was released unharmed ❤️ "Happy Sunday," Kidman wrote under the title of the picture
"Tenant!"
"Despite being caught, the spider was very lucky because the star chose to release it rather than kill it."
"I have to take care of this spider, help," Kidman said at the end of the video
Another yelled, "this is a tarantula, isn't it, mom?"? "Showed her lazy Australian attitude towards creepy reptiles, and then Kidman turned to her and showed fans how she trapped spiders in the glass."
"Back up! "Cried one of the girls."
"Come back, mom!"
"In the clip posted on instagram, Kidman's daughters, 7-year-old faith Margaret and 10-year-old Sunday rose, can be heard screaming in horror as they approach the Eight Legged animal without scruple."



**Something goes wrong**
““He wants to do a couture line with her and get her back to icon status.”Are vials of blood about to be back in fashion?”
““Angelina is the most beautiful woman in the world, and it kills Tomto see her in these depressing all-black ensembles and dowdy red carpet gowns,” says the source.”
“Now he’s ready to make the newly single actress his latest project.”
“Tom was the mastermind behind Gucci and Saint Laurent before launching his own line,and has gone on to direct two Oscar-nominated flicks, A Single Man and Nocturnal Animals.”
““With all the drama around her and Brad Pitt, Angelina feels like a huge outsider right now,and she knows Tom is the industry It Guy,” tattles a fashion insider.”
“Angelina Jolie is ready to get her groove back and is enlisting fashion guru Tom Ford to help!”
“...has lost her sparkle but can the fashion guru get her back on track...”
“Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Angelina Jolie Begs Tom Ford For Help Resurrecting Her Career Angelina Jolie Begs Tom Ford For Help Resurrecting Her Career Angelina Jolie Begs Tom Ford For Help Resurrecting Her Career The star...”


"He wants to build a fashion production line with her and let her return to the status of an idol." Will bottles of blood become popular again? "
"Angelina is the most beautiful woman in the world, and seeing her in these depressing all black suits and shabby red carpet dresses is killing Tom," the source said
"Now he's going to make this new single actress his latest work."
"Before launching his own series, Tom was behind Gucci and Saint Laurent and directed two Oscar nominated films, bachelor and night animals."
"There are all kinds of dramas between Angelina and Brad Pitt. She now feels like a huge outsider. She knows Tom is an it expert in the industry," a fashion insider said in a post
Angelina Jolie is ready to get back in shape. She's enlisting fashion guru Tom Ford for help
“… Lost her light, but can fashion masters get her back on track... "
"Click Share on twitter open in new window click Share on Facebook open in new window Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career Angelina Jolie asks Tom Ford to help her recover her career star..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Idk.” Either way, the event did seem like the party of the year!”
“When there are moms that can even afford formula that you could give to?”
“See here how they creatively sought help.”
“Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Tristan Thompson, 27, are on a major time crunch!”
“The duo have yet to come up with a name for their baby daughter, and, considering Khloe is due to give birth later this month, they have to settle on something — and fast!”
“Feeling the pressure, the parents-to-be decided to solicit help from guests at their baby shower on March 10.”
“While we know the idea isn’t particularly original or unique, it’s definitely brilliant — and who knows, maybe they found a gem in the suggestion box!”
“Click here to see pics of Khloe Kardashian’s maternity style.”
“As evident from the below photo, which Khloe posted via Instagram Stories, the expectant mom asked guests to write down their name ideas during the lavish party.”
“Placed on a round table along with pink roses and markers, was a card reading, “Help Khloe find a name for Baby Thompson.” And you know what — it might just work!”


“Idk。” Anyway, this event is really like the Party of the year! "
"When there are mothers who can afford the formula you can give them?"
"See how they creatively ask for help."
"Khloe Kardashian, 33, and Tristan Thompson, 27, are in a major time crunch!"
"The two haven't named their little daughter yet, and given that Khloe will give birth later this month, they have to solve some problems as soon as possible!"
"Under pressure, the parents to be decided to ask for help at the baby shower on March 10."
"Although we know that this idea is not particularly original or unique, it is absolutely wonderful - who knows, maybe they found a gem in the suggestion box!"
"Click here for a picture of Khloe Kardashian's maternal style."
"It's obvious from the photo below that Khloe posted this photo through instagram stories. The expectant mother asked her guests to write down her name at a luxurious party."
On a round table was a card that said, "give Chloe a name for baby Thompson." You know, it might work! "



**Something goes wrong**
““This one is.”Watch the first clip above and additional clips below:Julianne Moore Describes Meeting A Brooding 12-Year-Old Kristen StewartKristen Stewart’s Advice For Picking Roles: Don’t Be ‘So Fame Obsessed’”
“...on Sunday...”
“Since then she has starred in projects with smaller fan bases including Still Alice and Guantanamo Bay drama Camp X Ray Also Read Camp X Ray Review Kristen Stewart Goes to Gitmo Without a Script Movies can be important Stewart said of Still Alice which netted Moore a Golden Globe...”
“But after an alleged romantic indiscretion with her “Snow White and the Huntsman” director Rupert Sanders was caught on camera and Stewart and Pattinson broke up, the actress suddenly found herself at the heart of a media frenzy.”
“Her real life love affair with co-star Pattinson captured the heart of “Twilight’s” legion of passionate fans.”
“...s daughter in the 2002 David Fincher film Panic Room didn t become a household name until starring as Bella opposite Taylor Lautner and Robert Pattinson in the film adaptations of Stephenie Meyer s Twilight novels...”
“Luckily she believes people know the difference between fact and fiction and is banking on her fans taking the media with a whole big boulder of salt Also Read OscarWrap Julianne Moore Still a Contender Still Brilliant in Still Alice The actress who got her big break as Jodie Foster...”
““There is like, you know, a whole other form of entertainment that is just voraciously consumed,” she said.”
“The conversation also hit on other topics, including Stewart’s broodiness as a 12-year-old and how the world flocks to tabloid gossip stories that she’s featured in.”
“Moore s struggle with Alzheimer s disease which is slowly corrupting her mind and threatens to tear apart her family...”


"This one is." Watch the first clip above and others below: Julian Moore describes her advice on character selection when she meets a contemplative 12-year-old Kristen Stewart: don't be "so obsessed with fame and fortune"
“… Sunday... "
"Since then, the projects she starred in have a small fan base, including" still life Alice "and" Guantanamo Bay "series" summer camp X-ray ". She has also read the comments on" summer camp X-ray ". Christine Stewart went to the Gitmo film without a script. It's very important that Stewart said" still life Alice "won Moore the Golden Globe Award..."
"But after the alleged romantic faux pas with snow white and the hunter director Rupert Sanders was filmed and Stewart and Pattinson broke up, the actress suddenly found herself in a media frenzy."
"Her real love with CO star Pattinson captured the hearts of many fans of twilight."
“… In 2002, David finch's daughter didn't become a household name in the movie panic room until starring Bella opposite Taylor Lautner and Robert Pattinson in the film adaptation of Stephanie Meyer's Twilight novel
"Fortunately, she believes that people know the difference between fact and fiction, and expects her fans to use a big piece of salt to attract the media. After reading the Oscar, Julianne Moore is still a competitor. She is still brilliant in Alice, and actress Judy foster has made a big breakthrough..."
"You know, there's a completely different form of entertainment, and people just consume greedily," she said
"There are other topics involved in this conversation, including Stewart's depression when she was 12 years old, and how the world flocked to follow her tabloid gossip stories."
"Moore is fighting against Alzheimer's disease, which is slowly eroding her mind and threatening her family..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Whilst you're here, check out the moment Taylor called out Ed for peacocking...”
“Download Our Free App For All The Latest News!”
“Latest Quotes Reveal Joe Alwyn Is 'The One'It seems Taylor Swift is 'Ready For It' as engagement rumours surge following new reports that she's 'ready for him to put a ring on it'...”
“Even though they've kept their relationship on the DL for the most part, we're totally shipping Taylor Swift and Joe Alwyn.”
“It emerged recently that Taylor had been spending a lot of time with Joe living in London and stories about how she managed to go undetected had us cracking up!”
“> This Is How Much It'd Cost To Go To Every Single Taylor Swift 'Reputation Tour' DateBut is Taylor Swift about to get engaged?”
“Here's what we know so far...Is Taylor Swift Engaged?”
“Rumours of Taylor Swift being 'unofficially engaged' to her boyfriend Joe Alwyn surfaced after a source revealed that the pair had been creating engagement rings.”
“(GIF: Giphy)Speaking to NW, the source revealed, “They’ve been unofficially engaged for a couple of months now.”
“Taylor wants to announce the news once they’ve settled on the perfect engagement ring."”


"When you're here, look at the moment when Tyler told ed to show off..."
"Download our free app and get all the latest news!"
"The latest quote shows that Joe Alvin is" the man. ". Taylor Swift seems to be "ready" because there are new reports that she is "ready to let him wear the ring", and engagement rumors have proliferated... "
"Although they're keeping their relationship on DL most of the time, we're just shipping Tyler swift and Joe Alvin."
"It's been reported recently that Taylor and Joe have been living in London for a long time, and the story of how she managed not to be found makes us angry!"
"> it's the cost of Taylor Swift's every reputation tour, but is Taylor Swift engaged?"
"This is what we know so far Is Taylor Swift engaged? "
"The rumor of Taylor Swift's' informal engagement 'to her boyfriend Joe Alvin surfaced after a source revealed that they had been making an engagement ring."
“（ GIF:Giphy ）In an interview with NW, the source revealed, "they have been engaged unofficially for several months."
"Tyler wants to announce this when they find the perfect engagement ring."



Number  545
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“It would be great from the kids’ perspective.”Unfortunately for Depp, sources revealed that the mother of Lily-Rose, 18, and Jack, 15 has moved on with French writer Samuel Benchetrit.”
““We all are.”
““I’m rooting for them to get back together,” Rassel added.”
“He soon stepped out with Heard, and the two wed in 2015 — but the marriage ended one year later amid the actress’ domestic abuse claims and substance abuse allegations.”
“As Radar reported, Depp ended his 14-year relationship to the mother of his children in 2012.”
“She’ll always stand by him,” echoed Heather Rassel, who was married to Depp’s nephew Billy Rassel and remains close to the family.”
““She’s about the only person who can keep him in check, and the only person he really listens to.”“Vanessa has been there for Johnny throughout this entire thing.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"It's great from the children's point of view." Unfortunately, for Depp, sources have revealed that the mothers of 18-year-old Lily Rose and 15-year-old Jack have already lived with French writer Samuel benchtrett
"We are all."
"I support their reconciliation," Russell added
"He quickly came out with Hurd and they got married in 2015 - but a year later, the marriage ended because of the actress's domestic abuse and drug abuse charges."
"According to radar, Depp ended a 14-year relationship with his mother in 2012."
"She will always support him," echoed Heather Russell, who married Depp's nephew, Billy Russell, and was close to her family
"She is the only one who can control him, and the only one who is really obedient to him." "Vanessa's been with Johnny the whole time."



**Something goes wrong**
“Haven quickly receded from Jolie’s public life, and within weeks, she wed her Pushing Tin co-star Billy Bob Thornton, who was then engaged to actress Laura Dern.”
“It was too weird, even by Hollywood standards.”
““It’s Bad Dad vs. St. Ange,” Morton says.”
“...own self created myth that of depraved Hollywood hellion turned St Angelina humanitarian nonpareil...”
“Her mother would freeze out people for whatever reason and now Angie has frozen out Brad who was far more dignified and just issued a quiet statement By so publicly disparaging the father of her children some old enough to read what s being said online Jolie is endangering her...”
““The whole thing seems very impetuous,” says Jolie’s biographer, Andrew Morton.”
“People have come to ­admire her, but they love him.”
“Video reportedly exists of the plane incident, and no physical altercation is said to have occurred.”
“Strategically, Jolie seems miles ahead of Pitt, but she may lose the long game.”
“Angelina Jolie, who at 41 has masterfully manipulated the media for over two decades.”


HARVIN quickly emerged from Julie's public life. Within weeks, she married her partner, Billy Bob Thornton, who was later engaged to actress Laura Dean
"It's strange, even by Hollywood standards."
"It's bad dad to St. Angie," Morton said
“… The myth created by myself, the fallen Hollywood Hell has become St. Angelina's humanist non Parel... "
"No matter what the reason, her mother would turn people away. Now Angie has turned Brad away. Brad is much more dignified than her. She just issued a quiet statement publicly slandering the children's father. Some of the children are old enough to read that Julie is endangering her on the Internet..."
"The whole thing seems very impetuous," said Andrew Morton, Julie's biographer
"People began to admire her, but they loved him."
"It is reported that video of the plane incident already exists and there is no alleged physical conflict."
"Strategically, Julie seems to be a few miles ahead of Pete, but she may lose this long game."
"Angelina Jolie, 41, has been manipulating the media for more than 20 years."



**Something goes wrong**
“Also on HuffPost...”
“They went on to star in "Wanderlust" together in 2010 and officially came out as a couple in 2011, US magazine reports.”
“Aniston and Theroux first met back in 2007 on the set of "Tropic Thunder," which Theroux co-wrote with her "Along Came Polly" costar Ben Stiller.”
“It’s just one of those things that’s a shorthand for describing who I am,” he explained.”
““It doesn’t really get under my skin.”
“Despite having his own successful career as an actor, director, and screenwriter, Theroux is often referred to as "Mr. Jennifer Aniston" in the media, but he doesn't look at the nickname as an insult that others may take it to be.”
“#gogirl A photo posted by @justintheroux on Jul 13, 2016 at 5:25am PDTIn his sit-down interview with The Sunday Times, the 45-year-old "Leftovers" star went on to call his wife a "proper badass" adding, "it’s an honour to stand behind her."”
“#wcw Here's just one reason why.”
“Theroux showed his support of the opinion piece by sharing the link to it on his Instagram page with the caption: #wcw Here's just one reason why.”
“Earlier this year, Aniston wrote a powerful piece about body shaming and pregnancy pressures for The Huffington Post.”


"Also in hofpost..."
According to American magazine, they starred in "vagabond" together in 2010 and officially became lovers in 2011
Aniston and Cyrus met for the first time in 2007, when Cyrus co authored the film with her "here comes Polly" partner Ben Stiller
"It's just a shorthand to describe who I am," he explained
"It didn't really get into my skin."
"Despite his successful career as an actor, director and screenwriter, serrux is often referred to in the media as" Mr. Jennifer Aniston, "but he does not see the nickname as an insult that others might think."
“# gogirl@justintheroux In a photo released at 5:25 a.m. on July 13, 2016, in an interview with the Sunday Times, the 45 year old "leftover girl" star went on to call her wife a "real villain" and added: "it's an honor to stand behind her."
"There's only one reason."
"Theroux shared a link to this review on instagram with the title: # WCW, that's just one of the reasons."
Earlier this year, Aniston wrote an article for the Huffington Post about physical humiliation and pregnancy stress



**Something goes wrong**
“There’s no saying if the “Sorry” crooner and Gomez left with a sugar high.”
“Despite both being able to legally consume alcohol, The Biebs, 23, and Gomez, 25, shared a virgin version of the Ocean Blue Goblet.”
““They seemed to have a great time,” a source told Page Six on Monday.”
“The on-again couple were spotted holding hands while hanging out with some pals.”
“Page Six has learned that Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez took a trip to Seattle and stopped by Sugar Factory, Bellevue, this weekend with two friends.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Dates are always sweeter when there’s candy involved.”


"If the 'sorry' minstrel and Gomez leave with high sugar, it's not known."
"Although both can legally drink, Bibbs, 23, and Gomez, 25, share a virgin version of the aquamarine goblet."
"They seem to have a good time," one source told page 6 on Monday
"The couple was once again found holding hands with some friends."
"Page 6 tells us that Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez are on a trip to Seattle. This weekend, they went to Bellevue sugar factory with two friends."
"Click send this message to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) when it comes to candy, the date is always sweeter."



**Something goes wrong**
““The judge made a thoughtful and informed decision that the children were in no danger while with Brad.””
““He was done being Mr. Nice Guy and rolled the dice.”“The judge could have sided with Angie, but that didn’t happen,” the source added.”
““The kids are being used as pawns,” said the source.”
“The latest spat, according to the Daily Mail, revolves around the former couple’s 12-year-old daughter Shiloh and 9-year-old son Knox.”
“Jolie wanted them to appear on the “Maleficent” sequel, which she is currently filming in London.”
“Vivienne, Knox’s twin sister, appeared in the 2014 original Disney movie.”
“But Pitt has shut down the latest cameo idea.”
““He refuses to sign off her plan to include Shiloh and Knox in ‘Maleficent 2,'” the source said.”
“A family court judge recently sided with Pitt and told Jolie to allow him more visitation rights with their children or risk losing primary custody of their six children, which also includes Maddox, 16; Pax, 14; and Zahara, 13.”
“Jolie filed for divorce in 2016.”


"The judge made a thoughtful and wise decision that the children were not in danger when they were with Brad."
"He's no longer a good man. He can only roll dice." "The judge could have been on Angie's side, but that didn't happen," the source added
"The children were taken as pawns," the source said
The latest spat revolved around the couple's 12-year-old daughter Shiloh and 9-year-old son Knox, the Daily Mail reported
Julie wants them to appear in the sequel to viciousness, which she is currently filming in London
"Knox's twin sister Vivian appeared in the original Disney film in 2014."
"But Pete has turned off his latest Cameo idea."
"He refused to sign her plans, including Shiloh and Knox in 'malicious 2,'" the source said
A family court judge recently sided with Pitt and told Julie to allow him more visitation rights to their children or risk losing the primary custody of their six children, including 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks and 13-year-old Zahara
"Julie filed for divorce in 2016."



**Something goes wrong**
“Photo credit: Mega...”
“Photo credit: Mega“Meanwhile, Steve has the golden touch when it comes to TV.”
““There’s no way she was going to put up with Steve hanging around a man-eater like Kris — especially since he’s proven time and again he can’t be trusted!” Photo credit: MegaSteve and Kris, a two-time divorcée, have been buddy-buddy for years.”
“They were pictured here together with Kris beau Corey Gamble (left) during Paris Fashion Week in 2015.”
“They’ve also been seen out in Hollywood on multiple occasions.”
“Photo credit: Getty ImagesKris even brought her brood to “Family Feud.” Still, a TV insider insisted Kris has “no interest in Steve romantically.” Instead, Kris is seeking his advice to boost her own sagging empire!”
““It’s all about business,” the source snitched.”
““She admires his TV success and wants to learn all his secrets!” Photo credit: Getty ImagesAlthough “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” has been a monster hit, the show was created by Ryan Seacrest , and Kris desperately needs guidance to grow her own showbiz brand, according to sources.”
““Kris has tried to produce a long list of shows, but they’ve all been disasters,” the source said.”
“That’s why Kris is looking to him for professional help.” Furious over the “Har-dashian” mind meld, Marjorie got revenge by posting several videos of her working out with her hunky young personal trainer on Instagram.”


"Image source: Mega..."
"Photo source: Mega" at the same time, Steve has a golden charm on TV
"She couldn't have tolerated Steve mixing up with a cannibal like Chris - especially because he's been proven to be untrustworthy over and over again!"! "Photo source: megasteve and Chris, two divorcees, have been good friends for years."
"They were photographed here with Chris Bo Cory Gambo (left) during Paris Fashion Week 2015."
"They've made many appearances in Hollywood, too."
Photo source: Getty Images Kris even brought her children to "family grudges.". However, a television insider insisted that Chris was "not interested in Steve's romance.". Instead, Chris is looking for his advice to push her own declining empire! "
"It's all about business," the source quipped
"She admired his success on TV and wanted to know all his secrets! Photo source: Getty Images although keeping up the kardashians is a blockbuster, created by Ryan Seacrest. According to sources, Chris urgently needs guidance to develop his acting brand
"Chris tried to make a long series of shows, but it was a disaster," the source said
"That's why Chris asked for professional help." Marjorie was angry at the fusion of ideas of "Ha Dashan" and retaliated by posting several videos of her exercising with her handsome young personal trainer on instagram



**Something goes wrong**
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



**Something goes wrong**
“Related: Kris Jenner Finally Opens Up About Her Daughters Pregnancies: "It's Like a Faucet That We Turned On and Won't Turn Off...”
“Then they run through matters of Rob's whole situation with Blac Chyna, Kendall's anxiety issues, and a tarantula before we get to someone murmuring the phrase, "Did you guys hear what's on TMZ?"”
“...time...”
“Yet, the close-knit clan has stubbornly refused to confirm this.”
“Like most open secrets, it's become almost frustrating.”
“More frustrating than those two friends in your circle that everyone knows are secretly dating but refuse to admit it.”
“More frustrating than knowing someone is throwing you a surprise birthday party but not knowing the exact details.”
“More frustrating even than when someone you know keeps saying they're staying out of politics, but occasionally makes vague Facebook status that makes you think they're a secret Trump supporter.”
“Yes, more frustrating than even that.”
“In the process, though, the Kardashian-Jenners have turned the presumably inevitable announcement and their surrounding anticipation into events on their own.”


Related report: Chris Jenner finally disclosed her daughter's pregnancy: "it's like a tap, we turn it on, but we don't turn it off..."
"Then they dealt with the whole situation of rob and Blake chener, Kendall's anxiety, and tarantula, and someone murmured," did you hear the news on TMZ? "
“… Time... "
"However, the close family stubbornly refused to confirm this."
"Like most public secrets, it's almost depressing."
"It's more frustrating than the two friends in your circle who know you're dating in secret but refuse to admit it."
"It's more frustrating than knowing someone's going to have a surprise birthday party for you and not knowing the details."
"It's even more frustrating than people you know who keep saying they're not involved in politics, but occasionally blur their identities on Facebook, making you think they're Trump's Secret supporters."
"Yes, more frustrating than that."
"In the process, however, the Kardashian Jenner couple have turned this possibly inevitable statement and the expectations around them into their own events."



**Something goes wrong**
“He feels like that should be his baby.”AdvertisementCommenters say that Brown should move on.”
“...it...”
“In a typical Rihanna fashion, she laughed off the rumors.”
“According to an insider, the singer is not expecting, and she is not even trying to enter motherhood at the moment.”
“A person, who attended a big event with the couple, explained: “She is not pregnant lol.”
“She was taking shots backstage last night and drinking at the afterparty.”Another source spoke to Hollywood Life and added: “At this point, Rihanna feels like all she can do is laugh off all the pregnancy rumors, in addition to just ignoring them now.”
“She is not pregnant, and she is not even trying to get pregnant either at this point.”Rihanna on her way to 1OAK nightclub ?”
“A post shared by badgalriri (@badgalririr8) on Jan 29, 2018 at 4:15am PSTHowever, there will be little Riri or Hassan in the future.”
“The insider shared: “Would she like children in the future?”
“Yes, but definitely in the future, she is simply not ready to start a family… just yet.”


"He thinks it should be his child." Advertising commentators say Brown should move on
“… It... "
"She laughs off the rumors in a typical Rihanna way."
"According to a person familiar with the matter, the singer doesn't expect that she doesn't even want to be pregnant at the moment."
"She's not pregnant, ha ha," explained a person attending a major event with the couple
"She was taking pictures backstage last night and drinking at a drinking party." Another source told Hollywood Life: "at this point, Rihanna feels that all she can do is laugh off all the pregnancy rumors except now."
"She's not pregnant, and now she doesn't even want to be pregnant." Rihanna is on her way to 1oak night club? "
"Badgalliri (@ badgallir8) shared a post at 4:15 a.m. Pacific Standard Time (PST) on January 29, 2018, but there will be no Riri or Hassan in the future."
"Will she like children in the future?" the insider shared
"Yes, but certainly in the future, she is not ready to start a family Just now. "



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, are you excited about Katy and Rob possibly being a couple?”
“While nothing is confirmed yet on whether or not Rob and Katy are ~official~ we’ll be holding our breath until we find out more about this blossoming romance!”
“Katy Perry and Robert Pattinson were reportedly spotted making out at a restaurant in Los Angeles!”
“Are they a couple?!”
“Get the deets!”
“Are Katy Perry, 33, and Robert Pattinson, 31, dating?”
“They were reportedly spotted kissing during a group dinner on Jan. 26 at Taix French Restaurant in Los Angeles, a witness told Wonderwall.com.”
““They were making out,” an onlooker told the website.”
“The witness also added that their behavior made it seem like they were “totally a couple.” Eek!”
“See pictures of Katy and Rob together here.”


"Hollywood stars, are you excited that Katie and rob may be a couple?"
"It's not sure if rob and Katie are official yet, but we will hold our breath until we find out more about this blooming love!"
Katie Perry and Robert Pattinson are reported to be making out at a restaurant in Los Angeles
"Are they a couple?"
"Get the drugs!"
"Is Katie Perry, 33, dating Robert Pattinson, 31?"
A witness told reporters: "it is reported that they were found kissing at a group dinner at the Tex French restaurant in Los Angeles on January 26 Wonderwall.com Website. "
"They're making out," one bystander told the website
The eyewitness added that their actions made people feel that they were "a perfect couple."
"Look at the pictures of Katie and rob together."



**Something goes wrong**
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Kim and Beyonce’s run in?”
“If only you weren’t so shady,” from her notorious new Kanye diss track “This Is Why We Can’t Have Nice Things, has started to make a bit more sense, huh?”
“Here’s what went down between them at Serena Williams’ wedding.”
“Celebrity feuds have a way of bringing us all together (while tearing famous relationships apart).”
“Whether you’re Team Kimye or not, we can all agree that we’ll be here for whatever drama these stars find themselves in.”
“And hoo boy, do we have some drama to discuss today!”
“As we know, Kanye has beef with JAY-Z, 47, and by association, Beyonce, 36.”
“As we also know, Kim Kardashian, 37, will always stand by her 40-year-old husband and it just so happens that Kim and Beyonce ran into each other for the first time since their husbands started fighting.”
“Kim and Bey came face-to-face at Serena Williams‘ wedding and it was just as awkward as you expected it to be.”
““Beyonce seemed to avoid Kim at Serena’s wedding however they did have an uncomfortable exchange while at the glitzy party,” an eyewitness at the wedding tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Kim and Beyonce's running in?"
"If only you weren't that dark," from her infamous new Kanye diss track, "that's why we can't have good things, it's starting to make sense, right?"
"This is what happened between them at Serena Williams' wedding."
"There's a way for celebrity rivalry to bring us together (and tear apart famous relationships at the same time)," he said
"Whether you are the golden leaf or not, we all agree that no matter what the stars are doing, we will be here."
"Oh, do we have a play to discuss today?"
"As far as we know, Kanye has a relationship with Jay-Z, 47, and Beyonce, 36."
"We also know that Kim Kardashian, 37, will always support her 40 year old husband. It happened that Kim Kardashian and Beyonce collided for the first time after their husband's quarrel."
"Kim and bey are opposite Serena Williams' wedding, just as embarrassed as you think."
A witness at the wedding told reporters: "Beyonce seems to have avoided Kim at Serena's wedding, but they did have an unpleasant exchange at the gorgeous party." Exclusive to Hollywood life



**Something goes wrong**
“Multiple media sources reported that Beckham and his team had targeted the Portuguese star for a move to Miami in "three years' time".”
“Amid a frenzy of speculation, it took less than a week for Cristiano Ronaldo to be connected to Beckham's Miami team.”
“At the time, a year after the footballing star’s retirement, it was greeted with jubilation.”
“We’re trying to do the right thing.”At stake is Beckham’s post-playing future, and the dream of forming a football team in Florida – a dream first announced in 2014.”
“We’re good people.”
““It’s not a nice feeling.”
““This is one of the few times I’ve walked into a room and people have not smiled at me,” he admitted to those gathered, in an attempt to melt the frost.”
“But the former England captain was greeted not with the adoration he usually inspires, but instead with stony faces.”
“Beckham, 43, made his first ever appearance before city officials on Thursday, and presented his idea to the Miami city commission, who will now vote on whether to put it to a referendum on Wednesday.”
“David Beckham will this week find out whether Miami’s residents will be allowed to vote on his long-awaited proposal to found a football team in Florida.”


According to a number of media reports, David and his team are targeting the Portuguese star to move to Miami "in three years."
"In the midst of speculation, it took Cristiano Ronaldo less than a week to get in touch with David's Miami team."
"At that time, a year after the football star retired, people cheered."
"We're trying to do the right thing." It's about David's future after the game and his dream of forming a football team in Florida, which was first announced in 2014
"We are good people."
"It doesn't feel very good."
"It's one of the few times I walk into a room and people don't smile at me," he admitted to the crowd, trying to thaw the frost
"But the former England captain didn't get the admiration he usually inspires, he had a cold face
The 43 year old made his first appearance in front of city officials on Thursday and presented his idea to the Miami City Council, which will vote on Wednesday to decide whether to put it to a referendum
"David Beckham will find out this week if Miami residents can vote on his long-awaited proposal to build a football team in Florida."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
““Her family and friends don’t really trust him,” said the source, “especially because they are already talking marriage and kids!”Do you think that Britney Spears should start a family with Sam Asghari?”
“Meanwhile, Brit-Brit’s army aren’t too pleased with the romance.”
““Britney is doing everything she can to keep her youth because she knows that Sam is much, much younger than her and she will do anything to make this work,” the insider said.”
““She is hoping to become pregnant in the very near future and Sam is totally on board with this.”Since meeting Asghari on the set of “Slumber Party” video, she has gotten into incredinle shape – and doesn’t hesitate to show it off on Instagram!”
“...prepare for pregnancy the source dished to Radar...”
“She wants a girl so bad and she s madly in love with Sam a close friend of the 35 year old pop princess said adding And vise versa So bad in fact that the mother of Sean Preston 11 and Jayden James 12 has started taking prenatal vitamins to...”
““Britney has only five shows left until she’s done and all she can talk about right now is having a baby.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Her family and friends don't really trust him," the source said, "especially because they're already talking about marriage and children! "Do you think Britney Spears should marry Sam asgali?"
"At the same time, the British military is not very happy with the relationship."
"Britney Spears is doing her best to keep her youth, because she knows Sam is much younger than her, and she will do everything she can to make it go smoothly," the person familiar with the matter said
"She hopes to get pregnant in the near future, and Sam fully agrees." Since she met askari in the "sleep party" video, she has become radiant and shows off her figure on instagram without hesitation
“… Get pregnant, send the signal to the radar... "
"She wanted a girl so much that she fell madly in love with Sam. In fact, Sean Preston's 11 year old mother and Jaden James's 12-year-old mother have started taking prenatal vitamins, "said a close friend of the 35 year old pop diva
"Britney has only five shows until she's finished, and all she can say now is to have a child."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Mariah Carey may now be wishing things would have worked out with her billionaire ex-fiancé James Packer!”
“The singer’s high-end SoCal shopping spree turned “embarrassing” when her credit cards were declined, RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal.”
““She was shopping on Rodeo Drive and her credit cards were declined,” an eyewitness told Radar.”
““When it happened at Louis Vuitton she thought it was a fluke.”
“But when it happened three more times she was embarrassed and humiliated.”Carey, 47, played it off like it was a mistake, as she left and came back to purchase the high-end items.”
““She returned with an assistant and her manager Stella [Bulochnikov], who made a total scene,” the eyewitness said.”
“Bulochnikov is the lucky standup comedian-turned-music manager who was on the receiving end of Carey’s once-hefty bank account when the singer shelled out a whopping $34,000 on a Louis Vuitton trunk for her 44th birthday.”
“Yet, despite her cards not going through this time around, Carey didn’t walk away empty-handed.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
Maria Kelly may now hope to have a good result with her former fiance, James Parker, a billionaire
When her credit card was rejected, the singer's high-end social shopping spree became "embarrassed.", RadarOnline.com The website can only disclose. "
"She was shopping on Rodeo Avenue and her credit card was turned down," a witness told radar
"When it happened in Louis Vuitton, she thought it was a fluke."
"But when it happened three more times, she felt embarrassed and humiliated." Kelly, 47, pretended to be a mistake and left while returning to buy high-end goods
"She came back with an assistant and her manager, Stella (blochnikov), and she made a lot of noise," the witness said
"Brochnikov was a lucky stand up comedian who later became a music manager. On Kelly's 44th birthday, the singer spent $34000 on a huge bank account in the trunk of Louis Vuitton, which Kelly was accepting at the time
"However, although the card did not pass this time, Kelly did not return empty handed."



**Something goes wrong**
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“[…]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Black Widow, the actress’s character in the Marvel Cinematic Universe, has donned various red hairstyles throughout the superhero series.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively set the record straight.”
“A new report claiming Scarlett Johansson refuses to dye her hair red for the next two sequels in the Avengers franchise is completely false and riddled with inaccuracies.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
“[… ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"The black widow, the actress's role in the marvel world, wore all kinds of red hair throughout the superhero series."
"The gossip police can completely clarify the facts."
"A new report claims that Scarlett Johnson's refusal to dye her hair red in the next two sequels of the avenger series is totally wrong and full of mistakes."



**Something goes wrong**
“I am also so thankful to the fans that have supported me and continue to do so.”HollywoodLifers, are you shocked over the allegations against Danny Masterson?”
“And, as we previously reported, the news shocked Kunis as well.”
“Masterson has since been fired from Netflix’s ‘The Ranch’.”
“Ashton Kutcher, 39, is still processing the numerous rape allegations that have been made against his friend and The Ranch co-star Danny Masterson, 41.”
“Masterson has since been fired by Netflix from the show in which he and Kutcher both work on.”
““Ashton has been rocked by the firing of his friend Danny,” a source close to Kutcher tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He doesn’t want to believe any of the accusations against his longtime friend, but he does hope the truth will come out.” However, Kutcher knew he had to do what was best for everyone involved.”
““As one of the executives on the show, Ashton is agreeing to swift action being taken.”
“He is trying to protect the show and jobs of others working on the project.”
“He just feels horrible about the whole situation.” Kutcher has yet to release an official statement following the allegations of misconduct against Masterson.”


"I am also very grateful to the fans who support me and continue to support me Hollywood stars, are you shocked by the charges of Denny Masterson? "
"And, as we've reported before, it's a shock to Kunis."
"After that, Masterson was fired by Netflix's ranch."
"Ashton Kutcher, 39, is still dealing with numerous rape charges against his friend and co star of ranch, 41 year old Danny Masterson."
"After that, Masterson was fired by Netflix from the show he and Kutcher were involved in."
"Ashton has been fired by his friend Denny," a source close to Kutcher told reporters
"He doesn't want to believe any charges against his old friend, but he does want the truth to come out." However, Kutcher knows he has to do the best for all concerned
"As one of the show's executives, Ashton agreed to act quickly."
"He tried to protect the work of the show and other people involved in the project."
"He just thought the whole situation was bad." Kutcher has yet to make an official statement after accusing Masterson of misconduct



**Something goes wrong**
“...his parents and sunny dates at the beach...”
“Image zoom Credit John Shearer Getty Cyrus and Hemsworth who first began dating after meeting on the set of their 2009 Nicholas Sparks romance movie The Last Song previously kicked off the new year in Hemsworth s native Australia to celebrate Liam s 28th birthday with al fresco meals with...”
“The couple was spotted at the Elton John AIDS Foundation viewing party and then at the Vanity Fair afterparty.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Want to keep up on the latest from PEOPLE?”
“The prank video is the latest sighting of Cyrus and Hemsworth together since they attended several Oscars afterparties in March.”
““Babe stop, seriously!” Cyrus can be heard saying in the selfie video after Hemsworth spontaneously yelled.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Miley Cyrus & Liam Hemsworth ‘Light it Up’ in Green Costumes to Celebrate St. Patrick’s DayThe engaged pair were singing along to Justin Bieber’s “Love Yourself” in a video that also featured her beagle Barbie.”
“Fans of Cyrus and Hemsworth, who first got engaged in 2012, will remember that he enjoys pranking her — the actor previously pulled the same stunt back in 2016.”
“Image zoom Credit: Miley Cyrus/Instagram“I f—ing hate when he does this s—,” the former Voice judge captioned the video.”


“… His parents date the sunshine on the beach... "
"Photo zooming thanks to John hillgetti Cyrus and Hemsworth, who first started dating after the last song of their 2009 Nicholas spark romantic movie, launched in Hemsworth's Aboriginal Australia to celebrate Liam's 28th birthday with alfresco dinner with..."
"The couple were discovered at a ceremony at the Elton John AIDS Foundation and then at a vanity fair party."
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"This prank video is the latest witness that Cyrus and Hemsworth have been together since they attended several Oscars in March this year."
"Baby, stop it, seriously! "After Hemsworth's spontaneous shouting, Cyrus can be heard saying in his own video."
"Related video: Millie Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth, dressed in green to" light it up "to celebrate St. Patrick's day, sing with Justin Bieber's" love yourself "in a video that also shows her Beagle Barbie doll."
"Fans of Cyrus and Hemsworth, who were first engaged in 2012, will remember that he loved pranks - the actor did the same stunt in 2016."
"The credit for image zooming: Miley Cyrus / instagram," the former voice judge wrote in the title of the video: "I hate it when he does it."



**Something goes wrong**
“Are you happy to learn that Posh and Becks are staying together, HollywoodLifers?”
“Victoria may have disappointed us by not agreeing to the Spice Girls reunion, but keeping Posh and Becks alive is a definite plus.”
“There are no problems, whatsoever.”Indeed, David’s rep has also confirmed to HollywoodLife.com that the divorce reports are “100% fiction,” so it looks like things are totally a-ok between these gorgeous stars.”
““And are always texting and stay in contact throughout the day whenever they are busy.”
““They always video chat with one another when they have a minute free,” our insider adds.”
“...respective careers right now the soccer player is launching a soccer franchise in Miami and doing charity work for UNICEF while Victoria is constantly focused on her job as a fashion designer...”
“The only reason people jump to conclusions that they may be going through rough patches is because they do so much traveling alone because of their work commitments It s true David and Victoria are both incredibly busy with their...”
““The fact is they have never been happier and more in love with each other as they continue to raise their four beautiful kids and divide their time between family and work.”
“...magazine’s Feb. 3 report.”
““David and Victoria are most certainly not getting divorced,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY, totally refuting OK!”


"Are you happy to hear that bosh and Beck are together, Hollywood star?"
"Victoria may have let us down by not agreeing with the Spice Girls Party, but it's certainly a good thing to keep bosh and Beck alive."
In fact, David's representative also confirmed that the Hollywood Life divorce report is "100% fictional", so it seems that everything is going well among these gorgeous stars
"And text every day when you're busy, keep in touch."
"They always video chat when they are free," our insider added
“…… Now the footballer is running a football franchise in Miami and doing charity work for the United Nations Children's fund, while Victoria has been focusing on her work as a fashion designer.... "
"The only reason people come to the conclusion that they may be going through a difficult time is because they travel too much on their own because of their work. David and Victoria are very busy with their work..."
"In fact, when they continue to raise four beautiful children and divide their time between family and work, they have never been so happy and in love as they are now."
“… The magazine reported on February 3
"David and Victoria are definitely not going to divorce," a person familiar with the matter told reporters. Hollywood life.com exclusive, completely refutes good! "



**Something goes wrong**
“Such weird rumors"”
“Totally not true!”
“She tweeted shortly thereafter, "So @JonathanCheban just called me & asked if I was ok & read online I was attacked outside of Mr. Chow.”
“From photographs taken of the incident, the 36-year-old mother of two looked visibly taken aback by the individual, and her friend looked equally alarmed.”
“News source, a passerby bumped into Kardashian on the street.”
“The business mogul was departing from celeb hotspot Mr. Chow after attending the Fashion Los Angeles Awards Sunday evening, when according to an E!”
“...reality star was physically attacked while out in Los Angeles.”
“Kim Kardashian is doing just fine after reports surfaced the E!”


"Such a strange rumor"
"It's not true at all!"
Shortly after that, she tweeted: "so @ Jonathan Cheban called me to ask if I was OK and saw me attacked outside of Stephen Chow on the Internet."
"According to the photos taken, the 36 year old mother of two was obviously shocked by the man, and her friends were equally frightened."
"Source: a passer-by met Kardashian in the street."
"The business tycoon left celebrity Chow after attending the Los Angeles Fashion Awards on Sunday night, according to an e!"
"Reality TV stars were physically attacked when they were in Los Angeles."
"Kim Kardashian did well after the report came to the surface!"



**Something goes wrong**
“"I think that we can have those policy conversations, but today is not that day," White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders said the day after the shooting during a White House news briefing.”
“POLITICO Playbook newsletter Sign up today to receive the #1-rated newsletter in politics Email Sign Up By signing up you agree to receive email newsletters or updates from POLITICO and you agree to our privacy policy and terms of service.”
“| Matt Rourke/AP Conway: Politicizing Texas shooting 'disrespectful to the dead'White House counselor Kellyanne Conway on Monday criticized Democrats for "pointing fingers" and calling for increased gun control measures in response to the deadly Texas shooting over the weekend, saying the quick reaction is "disrespectful to the dead."”
“"The rush to judgment, particularly by people who just see politics and Trump derangement in every single thing they do, it doesn't help the victims, and it's disrespectful to the dead," Conway said during an appearance on "Fox & Friends" Monday morning.”
“Conway lamented Sunday's lethal shooting, which left at least 26 dead after a gunman opened fire on the First Baptist Church in Sutherland Springs, Texas, during a worship service on Sunday — the deadliest mass shooting in state history.”
“"There is evil among us," she said.”
“The counselor to the president also slammed officials who, in the wake of the latest historic mass shooting, were calling for action on gun legislation.”
““It's so beyond any type of reasonable response that anyone should have — why people see politics immediately," she said, hitting liberal politicians and celebrities for "taking to Twitter in the comfort of their very luxurious lives and pointing fingers."”
“You can unsubscribe at any time and you can contact us here.”
“The White House similarly dismissed calls for fast action in response to the lethal Las Vegas shooting last month that claimed the lives of more than 50 and left more than 500 injured.”


"I think we can have those policy conversations, but today is not that day," White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders said at a White House news conference the day after the shooting
"Politico playbook newsletter register now to receive" level 1 press releases in politics "email registration by registering, you agree to receive politico's email press releases or updates, and you agree to our privacy policy and terms of service."
"| Matt Locke / Associated Press Conway: on Monday, White House counsellor kellyanne Conway criticized Democrats for" pointing fingers "and called for stronger gun control measures to deal with the fatal shooting in Texas over the weekend, calling the rapid response" disrespect for the dead. "
"The rush to make judgments, especially those who only see politics and Trump's insanity in doing everything, is not helpful to the victims and disrespect for the dead," Conway said on Fox and friends on Monday morning
"Conway regrets Sunday's deadly shooting, in which a shooter opened fire on the First Baptist Church in Sutherland springs, Texas, during a Sunday service, killing at least 26 people - the deadliest mass shooting in the history of the state."
"There is evil among us," she said
"The president's advisers also attacked officials calling for action on gun legislation after the recent historic mass shooting incident."
"It's a reasonable response of any kind that no one should get - why do people see politics immediately," she said, attacking liberal politicians and celebrities for "using Twitter comfortably in their very luxurious lives and pointing fingers."
"You can unsubscribe at any time or contact us here."
"Last month, more than 50 people were killed and more than 500 injured in a fatal shooting in Las Vegas. The White House also rejected the call for quick action."



**Something goes wrong**
“Cookies.”
“We use such data in the aggregate to run internal analyses to improve upon your experience on Our website.”
“...purchase...”
“We may use your personal information to communicate with you about Your use of any of the features above New content on Our website New contests Prize information News that We think may interest you about Us Responses to your questions comments to us and Information relating to a ticket...”
“When you give Us PII to use the features above, you expressly consent to Our collection, storage, use and disclosure of this information as described in this Privacy Policy.”
“...message boards) E-commerce (ticket purchases)To use these features, We may require you to provide your email address, mobile number, name and/or address and certain demographic information.”
“Certain features of Our website may require that you provide Us with your personal information, including:Contests/Sweepstakes Surveys Newsletter Sign-Up Mobile Alert Sign-Up (SMS) Contact Us (email) Public forums (e.g.”
“Personally Identifiable Information (“PII”) is information that is uniquely identifiable to you, such as your name, address, email address, phone number, credit card number and other personal information that is not otherwise publicly available.”
“Information We CollectInformation we collect directly from you: Your provision of your personal information to Us is completely voluntary; it is not a statutory or contractual requirement.”
“If you require any more information or have any questions about Our privacy policy, please feel free to contact Us by email at [email protected].”


"Biscuits."
"We combine these data for internal analysis to improve your experience on our website."
“… Buy... "
"We may use your personal information to communicate with you about your use of any of the above functions, new content on our website, new competition prize information, news we think you may be interested in, comments on our answers to your questions, and information related to tickets..."
"When you provide PII to us to use the above functions, you expressly agree that we collect, store, use and disclose this information in accordance with the provisions of this privacy policy."
“… Message board) e-commerce (ticketing) to use these features, we may ask you to provide your email address, mobile phone number, name and / or address and some demographic information. "
"Some features of our website may require you to provide us with your personal information, including: competition / lottery survey newsletters registration mobile phone reminder registration (SMS) contact us (email) public forums (e.g
Personally identifiable information ("PII") is your only identifiable information, such as your name, address, e-mail address, telephone number, credit card number and other private personal information
"Information we collect information we collect directly from you: it is entirely voluntary for you to provide us with your personal information; it is not a statutory or contractual requirement."
"If you need more information or have any questions about our privacy policy, please feel free to contact us by email at [protected by email]."



**Something goes wrong**
“Nevertheless, we wish Selena the best during this difficult time as moving on is not as easy as it seems.”
“Plus, Justin Bieber is happily in a relationship with Hailey Baldwin, 21.”
““All that her friends and family can do is help her ride it out because no one in her camp wants to see them together again,” the source said.”
“After all, they’ve known each other since 2001, and their breakup back in March was their fourth time getting back together.”
“We can certainly understand Selena’s emotions.”
“She won’t easily admit it to everyone, but her friends and family still know that she still holds a candle for Justin and can see that times like this media tours gets to her emotionally and makes her think of the past,” our insider continued.”
““She has some fun and fond memories from it all, which then makes her think of the good old days.”
“...close to Selena tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY”
“Selena might be staying away from LA and things that cause her stress but it s impossible for her to not think about Justin during this time because in the past she has brought Justin s siblings and Justin himself with her to the previous Hotel Transylvania premieres a source...”
“In fact, Selena can’t seem to get her ex-boyfriend Justin Bieber, 24, off her mind, especially while on the media tour for Hotel Transylvania 3.”


"Nevertheless, we hope that Serena will do well in this difficult time, because it's not as easy to move on as it seems."
"In addition, Justin Bieber has a good relationship with 21-year-old Haley Baldwin."
"All her friends and family can do is help her through, because no one in her camp wants to see them together again," the source said
"After all, they have known each other since 2001, and their separation in March is their fourth reunion."
"Of course we can understand Selena's emotions."
"She won't easily admit it to everyone, but her friends and family still know that she is still holding a candle for Justin, and we can see that times like this media tour affect her emotionally and remind her of the past," our source continued
"She got some fun and good memories from all this, which reminds her of the good old days."
“… Close to Serena, tell Hollywood life exclusively
"Serena may be far away from Los Angeles and the things that bring pressure to her, but she can't miss Justin during this period, because in the past, she took Justin's brothers and sisters and Justin himself to the premiere of the Transylvania Hotel, which is a source..."
"In fact, Serena can't seem to forget her 24-year-old ex boyfriend Justin Bieber, especially during her media tour at the 3 hotel in Transylvania."



**Something goes wrong**
“There’s no need to blow something entirely out of proportion — however interesting or somewhat shady it may be — when it could risk painting two women whom we otherwise love and who have not been prone to catty behavior in public before this with a broad brush.”
“More: One Big Little Lies Star Might Run for CongressListen, at the end of the day, there’s most likely nothing here; the internet is talking about a problem that simply isn’t there.”
“Knowing u would likely get your daughter the toy!”
“Renata just bought the real BB-8 for Christmas for her daughter.”
“Easy.”
“Um…yes.”
“Knowing u would likely get your daughter the toy!”.”
““Um…yes.”


"There's no need to blow something out of proportion - no matter how funny or dark it is - because it risks drawing a big picture of two women we already love, and it's not easy for these two women to merge in public before that."
"More: a big lie star might run for Congress. Listen, after all, there's probably nothing here; the Internet is talking about a problem that doesn't exist at all."
"I know you'll buy toys for your daughter!"
"Renata just bought her daughter a real bb-8 for Christmas."
"Simple."
"Well Yes
"I know you'll buy toys for your daughter!" .”
"Well Yes



**Something goes wrong**
“Daily Star claim a source said: “He bit his tongue and suffered through all of that in the hope Angelina would allow him more time with their kids."”
“3 Angelina is demanding sole custody of the kids following the couple's split Credit: Getty ImagesAs part of the Family Services probe, he was ordered to undergo anger management counselling and submit to random drug tests prior to agreed visits with the kids.”
“Angelina immediately filed for divorce on the grounds of “irreconcilable differences” and is demanding sole physical custody of the kids with visitation rights only for Brad, whose lawyers have filed a counter-claim.”
“...on their private jet in September...”
“3 Brad is devastated that he won t be able to spend longer with his kids it s claimed Credit Getty Images The Fight Club star has been cleared of child abuse in an investigation by the LA County Department of Children and Family Services following a mid air altercation...”
“Brad 52 battle over legal custody...”
“Rumours that Brad Pitt is dating Kate Hudson following his split from Angelina Jolie have been rubbished Angelina 41 is living in a rented 9 4million beachfront mansion in Malibu with Maddox 15 Pax 13 Zahara 11 Shiloh 10 and eight year old twins Knox and Vivienne while she and...”
“Friends fans spy glaring continuity error in Thanksgiving episode starring Brad Pitt PITTY WOMAN?”
“...controlled by therapist as actor has drug and alcohol tests Revealed Did YOU spot it...”
“...have drug and alcohol testing four times a month by estranged wife Angelina Jolie Exclusive THE THREE ARE IN CAHOOTS Meet the two British witches who drove a wedge between Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie as power couple hit the rocks FROM BRAD TO WORSE Brad Pitt s child visitation...”


"He bit his tongue and put up with it, hoping Angelina would give him more time with their children," a source said, according to the Daily Star
"3 Angelina asked for separate custody of the couple's split child: Getty Images, as part of the family services survey, was ordered to receive anger management counseling and random drug testing before agreeing to visit the child."
Angelina immediately filed for divorce on the grounds of "irreconcilable differences" and asked for separate physical custody of her child. Only Brad has the right to visit. Brad's lawyer has filed a counterclaim
“… On a private plane in September
"3 Brad is very sad because he can't stay with the children any more. It is said that the star of fight club has been ruled out of child abuse by the Los Angeles County Department of children and family services in an investigation after an air quarrel..."
"Legal guardianship dispute..."
"Rumors about Brad Pitt's date with Kate Hudson after breaking up with Angelina Jolie have been written off. Angelina, 41, lives with Maddox, 15, 13 Zahara, 11 Shiloh, 10 and 8-year-old twins, Knox and Vivian, in a 9.4 million seaside mansion rented by Malibu, while she and..."
"Friends fans have found an amazing continuity error in Brad Pitt's Thanksgiving episode?"
“… Controlled by the therapist, because the actor's drug and alcohol tests show that you found out... "
“… Separated wife Angelina Jolie conducts drug and alcohol tests four times a month. The exclusive trio conspired to meet two British witches, who opened a wedge between Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie because the powerful couple bumped into Brad Pitt's children from Brad Pitt. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Did you have any idea that she could be so funny?”
“He was happy to see her having so much fun and being so at ease with herself,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Robert Pattison was cracking up like the rest of us at Kristen Stewart’s hilarious opening monologue on ‘Saturday Night Live.’ HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVE details on on how he loved being included in her jokes that had the audience in stitches.”
“Yo go girl!”
“Kristen Stewart absolutely crushed it at comedy when she hosted Saturday Night Live Feb. 4, and her ex Robert Pattinson, 30, is giving her big applause.”
“She mentioned him in jokes for her opening monologue and not only was he totally okay with it, he’s thrilled that she did it!”
““Rob saws snippets from the show and absolutely loved Kristen’s opening monologue.”
“He thought she was hilarious.”
“K-Stew kicked off her opening bit by reminding the audience how Donald Trump, 70, lost it on Twitter when she cheated on her Twilight co-star back in 2012.”
“HollywoodLifers, what did you think of Kristen on SNL?”


"Did you know she would be so funny?"
"He's happy to see her having so much fun and being at home with herself," one source said Exclusive to Hollywood life
"In Kristen Stewart's funny opening speech to Saturday night live, Robert Pattison, like the rest of us, collapsed. Hollywood life.com has exclusive details about how he likes to be included in her jokes, which fascinates the audience
"Oh, girl!"
Kristen Stewart broke the ice on Saturday night live on February 4, when her 30-year-old ex boyfriend Robert Pattinson gave her a big round of applause
"She mentioned him in the opening joke, and he not only totally agreed, but he was excited for her to do so!"
"Rob saw the footage and loved Christine's opening remarks."
"He thought she was funny."
"K-step's opening line is a reminder of how Donald Trump, 70, lost on twitter when he cheated in 2012."
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Christine on SNL?"



**Something goes wrong**
“A representative for Caitlyn had no comment.”
“Caitlyn finds Kanye inspiring but fears his support of Trump will be dismissed because of his other outrageous statements.”HollywoodLife has reached out to Kanye and Kim’s reps for comment.”
““She feels some of Kanye’s ideas are brave and bold but sometimes his energy is misguided or misunderstood.”
“She thinks Kanye is being brave, just like she was for many years.”But Caitlyn couldn’t quite get behind ‘Ye’s comments about how “slavery was a choice.” “However, Caitlyn has been left scratching her head trying to understand Kanye’s slavery comments,” our insider added.”
““Caitlyn knows first hand how hard it can be to have unpopular opinions in the Kardashian family.”
““Caitlyn is happy and proud that Kanye has the courage to support Trump so publicly,” a source told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
““But Kanye’s just happy to talk to someone who gets him, and Cait feels the same way.”As we’ve previously reported, the The Secrets of My Life author was pleased to see Kanye tweet in support of Donald Trump, 71, (unlike many of his fans and friends).”
“Kim “is loyal to her mom and wants nothing to do with Cait,” the source said.”
“This is why the insider claims that the “Famous” singer is keeping his conversations private from his wife.”
“No topic is off-limits, and there’s no judgement.”It’s no secret that Caitlyn isn’t on the best of terms with Kris Jenner, 62, or Kim Kardashian, 37.”


"A representative of Caitlin didn't comment."
"Caitlin found Kanye inspiring, but worried that his support for trump would be rejected because of his other outrageous remarks." Hollywood life has contacted representatives of Kanye and Kim Jong Il for advice
"She thinks some of Kanye's ideas are brave and bold, but sometimes his energy is misled or misunderstood."
"She thinks Caitlin is brave, just like she has been for years." But Caitlin could not fully understand Caitlin's comment that "slavery is a choice". "However, Caitlin has been scratching her head trying to understand Caitlin's comments on slavery," our source added
"Caitlin knew firsthand how hard it was to have unpopular opinions at Kardashian's house."
"Caitlin is happy and proud that Kanye has the courage to support trump so openly," one source told Hollywood life
"But Kanye was happy to talk to someone who got him, and CAIT felt the same way." As we reported earlier, the author of "the secret of my life" is happy to see Kanye support Donald Trump, 71, on twitter (unlike many of his fans and friends)
Kim is loyal to her mother and doesn't want to have anything to do with Kate
"That's why the insider claimed that the 'famous' singer kept secrets from his wife."
"No topic is unrestricted, no judgment." It's no secret that Caitlin has a bad relationship with Chris Jenner, 62, or Kim Kardashian, 37



**Something goes wrong**
“Thanks, but the trend should stop there.”
“Lena Dunham, Antonoff’s girlfriend at the time, said he ordered the necklace after feeling like Nazis had become a “mainstream thing again.”RELATED:Billy Joel wore a yellow Jewish star.”
“Billy Joel has now done it 100 times.”
“Before and after his landmark show last week at the “World’s Most Famous Arena,” the native Long Islander gave a series of interviews about his legacy.”
“In one with CBS News, he was asked about the most memorable moments during his incredible — and likely all-time record-breaking — MSG run.”
“After mentioning the nights that involved his daughter Della onstage, Joel brought up the concert during which he wore a yellow Star of David.”
“Joel pinned the star to his jacket during the encore of a Garden show last August, shortly after white supremacists and neo-Nazis led a deadly march in Charlottesville, Virginia.”
““This past year or so, there was the night I wore the Star of David, after the Charlottesville incident,” he said.”
“Although Joel is usually described as atheist or secular, his father was a German-born Jew who recalled the rise of Hitler and lost relatives in the Holocaust.”
“CBS interviewer Anthony Mason pointed out that Joel usually avoids taking political stands.”


"Thank you, but the trend should stop here."
Antonov's then girlfriend Lena Dunham said he was a relative who ordered the necklace after feeling that Nazis had become a "mainstream thing" again: Billy Joel was wearing a yellow Jewish Star
"Billy Joel has done it 100 times."
The Long Island native gave a series of interviews about his legacy before and after his iconic performance at "the world's most famous arena" last week
"In an interview with CBS News, he was asked about the most memorable moment in his incredible - and possibly record breaking - MSG run."
After talking about the night his daughter della was on stage, Joel mentioned the concert, where he wore a big yellow satellite
Last August, shortly after white supremacists and Neo Nazis led a deadly march in Charlottesville, Virginia, Joel pinned the star to his jacket during a garden show duet
"Over the past year or so, after the Charlottesville incident, one night I put on the star of David," he said
Although Joel is often described as an atheist or secularist, his father, a Jew born in Germany, recalls Hitler's rise and his family lost in the Holocaust
"CBS interviewer Anthony Mason points out that Joel usually avoids taking a political stance."



**Something goes wrong**
“Considering Mariah, Nick and the twins recently made an adorable appearance at the 2018 Kids’ Choice Awards, it makes total sense that Mariah’s ex would be on hand to see her say “I Do” again.”
“Mariah would love to get married in May at the Grand Wailea Resort in Maui the insider told OK where she and Bryan first went public with their romance Mariah and Bryan struck up a relationship in late 2016 with Mariah low key confirming the romance in February 2017 by...”
“The iconic singer reportedly popped the question to her bae, Bryan Tanaka, and the two are busy planning their big day!”
“Did Mariah Carey, 47, have a vision of love when looking at boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, 34, one that left her feeling all sorts of emotions?”
“After deciding that she just can’t let go of this hunk, Mariah reportedly decided to make it happen – an engagement, that is!”
““Word is Mariah took matters into her own hands,” a source tells OK!”
“...magazine, “It was an unusual proposal but it did the trick.”
“She wrote a song about how she wanted Bryan to be her husband and she performed it for him while wearing a sexy, glitzy gown.”
“Then she explained that she’s ready for them to make their relationship official.”Bryan gave a “hearty yes,” as the insider says, “He couldn’t believe his luck!” It appears Bryan also thinks he and Mariah belong together, and he always wants to be her baby.”
“These two aren’t waiting around for one sweet day to tie the knot.”


"Considering that Maria, Nick and the twins recently made a lovely appearance at the 2018 children's Choice Awards, Maria's ex boyfriend will see her at the scene and say" I do. "
"Maria is eager to get married in May at the grand Willa resort in Maui. The person familiar with the matter told OK that she and Bryan had disclosed their love affair for the first time. Maria and Bryan established a relationship with Maria at the end of 2016 and confirmed the relationship in a low-key way in February 2017 by..."
According to reports, the idol singer asked her BAE, Bryan Tanaka, about their big day
"When Mariah Carey, 47, looks at her 34 year old boyfriend Bryan Tanaka, does she have a vision of love that makes her feel all kinds of emotions?"
According to reports, after deciding not to let go of the big man, Maria decided to make it come true - engagement, that's it! "
"It's said that Maria is in her own hands," a source told OK
“… Magazine, "it was an unusual proposal, but it worked
"She wrote a song that said she wanted Brian to be her husband, and she performed it for him in a sexy, gorgeous dress."
"Then she explained that she was ready to formalize their relationship." Brian said "sincerely agree," as people familiar with the matter said, "he can't believe his luck! "Brian seems to think that he and Maria belong together. He always wants to be her child."
"These two are not waiting for a sweet day to get married."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know your opinions.”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Selena and her mom will reconcile?”
“Get the EXCLUSIVE details here.”
“Selena Gomez, 20, and her mom, Mandy Teefey, 41, haven’t been on the best of terms lately and one of the reasons is because of their disagreement with Selena’s decision to get back with Justin Bieber, 23.”
“However, Selena believes they can still work things out and become close again in the future.”
““The relationship Selena has with her Mom is very strong but strained,” a source close to Selena EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““When Selena needed a Mom, she was her manager and when she needed a manager she was her Mom.”
“Now with Mandy just as Selena‘s Mom, they are slowly getting on the same page.”
“The kidney surgery helped their relationship but Justin has not.”
“They are still trying to navigate through it all but it’s a process.”


"Let us know your opinion."
"Holly bug, do you think Serena and her mother will make up?"
"Get exclusive information here."
"Serena Gomez, 20, and her 41 year old mother, Mandy Tiffany, have had a bad relationship recently. One of the reasons is that they don't agree that Serena has decided to make up with Justin Bieber, 23."
"However, Selena believes that they can still solve the problem and become intimate again in the future."
"Selena and her mother have a very strong but tense relationship," an exclusive source close to her told Hollywood life
"When Selena needs a mom, she's her manager. When she needs a manager, she's her mom."
"Now Mandy is like Selena's mother. They're slowly going the same way."
"Kidney surgery helped their relationship, but Justin didn't."
"They're still trying to solve all this, but it's a process."



**Something goes wrong**
“She’s Mastered the Sip-and-Stare Selfie PoseTea is to models what Gatorade is to athletes.”
“So is Cindy Crawford, in case you forgot about her cameo in “Bad Blood.”5.”
“The 14-year-old daughter of supermodel Cindy Crawford and Rande Gerber is on the verge of supermodel stardom.”
“In fact, she’s basically everywhere and her career reminds us of another famous model we love: Kendall Jenner.”
“Kaia has so much in common with Kendall, we compiled proof that Cindy’s mini-me is the next big model of the moment (beware Kenny!).”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“1.”
“She Nails Model-Off-Duty StyleKendall is known for her effortlessly cool jeans-and-a-tee #OOTD’s, and Kaia has clearly taken notes.”
“Image zoom Credit: gotpap/Bauer-Griffin/GC; Josiah Kamau/BuzzFoto/Gettygotpap/Bauer-Griffin/GC; Josiah Kamau/BuzzFoto/Get2.”
“Her Name Begins with a KA very important fact.”


"She has mastered the self-image of sipping and gazing, and posetea is as good for models as Gatorade is for athletes."
Cindy Crawford, too, in case you forget her guest role in bad blood
"The 14-year-old daughters of supermodel Cindy Crawford and Rand Gerber are about to become supermodel stars."
"In fact, she's basically everywhere, and her career reminds us of another famous model we love: Kendall Jenner."
"Kaya and Kendall have a lot in common, and we've collected evidence that Cindy's mini me is the next big model (watch out for Kenny!)
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“1.”
"She's a model who doesn't go to work. Kendall is famous for her cool jeans and T-shirt. Kaya has obviously taken notes."
"Image scaling credit: gotpap / Bauer Griffin / GC; Josiah Kamau / buzzfoto / gettygotpap / Bauer Griffin / GC; Josiah Kamau / buzzfoto / get2."
"Her name begins with a very important fact."



**Something goes wrong**
“You could be blamed for the fact that it happened, for reporting it and blamed for how you reacted.”
“I would tell people who find themselves in this situation that there is a great deal of blame placed on the victims in cases of sexual harassment and assault.”
“I squirmed and lurched sideways to get away from him, but he wouldn’t let go.”
“When we were posing for the photo, he stuck his hand up my dress and grabbed onto my ass cheek.”
“In 2013, I met a DJ from a prominent country radio station in one of my pre-show meet and greets.”
“Why was it important for you to come forward about what happened to you?”
“Swift responded to questions about her experience from TIME in writing.”
“Her clear-eyed testimony marked one of several major milestones in the conversation around sexual harassment this year.”
“Here we are years later, and I’m being blamed for the unfortunate events of his life that are the product of his decisions—not mine.”Like many of the women interviewed for the 2017 Person of the Year issue, Swift would not accept blame for the abuse she experienced.”
“I m not going to let you or your client make me feel in any way that this is my fault...”


"You may be to blame for what happened, for what was reported and for your reaction."
"I'll tell those who find themselves in this situation that in cases of sexual harassment and abuse, the victims are heavily criticized."
"I wriggled and leaned to leave him, but he wouldn't let go."
"When we posed for a picture, he reached over my skirt and grabbed my butt and cheek."
"In 2013, I met a DJ from a famous country radio station at a pre show meeting."
"Why do you stand up and tell me what happened to you?"
"Swift answers questions about her experience in writing from time to time."
"Her clear testimony marks one of several important milestones in this year's dialogue on sexual harassment."
"A few years later today, I am accused of the unfortunate events in his life, which are the result of his decisions, not mine." Like many women interviewed by people of the year 2017, swift will not accept the accusations of abuse she has experienced
"I won't let you or your clients make me think it's my fault..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Brooches.”
“You know what’s royal?”
“Trooping the Colour is an annual thing for the Queen’s birthday, and for this year’s festivities, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge brought out Prince George and Princess Charlotte for their first balcony waves.”
“It was actually pretty charming because kids are kids and kids don’t really give a crap about royal protocol.”
“George and Charlotte were probably better behaved than most kids would have been, but George was still pretty grumpy.”
“So at one point, William knelt down to George’s level.”
“Will talked to George, possibly pointing out some of the planes or whatever, just trying to get George to brighten up.”
“And the Queen was not amused.”
“Come for the queen scolding William, stay for the George facepalm.”
“...pic twitter com etvmofiU5m Brandon McGinley brandonmcg June 15 2016 While I love George s face palm the kid has no poker face what I love most of all is that the Queen is basically the only person William will...”


"Brooch."
"Do you know what Royal is?"
"The rehearsal for the Queen's birthday is an annual event. For this year's celebration, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge took Prince George and Princess Charlotte to their first balcony dance."
"It's really fascinating because the children are children and they don't care about Royal etiquette at all."
George and Charlotte may be better than most of the kids, but George is still quite grumpy
"So once, William knelt down to George's level."
"Will talked to George, probably referring to airplanes or something, just to cheer him up."
"The queen is not amused either."
"Come to the queen who scolds William, and stay to George."
“… Pic twitter com etvmofiu5m Brandon McGinley brandonmcg June 15, 2016 although I love George's face palm, this child has no poker face. What I love most is that the queen is basically William's only one... "



**Something goes wrong**
“But we’ll only be sure when Ariana Grande walks down the aisle.”
“The Inquisitr reported that fans weren’t happy that she’d dedicated a song to Davidson on her upcoming album, Sweetener.”
“As The Inquisitr previously reported, an article on Radar Online claims that Grande is ready to call it quits because she “regrets” saying yes to Davidson’s proposal so quickly after they started dating.”
““Ariana didn’t know who Pete really was, and fell in love with the idea of being in love,” a purported insider said in an interview with Radar.”
“The reported source added that the “God Is A Woman” singer’s friends and family, particularly her brother, Frankie J., do not like the relationship.”
““Ariana wants the fairytale so bad, but Pete has already started to take a toll on her image, and she’s tired of constantly having to stick up for him,” they continued.”
“But Gossip Cop is on the case and they report that the story is nothing but fake news.”
“They report that a source close to Grande told them that Radar‘s claims are untrue and that Grande and Davidson have no plans to call off their engagement.”
“The celebrity news watch-dog also points out that Frankie J, Grande, and Davidson were recently spotted holding hands on the streets of New York.”
“This doesn’t sound like the actions of someone who doesn’t think highly of his sister’s fiance.”


"But we can only be sure when Ariana grand steps down the aisle."
Fans are unhappy that she sang a song for Davidson in her upcoming album sweetener, the prosecutor reported
"As previously reported by investigators, an article on radar online claimed that grand was ready to quit because she" regretted "having agreed to Davidson's proposal so soon after they started dating."
"Ariana didn't know who Pete was and fell in love with the idea of falling in love," a self described insider told radar
The source added that the singer's friends and family, especially her brother, Frankie J., did not like the relationship
"Ariana really wants fairy tales, but Pete has started to damage her image and she's tired of constantly coming forward for him," they continued
"But the rumors are that the police are working on the case, and they report that the story is just false news."
"They reported that a source close to grand told them that radar's story was untrue and that grand and Davidson had no plans to cancel their engagement."
The celebrity news observer also pointed out that recently Frankie J, grand and Davidson were found holding hands on the streets of New York
"It doesn't sound like the behavior of a person who doesn't think highly of his sister's fiance."



**Something goes wrong**
“She was spotted with Kendall Jenner just this week and has remained quiet about rumors that Kylie Jenner is pregnant.”
“The book is about honesty.”Caitlyn, however, does appear to remain close to her kids that she had with Kris.”
“In her interview with Piers Morgan, she shared why she spilled all in her book, but kept her family in the dark: “I had to because I had to be honest.”
“In fact, back in November, Caitlyn revealed that things remained strained, so much so that she shared it had been about a year since she spoke to Kim Kardashian.”
“...kids...”
“I didn t want them to leak it to the press and there was no reason for them to know about it Caitlyn was more open about her life in her 2017 memoir The Secrets of My Life which caused a rift between the former Olympian and Kris ex and...”
““Of course not, of course I didn’t trust them.”Caitlyn later continued, “I’d already been living as Caitlyn for a year and a half, nobody knows anything.”
“Her response?”
“No, it’s not that big a deal.”Later, Piers asked Caitlyn if she didn't trust her family to keep her secret.”
“It’s none of their business.”


"Just this week, she was found with Kendall Jenner and kept silent about rumors that Kelly Jenner was pregnant."
"This book is about honesty." However, Caitlin seems to have a close relationship with her and Chris's children
In an interview with Piers Morgan, she shared why she left everything out of the book but kept her family in the dark: "I had to do it because I had to be honest."
"In fact, as early as last November, Caitlin revealed that things were still so tense that she had been talking to Kim Kardashian for about a year."
“… The kids
"I don't want them to divulge it to the media, and they have no reason to know about it. Caitlin is more honest about her life in her 2017 memoir the secret of my life, which created a rift between the former Olympic athlete and Chris Qian, and...."
"Of course not. Of course I don't trust them," Caitlin continued later. "I've been living like Caitlin for a year and a half, and no one knows anything."
"Her reaction?"
"No, it's no big deal." Later, pierce asked Caitlin if she didn't believe her family would keep her secret
"It's none of their business."



**Something goes wrong**
“News, the couple spent Valentine’s Day house-hunting in L.A. “They visited two homes in the $8 million–$10 million range with a broker who gave them tours,” a source told the site.”
“Photo: SOVE, GICE/Stoianov/Max - Lopes/Geva / BACKAccording to E!”
“The Sun reported this weekend that one source of contention in his marriage to Aniston was his desire to party with the New York art scene Specifically Sun sources claimed that Aniston was upset over Theroux s desire to hang out with 25 year old photographer and art beauty Petra...”
“What life does he want to live?”
“So: Theroux initiated the breakup and took it public before Aniston was ready because … why?”
“), and Aniston agreed to release a statement the next day.”
““He wanted to make the announcement so he can live his life.” Theroux apparently flew to L.A. to talk to Aniston three days after her birthday (on Valentine’s Day!”
““Jen hoped that Justin would be low-key on her birthday so people weren’t wondering why he wasn’t with her, but that’s not Justin’s style,” People’s source said.”
“Instead, he walked around getting photographed in New York throughout Aniston’s birthday weekend, while Aniston celebrated at home with girlfriends in L.A. (We definitely noticed that last week.)”
“In one report, published Sunday, a source close to Aniston told People that “Jen didn’t want to announce [the split] for as long as possible, because she wanted to avoid the media attention.” But Theroux didn’t play ball.”


According to sources, the couple were looking for a house in Los Angeles on Valentine's day. "They visited two homes worth between $8 million and $10 million with an agent," a source told the website
"Photo: SOFF, GISE / Stoyanov / max Lopez / Geva / buck, according to e!"
The Sun reported this weekend that one of the sources of controversy in Aniston's marriage was that he wanted to have a party in the art world in New York. In particular, sources in the sun said that Aniston was upset that seru wanted to be with Petra, a 25-year-old photographer and artistic beauty
"What kind of life does he want?"
"So: before Aniston was ready, Cyrus broke up and made it public, because Why? "
He and Aniston agreed to make a statement the next day
"He wants to announce the news so that he can live his own life." Seru apparently flew to Los Angeles to talk to Aniston three days after her birthday
"Jennifer wants Justin to keep a low profile on her birthday so people won't wonder why he's not with her, but it's not Justin's style," the person familiar with the matter said
"On the contrary, on Aniston's birthday weekend, he was walking around New York to take pictures, while Aniston was celebrating at home with her girlfriend in Los Angeles (we must have noticed that last week)
In a report published on Sunday, a source close to Aniston told people, "Jennifer doesn't want to announce as long as possible because she wants to avoid media attention." But serrux didn't play



Number  580
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““They’re seriously looking into it and are convinced they’ve got a gold mine on their hands once it’s ready to roll.”We pay for juicy info!”
“‘They’re intrigued by the business opportunity that goes with harvesting top-shelf liquor, like George Clooney and Rande Gerber did with Casamigos,” noted the insider.”
““She embraces her love of fine wine and gourmet food, and wants to inspire others to do the same — especially with the booze.”Now Simpson, 37, and her 38-year-old husband are researching what it would take to make a mint off their shared passion.”
““Jess comes from this very self-righteous place, saying she’s proud of her lifestyle choices and to hell with the haters who’d deprive her and Eric from splurging on their favorite food,” an insider told Radar.”
“Jessica Simpson and Eric Johnson love their booze so much, they’re considering turning their passion into a new business venture, RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned.”
“Couple wants to cash in on their love of drinking.”
“Sloppy Jessica Simpson & Eric Johnson Becoming Booze Moguls!”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Cheers?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"They are seriously investigating to make sure that once the gold mine is ready to be mined, they have gold in their hands." We pay for interesting information! "
"They are very interested in the business opportunities brought by the top Baijiu, just like George Clunie and Rand Gerber are working with CASA Migos," said the insider.
"She loves wine and food and wants to inspire others to do the same - especially in wine." Now, Simpson, 37, and her husband, 38, are working on how to get mints from their shared passion
"Jesse comes from this very smug place, and she says she's proud of her lifestyle choices and goes to hell with the haters who prevent her and Eric from spending on their favorite food," an insider told radar
"Jessica Simpson and Eric Johnson like their wine very much, and they are considering turning their passion into a new business venture, RadarOnline.com The website has completely learned. "
"The couple wanted to profit from their love of drinking."
"Sloppy Jessica Simpson and Eric Johnson are the king of wine!"
"Click Share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) cheers?"



Number  581
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below!”
“It will be the first time in a long time that they ve all been in the same room together so it s likely to be bittersweet The report goes on to say that Brad has always liked to spoil his children so Angelina softened to the idea of him...”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will set their differences aside, as a new report claims the exes have agreed to spend Christmas TOGETHER with the kids.”
“This may just be the best news we’ve heard all day!”
“Despite going through a bitter divorce, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will reportedly spend Christmas TOGETHER for the sake of their six children — Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
“Isn’t that great?!”
““They’re not getting back together, but that doesn’t mean they can’t celebrate as a family,” a source told OK!”
“Magazine.”
“...playing Santa on Christmas morning...”
“HollywoodLifers, do YOU think Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie should spend Christmas together with the kids?”


"Tell us next!"
"It's going to be the first time in a long time that they're in the same room together, so it's probably a bittersweet story," he said, adding that Brad has always liked to spoil his children, so Angelina softened his mind... "
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will shelve their differences because a new report says the two predecessors have agreed to spend Christmas with their children."
"That's probably the best news we've heard today!"
Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are reported to be spending Christmas together for their six children, 16-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox, despite a painful divorce
"Isn't that good?"
"They won't get back together, but that doesn't mean they can't celebrate as a family," a source told OK
"Magazine."
“… Play Santa on Christmas morning... "
"Hollywood stars, do you think Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie should spend Christmas with the kids?"



Number  582
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: AKM-GSI; Inset: GettyFinally, the couple was spotted attending an intimate showcase for an Australian band making its New York City debut in late March.”
““They are having fun,” and insider told PEOPLE at the time.”
“The next month the duo vacationed together with friends on the private Bahamian island Over Yonder Cay.”
“They made their first weekend getaway in Montauk, New York in June 2016.”
““It was a really sweet moment,” an onlooker told PEOPLE, adding that, “Nina put her arms around his neck and kissed him.”While they were dating, Agdal and DiCaprio seemed always to be on the go, taking several vacations together over the course of the year.”
“The former couple were out enjoying the warm spring weather just last month in New York City, where they were spotted locking lips by the Hudson River in downtown Manhattan.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Did You See The Record Leo DiCaprio Broke on Oscars Night?”
“The two began spending more time with each other, though — from a beach day in Malibu to a yacht party in Ibiza.”
“Oscar winner DiCaprio, 41, and Agdal, 24, were first spotted together in May 2016, and a source confirmed to PEOPLE in July that the pair were hooking up.”
“At the latter club, The Revenant star was reportedly spotted dancing with model Ella Ross, who has recently been linked to Scott Disick.”


Image zooming source: akm-gsi; inset: Getty finally, the couple were found to be in an intimate performance by an Australian band that will make its debut in New York at the end of March
"They had a good time," people familiar with the matter told people at the time
"For the next month, they spent their holidays with friends in the Bahamas."
"In June 2016, they spent their first weekend in Montauk, New York."
"It was a sweet moment," one bystander told people, adding, "Nina put her arms around his neck and kissed him." When they date, it seems that Agdal and DiCaprio are always busy and spend several holidays together in a year
"Last month, the old couple enjoyed a warm spring in New York, and were found with their lips closed on the Hudson River in downtown Manhattan."
Related video: have you seen the record Leo DiCaprio broke on Oscar night
"But they started spending more time together - from beach day in Malibu to yacht parties in Ibiza."
"Oscar winners DiCaprio (41) and Agdal (24) were first found together in May 2016, and a source confirmed in July that they were dating."
At the latter club, the "revenge star" is reported to have danced with model Ella Ross, who recently had contact with Scott disc



Number  583
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here are our 10 the 10 Best Email Newsletters About Money”,”reading_time”:5}]};”
“Here\u2019s How Much You\u2019ll are having a moment \u2014 so whatever your financial need or interest is, there\u2019s probably one for you.”
“According to the IRS, \u201cunemployment Your Unemployment Benefits Are Taxable.”
“What do I need to know about taxes and unemployment?\u201d It may seem unfair to those who have already suffered financial consequences of COVID-19, but you have to pay taxes on your unemployment benefits.”
“...year amid the pandemic I collected unemployment benefits for the first time in my life...”
“...const FP budgeting to investing this is Farnoosh Torabi u2019s recommended list of digital tools to help you better navigate your finances and manage money the Best Financial Apps and Tools of 2021 to Help You Save Spend and Invest...”


Here are our 10 best e-mail newsletters about money
"This is how much time you have, so no matter what your financial needs or interests are, there may be one for you."
"According to IRS regulations, your unemployment benefits are taxable."
"What do I need to know about taxes and unemployment? \It doesn't seem fair to those who have suffered the economic consequences of cowid-19, but you have to pay taxes on your unemployment benefits. "
“…… I received unemployment benefits for the first time in my life in the year of the flu pandemic... "
“… Const FP budgeting to investment this is a list of digital tools recommended by farnoosh Torabi u2019 to help you better manage your finance and wealth management. The best financial applications and tools in 2021 help you save money and investment... "



Number  584
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Unfortunately, however, there are some people who would do anything for money, except work.””
““I would never want them to think this is true,” he said.”
““I have always paid far more than the maximum in child support and that will never change,” the former New York Yankees star said in a statement to Page Six.”
““It’s highly offensive to me that my former brother-in-law, who has been trying to pursue a frivolous case against me for four years and has gotten absolutely nowhere with it in court, is misrepresenting my relationship with my daughters to manipulate the public’s opinion,” he added.”
“The report Wednesday in the New York Daily News came soon after it was learned that A-Rod had just purchased a $15 million Manhattan apartment with girlfriend Jennifer Lopez.”
“According to the Daily News report, Rodriguez told his ex-wife Cynthia that he would cut his support payments for daughters Natasha, 13, and Ella, 9, over a legal dispute with her brother, Constantine Scurtis.”
“A-Rod’s alleged threat was meant to send a message to Scurtis, the Daily News added.”
“Cynthia had texted her brother explaining I m just trying to defend my child support situation and it s terrible She continued I have an email from Rodriguez telling me that he s basically making me pay for not stopping you and telling you that I hate you The tension...”
“Cynthia is referring to is a four year legal battle between Rodriguez and her brother...”
“Scurtis sued his ex brother-in-law in 2014, claiming he was pushed out of the real estate company they founded together when his sister’s marriage began to fail, the Daily News said.”


"Unfortunately, however, some people are willing to do anything but work for money."
"I never want them to think it's true," he said
The former New York Yankees star said in a statement on page 6: "my alimony is always far beyond the ceiling, and that will never change."
"My ex brother-in-law has been trying to bring an unimportant case against me for four years, but he has made no progress in court, which makes me very disgusted. He has distorted my relationship with my daughter to manipulate public opinion," he added
"The New York Daily News Report on Wednesday came shortly after learning that A-Rod and his girlfriend, Jennifer Lopez, had just bought a $15 million Manhattan apartment."
Rodriguez told his ex-wife Cynthia that he would cut alimony for his daughters Natasha (13) and Ella (9) because of a legal dispute with her brother Constantine scurtis, the Daily News reported
The daily news also said that "A-Rod's so-called threat is intended to send a message to Scudetti."
"Cynthia texted her brother to explain that I just wanted to defend my child's upbringing, which was terrible," she said, adding that I received an email from Rodriguez telling me that he was basically asking me to pay for the tension between not stopping you and telling you I hate you... "
"Cynthia refers to the four-year lawsuit between Rodriguez and her brother..."
"Scutis sued his former brother-in-law in 2014, claiming he was fired from the real estate company they founded when his sister's marriage began to fail," the daily news said



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kim will move past her feelings of powerlessness to a place where she feels confident and more in control?”
“Check out these pics of celebs, including Kim, who showed off their bikini bods in the snow.”
“However, it’s all about keeping healthy boundaries between the two of them.”
“While she’s reportedly “depending” on her surrogate, she hasn’t invited her to the Kardashians’ holiday celebrations, an insider told us.”
“She is doing her best to trust her surrogate and that her team of doctors will all do their best to deliver her baby safely into the world.” We reported earlier how Kim revealed she had a miscarriage before deciding to use a surrogate.”
““Kim is struggling to cope with not being the one delivering her own child.”
““With the pregnancy reaching term and the birth coming soon, Kim is realizing how much she is depending on others for everything to go smoothly, especially her surrogate,” our source added.”
“The entire experience is new for Kim and it is all of the unknowns that are making her fearful.”According to our source, Kim is still coming to terms with the fact she won’t be the one giving birth to her third child.”
“She has worked so hard to bring another child into the world for her family and the anxiety of the labor process is starting to get to Kim.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Hollywood stars, do you think Kim will get rid of the sense of powerlessness and go to a place where he is confident and more in control?"
"Take a look at the pictures of these celebrities, including Kim, showing off their bikini in the snow."
"However, it's all about keeping healthy boundaries between them."
An insider told us that although she was reported to be "dependent" on her agent, she had not invited her to the kardashians' festival celebrations
"She's doing her best to trust her surrogate mother, and her team of doctors will do their best to get her baby safely into the world." We reported earlier on how Kim revealed his miscarriage before deciding to use a surrogate mother
"Kim is trying to deal with the fact that he is not the one to deliver the baby."
Our source also said: "with the advent of pregnancy and the approach of childbirth, Kim realized how dependent she was on others for everything to go smoothly, especially her surrogate mother."
"The whole experience was new to Kim, and all the unknowns scared her." According to our sources, Kim is still accepting the fact that she won't be the one with the third child. "
"She made great efforts to bring another child to the world for her family, and the anxiety in the process of labor began to affect Kim."



**Something goes wrong**
“She feels like she’s in the in-crowd right now and loves that Scott has swagger and money and that he loves to travel and party.””
““Sofia is very young and naive and doesn’t know what she’s in for.”
““He still has Kourtney at the top of his mind all the time, and he is still texting and flirting with other girls,” the source says.”
“Sofia wanted commitment from him, so he committed to be her ‘boyfriend.’ “Image zoom Credit: Sofia Richie/InstagramRELATED VIDEO: Scott Disick and Sofia Richie Get a Congratulations Dessert and Become Instagram OfficialHowever, it appears the father of three’s heart remains with his ex Kourtney Kardashian.”
““He is just having fun.”
“Scott isn’t treating this as a long-term relationship whatsoever,” the insider shares.”
““Sofia is much more invested in the relationship than Scott.”
“The pair recently enjoyed a vacation in Punta Mita, Mexico, and documented their getaway on social media.”
“Since the couple confirmed their romance in September, Sophia and Scott have wasted no time packing on the PDA.”
“Lionel knows Scott’s playboy ways and he doesn’t want to see his daughter get hurt,” the source says.”


"She feels like she's in the crowd right now, and she likes Scott's swagger, money, travel and parties."
"Sophia is young, naive and doesn't know what she's doing."
"He still keeps Courtney in mind, he's texting and flirting with other girls," the source said
"Sophia wanted his commitment, so he promised to be her" boyfriend. " Photo zooming credit: Sophia Ritchie / instagram Related videos: Scott Disick and Sophia Ritchie get a congratulatory dessert and become full members of instagram. However, it seems that the heart of the father of three is still with his predecessor, Courtney Kardashian
"He's just having fun."
"Scott didn't see it as a long-term relationship," the person familiar with the matter said
"Sophia is much more involved in this relationship than Scott."
"The two recently took a holiday in pontamita, Mexico, and recorded their experiences on social media."
"Since the couple confirmed their relationship in September, Sophia and Scott have taken the opportunity to pack on their PDAs."
"Lionel knows Scott's Playboy way and he doesn't want to see his daughter hurt," the source said



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comment section!”
“Source: BACKGRIDDo you think Gwen and Blake were celebrating their nuptials?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDTheir squad sure seemed excited to hang with the couple as well, as they kissed each other on the cheeks and laughed together.”
“Good times!”
“He also cradled what looked to be a tropical drink in his hand.”
“Source: BACKGRIDMeanwhile, her bae looked as happy as could be as he walked alongside her in shorts and a button-up top.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDThe “Hollaback Girl” singer showed off her tight and toned tummy in a strappy white bikini top, which she paired with a fringed beige cover-up and black crocheted skirt, as she held a drink in her hand.”
“Source: BACKGRIDStill, these recent pics of Gwen and Blake strolling on a beach in Mexico with friends including fellow musician Luke Bryan look like they could have been on their honeymoon.”
“...reported just a few weeks ago that the couple was engaged, though the music stars have yet to confirm their nuptials.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDOK!”


"Please leave a message in the comments section!"
Do you think Gwen and black are celebrating their wedding? "
"The article continues with the following advertising source: backstage, their team seems very excited to be with the couple, because they kiss each other's cheek and laugh together."
"Good time!"
"He still has something in his hand that looks like a tropical drink."
"Source: backgrid at the same time, her BAE looks very happy as he walks beside her in shorts and a button top."
The article continues with the following advertising source: the singer "Hollywood girl" shows her tight abdomen, wearing a white bikini top, a beige trimmed blouse and a Black Crochet skirt, holding a drink in her hand
"Photo source: backgridstill, these recent photos of Gwen Blake walking on a beach in Mexico, together with friends including musician Luke Bryan, it seems that they may be on their honeymoon."
“…… It was reported a few weeks ago that the couple were engaged, but the music stars have yet to confirm their wedding
The article continues with the following advertising source: backgridok



Number  588
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Simona, 27, who works in a shop, said: ‘We don’t need any more immigrants here.”
“However those who work and live in the area fear the area is being permanently damaged.”
“...but it is bad for Italy...”
“There are simply too many of them Tour guide Denise 67 added Immigration here in Italy is a problem a big problem because of the huge numbers who are arriving all the time Chauffeur Santi 26 said It is good for Switzerland that they have closed the border to migrants...”
“‘People here in Como don’t like them.”
“They are not poor hungry refugees but they are big and strong.”
“‘You see them arriving at that the San Giovanni station.”
“Now they make us – me, my family and other Italian families – pay for them.’Housewife Federica, 55, said: ‘A small number of immigrants is not a problem but now they are so many.”
“‘Europe [the EU] does nothing to help us.”
“We [Italy] should not have to deal with these people on our own.”


"We don't need more immigrants here," said Simone, 27, who works in a shop
"However, those who work and live in the area fear that the area is being permanently damaged."
“…… But it's not good for Italy... "
"There are too many of them. Dennis 67, the tour guide, added that Italian immigration is a big problem because a large number of people have arrived all the time. Sandy, the driver, said on the 26th that it is a good thing for Switzerland that they close the border to immigrants..."
"The Como don't like them."
"They are not poor and hungry refugees, but they are big and strong."
"You see them at St. Giovanni station."
"Now they let us - me, my family and other Italian families - pay for them." "A few immigrants are not a problem, but now they are too many," said Frederick, 55, a housewife
"Europe (the European Union) is not helping us."
"We (Italy) should not deal with these people alone."



Number  589
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I love Ozzy dearly, you know.”
“.”
“Rumors and speculation that they have split up after nearly 34 years of marriage.”
““There were many tabloid headlines this past weekend about her and Ozzy.”
“Sharon Osbourne didn’t attend Monday’s taping of The Talk, but her co-host Julie Chen addressed her absence.”
“He was also spotted on Tuesday with his daughter Aimee, who’s rarely seen in public.”
“He was photographed on Monday morning in Los Angeles.”
“...that, “[T]he pair mutually agreed that Ozzy would move out of the house temporarily.”Contrary to what other outlets alleged, Ozzy had not gone missing.”
“Any reports that I am not sober are completely inaccurate.” A source also told E!”
““I have been sober for three and a quarter years, I have not touched drugs or alcohol in that time.”


"I love Oz, you know."
“.”
"Rumors and speculation about their breakup after nearly 34 years of marriage."
"There were a lot of tabloid headlines about her and oz last weekend."
"Sharon Osborne didn't attend Monday's recording, but her co host Julie Chen said she was absent."
"He was also found with his daughter Aimei on Tuesday, who rarely appeared in public."
"He was photographed in Los Angeles on Monday morning."
"The couple agreed to move oz out of the house for the time being." Contrary to what other media have said, Oz is not missing
"Any report that I'm not awake is totally inaccurate." A source also told e
"I've been off alcohol for a quarter of three years, and I didn't touch drugs or alcohol at that time."



Number  590
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Reed shared a similar photo on Instagram used it as a means to call out the tabloids.”
“So good catching up with these goofballs."”
“"Farewell dinner with team Somereed!”
“"Can't believe how time flies," she wrote.”
“Joined by the couple, Dobrev updated her Instagram Tuesday.”
“But, as Dobrev returned to film an episode of The Vampire Diaries this week, she posed for a photo with the Twilight star, proving once and for all that there's no bad blood between them.”
“That news might come as surprise to some people, given that multiple tabloids have claimed the actresses were "at war" over Ian Somerhalder, Reed's husband and Dobrev's ex-boyfriend.”
“Watch : Nina Dobrev Speaks Out on Ian Somerhalder Getting MarriedNikki Reed and Nina Dobrev have always gotten along.”


"Reed shared a similar photo on instagram and used it as a way to call out the tabloids."
"It's great to catch up with these idiots."
"Farewell dinner with somered team!"
"I can't believe how time flies," she wrote
Dobrev updated her instagram on Tuesday with the couple
"But when Dobrev returned to shoot an episode of Vampire Diaries this week, she posed with the stars in twilight to prove once and for all that there was no malice between them."
"The news may come as a surprise to some, as many tabloids claim that the actresses are fighting for Reid's husband and Dobrev's ex boyfriend Ian Somerhalder."
"Note: Nina Dobrev says that Ian summerhold is getting married, and Nicky reed and Nina Dobrev have been getting along well."



Number  591
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Maybe that was a coded message to her ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, who might be reeling from her moving on to a new flame so quick after their split.”
“Either she was trying to throw the radio host off the scent or she was slyly laying her cards on the table and revealing the truth.”
“Two divorced people at the same time."”
“She also alluded to all the gossip about the romance and the leaked photos being part of an elaborate publicity stunt launched by the TV network, saying, "I think that NBC did that.”
“She played coy and wouldn't confirm or deny the romance, instead calling the country crooner "hot."”
“Stefani did an interview with Ryan Seacrest after the first photos of she and Shelton canoodling on Halloween surfaced.”


"Maybe it's a coded message for her ex husband Gavin Rossdale, who might be scared that she started a new relationship soon after the break-up."
"She either wanted the radio presenter to smell her, or cunningly put her cards on the table to reveal the truth."
"Two divorcees at the same time."
She also mentioned that all the rumors and leaked photos about the relationship were part of the network's elaborate publicity stunt. "I think NBC did it," she said
"She pretended not to confirm or deny the relationship. Instead, she called the country singer" spice girl. "
"Stefani was interviewed by Ryan Seacrest after the first photo of her and Sheldon canoe came out on Halloween."



Number  592
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
“…… In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  593
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the biggest celebrity news stories of the day, controversies, crime, and other hot topics listen to our new podcast ‘All Rise’ below!”
““Paris believes her grandpa is a legend and should be treated as such,” a source told Radar last week.”
“Joe Jackson was laid to rest in a private funeral yesterday afternoon at Forest Lawn in Glendale, California.”
“But the famous family couldn’t stop feuding long enough to let their patriarch rest in peace!”
“RadarOnline.com can exclusively reveal that superstar Janet, 52, and her niece Paris, 20, refused to speak and kept far away from each other during the services.”
““Paris was almost unnoticeable at the funeral, and chose to stay away from her father’s siblings,” a source told Radar.”
““She was definitely frosty.”A separate Jackson family insider told Radar that the model is furious with her aunt for not spending Joe’s last days by his side.”
““Paris thinks Janet is acting fake,” the insider said.”
“(As Radar has previously reported, Janet and her father had a notoriously tumultuous relationship.)”
“Radar previously reported that Janet and Paris were fighting over who would cover the costs of the funeral.”


"For today's hottest celebrity news, controversy, crime and other hot topics, please listen to our new podcast" all up "!"
"Paris believes her grandfather is a legend and deserves to be treated like this," a source told radar last week
Joe Jackson was buried yesterday afternoon at a private funeral on the Forest Lawn in Glendale, California
"But this famous family can't stop their feud and let their patriarch rest in peace!"
“ RadarOnline.com The website can exclusively reveal that 52 year old superstar Janet and 20-year-old niece Paris refused to speak during the service and kept a distance from each other. "
"Paris was barely noticed at the funeral and chose to stay away from her father's brothers and sisters," a source told radar
"She's absolutely cold." Another Jackson family insider told radar that the model was angry that her aunt had not spent her last days with Joe
"Paris thinks Janet's behavior is fake," the person familiar with the matter said
(as radar reported earlier, Janet's relationship with her father is notoriously chaotic.)
"Radar previously reported that Janet and Paris were arguing about who would pay for the funeral."



Number  594
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Season 14 of The Voice is currently in the home stretch, with the semifinal round scheduled to air Monday (May 14).”
“The longtime friends seemed more than excited to compete not only against each other in the upcoming season, but also against fellow coaches Adam Levine and Blake Shelton, who have reprised their roles each season since the show began.”
“Hudson first lead "Team JHud" in season 13, but left the following season along with coach Miley Cyrus, making way for the return of Alicia Keys and Clarkson's debut.”
“The two powerhouse vocalists rose to fame thanks to their runs on early Idol seasons, and now they're ready to share their singing competition expertise for a second time around on The Voice this fall.”
“Season 15 of The Voice will feature twice the American Idol power, thanks to the just-announced returns of coaches Kelly Clarkson and Jennifer Hudson.”


"Voice" Season 14 is currently at home and the semi-final is scheduled to air on Monday (May 14)
"The old friends seem very excited to compete not only with each other in the coming season, but also with Adam Levin and Blake Shelton, who have been playing their roles again every season since the start of the show
Hudson led Jude for the first time in season 13, but left with coach Miley Cyrus next season to make way for Alicia case's return and Clarkson's debut
"The two powerful singers have made their mark in the early seasons of idol, and now they are ready to share their singing competition expertise for the second time in the autumn's" voice of man. "
"With the just announced return of coaches Kelly Clarkson and Jennifer Hudson," voice "season 15 will feature twice the power of American Idol."



Number  595
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He will be deeply missed.””
“All of us at UNICEF extend our deepest sympathies to the Moore family, and join his many friends and admirers from around the world in paying tribute to his life and mourning his loss.”
“Together with Lady Kristina, he worked very hard to do so.”
“He once said that it was up to all of us to give children a more peaceful future.”
“In his most famous roles as an actor, Sir Roger was the epitome of cool sophistication; but in his work as a UNICEF Goodwill Ambassador, he was a passionate – and highly persuasive – advocate for children.”
““With the passing of Sir Roger Moore, the world has lost one of its great champions for children – and the entire UNICEF family has lost a great friend,” Lane said in his statement.”
“By rights of possession, he owns the part.” So perhaps it’s no surprise that Moore’s death has invited a trove of remembrances and tributes from people across the pop culture spectrum.”
“As EW’s Chris Nashawaty wrote in a 2008 profile , “Moore played 007 more times than any other actor.”
“Though Moore was neither the most famous nor most acclaimed version of Bond (even he ranked himself fourth ), he did play the character the longest, in seven films stretching from 1973 to 1985.”
“Roger Moore, the second actor to play James Bond on the big screen, died Tuesday at the age of 89 .”


"He will be deeply missed."
"All of us in the United Nations Children's fund express our deepest sympathy to the Moore family and join many of his friends and admirers from all over the world in mourning his life and loss."
"Together with Ms. Christina, he worked very hard to do that."
"He once said that it is the responsibility of all of us to give our children a more peaceful future."
"Among his most famous actors, Sir Roger is the epitome of calmness and sophistication; but in his work as a goodwill ambassador to the United Nations Children's fund, he is a passionate and persuasive advocate for children's rights."
"With the death of Sir Roger Moore, the world has lost a great children's champion and the entire United Nations Children's fund family has lost a great friend," Ryan said in a statement
"He has the role by possession." Therefore, it may not be surprising that Moore's death has attracted a lot of reminiscences from all walks of life in popular culture
As Chris nashawatti of the Wall Street Journal wrote in his profile in 2008, "Moore plays 007 more than any other actor."
Although Moore is neither bond's most famous version nor the most popular version (even he is in fourth place himself), he played the longest role in seven films from 1973 to 1985
Roger Moore, the second actor to play James Bond on the big screen, died on Tuesday at the age of 89



Number  596
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They have developed into close confidantes and are sharing intimate details of their lives.” We can only imagine how Gwen would feel about that.”
“They’ve become close friends and allies over the past month or so.”
“Blake Shelton left his girlfriend of two years Gwen Stefani high and dry when he dumped her before heading off on tour in February, In Touch has exclusively learned, and she’s not taking it well.”
““Gwen doesn’t know what hit her,” said the insider.”
““She’s heartbroken.”But wait, Gwen just posted a photo with Blake three days ago, so what gives?”
“Apparently, it’s a desperate attempt to ignore the truth.”
““She continues to send him loving social media support from LA while he’s been out on the road,” said another insider.”
““But Blake has drastically slowed regular communication with her.” He certainly hasn’t reciprocated her online affection.”
““Blake’s through with Gwen’s neediness and all the drama: her demanding, critical ex-husband and her jealousy of him and other women,” explained the source.”
“Apparently, Gwen was jealous over his closeness with The Voice winner Chloe Kohanski, and Blake got sick of trying to make her trust him.”


"They have developed into intimate confidants and shared intimate details of their lives." We can only imagine how Gwen felt about it
"In the past month or so, they have become close friends and allies."
"Blake Sheldon abandoned his girlfriend Gwen Stefanie for two years and dumped her before going on tour in February. She didn't accept the exclusive report of contact magazine."
"Gwen doesn't know what hit her," the person familiar with the matter said
"She was very sad." But wait a minute. Gwen just posted a picture of Blake three days ago. What does that matter? "
"Obviously, this is a desperate attempt to ignore the truth."
"She continued to provide him with loving social media support from Los Angeles while he was away," another person familiar with the matter said
"But Blake has greatly slowed down his regular communication with her." Of course, he didn't repay her online feelings
"Blake saw Gwen's needs and all the drama: her harsh, picky ex husband and her jealousy of him and other women," the source explained
"It's clear Gwen envies his close relationship with dubbing champion Chloe kohanski, and black is tired of trying to convince her of him."



Number  597
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That place is ‘Dancing with the Stars!’ ”One top PR executive, who doesn’t work with O.J., said it isn’t such a bad idea — but doubted the Disney/ABC hit would want anything to do with him!”
“The mole continued: “A place where he can be funny and charming.”
““They do not want a big sit-down interview, but rather somewhere he doesn’t need to do a lot of talking or explaining.”‘Dancing With The Stars’ — Shocking Secrets Of Season 25!”
“...to a new audience, and hopefully remind his old fans why they once loved him,” a source told The National ENQUIRER.”
“...to reintroduce O J”
“Simpson desperate for ways to make money and revamp his image is reportedly listening to new advisers suggestions that the 70 year old freed felon join the cast of Dancing with the Stars The plan is to find a place...”
“O.J.”
“Rob Shuter reports….”


"The place is" dancing with the stars! "A PR executive who doesn't work with O.J. says it's not a bad idea, but he doubts if Disney / ABC's hit shows will have anything to do with him!"
"A place where he can be funny and charming," continued the mole
"They don't want a big one to sit down and interview, but somewhere, he doesn't need to do a lot of talking or explaining." "Dancing with the stars" - the shocking secret of season 25
A source told the National Enquirer that " To the new audience, I hope to remind his old fans why they once loved him
“… Reintroducing "O J"
"It's reported that Simpson is eager to find a way to make money and rebuild his image. He is listening to the advice of a new consultant to suggest that the 70 year old felon join the" dance with the stars "crew, and the plan is to find a place..."
“O.J.”
"Rob Shuter report..."



Number  598
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She’s a great woman.””
“For real.”
““It is humiliating on any level, but I found out he was cheating on me the majority of our marriage, I just didn’t know.”In October 2015, Odom was rushed to the hospital after being found unconscious in a Nevada brothel.”
“Something has to be right here,” Kardashian revealed.”
“...out in the weeklies and as much as I know they re bull where there s smoke there s fire...”
“They were all on his assistant s phone so he was really crafty she recalled as Stern asked the former Kocktails with Khloé host Doesn t that feel awful when the assistant knows and everyone knows To which Kardashian agreed Oh it s disgusting But all these rumors kept coming...”
“So nothing was on his cell phones, [but] he had an assistant.”
““He was so good.”
“I never speculated cheating … so I didn’t know about cheating … until before the DUI [in 2013],” Kardashian told Howard Stern in January 2016.”
“Image zoom Credit: JAKE HOLLY/startraksphoto.com“Love is blind … Lamar was so great at making me feel like I was the only one and I’m this princess.”


"She's a great woman."
"Really."
"It's a shame on any level, but I find that he cheated me most of our marriage, I just don't know." In October 2015, Odom was found unconscious in a Nevada brothel and rushed to hospital
"There must be something here," Kardashian revealed
“… In the weekly, as far as I know, where there is smoke, there is fire... "
"They're all on his assistant's phone, so he's really cunning," she recalls, when stern asked the former coktale and heroy host, didn't it feel terrible when the assistant knew that everyone knew which one Kardashian agreed with? Oh, it's disgusting, but all these rumors keep coming... "
"So there's nothing on his cell phone, (but) he has an assistant."
"He's wonderful."
"I never guess cheating So I don't know about cheating Until (2013) drunk driving, "Kardashian told Howard Stern in January 2016
Credit for image zooming: Jack Holly/ startraksphoto.com "Love is blind Lamar is very good at making me feel that I am the only one. I am the princess



Number  599
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Holmes and Foxx, 50, were first linked to each other back in 2013, a year after her high profile divorce from Tom Cruise.”
“Katie Holmes Demands Jamie Foxx Give Up Junk Food Now that they've gone public, the actress has laid down the law.”
“Katie Holmes won’t take any more of Jamie Foxx’s bad habits!”
“RadarOnline.com has learned the health-conscious actress told her junk food-loving boyfriend that his obsession with fatty snacks has got to go.”
““When she first started dating Jamie, he made it seem like he was healthy, too, and a nature lover,” an insider told Radar.”
““The truth soon came out – he’s a candy bar-eating closet junkie.”Meanwhile, Holmes, 39, is the epitome of good health, and works hard to keep her thin frame.”
“She is a big fan of cycling and yoga, and has even run in the New York City Marathon.”
““Katie runs a minimum of three hours a week on the treadmill and she’s athletic to the bone,” the insider added.”
“They spent years hiding their love, but since going public with their relationship last August, Holmes has dropped the hammer down on the Ray star.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Sherlock Holmes and fox are 50 years old. They got in touch as early as 2013, a year after her high-profile divorce from Tom Cruise."
"Katie Holmes asked Jamie fox to give up junk food. Now that the food is on the market, the actress has made the law."
"Katie Holmes won't put up with Jamie Fox's bad habits any more!"
“ RadarOnline.com The health conscious actress told her junk food lover that his obsession with high-fat snacks must stop
"When she first started dating Jamie, he gave the impression that he was healthy and a nature lover," one person familiar with the matter told radar
"The truth soon came out - he was a closet junkie eating candy." At the same time, Sherlock Holmes, 39, is a symbol of health, trying to stay slim
"She's very fond of cycling and yoga, and even participated in marathons in New York City."
"Katie runs at least three hours a week on the treadmill, and she's very athletic," the person added
"It took them many years to hide their love, but since they made it public in August last year, Sherlock Holmes has fallen on ray star."



Number  600
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt and Aniston haven't seen each other for years and have no plans to reunite romantically after she broke up with Justin Theroux.”
“The rumor-debunking site pointed out that the said report came less than two weeks after the same magazine published a story announcing that Pitt and Jolie "were back together."”
“The "Mr. & Mrs. Smith" stars are still negotiating their children's custody.”
“According to Life & Style, Pitt was hoping that his private talks with Jolie would "create sparks between them again."”
“The tabloid alleges that the "Allied" actor wanted to "resume their lives together" and to have a "new beginning" with their six children.”
“A so-called source claimed that the "Salt" star is giving her ex-husband false hope to receive a favorable divorce settlement.”
“"Once [Pitt] realizes that, it could send him spinning," the insider said.”
“"[Brad] has blinders on when it comes to Angie."”
“According to Gossip Cop, however, the report is not true.”
“Pitt is not using the custody negotiations to get back with Jolie.”


"Pete and Aniston haven't seen each other for years, and there's no plan for a romantic reunion after she broke up with Justin Cyrus," he said
"The website pointed out that less than two weeks before the report was published, the same magazine published a report announcing that Pitt and Julie were" back together. "
The stars of the Smiths are still negotiating for custody of their children
Pitt hopes his private conversation with Julie will "spark between them again," according to life and fashion magazine
The tabloid claimed that the "ally" actor wanted to "get back to life together" and have a "new start" with their six children
"A so-called source claimed that the" salt "star gave the ex husband a false hope to get a favorable divorce agreement."
"Once [Pete] realizes this, it may make him spin," the person familiar with the matter said
"[Brad] is dazzled at the mention of Angie."
"However, according to the gossip police, this report is not true."
"Pete didn't use custody negotiations to get back together with Julie."



Number  601
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““We’re very excited about this exhibit and helping to share a fascinating story about a hometown hero who’s gone on to remarkable achievements,” the museum say in a press release.”
“It features various Bieber memorabilia on display, including stage outfits, running shoes, a personal letter from Michelle Obama and the aforementioned underwear.”
“Titled Steps to Stardom, the exhibit launched at the Stratford Perth Museum on Sunday (February 18) and runs until December 31.”
“2018 I M CONVINCED WE ARE BACK IN 2011 I M NOT OKAY pic twitter com zBqKIuiqGe Megan marvelstaylena February 20 2018 Meanwhile an exhibition dedicated to Justin Bieber has opened in the singer s hometown of Stratford Ontario and it features a pair of his underwear...”
“...pic twitter com gBpr9fTUZB mags JANUARY 10 selmilasnature February 20 2018 Advertisement Justin and Selena will get married Selena isn t using Justin for promo Jelena forever Jelena isn t toxic anymore If Justin s happy with Selena then I m happy pic twitter com sLchIqh0zd Britt jdbpurposes February 20”
“...melinazrr February 20 2018 Jelena s back so I can listen to Love Will Remember and Nothing Like Us now without spiraling into depression bi sinceritiescary February 21 2018 My whole timeline is jelena and I m not complaining leslie brunosIovely February 20 2018 the eye contact is killing me...”
“@justinbieber @selenagomez #JustinBieber pic.twitter.com/SIUS4GRaqc — belieber?”
“?❣❣❣❣ just look at them ….”
“...im going to cry right now ?????”
“Ooooooohhhh myyyyyyyy goo000od i am dreaming????????????????????”


"We are very excited about the exhibition and help share a fascinating story about the extraordinary achievements of heroes in our hometown," the museum said in a press release
"There are various Bieber souvenirs on display, including stage costumes, running shoes, Michelle Obama's personal letters and the underwear."
"The exhibition, steps to the stars, was launched at the Perth Museum in Stratford on Sunday (February 18) and will last until December 31."
"In 2018, I'm sure we're back to 2011. I'm not good at pictures. On twitter website zbqkiuiqge Megan marvelstaylena on February 20, 2018, meanwhile, Justin Bieber's hometown Stratford Ontario held an exhibition with one of his underwear on display..."
“… Pic twitter com gbpr9ftuzb mags January 10 selminassnature February 20, 2018 advertisement Justin and Selena will get married Selena doesn't use Justin to promote Jelena forever, Jelena is no longer toxic if Justin s is satisfied with Selena, then I'm very happy pic twitter com slchiqh0zd Britt jdbpurposes February 20 "
“… Melinazir, February 20, 2018, jelina came back, so I can hear love will remember, nothing like us now, not into depression, my whole timeline is jelina, I don't complain about Leslie brunosi, February 20, 2018, eye contact is killing me... "
“@ justinbieber@selenagomez#justinbieber ” pic.twitter.com/SIUS4GRaqc -Bellebo
“? ❣❣❣❣  Look at them... "
“… I'm going to cry now
"Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh



Number  602
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a nearly two hour long interview released on Tuesday with Charlamagne tha God from iHeartRadio sThe Breakfast Club Kanye talks about what led to his rift with JAY Z expressing the disappointment he felt when the 48 year old rapper and his wife Beyonce did not attend his 2014”
“...wedding in Italy to Kim Kardashian West...”
“"I was hurt about them not coming to the wedding.”
“I understand they were going through some things, but if it's family, you're not going to miss a wedding," he says.”
“"I gotta state my truth."”
“"You just start coming up with all types of crazy things in your head," Kanye adds, noting that he started to feel "like the cousin that you can't bring around."”
“When asked if he knows why JAY-Z and Beyonce skipped the nuptials, Kanye says he never asked them.”
“"I'm not sure, I'm past it, but at the time I was hurt about it," he replies.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Tuesday, Kanye, the breakfast club, gave a nearly two-hour interview to charlamagne tha God from iHeart radio, talking about the reasons for his discord with jay z, and expressing the disappointment of 48 year old rapper and his wife Beyonce when they didn't attend the wedding in 2014."
“… The wedding of Kim kardashan in Italy... "
"I'm sad that they don't come to the wedding."
"I know they went through something, but if it's family, you won't miss the wedding," he said
"I have to be honest."
"You just start thinking all kinds of crazy things in your head," Kanye added, beginning to feel like "a cousin you can't bring."
"Asked if he knew why Jay-Z and Beyonce didn't attend the wedding, Kanye said he never asked them."
"I'm not sure, I'm past, but I was sad at the time," he replied



Number  603
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The website quoting sources reported that the makers have wrapped up the film and the lead pair is not shooting the sex scenes again.”
“However, Gossip Cop also debunked this report as well.”
“Though Johnson and Dornan tried hard to maintain the chemistry, they could not perform up to the mark, thus making the second instalment film worse than the first part.”
“Critics who saw the film laughed off watching Johnson and Dornan's intimate scenes.”
“Earlier, the Celebs Dirty Laundry reported that critics are not happy with the sex scenes in the movie due to which Johnson and Dornan are forced to reshoot the scenes.”
“Fifty Shades Darker has been in the spotlight again for the wrong reasons.”
“However, Gossip Cop has debunked the news and said that Dornan and Johnson are gearing up to promote the film, which is set for Valentine's Day release.”
“Dornan does not want his fans to remember him only for his role in the Fifty Shades franchise.”
“According to reports, Dornan is trying to shed Christian Grey's image from the Fifty Shades franchise, as he is looking for different roles in Hollywood for months now.”
“Even paparazzi are having a hard time locating them," Celebs Dirty Laundry reported quoting sources.”


"The website quoted a source as saying that the producers have finished shooting the film, and the two stars will no longer shoot sex scenes."
"However, the gossip police also exposed this report."
Despite Johnson and Donan's efforts to maintain the chemical reaction, their performance was not satisfactory, so the second film was worse than the first
"Critics who saw the film laughed at the intimate scenes of Johnson and Donan."
Earlier, celebrity in black reported that critics were dissatisfied with the sex scenes in the film because Johnson and Donan were forced to remake them
"The fifty shadows of darkness have once again become the focus of attention for wrong reasons."
"However, gossip police broke the news and said Donan and Johnson were preparing to promote the film, which will be released on Valentine's day."
"Donan doesn't want his fans to remember only his role in the fifty shadows series."
"Donan is reported to be trying to get rid of Christian Gray's image in the fifty shadows series because he has been looking for different roles in Hollywood for months."
"It's hard for the paparazzi to find them," celebrity dirty clothes quoted a source as saying



Number  604
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““All I can say about that is, it’s all true, that we truly adore each other, and we love each other, I think it still comes through.””
““It’s understandable that people seemed so invested in our happiness together,” Anna previously told People.”
“News of their split shocked fans and sparked social media speculation, but both stars maintain that there is nothing but love between them.”
“Both Anna and Chris announced their separation on Aug. 7, 2017 after 8 years of marriage.”
“They welcomed 5-year-old son Jack in August 2012.”
“Anna Faris Says She’s Unsure If She’ll Remarry After Her Split From Chris PrattThe couple first met on the 2007 film, “Take Me Home Tonight,” and went on to tie the knot on July 9, 2009.”
“We have a lot of love and friendship, and our big goal is to protect Jack,” she said.”
“We reiterate that there aren’t rules to this.”
““What Chris and I try to do is to communicate openly.”
“It’s not ideal, but yeah, I think both of us are actually probably doing better.”Anna Faris Talks Co-Parenting Son Jack With Her Ex, Chris PrattAnna echoed a similar sentiment about life after divorce in April’s Women’s Health cover story.”


"All I can say is that it's true. We really adore each other and love each other. I think we'll survive."
"It's understandable that people seem so invested in our happiness together," Anna told people earlier
"The news of their breakup shocked fans and sparked speculation on social media, but both stars insisted that there was only love between them."
"Anna and Chris announced their separation on August 7, 2017, after eight years of marriage."
"They had their five-year-old son Jack in August 2012."
"Anna Faris said she was not sure if she would remarry after breaking up with Chris Platt. The couple first met in the 2007 film take me home tonight and married on July 9, 2009
"We have a lot of love and friendship, and our big goal is to protect jack," she said
"We repeat that there are no rules."
"What Chris and I are trying to do is communicate openly."
"It's not ideal, but yes, I think both of us are actually doing better." Anna Faris, in the April cover story of women's health, talked about the similar views of her son Jack and her predecessor, Chris pratanna, on life after divorce



Number  605
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us here!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Caitlyn not being at the birth of Kylie’s baby?”
“Here’s to hoping these two can resolve any issues so Caitlyn can enjoy her new baby granddaughter!”
“An 11 minute pregnancy video she called “To Our Daughter” features Kylie’s own birth which was recorded by Caitlyn.”
“Despite her reportedly rocky relationship with Caitlyn, Kylie happily announced the news of her pregnancy and daughter’s birth through her social media accounts on Feb. 4.”
“She also explained her relationship with them as “23 years of carting them around” which led to criticism that she feels they have been a burden.”
“...s issues with Kylie and the Kardashians made headlines when the former athlete had an interview with Piers Morgan last month in which she stated that she doesn t talk to anyone in the family except for her biological kids Kendall Jenner 22 and Kylie...”
“Kylie and Caitlyn s relationship has been a little frosty of late as she made it clear she didn t approve of Kylie having a baby at her age when she wasn t in a committed relationship but Kylie hopes that will change when Caitlyn meets the new arrival Caitlyn...”
“Caitlyn did call Kylie to congratulate her and said she’s really excited to meet her new granddaughter.”
““As it happens, Caitlyn was actually out of the country anyway when the baby arrived—she was in Ireland on a work trip.”


"Tell us!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Caitlin not having Kelly's baby?"
"I hope these two can solve any problem so that Caitlin can enjoy her new granddaughter!"
"She called it" to our daughter, "an 11 minute pregnancy video of Kelly's own birth recorded by Caitlin
Although Kelly's relationship with Caitlin is said to be unstable, she happily announced her pregnancy and the birth of her daughter through her social media account on February 4
She also explained that her relationship with them "carried them around for 23 years," which led to criticism that she felt they had always been a burden
“…… Kelly and Kardashian made headlines last month. The former athlete told pierce Morgan that she didn't talk to anyone in her family except her biological children Kendall Jenner 22 and Kelly
"The relationship between Kelly and Caitlin has been a little cold recently, because she has made it clear that she does not approve of having children at her age. At that time, she was not in love, but Kelly hopes that when Caitlin meets the new Caitlin, the situation will change..."
"Caitlin did call Kelly to congratulate her and say she was really happy to meet her new granddaughter."
"It happened that Caitlin had actually gone abroad when her baby was born. She was in Ireland on business."



Number  606
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related slideshow: Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's romance retrospective:”
“"She wants to take the kids to London with her while she's shooting -- and she's frustrated with the process.”
“But even after all this time, they have yet to finalize a divorce and custody agreement.”
“© Matt Baron/REX/Shutterstock Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt attend their "By the Sea" film premiere in Los Angeles on Nov. 5, 2015.”
“That's apparently now causing problems for the star, who allegedly wants to take their children -- Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 9 -- with her to London where she'll film Disney's "Maleficent 2" this summer.”
“Brad is based in Los Angeles, where Angelina also bought a home in 2017.”
“In a May 23 report, Page Six writes that Hollywood sources familiar with her film have revealed Angelina, 42, "is furious since she wants to bring the couple's brood with her while the film shoots."”
“The implication is that her current custody arrangement with Brad -- the terms of which have remained confidential -- doesn't allow her to do that at will.”
“"They are figuring out how it would work, but she is not happy," a source told Page Six.”
“They're talking about how it would work."”


"Related slides: Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie's romantic retrospective":
"She wanted to take the kids to London while filming - but she was disappointed with the process."
"But even after such a long time, they have not yet finalized the divorce and guardianship agreement."
"? on November 5, 2015, Matt Baron / Rex / shutterstock, Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt attended the premiere of their seaside movie in Los Angeles."
"It's obviously causing trouble for the star, who is said to want to take her children - 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian - to London, where she will film Disney's villain 2 this summer."
"Brad lives in Los Angeles, where Angelina bought a house in 2017."
"In a report on May 23, page 6, Hollywood sources familiar with her film revealed that Angelina, 42, was" very angry because she wanted to take the couple's children with her when the film was being shot. "
"The implication is that her current custody arrangement with Brad - the terms of which have been kept secret - does not allow her to do so at will."
"They're trying to figure it out, but she's not happy," a source told page
"They're talking about how it works."



Number  607
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“While Miranda and Anderson made their relationship official a few months later, Blake appears to confirm that this rumored affair may have gone down with his recent post.”
““Gwen has been a rock of support for Blake since they met and he was first going through his divorce,” our source went on to say.”
“A source close to Gwen EXCLUSIVELY told HL how she & Blake are dealing with the scandal!”
“Blake Shelton, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, are discussing his ex Miranda Lambert, 34, and the fact that Miranda allegedly started dating her married tour mate Evan Felker while she was still seeing her ex Anderson East.”
“A source close to Gwen EXCLUSIVELY gave us the deets about how Blake and Gwen are reacting to Miranda’s dating scandal that allegedly broke up a marriage, according to reports.”
““Blake and Gwen have been talking a lot about the latest drama with Blake’s ex Miranda,” our source said.”
““Upon hearing the news that Miranda is involved with someone else yet again, hopping from guy to guy, Blake opened up to Gwen about the darker secrets of his marriage with Miranda.”
“They discussed the doubt the heartache and the mistrust Blake developed for Miranda that led to the end of their marriage When it comes down to it the newest bombshell surrounding Miranda s complicated love life has only brought Blake...”
“...and Gwen closer...”
““Gwen and Blake have bonded over the latest drama with Miranda and his ex’s dating habits have had the strange effect of making Gwen and Blake stronger than ever as a couple.”


"A few months later, Miranda and Anderson officially announced their relationship, and Blake seems to confirm that this rumor may be related to his recent post."
"Gwen has been a supporter of Blake since they met, and he experienced a divorce for the first time," our source continued
"A source close to Gwen told HL exclusively how she and black handled the scandal!"
"Black Sheldon, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, are discussing his 34 year old ex boyfriend, Miranda Lambert, and the fact that Miranda is said to have started dating her married travel partner, Ivan felke, while still dating her ex boyfriend Evan felke in the East."
"It is reported that a source close to Gwen exclusively disclosed to us Blake's and Gwen's reaction to Miranda's dating scandal, which is said to have led to the breakdown of their marriage."
"Blake and Gwen have been talking about the latest drama with Blake's former Miranda," our source said
"When he heard that Miranda had another relationship with another man, Blake jumped from one man to another and opened the secret of his marriage to Gwen."
"They discussed Blake's suspicion, heartache and distrust of Miranda, which eventually led to the end of their marriage. In the final analysis, the latest bomb surrounding Miranda's complex love life only brought Blake..."
“… Closer to Gwen... "
"Gwen and Blake got married to Miranda in a recent play. His ex girlfriend's dating habits have had a strange effect, making Gwen and Blake stronger than ever."



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know your opinions!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Robert and Kristen’s reunion?”
“We’re not sure who he’ll end up with next, but like Twigs, it seems Robert’s trying to move on as best he can and we wish him nothing but the best!”
“Since then, the Twilight actor has been seen with pal Katy and a mystery blonde woman.”
“Twigs is focused on her music and her career and she has no time for the negative energy.”Twigs and Robert broke things off last Oct. after being together for more than two years and getting engaged in early 2015.”
““What they had for each other ran its course and she couldn’t care less if Robert is linking up with Kristen, Katy (Perry) or whomever.”
““When it comes to her feelings about him, she can admit that she did love him at one point, but all of her emotions towards Rob have fizzled,” the source continued.”
“Although she’s trying to move on without Robert, it seems Twigs did really care for him when they were together.”
“It’s hard to think that a couple who was once so close and adorable together is now seemingly strangers, but we can definitely understand Twigs’ pain.”
“She was really hurt when they decided to split up, and she carried that with her for a couple months before she eventually got over it.” Woah!”


"Let us know your opinion!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Robert and Christine's reunion?"
"We're not sure who he's going to be with next, but like a twig, Robert seems to be doing his best and we just want him to go well!"
Since then, the twilight actor has been seen with friends Katie and a mysterious blonde
"Twigs is focused on her music and career, and she has no time to enjoy negative energy." Twigs and Robert were together for more than two years. After they were engaged in early 2015, they broke up in October last year
"What they have with each other is natural, and she doesn't care if Robert is associating with Christine, Katie (Perry) or other people at all."
"When it comes to her feelings for rob, she can admit that she once loved him, but all her feelings for Rob have come to nothing," the source continued
"Although she wants to leave Robert and continue to live, it seems that twigs really care about him when they are together."
"It's hard to imagine that a couple who used to be so close and lovely now look like strangers, but we can absolutely understand the pain of twigs."
"When they decided to break up, she was really sad. She took it with her for several months and finally recovered." WOW



Number  609
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
““She’d be beyond thrilled to win an Academy Award for Best Actress — something that’s evaded both her and Angelina.”“He still considers Jen the love of his life,” the source concluded.Have something to add to the story?”
““He wants Jen involved again as he produces and develops more and more high-quality film and cable TV products.”That kind of professional partnership could pay off for Jen, too, since the insider states she wants in on “prestige projects” under his production banner.”
“Machine star wants Jen to be his partner in other pursuits In Touch further reported They worked well together when they formed the production company Plan B in 2001 an insider close to Brad told In Touch...”
“Jennifer has been married to Wanderlust co star Justin Theroux for two years now And while Brad would never dream of ruining his ex s new marriage he would take a second chance at love with Jen in a heartbeat If they can t be romantic partners though the War...”
“Brad keeps telling friends that he’s seeing everything more clearly.”However, these realisations are obviously far too late.”
““And while he’s not in love with Jen, he realises how much he does love her.”
““He has come to realise that leaving Jen for Angelina was one of the biggest mistakes of his life,” the source adds.”
“And now, he’s “in touch with emotions and his true self like never before,” the source says.And it seems like this self-awareness comes with some great realisations.”
“Years later, Brad regrets leaving the Friends star for his now-ex Angelina Jolie, a source told In Touch exclusively.Following his 2016 separation from Angie, Brad sobered up and sought therapy.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"She's excited about winning the Best Actress Oscar - something neither she nor Angelina thought of." "He still thinks Jen is the love of his life," the source said, ending. Do you have anything to add? "
"He wants Jen to be involved again in the production and development of more and more high-quality movies and cable TV products." This professional partnership is also good for Zhan, because people familiar with the matter say she hopes to participate in the prestige project under his production banner
"Robo star wants Jan to be his partner in other fields. Contact further reports that they worked very well when they set up production company plan B in 2001, Brad informed contact..."
"Jennifer has been married to Justin Cyrus, CO star of roamer, for two years. Although Brad never dreamed of ruining his ex-wife's new marriage, if they can't be romantic partners in the war, he will fall in love with her again in a flash..."
"Brad kept telling his friends that he saw everything better." However, it is obviously too late to realize this
"Although he didn't love Jane, he realized how much he loved her."
"He has realized that leaving Jane for Angelina is one of the biggest mistakes of his life," the source added
Now, however, he has "unprecedented access to emotion and his true self," the source said, she said. And then it seems that this self-awareness is accompanied by some great understanding. "
"Years later, Brad regretted leaving friends star for his ex girlfriend Angelina Jolie," a source told touch. Following his separation from Angie in 2016, Brad woke up and sought treatment. "



Number  610
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While he was courting Meghan, who was still on social media at that time, the prince reportedly had a secret Instagram account (that he used to follow her, close friends, and charities).”
“Prince Harry/Spike reportedly had that Facebook account for four years.”
“: Yes, @KensingtonRoyalSecret social-media account?”
“Photo: Chris Jackson/Getty ImagesRoyal: Catherine, Duchess of Cambridge (Kate Middleton)Public social-media account?”
“Kate Middleton.”
“According to the British tabloids, the queen has a personal iPad and laptop, loves to text, and even has a clandestine Facebook.”
“: Queen Elizabeth, my sister in height, apparently has a super-secret Facebook account, can you believe it?”
“ReportedlyWhat’s the deal?”
“: Yes!!!!!!”
“: Yes, @RoyalFamilySecret social-media account?”


"When he courted Megan, it was reported that Megan was still on social media and that he had a secret instagram account (he had followed Megan, close friends and charities)," he said
"It's reported that Prince Harry / spike has been on Facebook for four years."
": Yes, @ kensingtonroyal secret social media account?"
Photo source: Chris Jackson / Getty im agesRoyal:Catherine , the Duchess of Cambridge (Kate Middleton) public social media account? "
"Kate Middleton."
"According to British tabloids, the queen has a personal iPad and laptop, likes texting and even has a secret Facebook."
": Queen Elizabeth, my sister, obviously has a super secret Facebook account, can you believe it?"
"What does the report say?"
": Yes
": Yes, @ Royal familyscreen social media account?"



Number  611
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed from Getty ImagesEmbed from Getty Images...”
“Kendall Jenner is no stranger to getting up close and personal with music’s biggest names.”
“Diplo was ­stroking her arm.”
“They both appeared to be comfortable and familiar in each other’s company and hanging off everything the other ­person said.”
“There was lots of touching and some extended hugging.”
“My source at the Palm Springs bash told me: “Kendall and Diplo were super-flirty at the party.”
“They set tongues wagging after spending lots of time with each other at the party which was thrown to celebrate the launch of a cosmetics brand headed by ­Kendall’s sisters Kourtney Kardashian and Kylie Jenner.”
“My spies caught Kendall looking extremely close with the US producer— who counts Katy Perry as an ex — at a Coachella bash on Friday.”
“The model has dated the likes of Harry Styles and A$AP Rocky — and now I hear she may have Diplo set in her sights.”
“Ugh.”


"Embed from Getty Images embed from Getty Images..."
"Kendall Jenner is no stranger to being close to big names in music."
"Diplo stroked her arm."
"In the company of each other, they seem to be very comfortable and familiar, and ignore every word they say."
"There was a lot of touching and hugging."
My source at the palm spring party told me, "Kendall and diplo were very flirting at the party."
"Kendall's sisters, Kourtney Kardashian and Kylie Jenner, spent a lot of time together at the party to celebrate the launch of the cosmetics brand, and then they started to quarrel."
"My spies caught Kendall looking very close to this American producer (who counts Katie Perry as her ex boyfriend) at Friday's cochella carnival."
"The model has dated Harry styles and a $AP rocky - now I hear she may have taken a fancy to diplo."
"Ah."



Number  612
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Any fun guesses?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think Kim and Kanye will name their new daughter?”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s getting antsy for her surrogate to deliver the newest member of her family.”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, had a Christmas for the ages between her family’s star-packed holiday bash and her lavish gifts from husband Kanye West, 40.”
“But the one thing she was hoping for and didn’t get was the arrival of her third child via surrogate.”
““Kim is getting antsy and she would have loved to have her new baby for Christmas and she is feeling very eager to start being a new mom again,” a source close to the reality star tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“While she got to ring in the holiday with daughter North, 4, and son Saint, 2, she can’t wait for the baby to come so she can do all of the new mommy duties all over again.”
““She is so looking forward to all the firsts that she misses from Saint and North who have already gone through that process.”
“The excitement is at a fever pitch right now to get that baby home and healthy and ready to be loved upon.”
“She can’t wait for the surrogate’s birth process to start, she was ready months ago!”


"Any interesting guesses?"
"Hollywood actresses, what do you think Kim and Kanye will name their new daughter?"
"We have an exclusive report on how she is anxious about delivering the latest family members to her surrogate mother."
"Kim Kardashian, 37, had a Christmas, from her family's star feast to the lavish gift from her husband Kanye West, 40."
"But the only hope she didn't get was to have a third child through surrogacy."
A source close to reality TV star told reporters: "Kim Jong Nam is getting impatient. She wanted to have a baby at Christmas, but now she is eager to be a new mother again." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"When she took her 4-year-old daughter, north, and her 2-year-old son, saint, on holiday, she couldn't wait for the children to come so that she could start her new mother's work again."
"She was so looking forward to all the firsts that she missed the saints and northerners who had gone through this process."
"Now it's time to take the child home, keep him healthy, be ready to be loved, and be excited."
"She can't wait for the surrogate mother's delivery to start. She was ready months ago!"



Number  613
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I wonder if it was his way of saying to [Kris] what I think she was saying to him when she married me: a big f— you,” she wrote.”
“Caitlyn went on to speculate whether part of Robert’s motivation behind defending Simpson was to obtain some form of revenge against his ex-wife Kris Jenner, who was close friends with Brown Simpson.”
“Kim and Kourtney Kardashian travel to Cleveland to visit Khloé Kardashian who spends much of time there with her boyfriend Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson but they re interrupted by a news alert about Caitlyn s then unreleased memoir The Secrets of My Life...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It says in Caitlyn’s book Robert Kardashian knew O.J.”
“Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team to get back at his re-married ex,” reads Kim, 36.”
““Robert told Caitlyn in secret after the O.J.”
“...murder trial that he believed his friend was guilty.”“That’s not true!” interrupts Khloé, 33.”
““Like, what?”“Like, to sell a book, you’re gonna make something up?” says Kourtney, 37.”
““Dad so believed in him,” Kim says.”


"I don't know if that's the way he said to [Chris], as I think she said to him when she married me: a big f-you," she wrote
"Caitlin goes on to speculate whether one of Robert's motives in defending Simpson is to take some form of revenge on his ex-wife, Kris Jenner, who is a close friend of brown Simpson."
"Kim and kurtany Kardashian went to Cleveland to visit heloe Kardashian. Kardashian and her boyfriend, Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson, spent a lot of time there, but they were interrupted by a news report about Caitlin's then unpublished memoir, the secret of my life..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Caitlin's book says Robert Kardashian knew O.J."
Kim, 36, said: "Simpson is guilty, but he joined the defense team in retaliation for his remarried ex-wife."
"After O.J., Robert told Caitlin in secret."
“… A murder trial in which he found his friend guilty. " "That's not true! "Interrupted khlo é, 33."
"For example, what? "For example, if you want to sell books, you have to make something up? Courtney, 37, said
"Dad trusted him very much," Kim said



Number  614
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Once again, the supermarket tabloid has seemingly fabricated yet another imaginary feud.”
“...near each other because there were roughly around 1 million people in between them...”
“A rep for Carey exclusively assures us the report is 100 percent not true The pair who both performed in New York s Times Square on New Year s Eve the busiest night of the year weren t standing anywhere...”
“A so-called “source” tells the tabloid, “Now Joe doesn’t want anything to do with Mariah or even be at the same events.”Let Gossip Cop set the record straight.”
“...the ball dropped on New Year s Eve...”
“We re told it s not true The Mariah Joe Jonas Hate Fest Rolls On reads a headline in this week s National Enquirer which claims Carey refused to stand next to Jonas and his band in Times Square as...”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively correct this claim.”
“Mariah Carey and Joe Jonas are NOT feuding, nor did she refuse to stand next to him as the ball dropped in Times Square on New Year’s Eve, despite a manufactured report.”


"The supermarket tabloid seems to have made up another imaginary grudge."
“… Close to each other, because there are about one million of them... "
"A representative of Carey exclusively assured us that this report was 100% untrue. Both of them performed in New York Times Square on New Year's Eve, which was the busiest night of the year. They didn't stand anywhere..."
A so-called "source" told the tabloid, "now Joe doesn't want to have anything to do with Maria, or even participate in the same event." Let the gossip police clarify the facts
“… On New Year's Eve
"We were told it wasn't true that Mariah Jonas hate day rolled in this week's national inquiry, claiming Kelly refused to stand beside Jonas and his band in Times Square as..."
"The gossip police can completely correct this statement."
"There was no disagreement between Maria Kelly and Joe Jonas, and she didn't refuse to stand next to Jonas when the ball fell in Times Square on New Year's Eve, despite a fabricated report."



Number  615
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s a baby, she needs to go to bed at 7 o’clock and relax,” Rose said of Jenner.”
“In February 2015, Rose appeared on The Breakfast Club radio show, where she gave her unfiltered thoughts on Jenner’s relationship with Tyga.”
“In July 2013, the couple secretly wed; the next month, they had a big ceremony in which Rose wore a stunning Pnina Tornai for Kleinfeld gown.”
“Son Sebastian In February 2013 Rose and Khalifa had their first child son Sebastian announcing the news on Twitter...”
“In April 2012 West released the song Cold in which he rapped Only n a I got respect for is Wiz And I ll admit I had fell in love with Kim around the same time she had fell in love with him Amber Rose Marries Wiz Khalifa After Welcoming...”
“Kanye West Raps About Wiz Khalifa, Amber RoseAs West’s romance with Kardashian blossomed, so did that of his ex Rose and her new rapper fiancé, Wiz Khalifa.”
“The pair were spotted out together and Kardashian’s famous family even started pressing the reality star for details on her new romance (remember when he let her borrow his car?!).”
“Kanye West Starts Dating Kim KardashianFresh off his split from Rose, West set his sights on his longtime friend and crush Kim Kardashian in early 2012.”
“That December, the couple confirmed they were engaged in an Instagram post featuring Chyna’s giant diamond ring.”
“#Blessed #2Kings,” Tyga captioned a Twitter photo cradling his little boy.”


"She's a baby and she needs to go to bed at seven," Rose said of Jenner
"In February 2015, rose appeared on the breakfast club radio and gave an unfiltered idea of Jenna's relationship with TEGA."
"In July 2013, the couple got married in secret; the following month, they had a grand wedding and rose wore an amazing pnina tornai for Kleinfeld dress."
"Son Sebastian in February 2013, Ross and Halifa asked their first son Sebastian to announce the news on twitter..."
"In April 2012, West released a song" cold ". In this song, he only rapped" I respect the wizard ". I admit that I fell in love with Kim. At that time, she fell in love with Kim, and amber rose married the wizard Halifa after she was welcomed..."
"Kanye West rapped wiz Khalifa, amber roseas's relationship with Kardashian was in full swing, and so was his former rose and her new rap fiance wiz Khalifa."
When they were found together, Kardashian's family even began to ask the reality TV star for details of her new relationship (remember when he asked her to borrow his car?). "
"Kanye West started dating Kim Kardashian as soon as he broke up with rose. West turned to his old friend and crushed Kim Kardashian in early 2012."
"In December of that year, the couple confirmed that they had posted a post on instagram about Zina's giant diamond ring."
TEGA tweeted a photo of a young boy in his arms with the title: "lucky 2 gold."



Number  616
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thanks to the new custody arrangement in place, when the actor isn’t on set, he will be able to spend his free time with his children.”
“Pitt is expected to film his latest flick, “Once Upon a Time in Hollywood,” alongside Margot Robbie, Leonardo DiCaprio and other A-list stars over the summer.”
“He also seems very positive about the future,” the source shared.”
“You can tell he is taking better care of himself.”
““He looks like he has aged in reverse.”
““He seems like a better version of the old happy Brad,” an insider told People on Saturday.”
“Although Pitt hasn’t been partying since negotiating a new custody arrangement with Jolie, those around the star believe the court decision has had a positive effect on him.”
“Furthermore, Pitt and Aniston reportedly haven’t seen one another “in ages,” and the actor didn’t even attend the AFI Gala on June 7, where Clooney was honored with the Life Achievement Award.”
“However, the eldest child, Maddox, 16, is not required to abide by the new arrangement as the court believes he is old enough to decide how much time he wants to spend with his father.”
“Jolie still has primary custody of their six children.”


"Thanks to the new custody arrangements, when the actor is not on set, he can spend his free time with the children."
Pitt is expected to work with Margot Robbie, Leonardo DiCaprio and other first-line stars on his latest film, Hollywood past, this summer
"He also seems optimistic about the future," the source said
"You can see that he takes better care of himself."
"He looks old."
"He looks like a better version of old happy Brad," an insider told people on Saturday
"Although Pete has never been to a party since negotiating a new custody arrangement with Julie, people around the star believe that the court's decision has had a positive impact on him."
In addition, it is reported that Pitt and Aniston "haven't seen each other for a long time", and the actor didn't even attend the AFI party on June 7, where Clooney won the life achievement award
"However, the oldest child, 16-year-old Maddox, does not need to comply with the new arrangement because the court thinks he is old enough to decide how long he wants to stay with his father."
"Julie still has primary custody of their six children."



Number  617
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it’s too soon for Selena and The Weeknd to get married and start a family together?”
“HollywoodLife.com has reached out for comment.”
“So is she going to walk down the aisle as a pregnant pride?!”
“Get all of the crazy details right here.”
“Selena Gomez, 24, is pregnant with The Weeknd‘s baby, sources claim to Life & Style magazine in their Feb. 13 issue.”
“OMG!”
““Selena is crazy about The Weeknd, 24, and has told pals that he’s the one,” one insider tells the mag, adding that the “Heart Wants What It Wants” singer has been experiencing cravings.”
““She’s [dropped] several hints that she’s expecting, complaining to those close to her that she’s too tired to stay out and that she feels nauseous.”
“When she’s not nauseous, though, she’s having weird cravings, and she can’t stop eating ice cream!” That certainly does seem a little fishy.”
“It sounds kind of nuts, but friends say that Selena “can’t wait to have a child of her own”, according to the report, and she’s constantly telling friends “how much she wants to be a mom”.”


"Holly worms, do you think it's too early for Selena and Zhou De to get married?"
"Hollywood Life" we've already contacted
"So, will she go to the palace of marriage like a pregnant pride?"
"Put all the crazy details here."
Serena Gomez, 24, is pregnant with this week's baby, lifestyle magazine reported on February 13
"My God
"Selena is crazy about 24-year-old this week and she tells her friends that he's the one," a person familiar with the matter told the magazine She added that singers who "want what they want" have been experiencing craving
"She (dropped) some hints of what she was looking forward to and complained to the people around her that she was too tired to stay outside and felt sick."
"But when she doesn't want to throw up, she has a strange desire. She can't stop eating ice cream! "It's really a bit suspicious."
"It sounds crazy, but friends say that Selena" can't wait to have her own child, "and according to reports, she keeps telling friends" how much she wants to be a mother. "



Number  618
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If this were a reality show, we'd say they're overdoing it!”
“...had endless energy the source adds...”
“But could the Duchess of Cambridge be expecting a fourth child, as well?”
“That's the rumor floating around social media today thanks to a new report from Life & Style magazine.”
“The tabloid claims that Kate is pregnant with twins, and sonograms have revealed that she's expecting two girls.”
“A source says Will and Kate “couldn’t be happier about their double-baby news" and have already begun picking out names.”
“She s been telling pals that she s thrilled to be pregnant with two little princesses and has been proudly showing the sonogram to those closest to her Yes insiders claim a pair of princesses will be entering the world...”
“...in 2018”
“But don't expect any of that cutesy name nonsense:“They don’t plan to coordinate the girls’ names to rhyme or start with the same letter," says the source.”
“Though they re still debating the final choices they ve narrowed down names for the second baby the source said They both like Victoria Alice Olivia Alexandra and Elizabeth One of the babies was calm and relaxed whereas the other...”


"If it was a reality show, we would say they went too far!"
“… There are infinite sources of energy to add
"But will the Duchess of Cambridge have a fourth child?"
"Thanks to a recent report in lifestyle magazine, this is the rumor circulating on social media today."
The tabloid claimed that Kate was pregnant with twins, and ultrasound showed that she was pregnant with two girls
Will and Kate are "very happy with their twin news" and are already picking names, a source said
"She kept telling her friends that she was excited to be pregnant with two little princesses and was proud to show the ultrasonogram to those closest to her. Yes, the insider claims that a couple of princesses will enter the world... "
"2018"
"But don't expect cute names to be bullshit," the source said. "They're not going to rhyme girls' names or start with the same letter."
"Although they are still discussing the final choice, they have narrowed down the name range of the second child. The source said that they all like Victoria Alice Olivia Alexandra and Elizabeth. One of them is calm and relaxed, while the other is..."



Number  619
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Unfortunately, this agreement appears to have wreaked havoc on Suri’s relationship with her father, as the two are rarely seen together.”
“...the Church of Scientology...”
“In Going Clear Scientology and the Prison of Belief Alex Gibney s 2015 documentary Marty Rathbun a former high ranking Scientologist confesses that he was assigned to sabotage Cruise s second marriage I was to facilitate the breakup with Nicole Kidman According to the film Scientology head David Miscavige a...”
“One of the main celebrity faces of Scientology, Cruise appeared to have, at some point, handed over the reins of his personal life to the church.”
“Long before Holmes and Cruise started dating, the leading man had a reputation for strange behavior—the alleged result of his close relationship with the Church of Scientology.”
“That’s because Foxx and Holmes’ intense secrecy is rumored to be a condition of Holmes’ 2012 divorce from Tom Cruise, which was itself the ending of one of the most widely discussed and analyzed marriages in celebrity history.”
“While any secret celebrity dating scenario is fodder for a People cover or a clickbait headline, JamKat is a particularly elusive and fascinating pairing.”
“Anonymous sources insisted on Jamie and Katie’s relationship status and tabloids, sensing a story even bigger and more factually accurate than Jennifer Aniston’s phantom pregnancy, never gave up.”
“He’s never told me he’s dating her.”Still, as months and years passed, rumors of this celebrity coupling persisted.”
“...telling ET that I have no knowledge of Jamie with Katie at all adding I ve never seen them together...”


"Unfortunately, this agreement seems to have seriously damaged Suri's relationship with her father, because they are rarely together."
Church of Scientology
"In innocent Scientology and the prison of faith, in Alex Gibney's 2015 documentary Marty Rathbun, a former high Scientology official admitted that he was assigned to destroy Cruise's second marriage in order to facilitate my marriage with Nicole Kidman Kidman, according to David Miscavige a, director of the film Scientology
"As one of Scientology's leading celebrities, cruise seems to have given his private life to the church to some extent."
Long before Holmes and cruise started dating, the hero was known for his strange behavior, which is said to be the result of his close relationship with the Church of Scientology
"This is because it is said that the high confidentiality of Fox and Holmes is a condition for Holmes' divorce from Tom Cruise in 2012, and the divorce itself is the end of one of the most discussed and analyzed marriages in celebrity history."
"While any secret celebrity dating scene is the material for a person's cover or a click on a bait headline, jamkat is a particularly elusive and fascinating combination."
"Anonymous sources insist on Jamie and Katie's relationship and tabloids, feel a bigger and more real story than Jennifer Aniston's ghost pregnancy, and never give up."
"He never told me he was dating her." However, months and years later, rumors about the celebrity couple still exist
“… Tell et that I didn't know Jamie and Katie were together, and that I've never seen them together... "



Number  620
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Over the course of several episodes, she performed in acting and singing competitions designed to test her performance mettle.”
“The up-and-coming actress — then going by her given name, Emily Stone — made the cut as one of the final contestants vying for the role of Laurie on In Search of The Partridge Family.”
“Stone created a PowerPoint presentation called “Project Hollywood.” The presentation was designed to show her parents, in detail, what pursuing her dreams would entail.”
“But she had to convince her parents to let her move from Scottsdale, Arizona to Los Angeles first.”
“She knew she wanted to try her hand at acting professionally.”
“She had a huge ambitionBy the time she became a teenager, Stone had taken years of voice lessons and appeared in more than a dozen community productions.”
“2.”
“Next: Stone used unconventional methods to convince her parents to let her be an actress.”
“And she knew how to get what she wanted.”
“But when she was a teenager, she was ready for something more.”


In several episodes, she took part in performance and singing competitions to test her acting ability
The budding actress - later renamed Emily stone - was selected as one of the last contestants to compete for Laurie Ann's role in the search for partridge house
Stone produced a PowerPoint Presentation called project Hollywood. The purpose of this presentation is to show her parents in detail what they need to pursue their dreams
"But she had to persuade her parents to move from Scottsdale, Arizona, to Los Angeles first."
"She knew she wanted to try professional acting."
"She has a huge ambition. When she became a teenager, stone had taken vocal lessons for many years and appeared in more than a dozen community productions."
“2.”
"Next step: SGM unconventional way to persuade her parents to let her be an actress."
"She knows how to get what she wants."
"But by the time she was a teenager, she was ready to do more."



Number  621
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was the inspiration behind several of her early songs, including “Boys Boys Boys,” “Judas” and, ironically, “Yoü and I.”This would have been the first marriage for both.”
““He gave me his heart on Valentine’s Day, and I said YES!” she captioned the shot.”
“The couple, who got engaged on Valentine’s Day 2015, ended their relationship earlier this month, a source confirms to Us.”
“She was really crushed the insider says adding that the couple drifted apart and that Gaga s recent trip to Cabo was a girls trip to get away and get over it The Born This Way singer 30 and the Chicago Fire actor 35 first met on the set of...”
“...her Yoü and I music video in 2011 in which he played her naked bathtub dwelling love interest...”
“They started dating several months later.”
“The pair previously split for a brief period in May 2012 before getting back together the following month.”
“Gaga excitedly confirmed her engagement to Kinney via Instagram in February 2015, sharing a close-up photo of her stunning heart-shape diamond ring.”
“The American Horror Story: Hotel actress, who is rumored to return for the hit FX series’ forthcoming sixth season, also gushed about her longtime beau in a November 2013 interview on The Ellen DeGeneres Show.”
“I loved her from the moment I met her.”Gaga previously dated Nebraska native musician Lüc Carl from 2005 to 2010.”


He was the inspiration for several of her early songs, including the boy, Judas and, ironically, youyou and me. It will be their first marriage
"He gave me his heart on Valentine's day and I agreed! "She titled the shot."
"A source confirmed to us that the couple got engaged on Valentine's day in 2015 and ended their relationship earlier this month."
"She's really crushed," the person familiar with the matter added, adding that the couple are estranged, Gaga's recent trip to cabo is a girl's trip to get rid of and overcome it's born to be like this, singer 30 and Chicago firefighter 35 meet for the first time set up... "
“… In her 2011 "me and you" music video, he showed her naked in the bathtub
"They started dating in a few months."
"The two broke up briefly in May 2012 and got back together next month."
"Gaga excitedly confirmed her engagement to Kinney through instagram in February 2015 and shared an amazing close-up of her heart-shaped diamond ring."
"American horror story: Hotel actress, it is said that she will return to the sixth season of the popular FX series, and talked about her long-time boyfriend in an interview with Ellen DeGeneres in November 2013."
"I loved her from the moment I met her." Gaga dated Nebraska native musician L ü C Carl from 2005 to 2010



Number  622
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But the worried pal says Kim's obsession with plastic surgery has gone overboard.”
“Then lipo on her inner and outer thighs, so she can pull off a thigh gap in time for bikini season in Hawaii!”
“Sources says "There’s the strong possibility of a rib removal."”
“But Kim's not stopping there.”
“As Radar previously reported exclusively, the mother-of-two is reducing her butt little by little and paying visits to her plastic surgeon to gradually remove the fat that was injected into it .”
“Kim’s not shy about admitting her butt plans but the rest she’s planning in secret — like a military operation!”
“That includes her face, thighs and boobs, according to the informant.”
“...spills the snitch.”
““She has plans for implants galore!"”
“Click through to find out what the big booty plastic princess is getting done this time!”


"But this worried friend said Kim's obsession with plastic surgery has gone too far."
"Then apply lipo on the inside and outside of her thighs so she can pull down the thigh gap in time for bikini season in Hawaii!"
It is said that "the possibility of rib resection is very high."
"But Kim won't stop there."
"As radar reported exclusively before, the mother of two is shrinking her buttocks bit by bit and going to see a plastic surgeon to gradually remove the fat injected into her buttocks."
"Kim has no qualms about admitting her ass plan, but the rest is her secret plan - like a military operation!"
"According to the source, this includes her face, thighs and chest."
“… He spilled the informant. "
"She has a lot of implant plans!"
"Click to see what the plastic princess is going to do this time!"



Number  623
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Give You Edward Cullen Daydreams...”
“RELATED CONTENT Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson Reunite at Lily Rose Depp s Birthday Party Pics Robert Pattinson Has His Gun Guitar and Mini Horse in Official Damsel Poster Exclusive Robert Pattinson Shirtless and Jogging Barefoot on the Beach Will...”
“The 32-year-old actor has made a name for himself by playing sullen and dark characters, but in his new Western film (with a twist), Damsel , he’s taking on comedy.”
““It was really fun.”
“I really wanted to do one for ages,” Pattinson told ET’s Katie Krause at the Hollywood premiere of the film on Wednesday.”
““I mean, I’ve played a lot of serious psychopaths so I thought I’d play a funny psychopath.”
““The film turns the Western archetype on its head thanks to Pattinson’s co-star Mia Wasikowska’s character, Penelope.”
““It seemed kind of subversive.”
“Most Westerns the archetype lead cowboy is someone who s sort of they can handle anything and it s them against the world and they come to save the damsel but pretty much every single male character in this movie...”
“...is completely inept Pattinson explained...”


"Here's Edward Cullen's daydream..."
"Related content Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson reunite at Lily Rose Depp's birthday party. Robert Pattinson has his gun, guitar and Mini Horse on the official girl poster. Exclusive Robert Pattinson goes barefoot on the beach and jogs barefoot..."
"The 32 year old actor is famous for his gloomy role, but in his new western film the girl, he's putting on a comedy."
"It's really fun."
"I've really wanted to make one for a long time," Pattinson told et's Katie Klaus at the Hollywood premiere on Wednesday
"I mean, I've played a lot of serious psychopaths, so I think I'll play an interesting psychopath."
"Because of Pattinson's co star Mia vasikovska's role as Penelope, the film completely subverts the Western prototype."
"It looks a little subversive."
"The archetypal protagonists of most Westerns are cowboys who can deal with anything, which is that they oppose the world and they come to save girls, but almost every male character in this film..."
“… It's totally incompetent, Pattinson explained



Number  624
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“How’d it go?’ And I lost it.””
““She didn’t seem nervous.”
“Sussex but to her friends she s still just Meg Makeup artist Daniel Martin the creative consultant for Honest Beauty Dior Beauty brand ambassador and a longtime friend of Meghan s who helped her achieve the perfect beauty look for her wedding day tells PEOPLE that even he was confused...”
“...as to what to call her after she was married to Prince Harry...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I asked her that.”
“‘Do I bow to you?”
“I don’t want to disrespect you, but I’ve known for almost ten years.”
“What’s up?”
“'” he recalls.”


"How's it going? "I lost it."
"She doesn't look nervous."
"Sussex, but to her friends, she's still MEG makeup artist Daniel Martin, creative advisor to the brand ambassador of honest beauty Dior, Megan's old friend, who helped her get the perfect look on her wedding day. She told people that even he was confused..."
“…… As for what to call her after she married Prince Harry... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I asked her."
"Shall I bow to you?"
"I don't want to disrespect you, but I've known you for nearly ten years."
"What's the matter?"
"He recalled



**Something goes wrong**
“He does have an ongoing custody battle with his soon-to-be ex-wife Angelina Jolie, 43, to worry about.”
“The source went so far as to claim that the actors’ other co-star, Leonardo DiCaprio, 43, “has called [Brad] out for layering it on so thick [with Margot].” None of this has been confirmed, and Brad could just be a happy (almost legal) bachelor minding his own business!”
“We’ll explain what’s really going on between these two!”
“Sorry, this won’t be a Mr. & Mrs. Smith situation.”
“Margot Robbie, 28, has eyes for one man, and it’s not for her co-star Brad Pitt, 54!”
“The two actors began filming for Quentin Tarantino’s Once Upon a Time In Hollywood earlier this summer, and rumors sprung that Brad had the hots for Margot.”
“While that’s yet to be confirmed, we can confirm this: Margot is respecting her wedding vows!”
““Margot is madly in love with her husband Tom,” a friend of Margot’s shares EXCLUSIVELY with HollywoodLife.”
“Just a reminder — Margot wedded Tom Ackerley, 28, the producer for her film I, Tonya, on December 18, 2016!”
““Even if Brad tried, he would never be able to woo her away.”Margot’s admiration for Brad — because really, you can’t help but admire the knockout — is purely professional!”


"He's worried that the custody battle between him and his 43 year old ex-wife-to-be, Angelina Jolie, continues."
"The source even claimed that the other co star of the two actors, 43 year old Leonardo DiCaprio," cried Brad because of his close relationship with Margot, "none of this has been confirmed. Brad may just be a happy (almost legal) bachelor who cares about his own business!" ！”
"We'll explain what happened between these two people!"
Sorry, this is not the case with the Smiths
"Margot Robbie, 28, only stares at one man, not her partner, Brad Pitt, 54!"
Earlier this summer, the two actors began filming in Hollywood for Quentin Tarantino's once upon a time, and there were rumors that Brad was interested in Margot
"Although this has not been confirmed, we can confirm this: Margot respects her marriage vows!"
"Margot is madly in love with her husband Tom, who is Margot's exclusive partner with Hollywood life."
"Just a reminder - on December 18, 2016, Margot married 28 year old Tom ackerley, the producer of her movie I, Tonya!"
"Even if Brad tried, he would never be able to take her away." Margot's admiration for Brad - because really, you can't help enjoying the knockout - is purely professional! "



Number  626
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He's bi-racial, and I think that many of the Caucasian people (Republicans and Tea Partiers) have a problem with his skin color.”
“Short answer: No.”
“And those critical of his performance are really sick of being labeled racist.”
“Rick:Not really, but a lot of people have grown weary of all the "race card" excuses for Obama's very poor performance.”
“Interested to know which ones made it on air?”
“Here’s my question to you: Has President Obama made racism worse?”
“Gallup found that the day after Mr. Obama was elected, a whopping 70% predicted race relations would improve.”
“Back in 2008, when the nation voted for "hope and change," Americans had a much rosier view of what this president would do for race relations.”
“41% percent see no change.”
“Americans are split on how Mr. Obama's presidency has changed race relations in the U.S.A recent USA Today/Gallup poll shows 35% of those surveyed said race relations have improved, while 23% say they've gotten worse under President Obama.”


"He's a bi racial person, and I think a lot of white people (Republicans and tea partiers) have problems with his skin color."
"Short answer: No."
"Those who criticize his performance are really tired of being labeled racist."
"Rick: not so good, but a lot of people are tired of all the race card excuses for Obama's bad performance."
"Would you like to know which program is on?"
"I want to ask you a question: has President Obama made racism worse?"
Gallup found that on the day after Obama's election, up to 70% predicted that race relations would improve
"As early as 2008, when the nation voted for hope and change, Americans had a more optimistic view of what the president would do for race relations."
"41% think there is no change."
"Americans have different views on how Obama's presidency can change race relations in the United States. In a recent USA Today / Gallup poll, 35% of respondents said race relations had improved, while 23% said they had become worse under President Obama. "



Number  627
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on Gossip Cop:Ben Affleck isn't trying to win back Jennifer GarnerEmma Watson and Robert Pattinson aren't datingBrad Pitt isn't trying to support Jennifer Aniston...”
“The webloid's seemingly fake "insider" further purports, "Khloe is uber protective of Kylie and it really makes her sad to see that Kylie isn't getting the kind of love and commitment from Travis that she's getting from Tristan."”
“The fabricated article comes from a website known for its manufactured Kardashian-Jenner stories, but Gossip Cop can set the record straight.”
“We're told that no one close to either star is feeding the untrustworthy HollywoodLife with information about their pregnancies.”
“REX/ShutterstockAs recently reported, on Wednesday Kardashian revealed she and Tristan are expecting their first child together.”
“So, to capitalize on that news, the unreliable outlet has manufactured an absurd article titled, "Khloe Kardashian Feels Guilty Over Happy Pregnancy As Sis Kylie Struggles With Hers."”
“In the story a so called source is quoted as telling the often discredited website Khloe has gone through absolute hell when it comes to her relationships so she feels very deserving of all the happiness with Tristan but there s one dark spot for her right now and that...”
“...s the state of Kylie s relationship with Travis Scott...”
“What's more, the outlet's questionable "source" goes on to claim that Kardashian "has no reason to feel guilty," but "she feels bad that things are going so well for her when her little sister is struggling" with her "reported pregnancy."”
“They're all made-up.”


"More about gossip police: Ben Affleck doesn't want to win back Jennifer Garner, Ma Watson doesn't have a date with Robert Pattinson, and Brad Pitt doesn't want to support Jennifer Aniston..."
The seemingly false "inside story" of online encyclopedia further claims that "Khloe is Kylie's super protector. It's really sad to see that Kylie didn't get the love and commitment she got from Travis and Tristan."
"This fake article comes from a website famous for fabricating the story of Kardashian Jenner, but the gossip police can clarify the truth."
"We were told that no one around a star would provide information about pregnancy to an untrustworthy Hollywood star."
According to recent reports, Kardashian revealed on Wednesday that she and Tristan are having their first child together
Therefore, in order to take advantage of the news, the unreliable media fabricated an absurd article entitled "sister Kelly feels guilty for her happy pregnancy."
"In this story, a so-called source is quoted as saying that the often dishonest website Khloe has gone through hell when it comes to her relationship, so she feels very worthy of all the happiness with Tristan, but there is a dark spot for her now and that..."
"The relationship between Kelly and Travis Scott"
More importantly, the media's suspicious "source" continues to claim that Kardashian "has no reason to feel guilty," but "she feels sorry that things are going so well while her little sister is struggling" with her "pregnancy report."
"It's all made up."



Number  628
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meghan Markle's half sister has been repeatedly vocal about her marriage to Prince Harry...”
“Meghan and Samantha’s father Thomas Markle, a retired lighting director who lives in Mexico, did not attend the royal wedding ay Windsor Castle, reportedly after a heart attack just days before the event.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Samantha, 53, is intent on telling all, including dirt about the Markle family.”
“She revealed: “Everyone will just have to read it to see what really goes on in the shadows.”
““My book is much more comprehensive as it definitely takes an in-depth look.”


"Megan markel's half sister has repeatedly publicly expressed her marriage to Prince Harry..."
It is reported that Megan and Samantha's father, Thomas Markle, had a heart attack a few days before the wedding and did not attend the royal wedding at Windsor Castle
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Samantha, 53, wants to tell everyone about the scandal, including the mark family."
"Everyone just needs to read it to see what's going on in the shadows," she revealed
"My book is much more comprehensive because it definitely needs to be studied in depth."



Number  629
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Who would you cast as Edward and Bella today?”
“They hope something gets off the ground,” our insider adds.”
“Where has the time gone?”
“Twilight first hit theaters in Nov. of 2008, turning Robert Pattinson, 31, and Kristen Stewart, 27, into international superstars with both their film franchise and their epic off-screen romance.”
“While they’re no longer a couple, the actors think that with the 10 year anniversary upon us the time is right for a reboot.”
““Rob and Kristen would love to see Twilight come back or be rebooted, but they would love to see a TV show come out of it most.”
“And they would be totally down to be a part of it, but would only like to make an appearance over being fully cast in the project,” a source close to the stars tells HollywoodLife.com EXClUSIVELY.”
““They realize what the franchise did for their careers and would be happy to support it for a new generation to enjoy.”
“Relations between Robert and Kristen seemed to have thawed after some frosty years since the franchise — as well as their romance — ended.”
“HollywoodLifers, would you like to see a reboot of Twilight?”


"Who will you choose to play Edward and Bella today?"
Our insiders added: "they want to make some progress."
"Where's the time?"
"Twilight" premiered in November 2008. Robert Pattinson, 31, and Kristen Stewart, 27, became international stars with their film specials and epic off screen love
"Although they are no longer a couple, the actors think that as the 10th anniversary approaches, it's time to start again."
"Rob and Christine would love to see Twilight return or restart, but they would like to see a show stand out most."
"They will be fully involved, but only want to play a role in the project," a source close to star told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"They are aware of what the franchise has done to their careers and are happy to support the new generation."
"The relationship between Robert and Christine seems to thaw after a few years of indifference, because their love is over."
"Hollywood stars, do you want to see Twilight restart?"



Number  630
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Who knows?”
“The two apparently dated, but maybe it was Christina’s rising star that got between them.”
“Both of them were in their 20s at the time, with their careers just starting out, and from the pics, it looks like the two had a fun-filled relationship.”
“...advertising14 Brad Pitt Was Sinitta’s BoyVia trend-chaser.comBack in the 1980s, before social media was there to record it and come up with a cute #couplegoals name, Brad dated pop songstress Sinitta for about two years.”
“He was even said to have the key to her apartment, but by June 2018, it was clear that it was all over when Neri was spotted with billionaire hedge fund manager Bill Ackerman in Paris.”
“...discussions about her projects which often bring together design biology computer science and engineering...”
“Neri Oxman according to her MIT bio is an architect and designer and the Sony Corporation Career Development Professor and Associate Professor of Media Arts and Sciences at the MIT Media Lab where she founded and directs the Mediated Matter research group Sure we bet she and Brad have many...”
“Brad was spotted going in and out of her apartment in Cambridge at all hours of the day and night.”
“Neri Oxman is a professor at MIT and according to all reports, their six-month relationship was getting serious as of April 2018.”
“He's even played off kilter killers in Kalifornia and Snatch, but rocket scientists, not so much.”


"Who knows?"
"The two obviously dated, but maybe Christina's new star brought them together."
"At that time, both of them were in their 20s, and their careers were just beginning. From the photos, their relationship seemed to be full of fun."
“… Ad 14 Brad Pitt is the boy trend of sinata- chaser.comBack In the 1980s, before social media recorded and came up with a cute name, Brad dated pop singer sinita for about two years
"It's said that he even had the key to her apartment, but by June 2018, when Neri was found in Paris with Bill Ackerman, a billionaire hedge fund manager, it was obviously over."
“… Discussions about her projects, which often combine design biology, computer science and Engineering
"According to her resume at MIT, Neri Oxman is an architect and designer, Professor of career development at Sony and associate professor of media art and science at MIT's media lab, where she founded and led the research group on intermediates, and of course we bet she and Brad have a lot of..."
"Brad was found walking in and out of her apartment in Cambridge day and night."
"Neri Oxman is a professor at MIT, and according to all reports, as of April 2018, their six-month relationship has become more and more serious."
"He even played some abnormal killers in California and squitch, but not rocket scientists."



Number  631
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Jason Merritt/Getty Images]”
“Regardless, they are eating up the talk about it.”Taylor Swift and Drake weren’t seen together again following the appearance at the party, and the rapper has since been linked to Jennifer Lopez.”
“Months after the singer was linked to rapper Drake, a source claims she is hoping to rekindle her past relationship with Conor Kennedy.”
“On January 31, Radar Online shared a news clip that claimed Taylor Swift found her former boyfriend’s recent mug shot to be “sexy.”“[Taylor Swift]’s confessed she finds him hotter than ever his bad-boy moment,” an insider alleged.”
“As the outlet revealed, Taylor Swift and Conor Kennedy reportedly dated for three months in 2012 before splitting amid unconfirmed reports of the Kennedy family disapproving of the singer.”
“Conor Kennedy was arrested earlier this month in Aspen, Colorado, following a fight that was prompted after a couple of people insulted one of his friends.”
““[Taylor Swift] has always regretted the way she and Conor parted ways,” added a pal.”
“While it is unclear whether Taylor Swift and her former boyfriend have been in touch in the years since they split, romance rumors are nothing new for Swift.”
“In fact, Swift often makes headlines for her alleged romances, despite the fact that many of the men she’s been tied to haven’t actually been her boyfriend.”
“In 2016, Taylor Swift started her year off with a romance with Calvin Harris, which had begun in 2015 after the former couple were introduced to one another at the Brit Awards.”


"[Jason Merritt / Getty pictures]
Taylor swift and Drake never showed up at the party, and rapper has been associated with Jennifer Lopez ever since
A few months after the singer was in contact with rapper Drake, it was reported that she wanted to rekindle her past relationship with Conor Kennedy
"On January 31, radar online shared a news clip claiming that Taylor Swift found a recent photo of her ex boyfriend" sexy. ". "(Tyler Swift) admits she found him sexier than ever, his bad boy moment," claimed one insider
"Taylor swift and Connor Kennedy are reported to have dated for three months in 2012, before breaking up in unconfirmed reports that the Kennedy family disapproved of the singer."
Earlier this month, Connor Kennedy was arrested in Aspen, Colorado, after a couple insulted a friend of his
"(Taylor Swift) always regretted the way she and Connor parted ways," a friend added
"Although it's not clear whether Taylor swift and her ex boyfriend have been in touch in the years after the breakup, romantic rumors are nothing new to swift."
"In fact, swift often makes headlines because of her so-called love affair, although in fact, many of the men she has relations with are not her boyfriends."
"In 2016, Taylor Swift's relationship with Calvin Harris began a new year. The relationship started in 2015 when the former couple was introduced at the Brit Awards."



Number  632
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In addition, she frequents the spray tanning bed every other day and, as the source said, “the price of her ever-changing hairstyles and hair color could pay someone’s mortgage!”Source: Getty...”
““Khloé has been working out constantly, and she’s even stopped partying and drinking to excess,” the source said.”
“Screen Shot 2015-10-01 at 2.41.54 PMSource: Instagram/@khloekardshianKardashian pays celebrity fitness trainer Gunnar Peterson up to $130,000 a year for his services.”
““Khloé says it’s totally worth the cost,” the source said.”
“Source: SplashA source told Star magazine that Khloe has spent over $3 million to go from the “ugly duckling” of the Kardashian-Jenner clan into arguably the hottest of the sisters.”
““Khloé is more confident than she’s ever been,” a family insider said.”
““With all the work she’s having done, it’s surprising she has the time or money to do anything else!” So how did she do it?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: Instagram/@khloekardashianAccording to the source, her biggest transformation is all in that little waist.”
“Khloe has reportedly lost over 50 lbs.”
“...through diet and exercise.”


"In addition, she often patronize spray beds every other day, as the source said," her changing hairstyle and hair color can pay someone's mortgage. "Source: Getty..."
"Khlo é has been exercising and she has even stopped partying and drinking too much," the source said
"October 1, 2015 2:41 p.m. screenshot source: instagram / @ khloekardshian Kardashian pays $130000 a year for celebrity fitness coach Gunnar Peterson's service."
"Khlo é said it was totally worth the cost," the source said
"Source: a splash a source told star magazine that Khloe spent more than $3 million to go from the Kardashian Jenner family's" ugly duckling "to arguably the hottest of the sisters."
"Heloe is more confident than ever," said one family insider
"It's amazing that she has time and money to do other things after so much work!"! "And how did she do it?"
"The article continues with the following advertising source: instagram / @ khloekardashiana. According to the source, her biggest transformation is in her small waist."
"Khloe is reported to have lost more than 50 pounds."
“… Through diet and exercise. "



Number  633
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And they’ll throw something out like, ’24 bucks’ or something, and I feel fantastic.”At the same time, Pitt admitted to the Times-Picayune that he and the organization had been “incredibly naive” in understanding what it really takes to rebuild a community.”
““And I say what’s your utility bill?”
““There’s six out of seven homes right next to me that have had significant repairs.”Another resident, Doris Wyman, said she and her husband Henry are only able to stay in their Make it Right home because Henry is a skilled handyman.”
““Look how many are boarded up now or abandoned.”“People have problems with porches, roofs, walls falling apart,” she added.”
““Make It Right says this is the largest green community in the United States,” Fowler said to the Daily Mail.”
“Fowler told the Daily Mail she had to repeatedly petition Make it Right and the city to tear it down.”
“The house was left unoccupied and rotting away.”
“Make it Right promised to renovate the house, but workers found its roof was beyond repair, Fowler said.”
“Resident Constance Fowler told the Daily Mail that her next-door neighbors in a Make it Right home had to move out because the wife was getting sick from the mold.”
“But some found they couldn’t keep up with the repairs and have abandoned them, the Daily Mail added.”


"They throw away things like '24 dollars' and I feel great." At the same time, Pitt admitted to the times that he and the organization were "naive" to understand what is really needed to rebuild a community
"How much do you charge for water and electricity?"
"Right next to me, six out of seven houses have been overhauled." Another resident, Doris Wyman, said she and her husband, Henry, had to stay at home because he was a skilled handyman
"Look at how many people are boarded up or abandoned now." "People have problems with the collapse of the porch, the roof, the walls," she added
"If this is the largest green community in the United States, get it right," Fowler told the daily mail
"Fowler told the daily mail that she had to petition repeatedly to correct the mistake and get the city to demolish it."
"The house is empty. It's rotten."
"We promised to repair the house, but the workers found that the roof couldn't be repaired," Fowler said
"Resident Constance Fowler told the daily mail that her next door neighbor had to move out of a" let it be "home because her wife was ill with mold."
"But some people find that the repairs can't keep up and have given up," the daily mail added



Number  634
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Looks like Caitlyn’s found herself quite the catch!”
“According to her Instagram page, Sophia is studying finance at Pepperdine — so, obvi, homegirl is just as smart as she is stunning.”
““A future male sexual companion?”
“Not happening, at least for now, and perhaps not ever,” she wrote in her tome before she had gender reassignment surgery.”
“A future female sexual companion?”
“I think about that.”
““A future female companion?”
“They feel a mix of jealousy and distrust about it.”In her memoir, The Secrets of My Life — which was released last year— the transgender rights advocate opened up about her future dating prospects after announcing her transition in 2015.”
““She’s their age!”
““They’ve heard from friends that Caitlyn’s dating Sophia, and it upsets them like you wouldn’t believe,” another source told Life & Style.”


"Looks like Caitlin found herself popular!"
"According to her instagram page, Sophia is studying finance in Pepperdine - so Obi, homegirl is as smart as she is."
"The male sexual partner of the future?"
Before undergoing sex change surgery, she wrote in her book, "at least not now, maybe never."
"Future female sexual partners?"
"I thought about it."
"The female partner of the future?"
"They feel jealous and distrustful of it." In her memoir the secret of my life, published last year, the transgender rights advocate revealed her future dating prospects after announcing her transformation in 2015
"She's as old as them!"
"They heard from their friends that Caitlin was dating Sophia, which upset them as if you didn't believe it," another source told life & style



Number  635
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...doesn t hurt that her boyfriend would be playing for the same team as her sister Kendall Jenner s man Blake Griffin HollywoodLifers do you want Tristan to be traded to the Clippers...”
“Khloe feels family is the most important thing in the world so she is hoping they get to move back to LA soon Switching to an LA team does seem pretty ideal for the couple and if the reality TV star is looking to be closer to family it definitely...”
“Khloe wants her baby to be a California kid and grow up with her cousins and family close to her.”
“A blockbuster NBA trade that would put her and her baby back in LA would make Khloe happy and relieved.”
““In her own subtle way, Khloe has been gently encouraging Tristan to do everything in his power to get traded to a team in Los Angeles.”
““With a baby on the way, Khloe feels that having the love and support of her family now is more important than ever,” the source said.”
“The source added that being close to family is more important now than ever due to the 33-year-old’s rumored pregnancy .”
“While Khloe loves spending time in Cleveland, there is no place like home.” See pictures of Tristan and Khloe here!”
““It would be the best scenario for her to be able to be back in LA close to her family on a more full time basis.”
““Khloe is freaking out and totally excited about the possibility of Tristan being traded to an NBA team in Los Angeles,” a source told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"It doesn't hurt that her boyfriend will play on the same team as her sister Kendall Jenner's boyfriend, Blake Griffin Hollywood rivers. Do you want Tristan to be traded to the Clippers... "
"Khloe thinks that family is the most important thing in the world, so she hopes that they can move back to Los Angeles as soon as possible and join the Los Angeles team. It's really ideal for the couple. If reality TV stars want to be closer to family, it must be..."
"Khloe wants her children to be California children and grow up with her cousins and family."
"A blockbuster NBA deal, can let her and her children back to Los Angeles, will let helo feel happy and gratified."
"In her own subtle way, Khloe has been gently encouraging Tristan to do what she can to trade a team to Los Angeles."
"With children, Khloe feels it is more important than ever to have the love and support of his family," the source said
"The source added that it is more important than ever to be close to his family because of rumors that 33 year old Edison Chen is pregnant."
"Although Khloe likes to spend time in Cleveland, there is no place like home." Look at the photos of Tristan and Khloe
"It would be the best for her to be able to return to Los Angeles on a more full-time basis and be closer to her family."
"Colo is very shocked and excited about the possibility that Tristan will be traded to the NBA team in Los Angeles," a source told reporters



Number  636
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jonas could Blake and Gwen really be married...”
“You could tell these two are soulmates.”
“The two are reportedly already husband and wife, having gotten married in a secret ceremony on his ranch!”
“Surprise!”
“In a year that has seen so many surprise engagements, it seems Blake Shelton, 42, and Gwen Stefani, 49, one-upped everyone by having a surprise wedding!”
“The two got married in March, insiders tell Star magazine, and for the past six months, the two have kept their marriage a secret!”
“The alleged wedding took place at Blake’s Tishomingo, Oklahoma ranch, at a “small gazebo by the lake,” where 45 friends and family members watched.”
““It was super intimate.”
“Not even locals in Tish knew it was happening,” an insider tells Star.”
““It was the most perfect day,” the source says.”


"Will Jonas black and Gwen really get married..."
"You can see that these two are soul mates."
"It's reported that the two are already husband and wife, and they had a secret wedding on his farm!"
"Surprise
"In this year, there are so many surprise dates, it seems that blacksheldon, 42, gwenster Vanni, 49, one of them held a surprise wedding for everyone!"
"People familiar with the matter told star magazine that they got married in March this year. In the past six months, they have kept their marriage secret!"
It is said that the wedding was held at Black's tikhomigo ranch in Oklahoma, where 45 relatives and friends watched the "little Pavilion by the lake"
"Too close."
"Even the local people in tish don't know it's true," an insider told the star
"It was the perfect day," the source said



Number  637
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementLet us know in the comments section down bellow.”
“Is she brave or is it an unwise decision?”
“Paris decision to make everything public...”
“Regarding what Paris grandparents Katherine and Joe Jackson think about her plan to reveal the family s darkest secrets in her upcoming book the insider said They are all supportive of this as is Paris s boyfriend Michael Snoddy and the rest of her family What do you think about...”
““She needs to get this out into a book so that she can finally let it go and stop obsessing about his death.” The insider also added that she’ll touch upon her alleged abuse too, as well as the other dark instances in her life.”
““Paris believes that Michael was murdered, as do many of her other family members,” a Jackson family insider stated.”
“Furthermore, she revealed more about the traumatic first time she was a victim of sexual abuse and later on she also opened up about her father’s death – claiming once again that he was murdered.”
“She openly talked about sensitive topics like battling depression and even her multiple suicide attempts.”
“She just wants to shut down all the BS that is out there.”Now, in a new and unexpected interview with Rolling Stone this week, the 18 year old gave fans a preview of what they should expect when the book hits the bookstores.”
“She doesn’t need the money.”


"Please let us know in the comments section below."
"Was she brave or unwise?"
"Paris decided to make everything public..."
"As for Paris' grandparents Katherine and Joe Jackson's views on her plan to expose the darkest secrets of the family in her forthcoming book, people familiar with the matter said that they all support this. So does Paris' boyfriend Michael snowdy and her other family members. Do you think..."
"She needs to put it in a book so that she can finally let go of his death." She will also touch on what she calls abuse and other dark events in her life, the person added
"Paris thinks Michael was murdered, as are many other members of her family," said a Jackson insider
"In addition, she revealed more about the trauma of being a victim of sexual abuse for the first time, and later disclosed her father's death - again claiming that he was murdered."
"She talked openly about sensitive topics, such as fighting depression, and even attempted suicide many times."
"She just wanted to shut down all BS." Now, in a new, unexpected interview with rolling stone this week, the 18-year-old gives fans a preview of what they should expect when the book hits the bookshop shelves
"She doesn't need money."



Number  638
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It now appears that the couple, who have vowed to stay good friends, took the trip to Mexico to either make one last attempt to save their marriage or as a way to say good-bye.”
“For these people, it’s not surprising that Aniston and Theroux announced Thursday that they were separating.”
“News said.”
“Because of these and other differences, few of Theroux’s friends were “fully on board” with the relationship, E!”
“Los Angeles the more social Theroux had to adapt to the reclusive lifestyle that Aniston had come to accept as Brad Pitt s wife of five years...”
“Theroux may have fallen hard for Aniston but he reportedly was bothered by the intense media scrutiny that came with dating the actress who became adored for her comedic talent and her signature hair styles while starring on the hit sitcom Friends Because of the regular paparazzi presence especially in...”
“...the leader of a hippie commune played by Theroux...”
“He s more nomadic more of a free spirit he s rugged and urban and Jennifer just isn t that kind of person Their romance became public in 2011 a year after they filmed Wanderlust a comedy in which Aniston plays a married urban filmmaker who has an affair with...”
““They have always just been two very different people with very different characters who just happened to fall in love,” a source told E!”
“On the other hand, “they were never really suited to one another,” people close to the couple told the outlet.”


"Now it seems that the couple who vowed to keep a good relationship traveled to Mexico either to save their marriage or to say goodbye."
"It's no surprise to these people that Aniston and seru announced their separation on Thursday."
"The news said
Because of these and other differences, few of selux's friends "fully agree" with the relationship, e
"The more socialized seru in Los Angeles has to adapt to the seclusion lifestyle, and Aniston has accepted this lifestyle as Brad Pitt's wife for five years..."
"Theroux may be interested in Aniston, but it is reported that he is troubled by the media scrutiny brought about by dating the actress, who is admired for her comedic talent and iconic hairstyle, because of her frequent paparazzi presence in the popular sitcom Friends, especially in..."
“… The leader of the hippie commune played by seru... "
"He's more nomadic, he's more free, he's rough, he's urban, and Jennifer's not that kind of person. Their love affair was made public in 2011. A year ago, they made the comedy "Tramp", in which Aniston plays a married urban filmmaker who is related to I'm having an affair
A source told e
"On the other hand, they never really fit each other," people close to the couple told the media



Number  639
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Photo: Jason Merritt/Getty Images...”
“While fans of Pattinson and Stewart are still hoping the pair will get back together, it looks like the exes have their sights set on other people.”
“Despite a new article alleging the former co-stars are rekindling their romance, it looks like Robsten shippers will have to keep on dreaming, seeing as sources shut down the report as false.”
“Pattinson and Stewart began dating in 2009 after meeting on the set of the supernatural movie.”
“The former couple experienced a brief break up in 2012 when the actress was caught cheating with her “Snow White and the Huntsman” director Rupert Sanders.”
“Although the actors tried to work past the scandal, their relationship officially ended in 2013.”
“A new report published by OK!”
“...claims Stewart is “on the rocks” with her current girlfriend, Stella Maxwell, and has been spending time with her ex-boyfriend.”
““Kristen is angling to give things between them another go.”
“She’s hoping that Rob is serious when he says he’s forgiven what happened back then,” an “insider” told the tabloid.”


"Photo: Jason Merritt / Getty pictures..."
"Although fans of Pattinson and Stuart still hope to get back together, it seems that the two ex girlfriends are looking at others."
"Despite a new article claiming that two former co stars are rekindling their romance, it seems that Robsten Ebers will have to keep dreaming because the source thinks the report is false."
"Pattinson and Stuart started dating in 2009 after they met on a supernatural set."
"The first two broke up briefly in 2012 when the actress was found having an affair with her snow white and the hunter director Rupert Sanders."
"Although the two actors tried to overcome the scandal, their relationship officially ended in 2013."
"OK, new report!"
“… Stuart claims to have been "on the rocks" with his current girlfriend Stella Maxwell and has been with his ex boyfriend
"Christine wants it to happen again."
"She wants rob to be serious when he says he forgives what happened at the time," an "insider" told the tabloid



Number  640
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“USA's report.”
“Neither Jessica or Justin have responded to OK!”
“The couple, who share three-year-old son Silas, were initially hesitant to expand their brood, but with both their careers in a comfortable place, they are ready for the next chapter.”
“Despite Jess' meticulous planning during her first pregnancy, the actress ended up needing an emergency C-section, and now that she's juggling a career and a toddler, 'she doesn't want to spread herself too thing,' adds the insider.”
“Jessica and her son Silas take a stroll in Chelsea Pier in Manhattan Getty'Jess is taking a step back to take care of herself,' the source notes.”
“It has been announced that Jessica will continue on as an executive producer on the hit series, but will not be returning as a regular cast member.”
“...that the 36-year-old actress is ready to lighten her workload and focus on a healthy pregnancy.”
“After Jessica's massive success with her Netflix series The Sinner, the source tells OK!”
“The exciting baby news couldn't come at a better time for the Hollywood couple.”


"The report of the United States."
"Neither Jessica nor Justin answered well!"
"The couple, who have a three-year-old son, Silas, initially hesitated to expand their parenting, but because their careers are in a comfortable place, they are ready for the next chapter."
"Although Jesse made a careful plan in her first pregnancy, she eventually needed an emergency C-section, and now she's busy with her career and her toddler, and she doesn't want to spread her story too widely," the person said
"Jessica and her son Silas are taking a walk at the Chelsea pier in Manhattan," the source said. "Jessica is taking a step back to take care of herself."
"It is reported that Jessica will continue to be the executive producer of the hit series, but will not return as an official actor."
“…… The 36 year old actress is ready to lighten her workload and focus on a healthy pregnancy
"After Jessica's huge success with the Netflix movie" sinner, "the source told" OK! "
"For the Hollywood couple, exciting baby news is just in time."



**Something goes wrong**
“Are you excited for their kids to meet?”
“Zahara Jolie Pitt 12 fell in love with the same type of toy doll when she was a baby and Brad wanted to help recreate the same fond memories with George and his new children It doesn t get much...”
“Brad Pitt’s finally met the Clooney twins, & we learned exclusively that he came baring special gifts — including the same type of African doll his daughter Zahara had as a kid.”
“How cute!”
“Ella and Alexander Clooney may only be three weeks old, but they sure have some famous faces in their corner — including one of dad George Clooney‘s, 56, BFFs Brad Pitt, 53!”
“And in meeting the baby twins for the first time, of course “Uncle Brad” brought gifts, AND fatherly advice.”
“While George and his wife Amal Clooney, 39, are currently residing in England and, as of right now, are planning on raising their children there too, Brad was recently in London and got to pay his old friends a visit.”
““Uncle Brad swung through London to see George and Amal and to meet their new babies during his time in Europe,” a Brad insider revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Brad even brought gifts for the little ones We can imagine it d be hard to pick out gifts for the kids who most likely have everything but we think the War Machine actor did an amazing job of selecting...”
“...a super thoughtful and sentimental present...”


"Are you excited that their children can meet?"
"Zahara Julie Pitt fell in love with the same kind of doll when she was 12 years old. Brad wanted to help George and his new children recreate the same memories, but he didn't get much..."
"Brad Pitt finally met the Clooney twins, and we learned exclusively that he came with special gifts, including the same African doll his daughter Zahara brought as a child."
"How lovely
"Ella and Alexander Clooney may be only three weeks old, but there must be some famous faces in their corner - including one of their father George Clooney, 56, and boyfriend Brad Pitt, 53!"
"When I first met the twins, of course uncle Brad brought gifts and fatherly advice."
George and his 39 year old wife, Amar Clooney, currently live in the UK and are planning to raise their children there, while Brad recently visited his old friend in London
An insider of Brad told reporters: "when Uncle Brad was in Europe, he wandered around London to see George and Amar and their newborn." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Brad even brought gifts to the children. As we can imagine, it's very difficult to choose gifts for the children, because they probably have everything, but we think the war machine actors are choosing..."
“… A very thoughtful and sentimental gift... "



Number  642
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you hope she restocks again?”
“Were you one of the lucky shoppers to snag a kit?”
“Or, you can just snag the full set on eBay for the low, low price of $750!”
“But don’t worry — if you were out of luck yet again today, our hopes are high that she’ll restock again soon.”
“VIDEO: Style Tracks: The Best Kardashian Fashion Moments of 2015!”
“And it’s no surprise that Kardashian fans aren’t delighted by the development.”
“Yet again, Lip Kit shoppers were faced with the sad realization there weren’t enough sets to go around — the brand has since announced that the lip kits are tragically sold out.”
“Instead, she shared a photo of herself still in bed two hours later, wrapped in a warm fur blanket, captioned “Morning” with a smiley face.”
“Kylie, however, was apparently still hitting snooze — she didn’t post about it at all.”
“Khloé Kardashian and Kris Jenner both posted photos on Instagram early Monday, reminding the world that we had yet another chance to get our hands on the kit, after it sold out almost instantly two weeks ago.”


"Do you want her to restock?"
"Are you one of the lucky shoppers?"
"Or, you can buy the full set on eBay for $750!"
"But don't worry - if you're not lucky today, we'd like her to come back soon."
"Video: Fashion track: best fashion moment for Kardashian in 2015!"
"It's no surprise that Kardashian's fans are not happy with what's going on."
"Once again, consumers of lip suits are facing a sad reality: there are not enough sets to choose from - the brand then announced that lip suits have been sold out."
Instead, she shared a picture of her still lying in bed two hours later, wrapped in a warm blanket with a smiling face and titled "morning."
"However, Kelly is obviously still napping - she doesn't post at all."
"Khlo é Kardashian and Kris Jenner both posted photos on instagram earlier on Monday to remind the world that we have another chance to get the kit after it sold out almost immediately two weeks ago."



Number  643
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We will continue to have updates as appropriate.”
“As Gossip Cop reported, Soules’ previous motion to dismiss the felony charge outright was denied last month.”
“'”Among other demands, it is also argued “any statement, questioning, or evidence about Mr. Soules’ criminal history” should also be inadmissible.”
“Thus, it is wholly improper for the State or any witness to refer to the decedent as a ‘victim.”
“His attorneys ask that Mosher not be referred to as the “victim” because Soules is “presumed innocent.” It’s argued, “The State has not charged Mr. Soules with any crime asserting he is criminally responsible for the death of the decedent.”
“Soules also makes other requests in this new motion.”
“In fact, it was previously claimed he initially refused to leave his house when officials arrived, allegedly leading to an hours-long standoff before he surrendered to custody.”
“...his vehicle It is possible the prosecutor will fight the request on the grounds that the samples were taken from Soules hours after the accident...”
“Furthermore Mr Soules has not been charged with any alcohol related offense Consequently his camp wants to bar any evidence testimony reference or argument that on the night in question Mr Soules 1 purchased alcohol 2 consumed alcohol 2 drove while impaired or 3 had beer cans in or around...”
“The DCI conducted thorough toxicology testing on two separate samples – his urine and blood – and conclusively determined no detectable amounts of alcohol or drugs were in either specimen.”


"We will continue to update as appropriate."
"As reported by gossip police, sules' previous motion to completely dismiss felony charges was rejected last month."
"Considers, among other requirements, that" any statement, inquiry or evidence concerning the criminal history of Mr. sules "should also be inadmissible."
Therefore, it is totally inappropriate for the state or any witness to call the deceased "victim"
His lawyer asked Mosher not to be called a "victim" because he was "presumed innocent". It has been argued that "the state has not charged Mr. sours with any crime, claiming that he is criminally responsible for the death of the deceased."
"There are other demands in this new motion," he said
"In fact, it has been reported that he initially refused to leave his home when officials arrived, which is said to have led to hours of confrontation before turning himself in."
“…… His car Prosecutors may object to the request on the grounds that the samples were collected from sours hours after the accident... "
"In addition, Mr. suers has not been charged with any alcohol-related crimes, so his camp wants to prohibit any evidence, testimony, reference or argument that Mr. suers bought alcohol in the evening 1, consumed alcohol in the evening 2, suffered physical damage while driving, or 3 had beer cans in or around..."
"DCI conducted a thorough toxicological test on two samples of his urine and blood, and finally determined that there was no detectable alcohol or drug in both samples."



Number  644
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Friend us on Facebook, Follow us on Twitter and Subscribe to our Newsletter!”
““Gwen says she’s definitely pursuing adoption.”–Leigh BlickleyGet more HollyBaby news and gossip!”
““Now Gwen and Gavin are focusing on their two boys, and they’re planning for the future,” says the insider.”
“But after her devastating miscarriage, the Enquirer reports that Gwen and Gavin have decided to give adoption a try.”
“Gwen takes her boys to the pumpkin patch!”
“The Rossdales even began extensive renovations on their Beverly Hills, CA home — adding two more bedrooms!”
“She was also spotted wearing Sea-Band wristbands, which are used by expectant moms for morning sickness relief.”
“Soon after, she was seen covering up an apparent baby bump rather than donning her usual belly-baring shirts!”
“Lily Allen suffers her second miscarriageThe pregnancy speculation began last spring when Gwen was overheard telling friends that she and Gavin, 45, were trying for a baby girl.”
“But the magazine reports that after suffering from the miscarriage, Gwen’s considering adoption.”


"Make friends with us on Facebook, follow us on twitter, subscribe to our newsletters!"
"Gwen said she must be pursuing adoption." ——Lee blickley gets more holibabi news and gossip
"Now Gwen and Gavin are focused on their two sons, and they are planning for the future," the person familiar with the matter said
"But after her tragic miscarriage, inquirer reported that Gwen and Gavin decided to try to adopt."
"Gwen took her children to pumpkin field!"
The rossdales have even begun a massive renovation of their home in Beverly Hills, California - adding two bedrooms! "
She was also found wearing a kelp wristband, which is used by expectant mothers to relieve morning sickness
Soon after, she was seen covering up the apparent baby lump instead of wearing her usual open belly shirt
"The speculation about Lily Allen's second miscarriage started last spring when Gwen inadvertently told her friends that she and Gavin, 45, wanted a baby girl."
"But the magazine reports that Gwen is considering adoption after the miscarriage."



Number  645
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Affleck raises his children with his former wife and actress Jennifer Garner.”
“He wants to be his kids’ hero ... Ben’s kids love old Disney movies like The Absent-Minded Professor, so he’d love to do a remake of one of those,” said a source.”
““He’s searching for a role in a fun, PG movie ...”
“It has only been his performances as Batman in the DC Universe films which have been suitable for his children — Violet, Seraphina and Samuel.”
“The 45-year-old actor’s filmography includes many adult dramas and thrillers, such as Good Will Hunting, Gone Girl and The Accountant.”
“...magazine, the actor wants family friendly roles because he wants his children to see his work.”
“According to a report in OK!”
“Ben Affleck wants to take on more roles in family films.”


"Affleck is raising children with his ex-wife and actress, Jennifer Garner."
"He wanted to be a hero for the kids... "Ben's kids like old Disney movies like" absent minded professor, "so he'd love to remake one of them," a source said
"He's looking for a character in an interesting PG movie..."
"Only his performance as Batman in DC Universe movies is suitable for his children - violet, Serafina and Samuel."
The 45 year old actor's films include many adult dramas and thrillers, such as "having fun," "the disappearing girl" and "accounting."
“… Magazines, actors want family friendly characters, because he wants his children to see his work
"According to OK
"Ben Affleck wants to play more roles in family movies."



Number  646
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lena Waithe’s emotional speechAfter a standing ovation, Master of None’s Lena Waithe accepted the award for Outstanding Writing of a Comedy Series with a message for her “LGBTQIA family:” “I see each and every one of you.”
““And in 2017 we still refuse to be controlled by a sexist, egotistical, lying, hypocritical bigot boss,” Tomlin added.”
“So in a way, this was all your fault,” Colbert said.”
““If he had won an Emmy I bet he wouldn’t have run for president.”
“House of Cards, the new season of American Horror Story, and of course next year’s Latin Grammys hosted by Sheriff Joe Arpaio.”Predictably, Colbert made a meal out of Trump complaining about his failure to snag an Emmy for his reality TV series Celebrity Apprentice.”
“All the late night shows, obviously.”
““However you feel about the president, every show was influenced by Trump in some way.”
“The hits only got more pointed from there.”
“Looking forward to the tweets,” he said.”
“Thank you for joining us.”


Li Na Weiser's touching speech after standing up and clapping, the ownerless Li Na Weiser accepted the award for excellent works in comedy series and left a message for her "lgbtqia family": "I see each and every one of you."
Tomlin added: "in 2017, we still refuse to be controlled by a bigoted boss who is sexist, conceited, lying and hypocritical."
"So in a way, it's all your fault," Colbert said
"If he wins the Emmy, I bet he won't run for president."
"House of cards, the new season of American horror stories and, of course, the Latin Grammy awards next year, hosted by Sheriff Joe Arpaio." Not surprisingly, Colbert was surprised by Trump's complaint that he failed to win an Emmy for the reality TV series Celebrity Apprentice
"Obviously, all the late night performances."
"No matter what you think of the president, every performance is influenced to some extent by trump."
"The hit rate just gets more direction from there."
"I'm looking forward to microblogging," he said
"Thank you for joining us."



Number  647
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From rumors about shady business dealings to allegations of fake pregnancies and murder plots, here are the best conspiracy theories about Queen Bey ever created.”
“Others, however, are insanely outlandish, such as allegations that her Super Bowl performances and alter ego Sasha Fierce are evidence of demonic possession.”
“Some theories are about Bey's public image, like the belief that she and Jay Z won't deny rumors of his infidelity as a marketing ploy to sell more units of her woman-scorned opus Lemonade.”
“But while the likes of Katy, Taylor, Adele, and Miley all have their detractors, none of them is subjected to more conspiracy theories than Beyoncé.”
“When you're one of the biggest pop stars in the world, not everybody is going to think you're ***Flawless.”


"From rumors of improper business dealings to accusations of false pregnancies and murder conspiracy, here's the best conspiracy theory about queen Shelley."
"Others, however, are crazy and whimsical. For example, her performance in the Super Cup and the ferocity of another self, Sasha, are evidence of demons."
"Some theories are about Bei's public image, such as believing that she and jay z will not deny the rumors of his infidelity, as a marketing strategy to sell more of her despised opus lemonade."
"However, although Katie, Taylor, Adele and Miley all have their own critics, no one is more susceptible to conspiracy theories than Beyonce."
"When you're one of the biggest pop stars in the world, not everyone thinks you're perfect."



Number  648
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That's also where they decide when each person will speak out about whatever rumor pertains to them.”
“In fact, Kim joined The Ellen Show earlier this week and revealed that they have a family group chat in which they discuss all the rumors swirling around them.”
“...via surrogate, both Kylie and Khloe have stayed mum on the topic their rumored pregnancies, and they've made their family members promise to do the same.”
“3 (another girl!)”
“While Kim Kardashian has confirmed she's expecting baby No.”
“There's been quite a bit of baby talk circulating Khloe Kardashian and Kylie Jenner lately...but none of it has actually come from them!”


"It's also where they decide when everyone will say anything about them."
"In fact, Kim joined the Allen Show earlier this week and revealed that they had a family group chatting to discuss all the rumors surrounding them."
“…… Through surrogacy, Kelly and Chloe are both silent about their legendary pregnancy, and they ask their family members to promise to do the same
"3 (another girl!)"
"And Kim Kardashian has confirmed that she is pregnant with a childless child."
"There's a lot of baby talk going on between Kardashian and Kelly Jenner these days But none of them actually come from them



**Something goes wrong**
“[HR]”
“Someone should just ask Manny who she is; haven’t we learned by now there’s nothing that kid doesn’t know?”
“Meanwhile, the identity of this vocal artist with the “horrible” voice remains a mystery - and 20th Century Fox Television did not return inquiring phone calls.”
“We know it’s not you – and that woman sounds horrible,’” Vergara told the Hollywood Reporter.”
““Friends and family called to tell me, ‘We really don’t like it.”
“And her supporters back home aren’t too happy, either.”
“Colombia native and Modern Family star Sofia Vergara says she has no clue why she wasn’t asked to dub the lines of her character Gloria on the Latin American version of the show.”


"[human resources]"
"Someone should ask Manny who she is. Don't we know now that the child doesn't know anything?"
Meanwhile, the identity of the "terrifying" vocal artist is still a mystery - 20th Century Fox TV did not reply to the phone
"We know it's not you - that woman sounds terrible," Vergara told Hollywood reporters
"Friends and family call to tell me that we really don't like it."
"And her supporters at home are not very happy."
"Colombian local and modern family star Sophia Vera said she didn't know why she wasn't allowed to voice her role Gloria on the Latin American version of the show."



Number  650
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pitt, meanwhile, has spent his court-ordered time with the kids in London and Los Angeles as he films Quentin Tarantino’s new movie, Once Upon a Time in Hollywood.”
“...old twins Vivienne and Knox...”
“...source says remains focused on healing her family transitions to new counsel in her ongoing divorce with Brad Pitt...”
““Angelina has decided to change counsel to Samantha Bley Dejean, as Samantha’s expertise is the protection and best interest of children,” Mindy Nyby, a spokesperson for the 43-year-old mother of six, tells PEOPLE.”
““Angelina appreciates Laura’s cooperation in transitioning the case over the past several weeks.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Angelina decided to put Samantha in charge of her case,” a source close to Jolie and Pitt’s contentious custody battle tells PEOPLE.”
“She put her in the lead a month ago and over the past month the case has been fully transitioned to Samantha Adds the insider She has come to rely on Samantha s counsel and thought it best that she take the lead Image zoom Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie...”
“...with children Pax Jolie Pitt Zahara Jolie Pitt Knox Jolie Pitt Shiloh Jolie Pitt and Maddox Jolie Pitt Credit Charley Gallay Getty Jolie and Pitt 54 have been embattled in a legal dispute over custody of their six children Maddox 17 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 12 and 10 year...”
““Angelina remains focused on healing her family,” the source says.”
“The court will determine things.”The children spent much of the summer with Jolie in London as she filmed Maleficent 2, but they normally reside in Los Angeles, where Pitt also lives.”


Meanwhile, Pitt spent court hours with children in London and Los Angeles while filming Quentin Tarantino's new film "once upon a time" in Hollywood
“… Old twins Vivian and Knox... "
“… The source said she was still focused on treating her family transition to a new lawyer in her ongoing divorce
"Angelina has decided to replace her lawyer with Samantha bly de Jean because Samantha's expertise is to protect children and their best interests," Mindy nibby, a spokesman for the 43 year old mother of six, told people
"Angelina thanks Laura for her cooperation in the transfer of cases over the past few weeks." Get news, feature, etc
"Angelina decided to put Samantha in charge of her case," a source close to the custody dispute between Julie and Pitt told people
"A month ago, she let her lead, in the past month, the case has been completely transferred to Samantha." The person added that she began to rely on Samantha's lawyers, believing that it was best for her to lead with Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie... "
“… With the children, Julie Pitt Zahara Julie Pitt Knox Julie Pitt Shiloh Julie Pitt and Maddox Julie Pitt Charley gally Getty Julie and Pitt 54 are involved in a legal dispute over the custody of their six children, Maddox 17, 14, Zahara 13, Shiloh 12 and 10... "
"Angelina is still focused on treating her family," the source said
"The court will decide everything." The children and Julie spent most of the summer in London, where Julie filmed villain 2, but they usually live in Los Angeles, where Pete also lives



Number  651
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"But Las Vegas is her stomping grounds , and she felt like she should have been allotted more time for her performance."”
“Dion "did her best to save face last night," the insider told Radar.”
“... And I can do a five-minute plank, just saying."”
“I'm 71 yesterday.”
“This is not an applause thing.”
“During her acceptance speech, Cher told the crowd, "I've been doing it for 53 years.”
“As those who watched last night's award show know, Dion also gave an epic performance — singing her hit song "My Heart Will Go On," which she originally released 20 years ago.”
“But according to the insider, Cher "does not care at all about the drama."”
“"There is already so much animosity between the two of them," said the source.”
“As fans know Dion, 49, and Cher have competing shows in Las Vegas.”


"But Las Vegas is her down-to-earth place, and she thinks she should be given more time to perform."
"Dion" tried his best to save face last night, "the insider told radar."
"... I can do a five minute trestle, just say
"I was 71 yesterday."
"It's not applause."
In her acceptance speech, Cher told the audience, "I've been doing it for 53 years."
"Everyone who watched the awards ceremony last night knows that Dion also performed an epic performance - singing her first hit song" my heart will continue "20 years ago
But according to people familiar with the matter, Cher "doesn't care about the play at all."
"There has been too much hostility between them," the source said
"Fans know that Dion and Cher, 49, have a game show in Las Vegas."



Number  652
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also made the joke that he's been "drinking all day" during the pandemic.”
“Happy #EarthDay everybody."”
“In Touch published a front-page story alleging that he was "drinking vodka before noon" and that his friends were begging him to get help.”
“After his divorce from fellow country superstar Miranda Lambert in 2015, rumors began circling that he was headed down a dangerous, alcohol-filled spiral.”
“This isn't the first time Shelton's drinking has come into the spotlight.”
“This account is meant for people who actually have a sense of humor.. We’re not accepting cry baby tweets today.. Maybe try again tomorrow!"”
““That’s some Justin Bieber on Hennessy, throwing up on stage, nonsense right there!”Shelton retweeted that message and said, "Oh I’m sorry ma’am...”
““So, that’s the type of quality show that you put on… for people that spend their hard earned money to come see you, is for you to show up drunk?” one follower said.”
“While some people found the fall entertaining, many people were not amused.”
“He quickly gets back up and grabs his guitar.”


He also joked that during the flu pandemic, he "drank all day."
"Happy earth day, everyone."
"In touch" ran a front page story accusing him of "drinking vodka before noon" and his friends pleaded with him for help
"After his divorce from fellow superstar Miranda Lambert in 2015, rumors began to circulate that he was heading into a dangerous, alcohol filled vortex."
"It's not the first time Sheldon's drinking has been noticed."
"This account is for people who really have a sense of humor.. We don't accept crying baby's microblog today.. Maybe try again tomorrow! "
"That's Justin Bieber from Hennessy, vomiting on stage, bullshit! Sheldon forwarded the message and said, "Oh, I'm sorry, ma'am..."
"So, this is the kind of high-quality show you put on Let those who spend their hard-earned money to see you, let you appear drunk? "Said one of the followers."
"Although some people think autumn is interesting, many people don't think it is."
"He quickly got up and grabbed his guitar."



Number  653
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comment section!”
“Oscars this weekend...”
“The insider concluded I heard he s frantically texting Jen and Angie to ask them to avoid being in the same room at all costs since no good could possibly come from it What do you think Jen and Angie should do once they inevitably encounter each other at the...”
““Why should either of them have to tiptoe around the Academy Awards worrying about bumping into the other?” said the source, adding, “A face-to-face showdown is inevitable.”To add even more drama, Brad Pitt was said to be “in a panic” about the potential nightmare.”
“...just avoiding each other completely but after thinking that over they weren t comfortable with that either...”
“...that there has been A LOT of pressure It s the biggest night of the year and they know they ll both be party hopping But while the plan was that they d just stake out their own territory neither was willing to budge an inch They finally settled on...”
“Article continues below advertisementAn insider told Ok!”
“So much so that the frenemies have already arranged a phone to discuss how they will handle the situation.”
“With Angelina slated to attend the star-studded ceremony in support of the film she produced, The Breadwinner, which is nominated for Best Animated Feature Film, and Jennifer also expected to be there, insiders have already been predicting some serious drama.”
“...that the real drama will not come down to the losers and the winners at the award show—but rather the minefield surrounding Brad Pitt’s exes Angelina Jolie and Jennifer Aniston—who are now BOTH single!”


"Please leave a message in the comments section!"
"Oscar this weekend..."
"The person familiar with the matter concluded that I heard he was frantically texting Jane and Angie, asking them to avoid staying in the same room at all costs, because it can't bring any benefits. Do you think it's inevitable for Jane and Angie to What should we do when we meet each other? "
"Why did the two of them stand on tiptoe at the Oscars for fear of bumping into each other? "A face-to-face showdown is inevitable," the source added To add to the drama, Brad Pitt is thought to be "panicked" by the potential nightmare
“… They just completely avoid each other, but after careful consideration, they also feel uncomfortable... "
“…… This is the biggest night of the year. They know that they will all go to the party, but the plan is that they will only get a foothold in their own territory, and no one is willing to give in. Finally, they decide to... "
The advertisement continues the article below, a personage inside course of study told OK
"So much that France has arranged a phone call to discuss how they will deal with the situation."
"As Angelina will attend the star studded awards ceremony to support her film," the breadwinner "is nominated for best animated film, and Jennifer is expected to attend, industry insiders have predicted that there will be some serious plots."
“…… The real drama won't fall on the winners and losers of the awards ceremony, but on the minefield around Brad Pitt's ex girlfriends Angelina Jolie and Jennifer Aniston, who are now single



Number  654
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In another post which featured Chris looking serious in a Tag Heuer advert, Elsa chimed in with: 'Don’t worry love, I would be mad too if some magazines keep trying to keep us apart,' adding the hashtags #dontcrackunderpressure #seeyoutomorrow #loveyou.”
“Honey you still love me right?'”
“But Spanish model Elsa Pataky has once again spoken about the struggles she and actor husband Chris Hemsworth faced during the early years of their marriage together.”
“Speaking to Vogue Australia, the mother-of-three confessed: 'We did everything very quickly – I don’t know how we survived as a couple.'”
“Scroll down for video'I don’t know how we survived as a couple': Elsa Pataky reveals the secret struggles that put 'pressure' on her marriage with Chris HemsworthChris and Elsa met in early 2010 and married shortly after in December that year.”
“They welcomed their daughter India in 2012 and their twin sons, Tristan and Sasha, later in 2014.”
“'We were married and then a year after we had kids.”
“It puts a lot of pressure on a marriage,' the Fast And The Furious actress admitted.”
“However, after recently celebrating their eight wedding anniversary, Elsa claims the couple couldn't be happier or more in love.”
“It puts a lot of pressure on a marriage Spanish actress Elsa has revealed she and actor husband Chris Hemsworth did struggle during the early years of their marriage Every marriage has ups and downs it s constant work to be in a successful marriage and stay together forever Elsa...”


"In another post, Chris appeared very serious in TAG Heuer's advertisement. Elsa echoed:" don't worry, love, if some magazines keep trying to separate us, I'll be angry too, "and added the label" don't track Unpressure, "" see you tomorrow, "" love you. "
"Honey, do you still love me?"
"But Spanish model Elsa Pataky once again talked about the difficulties she and her husband Chris Hemsworth faced at the beginning of their marriage."
"In an interview with vogue Australia, the mother of three admitted:" we do everything very quickly - I don't know how we survived as a couple. "
"Scroll down to watch the video 'I don't know how we survived as a couple': Elsa Pataki reveals secret struggles that put 'pressure' on her marriage to Chris Hemsworth. Chris and Elsa met in early 2010 and married shortly after December of the same year
"They had their daughter India in 2012 and their twin sons Tristan and Sasha in late 2014."
"We got married and had children a year later."
"It puts a lot of pressure on the marriage," the quick and angry actress admits
"However, after celebrating their eighth wedding anniversary recently, Elsa claims that the couple can't be happier or more in love."
"This has brought a lot of pressure on marriage. Spanish actress Elsa revealed that she and her husband Chris Hemsworth really struggled in the first few years of their marriage. Every marriage has ups and downs. Elsa is a constant job if she wants to be successful and stay together forever..."



Number  655
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...changed Recall the British tabloids were incredibly tough on Princess Diana but if Meghan is anything like her she ll continue to handle herself with impeccable class...”
“Harry is so protective of Meghan and he hates how some of the newspapers write about her it reminds him of his mother and the way she was treated by the press and sometimes Harry worries that nothing has really...”
““The British press is constantly jumping on each and every little faux pas though, and publicly reprimanding Meghan, it’s horrible really, and some days she ends up in tears,” the insider revealed.”
“Her few faux pas, while understandable to the royal family, are reportedly devastating to her.”
“At Meghan and Harry’s royal nuptials on May 18, the duchess seemed ready to commit to her role as a royal — singing God Save The Queen flawlessly, and crossing her legs at her ankles.”
“Listen, if the Queen doesn’t have a problem, we don’t have a problem.”
“Meghan how amazing she s doing and how quickly she s learning and she is Aww...”
“The funny thing is that the Queen is actually incredibly gracious to Meghan she doesn t put any pressure on her at all it s actually quite the opposite and Harry is so loving and supportive he s constantly telling...”
“HollywoodLife com exclusively...”
“But there is so much to remember so many minuscule little details it s kind of mind blowing really and all incredibly high pressured too as it s all under a microscope at the same time a palace insider told...”


“…… Looking back, the British tabloids are very tough on Princess Diana, but if Megan has anything in common with her, she will continue to treat herself impeccably... "
"Harry is very protective of Megan. He hates how some newspapers report on Megan, which reminds him of the way his mother and the media treat her. Sometimes Harry worries that there is nothing really..."
"It's really terrible that the British media keep jumping up and down every little mistake and publicly scolding Megan. Some days she will finally cry," the person familiar with the matter said
"Although the royal family can understand her impoliteness, it is reported that it was devastating for her."
On May 18, at the royal wedding of Megan and Harry, the Duchess seemed ready to play the Royal role - singing "God save the queen," flawless, with her legs crossed at her ankles
"Listen, if the queen has no problem, we have no problem."
"Megan, how wonderful she is. How fast she learns. She is..."
"Interestingly, the queen is actually very kind to Megan. She doesn't give her any pressure at all. On the contrary, Harry is so kind and supportive that he keeps telling her..."
"Exclusive to Hollywood Life com..."
"But there are too many things to remember, too many tiny details. It's really exciting and stressful, because it's all going on under a microscope. At the same time, a palace insider told me..."



Number  656
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The drama also proved to be a big winner at the Golden Globes, taking home four wins, including a supporting actress award for Laura Dern.”
“The first season was a breakout hit for HBO, bringing the premium cable network 16 Emmy nominations and eight wins, effectively sweeping the Limited Series categories in September.”
“Also Read: HBO Exec Apologizes for Saying Network Was 'Raped' by 'Big Little Lies' Cast NegotiationsIn addition to Kelly, Arnold, Witherspoon and Kidman, executive producers on the series also include Bruna Papandrea, Vallée, Nathan Ross and Gregg Fienberg.”
“Andrea Arnold has signed on to direct all seven installments, stepping in for Season 1 director Jean-Marc Vallée.”
“The second outing, like the first, be written and executive produced by David E. Kelley and will be based, in part, on a story by Liane Moriarty.”
“Celeste s Nicole Kidman therapist Dr Amanda Reisman and Merrin Dungey as Adrienne Quinlan the detective investigating the Perry s Alexander Skarsgard death...”
“Also Read Laura Dern Shares On Set Photo From Big Little Lies Madeline and Renata Are Back Photo HBO also confirmed that four key characters from the show s first season would return Kathryn Newton as Madeline s Reese Witherspoon daughter Abigail Sarah Sokolovic as Tori Bachman Robin Weigert as...”
“No details about the new roles were revealed beyond the character names.”
““In the Heat of the Night” star Crystal Fox will join the show as a series regular, playing Elizabeth Howard, and “Pitch” vet Mo McRae will play Michael Perkins in a recurring role.”
““Big Little Lies” has added two new cast members for its second season and confirmed a handful of characters from the show’s first outing to reprise their roles.”


"The play also proved to be a big winner at the Golden Globes, winning four titles, including Laura Dean's Supporting Actress Award."
"The first season was a great leap forward for HBO, bringing 16 Emmy nominations and 8 victories to the high-quality cable network, effectively sweeping through the limited series categories in September."
"Read another: HBO executives apologise that the Internet is' rapist 'and' big and small lies' actors negotiate in addition to Kelly, Arnold, Witherspoon and Kidman, executive producer series also includes Bruner papandrea, Walley, Nathan Ross and Greg Feinberg."
"Andrea Arnold has signed up to direct all seven films, succeeding first season director Jean Marc Valle."
"The second trip, like the first, was written and produced by David E. Kelly, based in part on the story of Lian Moriarty."
"Nicole Kidman therapists in Celeste, Dr. Amanda Reisman and Merlin dungee, play Adrian Quinlan, the detective who investigates the death of Perry's Alexander scargaard..."
"After watching Laura Dean share the back of Madeline and Renata in the photo of big lie, HBO also confirmed that the four key characters in the first season of the show will return to Katherine Newton as Madeline's Reese Witherspoon's daughter, Abigail Sarah sokolovich as Tori Bachman Robin Wight as..."
"The details of the new character were not disclosed except for the name of the character."
"Dead of night" star Christo fox will join the show as a regular, playing Elizabeth Howard, and "stadium" veteran Mo McRae will play the role of Michael Perkins
Two new actors have been added to the second season of little lies and it has been confirmed that some of the characters in the first season of the show will play their roles again



Number  657
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Taylor Swift (@taylorswift) on Oct 19, 2017 at 9:00am PDTHollywoodLifers, do you think “Gorgeous” will be another diss track at Kanye?”
“Oh man, midnight can not come fast enough!”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she won’t let the singer ‘bully’ her hubby Kanye West with more diss tracks.”
“The world is waiting for midnight on Oct. 20 when Taylor Swift, 27, drops her new single “Gorgeous.” Among those who are anxiously eager to hear her new tune is nemesis Kim Kardashian, 36.”
“She doesn’t want her husband Kanye West, 40, to be the subject of another diss track like Tay’s “Look What You Made Me Do.” As a result, the reality star is on guard.”
““Kim loves her man dearly and she refuses to let Taylor bully him or their family.”
“Kanye is working on himself and has not been the same since his health challenges this year.”
“He has slowed down a little and is not the same old Kanye that was always ready to fight on a moment’s notice,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““But Kim is feeling fine, alert and she watching Taylor like a mama bear protecting her cubs.”
“Kim will be listening closely as Taylor continues to release new music.”


"Taylor Swift (@ Taylor Swift) published an article at 9:00 a.m. on October 19, 2017. Do you think gorgeous will be another diss track of Kanye?"
"Oh, my God, midnight is not fast enough!"
"We gave an exclusive report on how she didn't let the singer" bully "her husband Kanye West with more diss tracks."
"The world is waiting for Taylor Swift, 27, to drop her new single, beautiful, at midnight on October 20. Among those eager to hear her new tune is Kim Kardashian, 36. "
She doesn't want her 40 year old husband, Kanye West, to be the protagonist of another diss track, such as Tay's look what you made me do. As a result, reality TV stars are on the alert
"Kim loves her man so much that she refuses to let Taylor bully him or their family."
"Kanye is trying to exercise himself. It's different since this year's health challenge."
"He has slowed down and is no longer the old Kanye who is ready to fight," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"But Kim feels good and alert. She's like mama bear watching Tyler protect her cubs."
"As Tyler continues to release new music, Kim will listen closely."



Number  658
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott asked if he s really the father For more on this story pick up the latest issue of In Touch on newsstands now...”
“Kourtney said no which has only heightened his suspicions Another insider also says that Kourtney who is currently dating 24 year old model Younes Bendjima isn t interested in debating with Scott Kourtney didn t want to hear it when...”
“Scott Disick was the perfect image of a doting dad.”
“Over the long Thanksgiving weekend he spent some seriously adorable father son time with his and ex Kourtney Kardashian s eldest child Mason 7 taking him to NYC to visit the Intrepid Sea Air Space Museum before hopping a private...”
“...jet bound for Miami where they took a helicopter ride and hit the beach...”
“Scott’s also often been on daddy-daughter dates with Penelope, 5.”
“But he’s rarely seen out with his youngest child, son Reign.”
“This sounds horrible to say but Scott is closest to Mason and then Penelope an insider exclusively tells In Touch adding that though Scott 34 has a bond with Reign who turns three on Dec 14 it s not the...”
“...same as the one he had with Mason when he was that young Now a source has some bombshell insight into why that might be...”
““Reign was conceived when Kourtney and Scott were going through a rough patch.”


"Scott asked if he was really the father of the story, and now he's picking up the latest issue of contact at the newsstand..."
"Courtney said no, it would only exacerbate his suspicions. Another insider also said that Courtney who is currently dating 24-year-old model yones benjima is not interested in debating when Scott Courtney doesn't want to hear it..."
"Scott Disick is the perfect image of a doting father."
"Over the long Thanksgiving weekend, he spent some very lovely father son time with his ex Courtney Kardashian's eldest son, Mason 7, to take him to New York to visit the Intrepid Sea and air space museum, and then dance a private dance..."
“… Jet to Miami, where they go to the beach by helicopter... "
"Scott also often dates five-year-old Penelope."
"But he was rarely seen with the youngest son, Ruijin."
"It sounds terrible, but Scott is closest to Mason, and then Penelope's insiders exclusively told in touch, adding that although Scott, 34, has a rule who turns three on December 14, the bond is not..."
“…… Just like when he was young with Mason, now a source has some amazing ideas about why... "
"Rule was conceived when Courtney and Scott went through difficult times."



Number  659
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Gossip Cop)”
“This latest report from the frequently discredited out is equally bogus.”
“We also shot down the tabloid's allegation that Carey used drugs and alcohol before her 2017 New Year's Eve show.”
“Gossip Cop previously debunked the magazine's fabricated tale about Carey and Tanaka having sex in a restaurant bathroom.”
“Unfortunately, publishing phony stories about Carey isn't exactly breaking new ground for the Enquirer.”
“The tabloid's assertion that she's juggling both Cannon and Tanaka is entirely false.”
“But despite the magazine's attempt at complicating the singer's love life, a source close to Carey exclusively assures Gossip Cop she's simply "not dating multiple people".”
“The seemingly phony source further claims that Tanaka is "eating out of her hands again", but "when things got rocky with Bryan, Mariah runs to Nick".”
“The outlet's dubious insider goes on to purport that Cannon "came to the rescue" when Carey initially broke up with Tanaka, and she then "hooked up with Nick partly to make Bryan jealous".”
“She loves Nick, but she's got the hots for Bryan."”


(gossip police)
"This latest report from the often discredited media is also false."
"We also refuted the tabloid allegation that Kelly was currently taking drugs and drinking alcohol on New Year's Eve 2017."
"The gossip police exposed the story of Kelly and Tanaka having sex in the restaurant bathroom made up by the magazine before."
Unfortunately, publishing false reports about Kylie can not open up a new world for the inquirer.
"It's totally wrong for the tabloid to say that she takes care of both cannons and Tanaka."
However, despite the magazine's attempts to complicate Kelly's love life, a source close to her exclusively assured gossip police that she was "not dating many people."
The seemingly false source further claimed that Tanaka was "eating his own food again", but "when things went wrong with Bryan, Maria ran to Nick."
The media's suspicious insiders continue to claim that when Kelly first broke up with Tanaka, cannon "came to rescue" her. Later, she "hooked up with Nick, partly to make Brian jealous."
"She loves Nick, but she likes Brian very much."



Number  660
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...smarturl it ZAYNxVEVO Spotify smarturl it ZAYNSpotify Site inZAYN com 2017 03 23T23 00 01 000Z”
“ZAYN Still Got Time Lyric ft PARTYNEXTDOORZAYN s Still Got Time ft PARTYNEXTDOOR on iTunes Stream Add on Spotify Get it on Amazon Music Get it on Google Play Follow ZAYN Facebook facebook com ZAYN Twitter twitter com zaynmalik Instagram instagram com ZAYN Snapchat snapchat com add ZAYN YouTube Subscribe...”
“In the meantime, listen to Zayn’s latest single, “Still Got Time,” below.”
“Both albums are tentatively scheduled for sometime this summer, only furthering what seems to be a competitive rollout in the making.”
“...peers as he told The Sun I feel like I m doing what s right right by myself and right by the boys so I feel good Nevertheless will the stress of Harry s musical buzz lead to a legitimate musical feud...”
“He s been hearing from music insiders that Harry s new work is the bomb it s edgy it s different and it s going to dominate the charts Zayn s exit from the group was amicable in 2015 and there was never any ill will towards his One Direction...”
“2017-03-27T18:25:42-04:00The source goes on to say that “Out of all the 1D guys, Harry is the one Zayn has always felt the most competitive with, and with good reason.”
“VideoVideo related to is there a feud brewing between zayn malik & harry styles?”
“He’s worried that Harry is going to steal his thunder and overshadow what he’s worked so hard for.” Check out the video teaser for Harry’s debut single, due out April 7th.”
“A source close to the “Pillow Talk” singer revealed that he’s “been flying high on his success as a solo artist, but he’s stressing now that Harry’s coming out with a new album.”


“… Smarturl it zaynxvevo spotify smarturl it zaynspotify website inzayn com 2017 03 23t23 00 01 000z "
"Zayn still has time to express ft partynextdoorzayn s still has time ft partynextdoor add spotify on iTunes stream get attention on Amazon music get Google play zayn Facebook com zayn twitter com zaynmalik instagram com zayn snapchat snapchat com add zayn YouTube subscription..."
In the meantime, listen to zayn's latest single, "still got time," as shown below
"Both albums are tentatively scheduled to be released sometime this summer, only to further push what seems to be a competitive launch."
"When he told the sun, I felt that I was doing the right thing for myself and the children, so I felt good. Nevertheless, will the pressure of Harry's music buzz lead to a reasonable music dispute..."
"He heard from people in the music circle that Harry's new work is a bomb. It's very avant-garde. It's different. It's going to dominate the charts. Zahn was very friendly when he quit the band in 2015, and never had any malice towards one of his directions... "
"2017-03-27t18:25:42-04:00 the source went on to say," of all 1D guys, Harry has always been the most competitive person for Zane, and for good reason. "
"Is there any feud brewing between Zane Malik and Harry stiles in the video?"
"He's worried that Harry will steal the limelight from him and cover up his hard work for it." Take a look at the video of Harry's first single on April 7
A source close to the "pillow talk" singer revealed that he "as a soloist, has been soaring, but he now emphasizes that Harry will release a new album."



Number  661
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If Kim and Bey want to remain icy, they better know that Serena’s not going to get involved in this “cold war.”Do you think Kim and Bey will ever be friends, HollywoodLifers?”
““To be surrounded by all her closest friends, and to share her special day with them, meant everything to Serena.”
“After Beyonce, 36, and Kim Kardashian, 37, and an awkward and “icy” run-in at Serena Williams wedding, the tennis legend would like to be excluded from Kim and Bey’s narrative.”
““Serena refuses to take sides between Kim and Beyonce,” a source close to Serena EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““She loves them both and doesn’t want to get involved in their beef.”
“Serena has been friends with Kim and with Beyonce for years she had no hesitation when it came to inviting them to her wedding she just made it clear that she didn t want any drama Outside of the awkwardness of Bey bumping into Kim at the bar it seems...”
“...that these two were able to bury their bad blood long enough to celebrate Serena s special day...”
““Serena’s wedding was amazing, and next to giving birth, it was the best day of her life,” the source tells HollywoodLife.com.”
“She’s grateful that Kim and Beyonce managed to put their differences aside in order to celebrate with her.”Maybe the alcohol helped Kim and Bey chill things out?”
“Which, that’s fine.”


If Kim and bay want to stay aloof, they'd better know that Serena won't get involved in the "cold war.". Do you think Kim and bay will be friends, Hollywood actress? "
"Being surrounded by all her closest friends and sharing her special day with them means everything to Serena."
"After 36 year old Beyonce and 37 year old Kim Kardashian were embarrassed and" cold "at Serena Williams' wedding, the tennis legend hopes to be excluded from Kim and Bay's narrative."
"Serena refuses to be partial to Kim and Beyonce," an exclusive source close to Serena told Hollywood life
"She loves them both and doesn't want to have anything to do with their beef."
"Serena and Kim are good friends. Over the years, she has not hesitated to invite them to her wedding. She just made it clear that she didn't want any more dramatic things except Kim's embarrassment when she ran into Kim in the bar. It seems that..."
“… These two men were able to bury their bad blood long enough to celebrate Serena's special day... "
"Serena's wedding was wonderful. Apart from having children, it was the best day of her life," the source said Hollywood life. "
"She's grateful to Kim and Beyonce for putting their differences aside in order to celebrate with her." Maybe alcohol will calm Kim and Beyonce down? "
"Well, it doesn't matter."



Number  662
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image credit to Meghan Markle // via InstagramSending good vibes – always in all ways #nobadenergy #bethechange A post shared by Meghan Markle (@meghanmarkle) on Feb 12, 2017 at 11:46am PST”
“And unfortunately, Pippa Middleton is clearly a lot more attention-hungry than Harry’s friends (who are reportedly generally down-to-earth), which means that she’s much less likely to want Meghan at her wedding.”
“Lest some of you have forgotten, Pippa famously stole the thunder at Kate Middleton‘s wedding by wearing *that* dress, the one that all the tabloids and publications were talking about for weeks on end after the wedding was over.”
“In fact, major publications spent more time covering Pippa’s dress than Kate’s actual wedding, a fact that did not go unnoticed by the royals or Kate.”
“Since then, Pippa’s been taking a much more low-key role in her relationship with the media and publicity, with exceptions every now and then.”
“But because of her history at thunder-stealing, she understands how easy it is for attention at weddings to drift to someone other than the bride – and in this particular circumstance, it’s almost a given that it will happen to her.”
“According to recent reports, Pippa Middleton is worried that inviting Meghan Markle, Prince Harry’s beau, to her wedding will shift the attention away from her wedding and onto Meghan.”
“As we saw a few days ago, Meghan Markle attended Prince Harry’s friend’s wedding in Jamaica, and all anyone in the media cared about the next few days was Meghan.”
“Sources tell the Daily Mail that Pippa definitely noticed how events played out at the wedding in the Caribbean, explaining, “She saw how all eyes were on Meghan rather than Lara (the bride) last week.”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below.”


"Photo source: Meghan Markle / / via instagram sending good vibes – always in all ways ţ nobadenergy ţ bethechange post shared by Meghan Markle (@ Meghan Markle) at 11:46 am on February 12, 2017"
"Unfortunately, Pippa Middleton is obviously more eager to get attention than Harry's friends (who, according to reports, are generally down-to-earth), which means she is less likely to want Megan to attend the wedding."
"I'm afraid some of you have forgotten that Pippa was famous for wearing that dress at Kate Middleton's wedding, and all the tabloids and publications talked about it for weeks after the wedding."
"The fact that magazines spend more time reporting on Pippa's wedding dress than Kate's actual wedding has not been ignored by the royal family or Kate."
"Since then, Pippa has been much more low-key in his relationship with the media and publicity, with occasional exceptions."
"But because of her history of stealing thunder, she knows that it's easy to shift the attention from the wedding to someone other than the bride - in this particular case, it almost happens to her."
"According to recent reports, Pippa Middleton is worried that inviting Prince Harry's boyfriend Megan Marcel to her wedding will shift her attention from her wedding to Megan."
"We saw a few days ago that Megan markel attended the wedding of Prince Harry's friend in Jamaica, and the media's attention in the next few days was on Megan."
Pippa must have noticed what happened at the Caribbean wedding, a source told the daily mail, explaining: "last week she saw all eyes focused on Megan, not Laura."
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below."



Number  663
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments.”
“Source: BACKGRIDDo you think The Weeknd's outfit was a jab at Justin?”
“But maybe this costume was the singer's way to get back at his ex?”
“Justin, too, has kept quiet.”
“Article continues below advertisementNeither Selena nor The Weeknd have addressed the breakup.”
“Source: BACKGRIDSelena and her ex Justin were recently spotted getting breakfast and attending church together.”
“Article continues below advertisementIt's been reported that Justin is to blame for Selena and the Weeknd's breakup.”
“Was The Weeknd mocking him in his Instagram?”
“Source: InstagramIn fact, the Biebs has been making the letterman jacket a part of his look for a while now.”
“"Toronto Nights," he captioned the pic.”


"Please let us know in the comments."
"Source: BACKGROUND: do you think this week's costume is an attack on Justin?"
"But maybe it's a way for singers to get back at their ex girlfriends?"
"Justin has been silent, too."
"The article continues below. Neither Serena nor weekend talked about breaking up."
"Source: backgrid Selena and her former Justin were recently found eating breakfast and going to church together."
"The article continues under the advertisement. It is reported that Justin is to blame for the breakup between Serena and the weekend
"Did the weekend people laugh at him on instagram?"
"Source: instagramin in fact, Biebs has made the Letterman jacket part of his look for some time."
"Night in Toronto," he wrote under the title of the photo



Number  664
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Update: Mathew Knowles, Beyonce Knowles’ father, tweeted an announcement of the twins’ arrival on June 18 (Father’s Day).”
“Reps for the couple have not responded to requests for comment.”
“The Carter family is reportedly looking at properties in Los Angeles, having made a $120 million offer on a brand new Bel-Air property designed by architect Paul McClean.”
“Beyoncé has kept a low profile in recent months, dropping out of Coachella (she was replaced by Lady Gaga) in April and skipping the Met Gala in May.”
“Despite having the most nominations, she got shut out in the top four categories to Adele.”
“During the show, she took home trophies for Best Urban Contemporary Album (for “Lemonade”) and Best Music Video (for “Formation”).”
“She performed at the Grammys later that month in a visual spectacle that included holographic technology.”
“The post currently has nearly 11 million likes.”
“The post — showing the singer embracing her baby bump in a garden scene — broke records on the social media platform.”
“Beyoncé announced her pregnancy via Instagram on February 1.”


"Latest news: Beyonce Knowles' father Matthew Knowles announced on twitter that the twins will arrive on June 18 (father's day)
"Representatives of the couple have yet to respond to requests for comment."
"It's reported that the Carter Family are looking for real estate in Los Angeles. They have offered 120 million dollars to buy a brand new bellell real estate designed by architect Paul McLean."
"Beyonce has been keeping a low profile in recent months, leaving cochella in April (replaced by Lady Gaga) and absent from the metropolitan party in May."
"Despite receiving the most nominations, she was still excluded from the top four by Adele."
In the performance, she won the best city contemporary album award and the best Music Video Award
"She performed a visual feast including holography at the Grammy Awards later that month."
"This post is currently liked by nearly 11 million people."
"This post shows the singer embracing her little lump in the garden, breaking the social media platform record."
"Beyonce announced her pregnancy through instagram on February 1."



Number  665
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They were previously changed in March 2015 to ignore gender bias, so even if Kate does have one girl and one boy, whichever one is born first would be next in line behind Charlotte.”
“Life & Style previously revealed that despite being fifth and sixth in line for the throne, the twins’ births could affect the rules of succession.”
“He looks after me as much as possible,” Kate said.”
““I’m very lucky.”
“But Kate knows that sibling rivalry is all part of the process of growing up.”She’s still suffering from hyperemesis gravidarum, or severe morning sickness, but recently gushed about William’s attentiveness.”
“She’s obviously worried that George and Charlotte will be jealous of the babies, especially Charlotte, who loves being the center of attention.”
““Kate feels that it’s important for her eldest two to bond with the newborns.”
““The twins will sleep in separate bedrooms but will share a playroom with George and Charlotte,” the palace source explains.”
“Kate and husband Prince William are currently in the process of designing duel nurseries for their new additions, who are due in April.”
“In her first public appearance since the pregnancy announcement in September, Kate wore a blue Temperley long-sleeved dress, but followed that up a week later with a pale pink Orla Kiely frock.”


"They were previously modified in March 2015 to ignore gender bias, so even if Kate does have a woman and a man, whichever comes first will be the next after Charlotte."
Life and fashion has previously revealed that although the twins are the fifth and sixth in line to the throne, their birth may affect inheritance rules
"He took care of me as much as he could," Kate said
"I'm lucky."
"But Kate knows that sibling rivalry is part of the growing up process," she said, adding that she still suffers from hyperemesis gravidarum, or severe morning sickness, but recently she has been gushing about William's carefulness
"She's obviously worried that George and Charlotte will be jealous of the children, especially Charlotte, because she likes to be the focus of attention."
"Kate feels that the relationship between her two oldest children and the newborn is very important."
"The twins will sleep in different bedrooms, but will share a game room with George and Charlotte," the palace source explained
"Kate and her husband Prince William are currently designing a two person nursery for their new members, who will expire in April."
Kate made her first public appearance since she announced her pregnancy in September, wearing a blue Temple long sleeve dress but a week later wearing a pale pink Ola Kelly dress



Number  666
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It will be interesting to see where things go from here!”
“Whether she’s drying him off with a towel or grabbing coffee with the singer, her happiness shines through.”
“The blonde beauty always seems to have a carefree and fun-loving attitude whenever she’s around Justin.”
“She wishes Justin the best and hopes he does not break Hailey’s heart by quickly losing interest again.”Hailey doesn’t seem to be too concerned with getting her heart broken just yet.”
““Selena knows better than anyone how challenging it can be to maintain a relationship with Justin.”
““Selena has major doubts that Justin and Hailey will stay together very long,” the source said.”
““Selena still misses him and thinks about Justin all the time.” Selena’s own experience with having a love life with Justin keeps her weary of his relationship with anyone else.”
““Selena is sad things are the way they are between her and Justin because despite everything, she still has strong feelings for him,” the source continued.”
“She enjoys being single but knowing Justin is moving on still hurts.”Although Selena and Justin have both seemed to be living their best single lives since their split, we can understand why Justin’s public romantic moments would get to her.”
““Selena is doing her best to not pay attention to what Justin is up to, but it’s impossible, her friends text her and tell her what is going on constantly.”


"It would be interesting to see where things go from here!"
"Whether she was drying his hair with a towel or drinking coffee with a singer, her happiness was shining."
"The blonde always seems to have a carefree and playful attitude when she is around Justin."
"She wished Justin all the best and hoped that he would not hurt Haley because he lost interest again." Haley didn't seem to care enough to make her sad
"Serena knows better than anyone how difficult it is to have a relationship with Justin."
"Selena is very skeptical that Justin and Haley will be together for a long time," the source said
"Serena still misses him, always thinking about Justin." Selena's own love experience with Justin made her tired of his relationship with others
"Selena is very sad, that's what happened between her and Justin, because despite what happened, she still has strong feelings for him," the source continued
"She likes to be single, but it's still painful to know that Justin has to go on living." Although both Serena and Justin seem to have the best single life since their breakup, we can understand why Justin's overt romantic moments affect her
"Selena tries to ignore what Justin is doing, but it's impossible. Her friends keep texting her to tell her what happened."



Number  667
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Gwyneth has previously dated Brad Pitt, Luke Wilson, Donovon Leitch and Ben Affleck.”
“'Things got very serious very fast, but lately all they did was fight all the time and she's tired of it.'”
“Amid reports that the 42-year-old Oscar-winning actress and her 44-year-old producer beau have split, Brad was spotted out for the evening with another woman.”
“The former Glee executive producer took a mystery brunette out for dinner in the Venice Beach neighbourhood of Los Angeles on Tuesday.”
“Scroll down to video Moving on Brad Falchuk seemed to be over girlfriend Gwyneth Paltrow when he stepped out with a mystery brunette on Tuesday in Venice California It may not have been a very formal affair however since the American Horror Story producer stayed casual in a black V”
“...neck T shirt under a matching black blazer...”
“Brad's lady friend wore her brown hair long and loose, cascading over a white jacket.”
“Having 'consciously uncoupled' from husband Chris Martin in March 2014, Gwyneth quickly moved on to Brad.”
“Breakup rumours Gwyneth left and Brad right are reportedly heading for a split according to the June 29 issue of Life Style According to a report from the June 29 issue of Life Style however friends say the blonde Iron Man star and her rebound guy are about to end...”
“...their relationship...”


"Gwyneth has dated Brad Pitt, Luke Wilson, Donovan Lodge and Ben Affleck before."
"Things get serious very quickly, but recently they've been fighting and she's tired of it."
It is reported that 42 year old Oscar winner Brad broke up with 44 year old producer Bo and Brad was found with another woman
"The former glee executive producer took a mysterious brunette to dinner on Tuesday near Venice Beach in Los Angeles."
"Rolling to the video mobile Brad falchuk seems to have overtaken girlfriend Gwyneth Paltrow when he comes out with a mysterious brunette in Venice, California on Tuesday, which may not be a very formal event, but because the American horror story producer stays in a black V casual."
“… Neck T-shirt with black suit... "
Brad's girlfriend has long brown hair and is fluffy in a white jacket
"In March 2014, Gwyneth and her husband, Chris Martin, were 'consciously decoupled' and soon moved to Brad."
Gwyneth left and Brad right are on the verge of breaking up, but friends say the blonde Ironman and her rebounder are coming to an end, lifestyle magazine reported on June 29
“… Their relationship... "



Number  668
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 11-minute clip showed fans a glimpse into her pregnancy and included shots with her whole family, including her pregnant sister Khloé and newborn niece Chicago West.”
“I knew for myself I needed to prepare for this role of a lifetime in the most positive, stress free, and healthy way I knew how."”
“"My pregnancy was one I chose not to do in front of the world.”
“I understand you're used to me bringing you along on all my journeys.”
“In an accompanying post, Jenner wrote: "I'm sorry for keeping you in the dark through all the assumptions.”
“The 20-year-old kept her pregnancy away from the spotlight and revealed the arrival of her healthy baby with rapper Travis Scott in a sweet YouTube video last weekend.”
“The speculation comes just days after the Kardashian-Jenner clan welcomed another baby into the family, with Kylie Jenner giving birth to Stormi Webster.”
“All pink diner party?” asked a third.”
“Either way I’m so happy for you and @RealTristan13!”“Okay guys, is @khloekardashian also having a girl?”
“That would be so amazing if you have a little girl and Stormi and Chicago all get to grow up together being so close in age!”


"The 11 minute video gave fans a glimpse of her pregnancy, as well as a group photo of her and her family, including her pregnant sister heloe and her newborn niece Chicago West."
"I know for myself that I need to prepare for my role in my life in the most positive, stress free and healthy way I know."
"My pregnancy is what I choose not to do in front of the world."
"I know you're used to taking you with me every time I travel."
"I'm sorry to let you get caught in all the assumptions," Jenner wrote in a subsequent article
"Last weekend, the 20-year-old revealed the arrival of her healthy baby with rapper Travis Scott in a sweet YouTube video."
"Just a few days ago, the Kardashian Jenner family had another child. Kelly Jenner gave birth to Tommy Webster."
"All pink dining car party? "Asked the third
"Anyway, I'm happy for you and @ realtristan13! "Well, guys, does @ KhloeKardashian have a girl, too?"
"If you have a little girl, Tommy and Chicago can grow up together at such a close age, it's amazing!"



Number  669
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And, well, the rest is was history.”
“Sofia has been enjoying her time with Scott, and as long as Kourtney stays with Younes , Sofia feels that Kourt poses no threat to her happiness with Scott,” the insider adds.”
“Kourtney Kardashian , 38, and Younes Bendjima , 24, gave fans a breakup scare on March 5 when she suddenly went missing on Instagram and his account went private — At the same time.”
“The Keeping Up With The Kardashians star’s Instagram was temporarily deleted, and when she returned to IG, she wasn’t following her boyfriend.”
“However, soon after her return, Kourtney followed Younes, reassuring fans that they were still together.”
“While many fans were worried they had split,, 19, was on edge as well.”
“Now that Sofia is dating Kourt’s ex and baby daddy, Scott Disick, 34, she has to keep a sharp eye on what goes on since Scott is notorious for running back to Kourt.”
“So, you can only imagine how worried Sofia was when reports claimed Kourt and Younes had split.”
““ Sofia is hoping that Kourtney and Younes never split,” a source close to the young model tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She would hate to see Kourtney and Younes split and then Scott try to reconcile with Kourtney on a rebound.”


"Well, the rest is history."
"Sophia has always enjoyed her time with Scott, and as long as Courtney and younes are together, Sophia feels that Courtney will not threaten her happiness with Scott," the insider added
"On March 5, Kourtney Kardashian, 38, and younes bendjima, 24, suddenly disappeared on instagram, and his account turned into a private account, which scared fans of breaking up."
"Kardashian star's instagram was temporarily removed, and when she returned to Ig, she did not follow her boyfriend."
"However, shortly after her return, Courtney followed younes and assured the fans that they were still together."
"When a lot of fans are worried about their breakup, the 19-year-old is also nervous
"Now Sophia is dating Scott Disick, 34, the former father and little father of Scott, and she has to pay close attention to the progress of things because Scott is notorious for running back to him."
"So when it's reported that Kurt and younes are breaking up, you can only imagine how worried Sophia is."
"Sophia hopes Courtney and younes will never separate," a source close to the young model told reporters
"She didn't want to see Courtney break up with yones, and then Scott tried to reconcile with Courtney."



Number  670
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“As for their recent rendezvous, reps for Pitt and Miller did not comment on the matter.”
“It’s insane.”Meanwhile, sources say Jolie has banned her kids from calling their dad in recent weeks.”
“You know, he’s the producer of the film and I’ve met him twice.”
“He’s not been to the set.”
“He seems to be over a hump.”Miller previously denied dating rumors, saying: “So this is the truth about that: Brad Pitt is producing the movie that I just wrapped, but I didn’t see him.”
“Another insider added that Pitt, who’s been caught looking frail in recent months, was “in very high spirits, which he hasn’t been for a long time.”
“Pitt and Miller were “heavily enjoying each other’s company,” and “were talking to each other all night,” a source told the publication.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"As for their recent meeting, representatives of Pitt and Miller did not comment on the matter."
"This is crazy." Meanwhile, it has been reported that Julie has banned her children from calling their father in recent weeks
"You know, he's the producer of the film, and I've met him twice."
"He hasn't been to the set."
Miller previously denied the dating rumors, saying: "this is the truth: Brad Pitt is making the movie I just finished, but I didn't see him."
Another insider added that Pitt had been found to look frail in recent months and that he was "in a very high mood, not for a long time."
"Peter and Miller" enjoyed each other's company very much "and" talked all night, "a source told the Wall Street Journal



Number  671
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It would also be mundane at times.””
“And I think that that kind of relationship — God, it sounds like it would just be so beautiful — would also be hard.”
““That’s just basically stuff she’s told me.”
““I’ve never had that, so I wrote that song about things that Lena [Dunham] has told me about her and Jack [Antonoff],” she said.”
“Recent years have seen Antonoff act as producer and co-writer with the likes of St Vincent, Lorde and Taylor Swift – the latter once said that his relationship with Dunham inspired the ‘1989’ album track ‘You Are In Love‘.”
“Bleachers, whose recent album ‘Gone Now‘ was named as one of NME’s best albums of 2017, last year had Dunham direct the video for ‘Don’t Take The Money‘.”
“They are both moving on.”Representatives from the couple then confirmed that they were no longer together.”
““Jack and Lena were growing apart and it just made sense for them to end their relationship where it was.”AdvertisementThey added: “They want the best for each other no matter what.”
“News.”
““It was mutual,” a source told E!”


"Sometimes it can be ordinary."
"I think that relationship - gosh, it's going to sound great - it's going to be hard."
"That's basically what she told me."
"I've never done this before, so I wrote a song about what Lena (Dunham) told me about her and Jack (Antonov)," she said
"In recent years, Antonov has worked as producer and co-author with Saint Vincent, Lord and Taylor Swift, who said his relationship with Dunham inspired the 1989 album you're in love."
"Grandstand, whose recent album 'let's go' was rated as one of NME's best albums in 2017, last year Dunham made a direct video for 'don't take money.'
"Both of them are going on." Representatives of the couple later confirmed that they were no longer together
"The relationship between Jack and Lena is getting more and more estranged. It makes sense for them to end their old relationship." In the ad, they added: "no matter what happens, they want each other to be the best."
"News."
"It's mutual," one source told e! "



Number  672
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“14 Garbine Muguruza...”
“Prior to that, Williams had beaten Muguruza three consecutive times, all on the hard court surface.”
“Their first match against one another on grass courts is for the most prestigious title you can earn on the surface, The Venus Rosewater Dish.”
“Saturday’s match will be broadcast by ESPN in the United States, beginning at 9 a.m.”
“ET.”
“ABC will have encore coverage of the match beginning at 3 p.m. Online streaming of the singles final will be available via WatchESPN and via the ESPN App on smartphones and other devices.”
“For Williams, playing in the Wimbledon final is nothing new.”
“She has won the title five times, last doing so in 2008.”
“That was also the last time she won a Grand Slam, though she came close earlier this year when she played in the Australian Open finals.”
“Muguruza has also won a Grand Slam title, but just one — taking home the win on the clay of Roland Garros, the French Open.”


"14 Gabin muguruza..."
"Before that, Williams has beaten muguruza three times in a row, all on the hard court."
"Their first game on the grass was for the most prestigious champion you can win on the grass, the Venus rose water plate."
"Saturday's game will be broadcast in the United States by ESPN, starting at 9am."
"Wait a minute."
"ABC will start Encore coverage of the game at 3pm. Online streaming of singles finals will be available through watchespn and ESPN applications on smartphones and other devices. "
"It's nothing new for Williams to play in the Wimbledon final."
"She's won five times, last time in 2008."
"It was the last time she won a grand slam, but she was close in the Australian Open final earlier this year
"Muguruza also won the Grand Slam, but only one - on Roland Garros' clay at the French Open."



Number  673
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s tried and true and exactly what she needs, so they’re hoping he’ll officially become family this summer.” Aww!”
“They can see how committed Blake is to Gwen.”
“We have the exclusive details on why they think so, here.”
“The sun is shining, the birds are chirping, and Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are more in love than ever!”
“So why not get married this summer?”
“Their friends and family are convinced that a summer wedding is actually happening, a source close to Gwen told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY, and they think that the couple have been hinting at it for awhile.”
“HollywoodLife has reached out to Blake and Gwen’s reps for comment.”
““Gwen family and friends are buzzing right now, because she’s been dropping hints that she and Blake have a big announcement coming,” the source told us.”
““She’s been teasing that they have a big secret they’re getting ready to share and everyone’s convinced they’re going to have a surprise wedding this summer.”
“Gwen’s told her family and friends to block off some dates for a big party at Blake’s place in Oklahoma this summer.”


"He's real, and that's what she needs, so they want him to get married this summer."! "
"They can see Blake's loyalty to Gwen."
"We have exclusive details about why they think so."
"The sun is shining, the birds are chirping, Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stephanie are in love more than ever
"Then why not get married this summer?"
"Their friends and family believe that the summer wedding is really going to take place," a source close to Gwen told exclusive Hollywood life. They think the couple have hinted at it for some time
"Hollywood life has contacted representatives of black and Gwen for advice."
"Gwen's family and friends are very busy now because she has been hinting that she and Blake are about to announce a big news," the source told us
"She kept joking that they were going to share a big secret and everyone believed there would be a surprise wedding this summer."
"Gwen told her family and friends that at a big party at the black house in Oklahoma this summer, some of the appointments would be cancelled."



Number  674
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Jennifer Garner Looks Incredible in First Red Carpet Appearance Since Taking Ben Affleck to RehabBen Affleck and Jennifer Garner Finalize Their Divorce 3 Years After SplitBen Affleck's Ex Lindsay Shookus Wanted Him to Go to Rehab Before Split: Source...”
“"She looked distraught."”
“Garner drove her estranged husband to rehab last week and was photographed arriving at Affleck's house looking visibly upset outside of his Pacific Palisades, California, home.”
“Later, the former couple, along with the actress' bodyguard, was seen driving away from Affleck's house with the Argo director sitting in the backseat, looking distressed.”
““Jen was incredibly concerned because Ben was making excuses for missed plans and rarely answering his phone in the week before he entered rehab," our source says.”
“"She knows this pattern very well and became worried.”According to the source, Garner eventually went to check on 46-year-old Affleck, and the actor appeared to have been on "some type of bender."”
““She went over to check on him fearful of what she mind find, and sure enough found him with empty bottles strewn all over the house," the source says.”
“"He reeked of alcohol and clearly had been on some type of bender, and was in terrible shape.”An eyewitness told ET last week that 46-year-old Garner looked "distraught" as she drove Affleck to rehab.”
“The A-list stars share three children together -- 12-year-old daughter Violet, 9-year-old daughter Seraphina and 6-year-old son Samuel -- and were married for 10 years before splitting in 2015.”
“"Garner was very emotional but decided to take the situation into her own hands," the eyewitness said.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Jennifer Garner's first appearance on the red carpet since taking Ben Affleck to rehab looks incredible. Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner finalized their divorce agreement three years after their divorce. Ben Affleck's ex girlfriend Lindsay schokus wants him to go to rehab before his divorce
"She looks upset."
"Ghana drove his separated husband to rehab last week and was photographed outside his home in Pacific Palisades, California, looking depressed when he came to Affleck's house."
"Later, the bodyguard of the former couple and the actress was seen driving away from Affleck's house. Director Argo was sitting in the back seat and looked very upset."
"Jen was very worried because Ben had been making excuses for missed plans for the week before he went to rehab and rarely answered the phone," our source said
"She understood the pattern very well and began to worry." According to the source, Ghana eventually went to check on the 46 year old Affleck, who seems to have been "bending of some kind."
"She went to see him, worried about what she would find, and sure enough found that he was full of empty bottles," the source said
"He smelled of wine, obviously doing some form of bending, and he was in bad health." A witness told et last week that Ghana, 46, looked "upset" when driving Affleck to rehab
"The A-level star has three children - 12-year-old daughter violet, 9-year-old daughter Serafina and 6-year-old son Samuel - who separated in 2015 after 10 years of marriage."
"Ghana was very emotional, but she decided to deal with it on her own," the witness said



**Something goes wrong**
“[Featured Image by KGC-138/STAR MAX/IPx/AP Images]”
““I don’t know who said that, but that’s some weird story that they made up,” Sandler firmly refuted.”
“Either way, the claim that the Biebs had “sought out some A-list help to guide him in his thespian ambitions,” as US Weekly’s spurious “source” puts it — is fiction.”
“...flat out fabricated them...”
“Given that the magazine is owned by American Media Inc the publisher that also owns the National Enquirer Radar Online Star OK and other outlets of that low tier ilk we ll leave it to sensible Inquisitr readers to decide whether or not US Weekly used incompetent sources or just...”
“Sandler’s emphatic calling out of the fake story indicates the purported “quotes” in US Weekly’s story were either inadequately sourced or simply made up.”
“He just wanted to go to dinner, me and David Spade and Dustin [Hoffman], and Dustin said no, he ran away, so it was just me and David.”Watch the brief interview below.”
“The veteran comedy star explained, “That’s not it at all.”Sandler continued, “We just hung out.”
“In Entertainment Tonight’s interview, Sandler was asked about the claim that he dined with the Canadian pop singer to help his acting career.”
“Always consider the source before believing a story.”


"[featured pictures provided by kgc-138 / Star max / IPX / AP images]"
"I don't know who said it, but it was a strange story they made up," Sandler retorted firmly
"In any case, as the false" source "of American weekly said, the story that the biebers" seek the help of first-line stars to guide him to realize his acting ambition "is fictitious."
“… Completely fabricated... "
"Considering that the magazine is owned by American media Inc., which also owns the publisher of national inquirer radar online star OK and other low-level magazines of the same kind, we will leave it to the readers of wise interrogators to decide whether American weekly uses unqualified sources or just..."
"Sandler's emphasis on this false report shows that the so-called" quotations "in the US weekly reports are either from insufficient sources or just fabricated."
"He just wanted to go to dinner, me and David spade and Dustin (Hoffman), Dustin said no, he ran away, so it was just me and David." Look at the short interview below
"It's not like that at all," explained the veteran comedian Sandler continued, "we're just hanging out."
In an entertainment interview tonight, Sandler was asked that he had dinner with the Canadian pop singer to help his acting career
"Before you believe a story, you have to think about the source."



**Something goes wrong**
“Jenner was originally hopeful about Trump, given that he promised to make LGBTQ rights part of his platform.”
“But when they see Caitlyn, they agree that she should use the women’s bathroom.”
“Jenner spoke candidly with Variety about the pain of that rejection.”
“Her conservatism made her a pariah in the left-leaning entertainment industry, where she’s been criticized for not doing enough to help the transgender community.”
“She voted for Trump in the 2016 election (but is no longer a fan).”
“On her reality show, Jenner expressed support for Ted Cruz and sparred with activists, who were as experienced in trans-politics as she was unversed.”
“She had difficulty living up to those expectations, especially after coming out as something more controversial than being transgender: a Republican in Hollywood.”
“Next came the cover of Vanity Fair and her own reality TV show, “I Am Cait.”Her newfound fame put enormous pressure on Jenner — who had lived the first 65 years of her life as Olympic gold medal-winning decathlete Bruce Jenner — to be the perfect transgender role model.”
“...a man to a woman attracted a staggering 17 million viewers...”
“I can get more things done if I don t stick my nose into everything publicly Jenner s low key lifestyle and muted public profile stand in sharp contrast to the days when her much talked about 2015 interview with Diane Sawyer in which she revealed plans to transition from...”


"Jenner had hoped for trump because he promised to make LGBTQ rights a platform for him."
"But when they saw Caitlin, they agreed that she should use the ladies' room."
"Jenner spoke frankly about the pain of that refusal."
"Her conservatism has made her a pariah in left leaning entertainment circles, and she has been criticized for not doing enough to help transgender communities."
"She voted for trump (but no longer a fan) in the 2016 election."
In her reality show, Jenna expressed her support for Ted Cruz and had disputes with activists who had as much cross political experience as she had
"It's hard for her to live up to those expectations, especially after her more controversial debut as a transgender: a Republican in Hollywood."
Next comes the cover of vanity fair and her own reality show I'm Cain. Her new fame has put a lot of pressure on Jenner, who has become a perfect transgender role model as an Olympic gold medalist Bruce Jenner for the first 65 years of her life
“… One man and one woman attracted 17 million viewers... "
"If I don't pay attention to everything publicly, I can do more. Jenna's low-key lifestyle and low-key public image are in sharp contrast to the days when she talked about it in an interview with Diane Sawyer in 2015, in which she revealed that A plan for transition. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Gomez’s brave public acknowledgement of the battle she’s been privately facing, and the gift of life she received, will give strength to others to do the same.”
“Our goal is to get as many people off the waiting list as possible and help all of them find a second chance at life.Ms.”
“National Kidney Foundation can help people start the conversation through a special free program called The Big Ask: The Big Give .”
“But many kidney patients never get a transplant because they are afraid to ask their family members and friends for help.”
“To all of us, she is nothing short of a hero.”There are currently more than 100,000 people on the kidney transplant wait list –and the average wait time is long, three to five years or longer.”
“Finding a match is not easy; and I am sure she feels immensely blessed and grateful to her dear friend, Francia Raisa for the gift of life.”
“...tragic loss allowed me to live I would like to extend my heartfelt support to Selena as she continues her journey towards kidney health...”
“I am alive today because of the kidney transplant I received 13 years ago from an anonymous deceased donor and there isn t a day that goes by when I do not give thanks to the family who despite their...”
“...said Kidney disease has been part of my own life for as long as I can remember affecting three generations of my family...”
“Kidneys play a critical role in the body acting as the body s filtering system removing wastes and controlling blood pressure and once they fail dialysis or a kidney transplant are needed just to stay alive NKF CEO Kevin Longino...”


"Gomez bravely and publicly admits that the fight she has been facing in private, and the gift of life she has received, will give others the strength to do the same thing."
"Our goal is to get as many people off the waiting list as possible and help them find a second chance to live. Miss. '
"The National Kidney Foundation can help people start a conversation through a special free program called big ask: big give."
"But many kidney patients have never had a transplant because they are afraid to ask family and friends for help."
"For all of us, she's a hero." There are more than 100000 people on the waiting list for kidney transplantation - the average waiting time is very long, three to five years or more
"It's not easy to find a match, and I'm sure she's very lucky and grateful for the gift of life from her dear friend, Francia Raisa."
“… I have survived the tragic loss. I would like to express my heartfelt support to Selena, who will continue her journey of kidney health... "
"I'm alive today because 13 years ago I received a kidney transplant from an anonymous deceased donor, and I don't have a day without thanking this family, even though they
“… Kidney disease has always been a part of my life, as long as I remember that it has affected my family for three generations... "
"The kidney plays a vital role in the body. As the body's filtration system, it can remove waste and control blood pressure. Once dialysis or kidney transplantation fails, it needs Kevin Longino, the chief executive of NKF, to maintain his life..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Are ya holdin’ on tight?’””
“Later in “The Clique,” Smith praises his family: “The real-life Incredibles, last name Smith.”
“The rapper addresses the constant divorce rumors he and wife Jada Pinkett Smith face in his new song.”
“The 49-year-old actor hinted at new music he has been working on in a YouTube video on Wednesday, May 23.”
“He shared a snippet of one of his new tracks, “To the Clique,” in which he raps about his personal life.”
““Stop the divorce rumors and mind your damn business,” Smith says in the song.”
“The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air actor and the Girls Trip actress, 46, have dealt with gossip about their relationship status throughout their 20-year marriage.”
“They do not comment on the reports often, though.”
“Jada Jaden Willow Trey ya ll ain t f king with my clique Smith spoke up to defend his marriage after outlets ran with a report that the couple who are parents of Jaden 19 Willow 17 and Smith s son from his previous marriage Trey 25 were divorcing in...”
“Get ready.”


"Are you holding on? '"
Later, in faction, Smith praised his family: "incredible in real life, surnamed Smith."
"In his new song, the rapper talks about the divorce rumors that he and his wife Jada pinkert Smith often face."
"The 49 year old actor hinted at the new music he was creating in a YouTube video on Wednesday, May 23."
"He shared a piece of his new song," to pike, "which tells about his private life
"Stop the divorce rumors and mind your business," Smith said in the song
The 46 year old prince and the heroine of the girl's journey have been talking about their relationship for 20 years
"However, they don't often comment on these reports."
"Jada Jaden willow treya will not be associated with my faction. In the media reports, Jaden Jaden willow 17's parents and Smith's son treya 25 are in After the divorce, Smith defended his marriage
"Ready."



Number  679
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“!”
“On June 9, Blake was spotted spending some quality time with a mystery blonde in Los Angeles.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why she thought her recent flings would make Blake come crawling back!”
“These days, Kendall Jenner has been living her best life.”
“From her make out session with Anwar Hadid to her multiple dates with Ben Simmons, it’s clear she’s enjoying the singe life.”
“However, we’ve just learned the real reason behind her many romances.”
““It sucks for Kendall that Blake [Griffin] got traded because that started the break up between the two.”
“The long distance was an issue.”
“But, she liked him a lot, and she still wanted him to fight for her and make it work.”
“So, she has been dating, but she thought that would make him jealous and come after her again.”


“!”
On June 9, Blake was found in Los Angeles with a mysterious blonde
"We've got an exclusive account of why she thinks her recent indulgence will bring black back!"
"Kendall Jenner is living her best life these days."
"From her intimacy with Anwar Hadid to her many dates with Ben Simmons, it's clear that she enjoys the life of a singer."
"However, we just learned the real reason behind many of her romantic stories."
"It's too bad for Kendall that Blake (Griffin) was traded because it triggered a breakup."
"Long distance travel is a problem."
"But she likes him very much, and she still hopes that he can fight for her and make everything go well."
"So, she's been dating, but she thinks it's going to make him jealous and catch up with her again."



Number  680
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We can’t wait to see!”
“She may be showing the first hints of a baby bump at this point.”
“See the very suspicious pics here!”
“If Beyonce‘s not pregnant, she certainly isn’t helping squash the baby rumors!”
“Queen Bey stepped out in Cannes with husband Jay-Z wearing a flowy maxi dress with an empire waist.”
“You know what that means — it didn’t show an inch of her figure, even her arms.”
“Well, almost everything was covered.”
“The dress was cut totally low and showed off a massive amount of cleavage.”
“She was wearing a pair of sky-high, stripped wedges, which feels like the opposite of what a pregnant woman would wear!”
“However, this is Beyonce we’re talking about; she’s the star who performed in a floating chair at the Grammys while extremely pregnant with twins!”


"We can't wait to see it!"
"She may show the first signs of a baby lump at this point."
"Look at these suspicious pictures!"
"If Beyonce isn't pregnant, she won't help quell the rumors about the baby!"
"The queen came out in Cannes with her husband, Jay-Z, in a flowing dress with an imperial waist."
"You know what that means - it doesn't show an inch of her body, not even her arms."
"Well, almost everything is included."
"The skirt was cut very low, revealing a lot of cleavage."
"She's wearing a pair of priceless, stripped wedges. It's the opposite of what pregnant women wear!"
"But we're talking about Beyonce, the star of the floating chair at the Grammy Awards, with twins!"



Number  681
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““It’s a huge ask of one actor to portray all that, so splitting the job between several actors not only makes production easier, it also increases the chance of more people paying to see the film.”We pay for juicy info!”
“...revealed...”
“There have been talks that they need someone for the closet years before George came out the toilet sex years when he was busted in a public restroom the addiction years and the fat years when George was left bloated by his drinking drug use and health problems the insider...”
“...star’s life are being referred to in “crude” terms, the source said.”
“But the stages of the former Wham!”
““Producers are interested in doing the same with George Michael because he went through so much during his lifetime,” dished a snitch.”
“In that film, multiple stars, including Christian Bale, Heath Ledger and Cate Blanchett, portrayed various aspects of Dylan’s life.”
“For his biopic, producers are said to be borrowing from 2007’s “I’m Not There” about music legend Bob Dylan.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"It's a huge requirement for one actor to paint all this, so distributing work among several actors not only makes production easier, it also increases the chance for more people to spend money on movies." We pay for juicy information! "
“… Reveal... "
"It's said that in the years before George came out, they needed someone, in the years before he went to the toilet, when he was caught in a public toilet, in the years of drug addiction, in the years when George became fat because of his drinking, drug use and health problems, insiders..."
“…… "People use" vulgar "terms to refer to the life of stars," the source said
"But the stage of the last bash!"
"Producers are also interested in George Michael because he's been through so much in his lifetime," one whistleblower said
In that film, many stars, including Christian bell, Heath Ledger and Kate Blanchett, depict all aspects of Dylan's life
For his biography, the producer is said to have borrowed from the 2007 I'm not there about music legend Bob Dylan



Number  682
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At the time their reps gave a joint statement which read, “Before rumors or falsifications get out of hand we can confirm that Orlando [Bloom] and Katy [Perry] are taking respectful, loving space at this time.”The two stars have yet to address or confirm the wedding report.”
“Katy and Orlando originally announced their split in late February, 2017, just days after they seemed happier than ever at numerous Oscars parties.”
“The pair allegedly tied the knot in a super secret wedding in Prague!”
“You’ve got to check out these unexpected details!”
“Katy Perry, 33, and Orlando Bloom, 41, reportedly had a quickie wedding in Prague!”
““Word in her inner circle is that her recent trip to Prague to visit him was actually an elopement,” a source tells OK!”
“...mag.”
““Katy has never had a connection with a man like the one she has with Orlando.”
“Friends say neither of them wanted to waste more time apart While visiting Bloom in Prague where he s currently filming his upcoming Amazon series Carnival Row the mag s source says Perry and the actor enjoyed a romantic lunch on February 28 where they cozied up together at Cafe...”
“Savoy...”


"At that time, their representatives issued a joint statement, which said," before rumors or fraud get out of control, we can confirm that Orlando (Bloom) and Katie (Perry) are occupying the space of respect and love at this time. " The two stars have not published or confirmed the wedding report
"Katie and Orlando first broke up at the end of February 2017. Just a few days ago, they seemed to be happier than ever at many Oscar parties."
They are said to have married at a super secret wedding in Prague
"You have to look at these unexpected details!"
Katie Perry, 33, and Orlando Bloom, 41, are reported to have had a quick wedding in Prague
A source told OK: "in her inner circle, it is said that her recent visit to Prague is actually an elopement."
“… Magazine
"Katie has never been with a man like Orlando."
"Friends said that they didn't want to waste more time while visiting bloom in Prague, where he is currently filming his upcoming Amazon series Carnival platoon. The source said that Perry and the actors enjoyed a romantic lunch and they were comfortable together in the cafe on February 28..."
"Savoy..."



Number  683
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below!”
““Selena and Justin know better than to pay any attention to rumors about them and their relationship, they’re used to people constantly speculating and they just ignore it,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“But are they ready to live together!?”
“Maybe it just took loads of trial and error, but it looks like Selena Gomez, 25, and Justin Bieber, 23, have finally arrived at a mature relationship that actually works for them!”
“The “What Do You Mean?” singer appears willing to do whatever it takes to make it work this time!”
“But are they ready to take the next step?”
“You know, living together?”
“Now, thanks to our sources, we’ve got some clues on what to expect from this pair!”
“Take a look back at their relationship over the years right here!”
““Their relation is very important to them, and they share very traditional values when it comes to family and children, so they want to make sure they have a stable and committed home life together.”


"Please let us know in the comments section below!"
"Selena and Justin know very well not to pay attention to the rumors about their relationship. They are used to people's constant speculation. They just ignore the rumors," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"But are they ready to live together?"
"Maybe it's just a series of trial and error, but it seems that Serena Gomez, 25, and Justin Bieber, 23, have finally found a mature relationship that really suits them!"
What do you mean? "This time, Singh seems willing to make it succeed at all costs!"
"But are they ready to take the next step?"
"You know, living together?"
"Now, thanks to our sources, we have some clues about the couple!"
"Let's review their relationship over the years."
"Their relationship is very important to them. In terms of family and children, they have very traditional values, so they want to ensure that they have a stable and determined family life."



Number  684
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“2017 marked the first time Kanye has appeared in the Kardashian holiday card since he started dating Kim back in 2012”
“Making his mark!”
“Yet Kim Kardashian couldn't resist capturing the moment she rang in the New Year with her husband Kanye West on Sunday evening, and sharing it with her 105million Instagram followers.”
“The self-confessed selfie addict completed the countdown to midnight with a kiss in front of the camera, as they celebrated at a club among glamorous friends.”
“Scroll down for videoKisses for the Mrs: Kim Kardashian shared her New Year's kiss with Kanye West on Sunday night, as they welcomed 2018 togetherKim looked like an ice princess with her sharp, bleached bob, which matched her off-the-shoulder dress.”
“Clearly smitten, Kanye shot a rare smile for the camera as pals including Larsa Pippen gathered to count down and wish each other a 'Happy New Year'.”
“Just last week, Kim declared that she was going to use her mobile less, saying: 'My New Year's resolution is to be on my phone less and be more in the moment.'”
“Be more in the moment Despite vowing to put down her phone in 2018 Kim didn t exactly start as she meant to go on Party people She proceeded to film the midnight countdown with her friends at a club The final countdown The celebration was captured for Kim s...”
“...millions of followers She went on to say My 2018 fitness goal is I plan to train really hard and be more consistent five to six days a week weight training with Melissa...”
“2018 will be the year that their family of four becomes five when they welcome a third child via surrogate.”


"2017 is Kanye's first appearance on Kardashian's holiday card since he started dating Kim in 2012"
"Mark him!"
"However, Kim Kardashian couldn't help capturing the moment when she and her husband Kanye West called on New Year's Eve on Sunday night and shared it with 105 million instagram fans."
"The self confessed self timer finished the countdown to midnight by kissing in front of the camera as they celebrated with charming friends at a club."
"Scroll down to see the video of kissing for your wife: Kim Kardashian shared her new year's kiss with Kanye West on Sunday night as they met together for 2018. Kim Kardashian looks like an ice princess in her sharp, bleached Bob dress, which goes well with her off shoulder dress
"Obviously fascinated, when friends including Lhasa Pippen get together to count down and wish each other a" Happy New Year ", kenyeh smiles at the camera
"Just last week, Kim announced that she would use less mobile phones. She said," my new year's resolution is to use less mobile phones and more present. "
"Although Kim vowed to put down her cell phone in 2018, she didn't start like she wanted to go to a party. She continued to shoot the midnight Countdown with her friends at a club. The last countdown celebration was for Kim s..."
“…… Millions of followers, she went on, "my fitness goal for 2018 is that I plan to work very hard, lifting weights five to six days a week with Melissa..."
"2018 will be a year for their family of four to have their third child through surrogacy."



Number  685
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Get the exclusive celebrity scoop on all the stars you love before any of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast Straight Shuter below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“'Idol' Alums Already At War During Taping Of 'The Voice'J-Hud Vs. Kelly!”
“'Idol' Alums Already At War During Taping Of 'The Voice' Hudson is ‘coming back with a vengeance,’ says onset source.”
“Taping for season 15 of The Voice starts on Wednesday, and RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned returning diva judge Jennifer Hudson has it out for last season’s rookie winning coach, Kelly Clarkson!”
“According to a source Hudson, 35 – who got canned years ago as an American Idol hopeful — is making rehearsals a living hell for Clarkson, whose career was launched when she won the first season of Idol!”
““Jennifer has had it out for her since Idol days and Kelly knows this,” the on-set snitch said.”
“She is telling everyone who will listen that she may have lost Idol but she is not going to lose The Voice As Radar previously reported Hudson created a ton of drama when she was a coach on The Voice two seasons ago and was ripped apart by fans for...”
“...her crazy on camera antics which included throwing shoes at contestants...”


"Get exclusive news of all your favorite stars in front of your friends by subscribing to our new podcast below!"
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"The alumni of idol were already at war when they recorded the" voice "j-hud vs. Kelly game!"
"The alumni of idol were already at war when they were recording the sound, and Hudson was coming back from revenge," the source said
"The recording of sound season 15 will start on Wednesday RadarOnline.com The website has learned exclusively that after the return, judge Jennifer Hudson has been the rookie champion coach of last season, Kelly lakson
According to a source, Hudson, 35, was fired a few years ago because of the hope of American Idol. Now she regards rehearsal as Clarkson's hell. Clarkson's career began when she won the first season of idol
"Jennifer's been working for her since the idol age, and Kelly knows that," the set informant said
"She told all those who would listen to her that she may have lost her idol, but she won't lose her voice because radar previously reported that Hudson created a ton of drama when she was a coach's voice two seasons ago, torn fans for..."
“…… Her crazy antics in front of the camera, including throwing shoes at the contestants... "



Number  686
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...star Heather Maltman at a party...”
“Former radio personality Mel Grieg put on a busty display in a plunging gold dress as she sipped champagne with former Bachelor star Heather Maltman at a party Former radio personality Mel Grieg put on a busty display in a plunging gold dress as she sipped champagne with former Bachelor...”
“Another huge celebrity watching the fireworks on the bridge was Kylie Minogue, who posted shots of the landmark all lit up.”
“Excited: Hugh Jackman celebrated New Year's Eve in Sydney, and shared to Instagram a video of himself watching fireworks on Sydney HarbourHugh wished his followers a Happy New Year's Eve, as the fireworks went off.”
“Hugh Jackman celebrated New Year's Eve in Sydney, and shared to Instagram a video of himself watching fireworks on Sydney Harbour.”
“We getting married this year!!!!'”
“2018!!!”
“'Happy New Year!!!”
“She captioned the video saying she was looking forward to their wedding this year.”
“Shanina stood in the DJ booth as she took a video, kissing her man.”


“… Playing Heather Maltman at the party... "
"Former radio celebrity Mel Grieg appeared in a gold dress when sipping champagne with former bachelor star Heather Maltman at a party. Former radio celebrity Mel Grieg appeared in a gold dress when sipping champagne with former bachelor..."
Another superstar watching the fireworks show on the bridge was Kelly Minogue, whose photos of the iconic buildings were all lit up
"Excitement: Hugh Jackman celebrated New Year's Eve in Sydney and shared with instagram a video of watching fireworks in Sydney Harbour. Hugh wishes his followers a happy new year as the fireworks set off
Hugh Jackman celebrated New Year's Eve in Sydney and shared his video of watching fireworks in Sydney Harbor with instagram
"We're getting married this year!!"
“2018!!!”
Happy New Year
"She said in the title of the video that she was looking forward to their wedding this year."
"Shanina was standing in the DJ room and kissing her man when she was making the video."



Number  687
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie will be the first daughter in the family to be worth a billion dollars?”
“The incredibly business-savvy momager has helped all of her kids with their ventures, and it turns out Kylizzle hit the jackpot with the perfect product for her fans.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how Khloe Kardashian is feeling jealous that Ky is her mom’s new golden child!”
“It’s a pretty impressive feat to build a cosmetics empire by the age of 20, and Kylie Jenner has done just that as her lip kit brand has sold $420 million worth of product in just a year and a half!”
“The news was heralded on the cover of our sister publication Women’s Wear Daily on Aug. 9, along with a cover photo showing Ky and her proud mama Kris Jenner, 61.”
“That caused Khloe Kardashian, 33, to remark that, “We are dead to her now,” referring to her other siblings.”
““Khloe was joking when she made that comment, but underneath it there’s definitely some truth to her feelings.”
“There has always been competition between the girls for their mom’s attention,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She only has so much to go around and there are times Kris does play favorites, or at least it seems that way to Khloe,” our insider continues.”
“That has the Good American jeans founder feeling a little competitive that her sister just turned 20 on Aug. 10 and is already nearly halfway to being a billionaire!”


"Hollywood actresses, do you think Kelly will be the first daughter in the family worth $1 billion?"
"This business savvy mom helped all the kids start their own businesses. As a result, kailizil provided perfect products for her fans, and she was a great success."
"We've got the exclusive details of Carol Kardashian's jealousy that Katie is her mother's new golden boy!"
"Building an empire of cosmetics before the age of 20 is an impressive feat. Kelly Jenna (Kylie Jenner) has done that because her lipstick brand has sold $420 million worth of products in just a year and a half."
"On August 9, our sister magazine, women's wear daily, published the news on the cover, along with a cover photo of Kentucky and her proud 61 year old mother, Chris Jenner."
"That makes Khloe Kardashian, 33, say," we're dead to her now, "referring to her other siblings."
"Khloe was joking when she said this, but there must be some truth in her feelings behind it."
"Girls have been fighting for their mothers' attention," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She has only so many things to do, and there are a lot of times when Chris does play favorite, or at least it seems to be such Khloe," our insider continued
"It's a bit of a competition for this great American jeans founder, whose sister turned 20 on August 10 and is on the verge of becoming a billionaire!"



Number  688
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Daily Mail has updated their original story to reflect this.”
“Ben was also spotted getting a suite at the Beverly Hills hotel with a “hot blonde.” I suspect there’s more than just one.”
“...had a slave owning ancestor...”
“That’s what came to mind when I saw these exclusive Daily Mail photos (we don’t have access to them, you can see them on the Daily Mail) of Affleck out with a “mystery blonde.” The two went out to lunch, for sushi, and to a bookstore.”
“The woman is grabbing his arm like she wants to indicate that they’re together and is looking at Ben for validation.”
“He’s trying to look away and frown but he’s grinning slightly, like he’s trying to frown, but is happy to be caught out with her.”
“In other photos he just looks defeated, like he knows he was busted and there’s no way out of this one.”
“So is this a business thing and are they just playing up for the cameras?”
“I would say that the woman could be an industry-type person, like a producer, or she might be staff.”
“She’s wearing jeans and he’s in corduroys, which isn’t particularly business-y, but people keep it casual in LA.”


"The daily mail has updated their original report to reflect that."
Ben was also found booking a suite with a "sexy blonde" at Beverly Hills Hotel. I suspect more than one
“… There is an ancestor of slaves... "
"I thought of that when I saw the exclusive photos of Alfred dating a 'mystery blonde' in the daily mail (we don't have them, you can see them in the daily mail). They went out for lunch, sushi and a bookstore
"The woman grabbed his arm as if to show they were together and was looking at Ben for confirmation."
"He tries to look away and frown, but he smiles a little, just as he tries to frown, but is glad to be found out by her."
"In other photos, he just looks like a failure, as if he knows he's been caught, and this photo has no way out."
"So, is it a business thing, is it just for the camera?"
"What I want to say is that this woman may be an industry type person, such as a producer, or she may be an employee."
"She's wearing jeans, he's wearing corduroy, it's not particularly business, but in Los Angeles people stay casual."



Number  689
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple has reportedly been spotted house hunting near New York's Central Park and the Brentwood area of Los Angeles where he and Garner shared a home.”
“But the magazine has pointed out that has been seen wearing a diamond ring on her right hand and this could be an engagement ring.”
“This comes after his rep denied to DailyMail.com that he was engaged to Lindsay Shookus.”
“On Wednesday Life & Style claimed the couple, who have been dating for six months, are making plans to walk down the aisle.”
“'He's fallen hard,' an insider told the publication.”
“'It's no surprise that they're now taking their relationship to the next level.'”
“Scroll down for video New York state of mind Ben Affleck arrived into the Big Apple on Saturday Not Lindsay The Justice League actor was spotted with an unidentified woman at the airport but it is believed he is in town to see his rumored fiance Shookus a TV producer...”
“...for Saturday Night Live has yet to be seen with an engagement ring on her wedding finger...”
“Even though he was accompanied by an unidentified woman, he is more than likely in town to see his lady love, 37, who lives in the metropolitan city.”
“He knows Lindsay is "the one," and the feeling is mutual.'”


"It's reported that the couple were found looking for a house near New York's Central Park and Los Angeles' Brentwood area, where he and Ghana live together."
"But the magazine pointed out that she was seen with a diamond ring on her right hand, which could be an engagement ring."
"It's after his representative denied that he was engaged to Lindsay schokus in the daily mail."
"The couple, who have been dating for six months, are planning to get married," life & style magazine said on Wednesday
"He had a terrible fall," an insider told the magazine
"It's no surprise that they're taking the relationship to a new level now."
"Rolling down the state of mind video of New York State Ben Affleck arriving at big apple on Saturday, not Lindsay Justice League actor was found at the airport with an unidentified woman, but it is believed that he was in town to see his fiance shaukus, a TV producer..."
“… I haven't seen her with an engagement ring on her finger when she got married on live broadcast on Saturday night. "
"Although he is accompanied by an unidentified woman, he is likely to meet his 37 year old lover in the city, who lives in metropolis."
"He knew Lindsay was the only one, and the feeling was mutual."



Number  690
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
““Since then he’s been bombarding her with calls and flowers.”
“The emotional track makes it very clear that he’s missing his ex big time.”
“So, is he going hard to get her back?”
“Here’s what we know!”
“Katy Perry, 32, and John Mayer, 39, had a very intense — and tumultuous — relationship.”
“They dated on and off from August 2012 until they finally split for good in 2015.”
“Katy moved on to Orlando Bloom, 40, and it seemed like John was history.”
“But a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that John has never given up on winning her back.”
““John was practically jumping for joy when he found out about her breakup with Orlando,” says our source.”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Since then, he's been bombing her with phones and flowers."
"The emotional trajectory is very clear that he missed his pre era."
"Is it hard for him to get her back, then?"
"We know that!"
"The relationship between Katie Perry, 32, and John Meyer, 39, is very tense and chaotic."
"They dated intermittently from August 2012 until they finally broke up in 2015."
"Katie moved to Orlando Bloom, 40, and John seems to be history."
But it is reported that John never gave up to win her back
"John was ecstatic when he found out that she had broken up with Orlando," our source said



Number  691
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I remained silent in an attempt to protect my family from further embarrassment and to restore a small degree of the privacy they have lost.”
“In April of 2018 the disgraced anchor made a statement to the Washington Post in which he said, "I have made no public comments on the many false stories from anonymous or biased sources that have been reported about me over these past several months...”
““Matt and Shamin have known each other for many years, as she spends a lot of time in the Hamptons, as does he," a source close to Lauer told Page Six.”
“Not long after the divorce was finalized, Lauer reportedly began dating marketing and public relations executive Shamin Abas.”
“A source reportedly told the publication that the former couple, who have three children together, were on good terms.”
“The publication stated at the time that Lauer would pay Roque up to $20 million in a divorce and that she retained the ownership of a horse farm that they jointly owned in the Hamptons.”
“The couple had been separated for almost two years.”
“James Devaney Getty ImagesAccording to reports from Page Six, Lauer and Rocque filed for an uncontested divorce in July of 2019, which was finalized by a Suffolk County Supreme Court judge that September.”
“Matt Lauer at a basketball game with his children Jack, Romy, and Thijs at Madison Square Garden in January 2016.”
“Laying Low After 'Today'After his firing from the Today show in November 2017, Lauer reportedly spent his days holed up in his now-for sale Hamptons house, where he "focused on family."”


"I kept silent, trying to protect my family from further embarrassment and restore a small part of their lost privacy."
"In April 2018, the discredited anchor issued a statement to the Washington Post, in which he said," in the past few months, anonymous or biased sources have reported many false reports about me, and I have not made any public comments... "
"Matt and shaming have known each other for many years because she and he have spent a lot of time in Hampton," a source close to Raul told page 6
It is reported that shortly after the divorce, Raul began dating marketing and public relations director shamin Abbas
"According to reports, a source told the media that the former couple had three children and had a good relationship."
"It was said in the publication at the time that Raul would pay rock up to $20 million in divorce fees and she retained the ownership of a racecourse they jointly owned in Hampton."
"The couple have been separated for nearly two years."
"James devanni Getty photo according to the report on page 6, Raul and Locke filed a divorce without objection in July 2019, which was finally determined by the Supreme Court judge of Suffolk County in September of the same year."
"In January 2016, Matt Raul and his children, Jack, ROMMY and tis, played basketball in Madison Square Garden."
"In November 2017, Raul was fired from the" Today Show ". He kept a low profile after the" Today Show ". According to reports, Raul hid in his Hampton villa for sale all day," focusing on family. "



**Something goes wrong**
“They have one child together, a four-year-old son named Jack.”
“Above Chris and Anna are seen at the actor's Hollywood Walk Of Fame ceremony in April'I would just be the counselor between them and go, "What really is the issue here?"'”
“But according to one friend of the couple Anna Faris and Chris Pratt are 'still living' together.”
“Millionaire Matchmaker Patti Stanger, 56, dished to Entertainment Tonight Thursday, revealing she thinks there is 'still hope' for the pair because the parents-of-one are 'still living in the [same] house.'”
“Still sharing something!”
“Though Anna Faris and Chris Pratt announced their split on Sunday friend Patti Stanger told ET that the duo are still living together The WeTV starlet had tons of feelings about the eight years married couple telling ET this is really hard because I m close to them adding that...”
“The day it happened I actually texted them...”
“The dating professional wasn't hiding her opinion, explaining 'I want them to get back together' and that she'd be more than willing to counsel the pair.”
“'Let's pray it turns around,' she said.”
“'I want them to get back together.”


They have a child, a four-year-old son named Jack
Image above: Chris and Anna at the Hollywood Walk of fame awards in April, I just want to be a consultant between them, and then ask, "what's the problem?"
"But according to a friend of the couple, Anna Faris and Chris Platt are still" living "together."
"Patti stanger, a 56 year old Millionaire Matchmaker who attended tonight's entertainment on Thursday, said she thought the couple" still have hope "because one of their parents" still lives in the same house. "
"What are you sharing?"
"Although Anna Faris and Chris Platt announced their breakup on Sunday, her friend Patty stanger told et that they are still living together. The little star of wetv has a lot of feelings for the couple who have been married for eight years. She told et that it's really hard because I'm very close to them, and added that..."
"I really texted them the day it happened..."
"The Dating Expert didn't hide her point of view. She explained," I hope they get back together. "She was very willing to give advice to them."
"Let's pray it gets better," she said
"I want them back together."



Number  693
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The way things are going, who knows if there will be a third season?” the Closer source said.”
“After quickly becoming a favorite of both critics and TV viewers, and winning a slew of prestigious awards, HBO announced in December that it would air a second season of the drama, slated to premiere sometime in 2019.”
“There’s a feud brewing behind-the-scenes on the Season 2 set of the HBO series, Big Little Lies, and it’s between two much-adored actresses.”
“An insider told Closer Weekly that original series star Nicole Kidman and show newcomer Meryl Streep are just not getting along, and it is affecting everyone working on the project.”
“Even though the series leads, Kidman, Reese Witherspoon, Shailene Woodley, Zoë Kravitz, and Laura Dern, have consistently promoted female power throughout the promotion of the series and awards season, it seems as if jealousy may still be rearing its ugly head.”
““Nicole feels she’s the star of the show and is threatened by Meryl,” the source revealed to Closer.”
““Meryl’s picked up on it and the two have really gotten into it….”
“[They had] an epic falling-out.”Kidman, 50, won multiple awards for her portrayal of Big Little Lies‘ Celeste Wright, including an Emmy, a Golden Globe, and a Screen Actors Guild award.”
“She has only one Oscar though, which was for her role in The Hours.”
“Meanwhile, 58-year-old Streep is highly revered in Hollywood and has been nominated for an Oscar an outstanding 21 times, with three total wins.”


"Now, who knows if there will be a third season? "A more recent source said
"After quickly becoming a favorite of critics and TV viewers and winning a series of prestigious awards, HBO announced in December that it would broadcast the second season of the play, which is scheduled to premiere sometime in 2019."
"Behind the scenes of the second season of HBO series, there is a grudge, big and small lies, which is between two adored actresses."
"An insider told closer weekly that the original series Star Nicole Kidman and rookie Meryl Streep didn't get along well, which affected everyone involved in the project."
"Although Kidman, Reese Witherspoon, Shireen Woodley, Zoe Kravitz and Laura Dean have been promoting women's rights throughout the series and the awards season, jealousy seems to be on the rise."
"Nicole feels like the star of the show, threatened by Meryl," the source told closer
"Meryl found out about it, and they really got into it..."
Kidman, 50, has won many awards for her role as Celeste Wright in the big lie, including an Emmy, a golden globe and a Screen Actors Guild Award
"But she has only one Oscar, and that's her role in the hours."
Meanwhile, 58 year old Streep is highly respected in Hollywood. He has been nominated for 21 Oscars and won three awards



Number  694
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments section!”
“The insider adds, she's “totally on board with Jay and had to let Solange down gently.”Do you think the duo should allow Solange inside Beyonce's delivery room?”
“And it comes as no surprise that Bey is siding with her man.”
“Article continues below advertisement“He’s told Beyonce these are his babies too and he wants to be there when they’re born, but he doesn’t want Solange ruining his big moment with some mean wisecrack at his expense," the source continues.”
“The snitch spills, “Jay and Solange still have a tense relationship and he just doesn’t like being in the same room as her."”
“Article continues below advertisement“It’s her or me!” Jay told Bey as a coldhearted ultimatum.”
“According to an insider, Solange “begged Beyonce to let her be her birth partner.” The pregnant singer was open to the idea of letting her sis witness the birth, but the proud papa is putting his foot down.”
“Sources tell RadarOnline.com that the rapper is refusing to allow his sister-in-law inside Beyonce's delivery room when she gives birth to their twin babies later this year.”
“Source: AKM-GSIEven though it's been three years since their public brawl, things are still heated between Jay-Z and Solange Knowles.”


"Please tell us what you think in the comments section!"
The person added that she "totally agreed with Jay and had to let Solange leave gently." Do you think they should allow Solange into Beyonce's delivery room? "
"It's not surprising that Bei is on her man's side."
"The article continues the following ad," he told Beyonce, which is also his child, that he wants to be there when they are born, but he doesn't want Solange to ruin his great moment with some despicable think tank at his expense, "the source continued
"The informant said:" Jay's relationship with Solange is still tense. He just doesn't like to be in the same room with her
The following article continues with the ad "it's her or me! "Jay told Bei it was a cold ultimatum."
According to a person familiar with the matter, Solange "begged Beyonce to let her be her biological partner." The pregnant singer is open to the idea of her sister witnessing the birth of her baby, but the proud father is determined to go his own way
"The source told us RadarOnline.com The website "rapper refused to let his sister-in-law into Beyonce's delivery room when she gave birth to their twins later this year."
"Source: AKM gsieven although they have been fighting openly for three years, things between Jay-Z and Solange Knowles are still fierce."



Number  695
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, Jelena then ended things in early March 2018.”
““He was disgusted,” the source admits.”
“And, Bieber isn’t cool with Sel’s ex bringing up her near death experience.”
“Justin Bieber, 24, isn’t too fond of “Call Me By Your Name,” — The Weeknd‘s new track which seems to suggest that he [The Weeknd] almost donated his own kidney to Selena Gomez, 25, when she need one the most.”
““Justin thinks The Weeknd’s new song is petty, weak and makes him look bitter,” a source close to Justin tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY, adding that Justin is the one who has “real love” for Selena.”
““Whether they are together or not, in the past, present or in the future, Justin will always be there for Selena and he would gladly hand over one of his kidneys to save her life,” the source adds.”
“Additionally, “Justin feels like it would be an honor to help Selena with something major like that,” the insider says.”
“Therefore, when Justin caught wind of The Weeknd’s new track, he thought it was distasteful that Abel, 28, had the nerve to hash up Selena’s traumatic experience.”
“Although he’s not with Selena, for now, we hear JB will always has her back, and this time, The Weeknd didn’t.”
“She then got back together with Bieber following the breakup.”


"However, Jenna then ended things in early March 2018."
"He was disgusted," the source admitted
"What's more, Bieber doesn't like Searle's ex-wife to mention her near death experience."
Justin Bieber, 24, doesn't like "call me your name" - the new song of "weekend" seems to suggest that he almost donated his kidney to Serena Gomez, 25, who needs it most
A source close to Justin told reporters: "Justin thinks the new song of the weekend is very stingy and weak, which makes him look very bitter." He also said that Justin is the one who really loves Serena. "
"Whether they are together or not, in the past, now or in the future, Justin will always be there, and Serena and he will be happy to hand over one of his kidneys to save her life," the source added
"In addition, Justin feels it's an honor to help Serena with such a big task," the person said
"So when Justin heard about this week's new song, he thought it was disgusting that Abel, 28, had the courage to make a mess of Selena's painful experience."
"He wasn't with Serena, but now we hear that JB will keep her coming back, and this time, not at the weekend."
"After breaking up, she got back together with Bieber."



Number  696
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, how many children do you think Angie will adopt and from which countries?”
“We can’t wait for Angie’s next chapter to begin!”
“As if six children wasn’t enough of a handful, Angelina Jolie is excited to expand her family once the Brad Pitt divorce is behind her.”
“The actress wants to adopt more kids from all around the world, and we’ve got the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“Angelina Jolie, 41, has a heart of gold!”
“Smack in the middle of a messy Brad Pitt, 53, divorce, the humanitarian is still thinking of sweet ways she can make the world a better place — specifically for a few lucky children!”
““Angelina is going to continue to adopt kids in the future,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She feels that it certainly makes a difference.”
“With her current children getting older and the resources she has to accommodate that, it will only be a matter of time before she expands her brood.” Where will she go next?”
“The First They Killed My Father director has adopted children all over the world, including Cambodia, Ethiopia, and Vietnam.”


"Holly worms, how many children do you think Angie will adopt? What country are they from? "
"We can't wait for Angie's next chapter to start!"
"It seems that six children is not enough. Once Brad Pitt divorces, Angelina Jolie is happy to expand her family."
"The actress wants to adopt more children from all over the world. We have exclusive details!"
"Angelina Jolie, 41, has a heart of gold!"
Brad Pitt, 53, is divorcing, and humanists are still trying to make the world a better place - especially for a few lucky children! "
"Angelina will continue to adopt children in the future," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She thought it would be different."
"As her children are getting bigger and bigger, she has enough resources to adapt to these, and it's only a matter of time before she expands her parenting scale," she said
"The director who killed my father first adopted children all over the world, including Cambodia, Ethiopia and Vietnam."



Number  697
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Victor Boyko/Getty Images]”
“Is his mental breakdown to blame?”
“Would you be surprised by the news that Kanye West is lazy when it comes to hitting the gym?”
“Considering the supposed fact that Kanye is easily distracted once he gets to the gym, it would seem to fans that the rap icon has a long way to go before he can say he has fully recovered from his mental breakdown, which left him hospitalized for eight days.”
“It’s being said that in the hopes of clearing his mind from his negative thoughts, West has been working on recording new music for his forthcoming album, Complex reveals, but there’s no rush, as he’s mainly focused on getting his mind on the right path.”
“Of course, the rumor concerning Kanye West’s laziness at the gym comes just weeks after it was claimed that the aging rapper is still recovering from his infamous meltdown in November.”
“The source adds that despite all the efforts the trainer makes to push West in the right direction, to get the fit body he wants, the father of three just doesn’t seem to be interested.”
““Harley shows Kanye how to do a certain exercise on a machine, Kanye nods in agreement and then they walk over to another machine and do the same thing,” the insider explains.”
“And though he has the drive and dedication to get in the best shape possible, upon arriving at the facility, he ends up doing little to nothing, the source alleges.”
“The outlet quotes its source as saying that the fitness studio in Woodland Hills has become one of Kanye West’s favorites.”


"[Victor Boyko / Getty pictures]
"Is his mental breakdown the culprit?"
"Would you be surprised to hear that Kanye West is lazy in fitness?"
"Considering the hypothetical fact that Kanye is easily distracted when he arrives at the gym, the rap idol has a long way to go in the eyes of fans before he can say that he has fully recovered from the mental breakdown, which has made him hospitalized for eight days."
"It is said that in order to eliminate the negative thoughts in his mind, West has been recording new music for his upcoming album complex revelation, but he is not in a hurry, because he mainly focuses on putting his thoughts on the right path."
"Of course, the rumor about Kanye West slouching in the gym came a few weeks ago when it was claimed that the elderly rapper was still recovering from the infamous collapse last November."
"The source added that although the trainer made every effort to move in the right direction to get the health he wanted, the father of three didn't seem interested."
"Harley showed Kanye how to do an exercise on one machine, Kanye nodded in agreement, and then they went to another machine to do the same thing," the person explained
"Despite his motivation and dedication to be in the best possible condition, he did almost nothing when he arrived at the facility, the source claimed."
"Woodland Hill fitness studio has become one of kenye West's favorites," the media quoted sources as saying



Number  698
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And we are in the process of determining that.””
“Kim [Kardashian] did it a few seasons ago.”The Dance Moms star added that Jenner should partner up with Val Chmerkovskiy, should she choose to do the show in the future.”
“The I Am Cait star, 68, has no plans to join season 26 of the show, despite reports saying otherwise.”
““The current reports are not true,” a rep for the reality star tells Us Weekly of the rumors.”
“Although fans have been speculating for years that Jenner will join ABC’s dancing competition series, it won’t be happening in the near future.”
“Cheryl Burke, a former pro on the show, previously expressed interest in the Secrets of My Life author joining the cast.”
““I think Caitlyn would be amazing on DWTS,” Burke, 33, told Entertainment Tonight in June 2015.”
““The whole family has basically done it.”
“I danced with Rob [Kardashian].”
“If she signed onto the series, Jenner would join a long list of Olympians who’ve competed for the highly-coveted Mirrorball trophy, including Apolo Ohno, Simone Biles, Laurie Hernandez, Kristi Yamaguchi, Shawn Johnson, Charlie White, Evan Lysacek, Meryl Davis, Lolo Jones, Nastia Liukin and more!”


"We're working on that."
"Kim [Kardashian] did it a few seasons ago." The dance mom star added that Jenna should partner with Val chimmerkovsky if she chooses to do the show in the future
"The 68 year old" I'm Katie "star has no plans to join season 26, despite reports that it's not."
"The current report is not true," a representative of a reality TV star told us about the weekly rumors
"Although fans have been speculating for years that Jenna will join ABC's dance competition series, it won't happen in the near future."
"Cheryl Burke, a former professional actress in the show, has previously expressed interest in the author of the secret of my life joining the cast."
"I think Caitlin will be great on DWT," Burke, 33, told entertainment tonight in June 2015
"The whole family basically did it."
"I dance with rob."
"If she signs up for this series, Jenna will join a long list of Olympians who have competed for the highly coveted mirror ball trophy, including Apollo field, Simone beers, Laurie Hernandez, Christie Yamaguchi, Sean Johnson, Charlie white, Evan lissacker, Meryl Davis, Lolo Jones, Nastia Liukin and more!"



Number  699
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow @htshowbiz for more.”
“8 2018”
“The source added The aim is to wrap the movie on a good note and set the stage for later promotion Directed by Gary Ross from a script written by Ross and co writer Olivia Milch Ocean s Eight is set to hit theatres in the United States on June...”
“They want to make sure the cast and crew have someone to vent any frustrations to, so nothing gets taken out on another actor,” a source said.”
““There have been a few arguments, and certain people haven’t gotten on as well as they’d hoped,” a source claims.”
“Magazine, the producers have a counsellor on call to make sure the women get along, reports aceshowbiz.com.”
“According to OK!”
“Producers of the film Ocean’s Eight are said to have hired a therapist to prevent any fights between its all-female cast members, which includes Sandra Bullock, Cate Blanchett, Rihanna and Anne Hathaway.”


"Follow @ htshowbiz for more information."
“8 2018”
"The source added that the purpose of the film is to better package the film and prepare for the late publicity of director Gary Ross, whose script is directed by Ross and co-author Olivia milch ocean and will be released in the United States in June..."
"They want to make sure that there are people in the cast and the crew who are venting their discontent so that no one is taking it out on other actors," a source said
"There's some debate, some people don't get along as well as they want them to," a source said
"Magazine, producer has a consultant on call to make sure women get along, report aceshowbiz.com Website. "
"Press OK!"
"It is said that the producer of the movie ocean 8 has hired a therapist to prevent any quarrels among all the actresses, including Sandra Bullock, Kate Blanchett, Rihanna and Anne Hathaway."



Number  700
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sandy feels incredibly fortunate and blessed that she is sharing the parenting journey with Bryan.” Here’s hoping they tie the knot sooner rather than later!”
“Prior to Bryan, Sandra was married to Jesse James from 2005 until their messy divorce in 2010 after he admitted to a plethora of cheating scandals.”
“According to a new report, even though the A-list actress and her boyfriend, Bryan Randall, are doing perfectly, they aren’t in a rush to get engaged.”
““Sandy is a bit hesitant about getting married because of the legalities,” a pal of hers told Us Weekly, adding that Bryan has not yet adopted her two kids, Louis, 7, and Laila, 5.”
““It gets complicated.”Apparently, Sandra turned to her good friend Jennifer Aniston for advice, who is clearly a pro at secretive relationships and weddings.”
“The Blind Side actress suggested she and Bryan would hold a private, small ceremony to which Jen agreed since she thinks they’re basically already husband and wife.”
““Jen was saying, ‘What’s the difference?”
“He’s already living here, he’s already your old man,'” a source told the news outlet.”
““She went through a great deal of heartbreak after Jesse,” says the friend.”
““He is 100 percent there for Louis and Laila and wonderful with them in every way.”


"Sandy feels very lucky and lucky. She's sharing a parenting trip with Brian." I hope they get married soon
"Before Brian, Sandra married Jesse James from 2005 until their chaotic divorce in 2010, because he admitted too many fraud scandals."
"According to a new report, although the A-rated actress and her boyfriend Bryan Randall perform perfectly, they are not in a hurry to get engaged."
"Sandy is a little hesitant to get married because of the law," one of her friends told us weekly, adding that Brian has yet to adopt her two children, Louis, 7, and Lyra, 5
Apparently, Sandra sought advice from her good friend, Jennifer Aniston, who is clearly an expert on secret relationships and weddings
"The blind actress suggested that she and Brian have a small private ceremony, and Jennifer agreed because she thought they were basically married."
"Jane was saying," what's the difference? "
"He already lives here, he's your old man," a source told the news media
"After Jesse, she went through a lot of sad things," the friend said
"He's 100 percent for Louis and Lyra, and he gets on well with them in all aspects."



Number  701
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The rep says Brussaux had sex with another big rapper at the same time as Drake, adding the other rapper has all but acknowledged it's his kid.”
“F*** you.”
“Drake however, is calling BS.”
“Sophie Brussaux has already hired a big NYC lawyer, Raoul Felder, to get the paternity/child support ball rolling.”
“She claims she's 3 1/2 months pregnant and pins down conception to either January 20 or 21.”
“The pic was taken January 24 at a Japanese restaurant in Amsterdam.”
“The woman, a retired porn star, has what she says are text messages between her and Drake, which purport to say the following:Drake: I want you to have an abortion.”
“Brussaux: I can't kill my baby simply to indulge you sorry.”
“Drake: Indulge me?”
“Brussaux: What?”


"The representative said that brusoe and Drake had sex with another big rapper at the same time, and the other rapper almost admitted to being his child."
"For you."
"But Drake is talking nonsense."
Sophie brusoe has hired Raoul feld, a New York City barrister, to prepare for parenthood / child custody
"She claimed that she was pregnant for three and a half months and set the date for her pregnancy on January 20 or 21."
"This picture was taken in a Japanese restaurant in Amsterdam on January 24."
The woman, a retired porn star, said she had a text message with Drake saying, "Drake: I want you to have an abortion."
"Brusoe: I can't kill my child just to indulge you. I'm sorry."
Drake: indulge me? "
"Brusoe: what?"



Number  702
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It is,” said the insider, “a complicated relationship.””
“According to the insider, the pair are waiting for Presley and Kaia to fully leave the nest before making any decisions about the fate of their marriage.”
““It takes a little bit of work, but if you’re friends first, it makes [it] so much easier,” Rande, a nightlife and spirits entrepreneur, has said of his relationship with his supermodel wife of 20 years.”
““We both know what our priorities are, and we work really hard.”Cindy and Rande are facing their toughest test yet.”
“The parents of Presley, 19, and Kaia, 16, are on the rocks after two decades as husband and wife, an insider recently told In Touch in the magazine’s latest issue, on newsstands now.”
““There has been constant drama in their marriage for years,” the insider said of Cindy, 52, and Rande, 56, who have mostly clashed over cheating rumors.”
“Now, with their kids getting older and establishing modeling careers of their own, the pair are drifting apart.”
““Put it this way: They don’t keep tabs on each other anymore.”
“Sometimes it seems like they’re living separate lives,” the source shared.”
“Cindy has been known to obsess over Rande’s ladies’ man reputation.”


"It's a complex relationship," the person familiar with the matter said
"According to people familiar with the matter, they are waiting for Presley and Kaya to leave the nest completely before making any decision on the fate of their marriage."
"It takes a little bit of work, but if you're friends first, it makes it a lot easier," Rand, a nightlife and spiritual entrepreneur, said of his relationship with his supermodel wife of 20 years
"We all know what our priorities are and we work very hard." Cindy and Rand are facing the toughest test yet
"The parents of Presley, 19, and Kaya, 16, are both in trouble after 20 years as husband and wife," a person familiar with the matter said recently in the latest issue of contact magazine
"Their marriage has been dramatic for years," the person said of Cindy, 52, and Rand, 56, who mostly clashed over deceptive rumors
"Now, as the children grow up and set up their own modeling career, they are gradually estranged."
"Let's put it this way: they don't watch each other anymore."
"Sometimes they seem to live separately," the source said
"Cindy has been haunted by Rand's reputation as a woman and man."



Number  703
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
““Setting down roots is something she’s thought long and hard about.”
“Gossip Cop reports that an insider close to Swift confirmed she is not house-searching in England at all—especially as she's about to set off on her Reputation world tour this spring.”
“Original, 4/5, 5:35 p.m.: Taylor Swift, the pop star and very secretive girlfriend of British actor Joe Alwyn, is ready to commit!”
“To England full-time, that is.”
“The Sun's Dan Wootton—the guy who broke the news the two were secretly dating last May—reports that Swift is looking for a North London house to make her home base.”
“Alwyn and his family live in North London's Crouch End; Swift would like to be near that and the countryside near Soho Farmhouse in Oxfordshire, outside of the city.”
“(Soho Farmhouse, by the way, is where Meghan Markle had her swanky bridal shower.)”
““Taylor loves the UK and how she can live a relatively normal life without being disturbed," the source said.”
“The Sun previously reported that Swift went undetected in disguises around the city.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Taking root is something she has been thinking about for a long time."
"Gossip police reported that an insider close to swift confirmed that she was not looking for a house in the UK at all, especially when she was about to start her world tour this spring."
"Original, 4:5 p.m., 5:35 p.m.: Taylor Swift, pop star, secret girlfriend of British actor Joe Alvin, ready!"
"It was a full-time trip to England."
Dan Wootton of the Sun reported last May that Swift was looking for a house in North London as her base
"Alvin and his family live in crouch, north of London; swift wants to be close to the countryside there and near SOHO farmhouse in Oxfordshire, outside the city."
(by the way, SOHO farmhouse is the place for Megan markel's luxurious wedding.)
"Taylor loves Britain and how she can lead a relatively normal life without being disturbed," the source said
The sun had previously reported that swift had absconded in disguise in the city without being found



Number  704
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“There’s no denying they’d make one hell of a couple!”
“Is Nicki that woman?”
“The “We Found Love” singer is reportedly “hurt” by the fact that the “Fake Love” rapper’s anaconda seems to be pointing in Nicki Minaj‘s direction these days.”
“We guess RiRi still has feelings for her ex and longtime friend after all.”
“MORE: Chris Brown Was Preparing to Propose to Rihanna Before Domestic Violence Arrest“Things didn’t end well when she and Drake broke up last year,” a source told Hollywood Life.”
““She still has strong feelings over it.”
“Seeing him with Nicki hurts, but she always felt like he was obsessed with her.”
“Their connection comes as no surprise to Rihanna Photo Credit Getty Images The Canadian has never tried to hide the fact that his feelings for Nicki go past just friends Then again Drake did make it very clear to the entire world how he views Rihanna during his 2016 VMAs...”
“...speech...”
“MORE: Jennifer Lopez Dumped Drake Because He Was Sleeping With Another Woman“She’s someone I’ve been in love with since I was 22 years old,” Drake admitted at the awards show.”


"There's no denying that they'll make a great couple!"
"Is Nicky the woman?"
"It's reported that the singer" we found love "is" hurt "because the python of the" fake love "rapper seems to be pointing in the direction of Niki Minagi recently."
"We guess Riley still has feelings for her ex girlfriend and old friends."
"More: Chris Brown is going to propose to Rihanna before he is arrested for domestic violence. When she broke up with Drake last year, things didn't end well, "a source told Hollywood life
"She still has strong feelings about it."
"It's sad to see him with Nicky, but she always thinks he's fascinated by her."
"The connection between them is not surprising to Rihanna. Canadians have never tried to cover up the fact that his feelings for Nikki are only between friends. Then Drake once again showed the world how he thought of Rihanna in the 2016 VMA..."
“… "Speech..."
"More: Jennifer Lopez dumped Drake because he had sex with another woman." "She's the one I've loved since I was 22," Drake admitted at the awards ceremony



**Something goes wrong**
“[Image Credit: Jason Merritt/Getty Images]”
“Multiple reports confirmed that Spears decided to marry her childhood friend on a whim.”
“According to Life & Style magazine, the 33-year-old singer is doing just that with her boyfriend of eight months, Charlie Ebersol.”
“An inside source allegedly opened up to the magazine about Britney Spears’ relationship status and wedding plans.”
““They talk about getting married all the time.”
“Britney has never been happier than she is now with Charlie!”
“[Britney] wants something simple but memorable, nothing too over-the-top.”The insider further claimed that Britney Spears and Charlie Ebersol were “mulling another quickie Las Vegas wedding,” a decision that the “Pieces of Me” singer made back in 2004 when she married Jason Alexander.”
“However, Gossip Cop reported on Thursday that the rumored reports about Britney Spears’ secret wedding are not true.”
““Don’t go buying a gift just yet.”
“There is NO wedding in the works.”Britney Spears NOT “Planning Wedding” To Charlie Ebersol, Despite Report (Exclusive) http://t.co/fDznztSgmX — Gossip Cop (@GossipCop) June 4, 2015As mentioned above, Britney Spears married Jason Alexander in January 2004 at the Little White Wedding Chapel located in Las Vegas, Nevada.”


"[image source: Jason Merritt / Getty Images]"
"Multiple reports confirm that spears decided to marry his childhood friends on a whim."
The 33 year old singer and her eight month old boyfriend, Charlie ebersoll, did just that, according to lifestyle magazine
"It is said that an insider disclosed Britney Spears' love situation and wedding plans to the magazine."
"They've been talking about getting married."
"Britney has never been as happy with Charlie as she is now!"
"(Britney Spears) want something simple but unforgettable. Don't exaggerate." Britney Spears and Charlie ebersoll are "thinking about another quick Las Vegas wedding," according to people familiar with the matter, after the "my fragment" singer married Jason Alexander in 2004
"However, gossip police reported on Thursday that rumors about Britney Spears' secret wedding were not true."
"Don't buy presents for the time being."
Britney Spears didn't "plan a wedding" with Charlie ebersoll, though (exclusive) http://t.co/fDznztSgmX- Gossip police (@ gossip) June 4, 2015 as mentioned above, Britney Spears married Jason Alexander at little white church in Las Vegas, Nevada in January 2004



Number  706
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...attention of The Anschutz Foundation that certain organizations either the Foundation or I have funded have been supporting such causes we have immediately ceased all contributions to such groups...”
“In a statement to The Times on Thursday, Anschutz said he was unaware of the anti-LGBTQ work done by any of the organizations he had supported and that he had ceased all contributions after learning.”
“(Katie Falkenberg / Los Angeles Times)Following news this week that the Coachella Valley Music and Arts Festival had booked Radiohead, Kendrick Lamar and Beyoncé to lead its 2017 lineup, the owner of the company that oversees the festival’s organizers has come under fire for his political interests.”
“According to a widely picked up report in Uproxx Philip F Anschutz the owner of AEG whose AEG Live division is the world s second largest presenter of live music sports and entertainment after Live Nation has donated to a number of anti LGBTQ groups such as Alliance Defending Freedom...”
“National Christian Foundation and Family Research Council...”
“A number of these organizations have been listed as “extremist groups” by the Southern Poverty Law Center.”
“Because AEG Live oversees Coachella promoter Goldenvoice, people have taken to social media to question if anyone should drop hundreds of dollars for the destination festival out of fear that their money would fund anti-gay groups.”
“General admission passes to Coachella sold out in an hour on Wednesday.”
““Recent claims published in the media that I am anti-LGBTQ are nothing more than fake news – it is all garbage.”
“Anschutz said he and his foundation contribute to numerous organizations that pursue a wide range of causes Neither I nor the Foundation fund any organization with the purpose or expectation that it would finance anti LGBTQ initiatives the statement continued and when it has come to my attention or the...”


“…… The Anschutz foundation notes that the foundation or some of the organizations I funded have been supporting these undertakings, and we have immediately stopped all donations to these groups... "
"Anschutz said in a statement to the times on Thursday that he was not aware of any anti LGBTQ work done by any organization he supported and that he had stopped all donations after learning of it."
(Katie Falkenberg / Los Angeles Times) this week, the Coachella Valley Music and Arts Festival is booking radio head, Kendrick Lamar and Beyonc é as the leaders of the 2017 Festival, and the boss of the company that oversees the festival's organizers has come under fire for its political interests
"According to a widely watched report in the global times, AEG's AEG live division is the second largest live music, sports and entertainment presenter in the world, second only to live nation. The company has donated money to anti LGBTQ organizations such as alliance defending freedom..."
"National Christian foundation and Family Research Council..."
"Some of these organizations are classified as' extreme organizations' by the Southern Poverty Law Center."
"As AEG live regulates goldenvoice, Coachella's founder, people have questioned through social media whether anyone should invest hundreds of dollars in festivals in their destination because they are worried that their money will fund anti gay groups."
"Regular tickets for cochella are sold out in an hour on Wednesday."
"The recent remarks in the media about my opposition to LGBTQ are just false news and rubbish."
"Anschutz said that he and his foundation have provided a wide range of reasons for many organizations. Both I and the foundation have funded any organization with a purpose or expectation. It will fund the anti LGBTQ initiative and declare that it will continue when it draws my attention or..."



Number  707
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Historically Harry has always been ‘tamed’ by his girlfriends, we saw that with Chelsy and Cressida, but I think Meghan’s had a bigger influence on him than any other woman.””
““I think Meghan has had a really positive influence on Harry,” Katie Nicholl, author of Harry Life Loss and Love told Express.co.uk exclusively.”
“However, a royal expert has said no previous romantic interest had ever “tamed” Harry in the way that Meghan has done.”
“It is known Prince Harry had high profile relationships with Chelsy Davy, 32, and Cressida Bonas, 29, before he began dating Meghan in 2016.”
“...previous girlfriends in one particular way...”
“Sign up fornow for the biggest moments from morning TV Meghan Markle 36 will marry Prince Harry 33 in a royal wedding ceremony on May 19 2018 and it seems the royal s wife to be stands out from his...”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"Harry has always been" tamed "by his girlfriend in history. We see that in Chelsea and cresida, but I think Megan has more influence on him than any other woman."
"I think Megan has had a very positive impact on Harry," Katie Nicole, author of Harry's lost life and love, told reporters exclusive to express companies
However, a royal expert said that there was no romance that could "tame" Harry as Megan did before
"It's well known that Prince Harry had a high-profile relationship with 32 year old Chelsea David and 29 year old cresida Bonas before he started dating Megan in 2016."
“… Former girlfriends in a special way... "
"Now sign up for the most important moment of morning TV. Megan markel will marry Prince Harry 33 at the royal wedding on May 19, 2018. It seems that the Royal wife will stand out from him..."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  708
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I really miss it.”Fellow celebs such as Neil Patrick Harris, Michelle Williams, Kirsten Dunst, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Jessica Biel and Christina Ricci also reportedly once lived at the housing facility.”
““When I met you I was still living in the Oakwoods apartment [in Burbank, California] … with Screech — with Dustin Diamond — I loved it.”
““I met you when I literally had first moved here,” Pattinson told Seacrest.”
“The Good Time actor revealed that he lived with Dustin Diamond!”
“Robert Pattinson phoned in to On Air With Ryan Seacrest on Thursday, August 31, and recalled when he first moved to Los Angeles nearly 10 years ago.”
“This is too good.”


According to reports, celebrities such as Neil Patrick Harris, Michelle Williams, Kirsten Dunst, Jennifer Love Hewitt, Jessica Biel and Christina Ricci also lived in the school
"When I met you, I was still living in Oakwood apartment (Burbank, California) With screams - with Dustin Diamond - I love it. "
"I knew you when I first moved here," Pattinson told Seacrest
"The good actor revealed that he lived with Dustin diamond!"
On Thursday, August 31, Robert Pattinson made a radio call to Ryan Seacrest, recalling his first move to Los Angeles nearly 10 years ago
"That's great."



**Something goes wrong**
“WATCH: Amber Rose Flaunts Her Curves in Sexy Sheer Dress Following Split From Val Chmerkovskiy...”
“Rose's post remains on her page with the caption "my muf**kin Bruva," while the rapper has since deleted his (though, to be fair, he did undergo a major social media clean-up in order to put full focus on his new single, "Unforgettable").”
“Earlier this month, Rose and French initiated renewed romance rumors when the two both posted the same sexy pic to Instagram.”
“And according to a snap posted by French, Drake later joined in on the party, too!”
“"Happy Birthday @belly," another post read, which featured MUVA rocking a bright orange dress as she posed with the birthday boy and Basketball Wives star Duffey.”
“...straight ???#UNFORGETTABLE."”
“"???”
“"My bruvaaa @frenchmontana," she captioned it.”
“In one of the videos, the former Dancing With the Stars contestant lays her head on French's chest, flirting with the camera.”
“WATCH: Val Chmerkovskiy Addresses Amber Rose Split for the First TimeOn Saturday, Rose and French both took to Instagram to share highlights from hip-hop artist Belly's birthday bash.”


"Observation: amber rose shows off her curves in a sexy transparent dress after splitting from val chmerkovskiy..."
"Ross's post is still on her website, titled 'my MUF * * kin bruva', and the rapper later deleted his (though, to be fair, he did undergo a major social media clean-up to focus all his energy on his new single, unforgettable)
"Earlier this month, rose and French posted the same sexy photo on instagram, sparking new romantic rumors."
"And according to the snapshot posted by the French, Drake later joined the party!"
"Happy Birthday @ belly," another post said, as she swayed a bright orange skirt and posed with the birthday boy and his basketball wife, dafi
“… Straight??? #Unforgettable. "
“"???”
"My bruvaa @ Montana, France," she wrote with subtitles
In one of the videos, the former "dancing with the stars" puts his head on the French chest and flirts with the camera
"Watch: val chmerkovskiy addressed amber rose for the first time on Saturday, and both rose and French shared the highlights of hip hop artist Bailey's birthday party on instagram."



Number  710
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Including, it would seem, Dakota Johnson, who had a prime seat at Jolie's table while Aniston was on stage, and was caught doing what you would in her place:TwitterSame.”
“But, just like in real life when you run into a (now almost) ex of your ex, it's still a moment that makes everyone   .”
“...whole lot of bullshit and we re all adults here etc...”
“Last night Jennifer Aniston and Angelina Jolie were in the same room at the Golden Globes and the Netflix after party a rare occurrence and a thing that shouldn t be a thing since Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston divorced over 12 years ago the drama surrounding them is a...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"Including Johnson of Dakota, when Aniston was on stage, she had a main seat on Julie's desk and was found doing what you wanted to do with her. Location: twittersame."
"But, just as in real life, when you meet a (now almost) predecessor of your predecessor, it's still an exciting moment for everyone."
“… A lot of crap, we're all adults, and so on... "
"It's a rare thing that Jennifer Aniston and Angelina Jolie were in the same room after the Golden Globes and Netflix party last night. It shouldn't have been a thing since Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston divorced 12 years ago. The drama surrounding them is a..."



Number  711
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The relationship has been fizzling out."”
“The whole thing with Rob saying they are 'kind of engaged' speaks for itself.”
“"They were serious at one point, but not anymore.”
“"He is technically still with FKA twigs, but it doesn't seem like it will last," one source told us.”
“News has learned things might be heating up between Pattinson and Perry as he's already allegedly cooled off from FKA twigs, who he started dating in 2014 and proposed to the following year.”
“Well, E!”
“Fast forward to this weekend when he was spotted getting cozy with good pal Katy Perry during a dinner outing Saturday night, causing lots of fans to question what's really going on.”
“The actor, 31, made headlines late last month after he said he's only "kind of" engaged to FKA twigs during an interview with Howard Stern.”
“Robert Pattinson is raising some questions in the romance department.”


"The relationship has been failing."
"Rob said they were 'a little engaged', and that in itself speaks for itself."
"Once they were serious, but now they are not."
"Technically, he's still using FKA's branches, but it doesn't seem to last," a source told us
"There are sources that the relationship between Pattinson and Perry may be heating up because he is said to have alienated FKA twigs, who started dating in 2014 and proposed the following year."
"All right, e!"
"Fast forward to this weekend, he was found at a dinner party on Saturday night with his good friend Katie Perry, very comfortable, which caused many fans to question
In an interview with Howard Stern at the end of last month, the 31 year old actor said he was just "a little bit" engaged to FKA twigs, making headlines
"Robert Pattinson asked some questions in the romance department."



Number  712
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“On the same track he raps You know white people get money don t spend it Or maybe they get money buy a business I d rather buy 80 gold chains and go ig nant West sees himself as celebrating the economic freedom black Americans were denied for decades and...”
“Photograph: TidalHe also continued his analysis of black America.”
“I don t agree 100 with anyone but myself In response R B singer Frank Ocean emerged from hibernation with a sarcastic screengrab of the time West went off script during a 2005 Hurricane Katrina appeal to say George Bush doesn t care about black people the intimation being that...”
“I don’t agree with everything Trump does.”
“He is my brother.” After an intervention by a presumably somewhat weary Kim Kardashian, West wrote: “My wife just called me and she wanted me to make this clear to everyone.”
“We are both dragon energy.”
“He posted a picture of himself wearing the Trump campaign’s Make America Great Again cap, and tweeted: “You don’t have to agree with Trump but the mob can’t make me not love him.”
“But his recent tweets left no room for doubt.”
“He puzzled many when he posed for photos with Trump in December 2016, making him one of the first celebrities to apparently endorse the new president.”
“He is a free moron.”02:34 From Taylor Swift to Hurricane Katrina: five of Kanye West's memorable outbursts – videoBlack America’s dismay at West has been brewing for some time.”


"On the same track, he rapes. You know, white people have money and don't spend money, or they have money to buy a business. I'd rather buy 80 gold chains and go to Ig South West. He thinks he's celebrating the decades of economic freedom deprived of black Americans, and..."
"Photo: tydal continues to analyze black Americans."
"I don't agree with anyone but myself. In response, Rb singer Frank ocean called for George Bush in Hurricane Katrina in 2005 Bush came out of hibernation when he didn't care about the black people, and used ironic screenshots to describe the time when West was out of manuscript in that appeal, implying that.... "
"I don't agree with what trump has done."
"He's my brother." Intervened by a perhaps tired Kim Kardashian, West wrote: "my wife just called me and she wanted me to tell everyone about it."
"We are all dragon energy."
"He posted a picture of himself wearing the trump campaign's" make America great again "hat and tweeted:" you don't have to agree with trump, but the mob can't make me not love him. "
"But his recent micro blog did not leave any room for doubt."
"He confused many when he took a picture with trump in December 2016, making him one of the first celebrities to show clear support for the new president."
"He's a free idiot." 02:34 from Taylor Swift to Hurricane Katrina: five unforgettable outbreaks of Kanye West - the frustration of black Americans with West has been brewing for some time



Number  713
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stefani is next set to appear live Monday on The Voice.”
“Stefani hasn’t yet addressed her condition publicly, and a rep for the singer did not immediately return request for comment.”
“However, a source tells PEOPLE that although Stefani sought medical attention at the hospital, she wasn’t admitted.”
“RELATED VIDEO: Gwen Stefani on Her Year of ‘Beautiful Memories’ with Blake SheltonAccording to the Las Vegas Review-Journal, manager Irving Azoff told Ruvo that Stefani was admitted to Cedars-Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles on Tuesday, and advised not to fly or sing.”
“Singer Jennifer Hudson replaced her at the event.”
“Instead, attendees watched a video message from Stefani, 47, apologizing for her absence.”
“Larry Ruvo, the president of Keep Memory Alive – which supports the Cleveland Clinic Lou Ruvo Center for Brain Health – announced that Stefani wouldn’t be making it due to a “ruptured eardrum” about an hour into the show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Sources tell PEOPLE that the change of plans wasn’t revealed ahead of the gala at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas.”
“Stefani was meant to perform at the Keep Memory Alive: Power of Love gala in Las VegasGwen Stefani had to bow out of her scheduled headlining performance at the annual Keep Memory Alive: Power of Love Gala after rupturing her eardrum, event organizers told attendees mid-show Thursday evening.”


"Stefani will be on voice next time on Monday."
"Stefani has not publicly stated her condition, and the singer's representative did not immediately respond to a request for comment."
"However, a source told people that although Stefani sought medical assistance in the hospital, she was not admitted to the hospital."
"Related video: Gwen Stephanie and Blake Sheldon share a year of" good memories. "According to Las Vegas Review Magazine, agent Owen yazov told ruvo that Stephanie was admitted to cedar Sinai Medical Center in Los Angeles on Tuesday and advised against flying or singing."
"Singer Jennifer Hudson replaced her at the event."
"Instead, the participants watched a video of Stefani, 47, apologizing for his absence."
"Larry roover, President of keep memory alive, who supports the clinic's roover brain health center, announced that Stefani couldn't attend because his eardrum ruptured an hour after the show started."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"The source told people that there was no change in the plan before the celebration at the MGM Grand Garden Arena in Las Vegas," he said
"Stefani was going to perform at the" keep memory alive: the power of love "party in Las Vegas. Organizers told participants on Thursday night that Stefani had to withdraw from the headline performance at the annual" keep memory alive: the power of love "party after her eardrum ruptured."



Number  714
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The insider laments, “No one wants to see them split up.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
“But it’s unlikely that that’ll happen — as Ellen was the one hoping to make things work.”
“For years, it’s been rumored that Ellen DeGeneres and Portia de Rossi have had troubles in their marriage — but an insider tells In Touch exclusively that the pair, who have been married since 2008, are officially at their breaking point, and divorce is officially inevitable.”
““They’re not going to make it.”
“Their roller-coaster marriage is about to derail,” the insider tells the magazine.”
“The reason they have held off until this point isn t a coincidence Next August marks 10 years since they tied the knot and after making it a decade together California law could mean Portia is entitled to more of Ellen s money Ellen is worth an estimated 360 million...”
“...compared to Portia s 20 million fortune...”
“Should Ellen want to protect herself (and her estate), she would need to end their union before the big anniversary come August.”
“The insider adds, “[Ellen’s] friends know she would do whatever it takes to stay married to Portia, and she has.”
“And the personal battle will be just as ugly for their loved ones and fans.”


"No one wants to see them break up," sighs the insider For more information, please click on the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please visit our newsletters! "
"But that's unlikely to happen - because Alan is the one who wants things to work."
"For years, it has been rumored that Ellen DeGeneres and Portia de Rossi are in trouble in their marriage - but an insider told contact exclusively that the couple, who have been married since 2008, are officially breaking up and a formal divorce is inevitable."
"They won't make it."
"Their roller coaster marriage is about to derail," people familiar with the matter told the magazine
"It's not a coincidence that the reason why they put off until now is that they will be married for 10 years in August next year. After 10 years together, California's law may mean Portia has the right to get more money from Ellen. Ellen's value is estimated to be 360 million..."
"Compared with Portia's 20 million property..."
"If Ellen wants to protect herself (and her property), she'll have to end their union before her wedding anniversary comes in August."
"Friends know that she will stay married to Portia at all costs, and she has done it," the person added
"For their relatives and fans, this personal struggle is just as ugly."



Number  715
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Right?”
“News, “We work together closely; he’s my love interest in the film.”
“Alexandra Daddario is squashing claims that she’s loved up with costar Zac Efron.”
“Alexandra Daddario, 32, wants to make something very clear: She’s not dating Zac Efron.”
“Yes, he was her love interest in the 2017 Baywatch film but the actress claims that, in real life, they’re just “good friends.” Alexandra clarified their relationship in an interview with PEOPLE.”
“Crushing the hopes of Baywatch fans everywhere, she said on May 31, “We’re very good friends.”
“Zac and I’ve worked together, and we’re very good friends.”It’s not the first time that Alexandra has claimed that Zac, 30, is in the friendship zone.”
“In May 2017, she told E!”
“I understand why people would go crazy over something like that, but Zac and I are very good friends.” So, what happened?”
“Two hot b tches Because with flirting like that of course people wouldn t think they re dating...”


"Is it?"
"News", we work closely together; he is my favorite of this film
"Alexandra dadario is refuting the claim that she is in love with Zac Efron."
"Alexandra Daddario, 32, wanted to make it clear that she didn't date Zac Efron."
"Yes, he was her passion for the 2017 Gulf watch film, but the actress claimed that in real life they were just" good friends. ". Alexandra clarified their relationship in an interview with people magazine
"Shattered the hopes of Baywatch fans everywhere," she said on May 31. "We are very good friends."
"Zach and I have worked together and we are very good friends." It's not the first time Alexandra has claimed that Zach, 30, is in the friendship zone
"In May 2017, she told e!"
"I understand why people go crazy about things like this, but Zach and I are good friends." So, what happened? "
"Two hot girls, because of this flirtation, people certainly don't think they're dating..."



Number  716
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In May, Jimmy Fallon grilled both Lopez and Rodriguez (on the 10th and 11th, respectively) during interviews on The Tonight Show Starring Jimmy Fallon, and when Fallon asked Lopez about the connotation of the lyrics in her new song, she replied, "no pressure."”
“So, at least she gave him a head's up before the media pounced all over it.”
“Maybe that ellipsis and heart emoji Lopez added at the end are meant to imply, "more news to come."”
“Maybe that photo was taken in a "quiet lil moment" after Rodriguez proposed.”
“Maybe that is the confirmation.”
“Wait.”
“Obviously, if they are engaged and they did want to share the news with their fans, Lopez's caption of the photo would have been something other than, "It’s the lil quiet moments that matter the most."”
“Do you have something you'd like to share with your fans?”
“Jennifer, Alex?”
“A ring that she is very clearly wearing on her left hand's ring finger AKA the finger that one would wear an engagement ring on.”


"In May this year, in an interview with the tonight show starring Jimmy Fallon, Jimmy Fallon questioned both Lopez and Rodriguez (on the 10th and 11th respectively). When Fallon asked about the connotation of the lyrics of Lopez's new song, she replied," there's no pressure. "
"So she gave him at least a chance before the media reported it."
Lopez's ellipsis and heart-shaped expression at the end may mean "more news is coming"
"Maybe that picture was a 'quiet moment' after Rodriguez proposed."
"Maybe that's confirmation."
"Wait a minute."
"Obviously, if they're engaged and they really want to share the news with their fans, Lopez's description in the photo won't be" the most important thing is the little quiet moment. "
"Is there anything you want to share with your fans?"
"Jennifer, Alex?"
"The ring she obviously wears on the ring finger of her left hand is the one with the engagement ring."



Number  717
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After Lambert won Female Vocalist of the Year Wednesday night, the singer noted in her acceptance speech that she “needed a bright spot this year.”Watch the “Strip It Down” singer’s priceless reaction above.”
“Shelton, 39, split from Miranda Lambert in July after four years of marriage.”
“And according to a source, the 46-year-old No Doubt songstress, who split from husband Gavin Rossdale this past August after 13 years, is in Nashville with her beau to attend CMA afterparties!”
““Gwen and Blake are longtime friends who have very recently started dating,” her rep told Us earlier in the day.”
“It’s not true.”As exclusively confirmed by Us Weekly, the two Voice coaches are indeed seeing each other.”
“I need to see where Blake has stated that.”After trying to wrap his head around the new romance, Bryan, who took home the trophy for Entertainer of the Year, joked: “It can’t be true, because there’s no way Blake could ever score a girl like that.”
““You’re trying to trick me…Pull [it] up online.”
““He didn’t come out about that,” Bryan responded incredulously after being informed about the new couple.”
“News prior to the 2015 Country Music Association Awards on Wednesday, Nov. 4, Bryan, 39, joked that Stefani is too hot to be dating Shelton.”
“While chatting with E!”


After Lambert won the best female singer of the year award on Wednesday night, the singer said in her acceptance speech that she "needs a bright spot this year.". Look at the priceless reaction of the naked singer
"Sheldon, 39, broke up with Miranda Lambert in July after four years of marriage."
According to a source, the 46 year old singer broke up with her husband Gavin Rosedale in August 13 years later and is now attending a CMA party with her boyfriend in Nashville
"Gwen and Blake are old friends who have recently started dating," her agent told us earlier in the day
"It's not true." As American weekly exclusively confirmed, the two voice coaches are actually meeting
"I'll see what Blake says." After trying to wrap his head around the new relationship, Bryan joked: "it can't be true, because black can't get such a girl."
"You want to cheat me Put it online. "
"He didn't disclose it," Brian replied incredulously after learning about the couple
"Before the 2015 Country Music Association Awards on Wednesday, November 4, Brian, 39, joked that Stephanie was too hot to date Sheldon."
"While chatting with E!"



Number  718
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“To celebrate Harper Beckham’s birthday, David and Victoria have reportedly splashed the cash and bought her a £7,000 pedigree pony.”
“A soure reportedly told the Sun: ‘A few months ago, David and Victoria bought Harper some riding lessons and she fell in love with the sport.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“‘She’s horse-mad and has spent the past few weeks badgering her parents for a pony of her own.’The youngster - who turns seven today - has also reportedly received riding gear from Colne Saddlery in Cheltenham.”
“'Obviously, a horse is a massive commitment, and David and Victoria have impressed upon her how important it is that she cares for it herself and gets stuck into the mucking out.”
“They then visited a saddlery last month and got her all the accessories,' the source added.”
“‘The pony is an extravagant gift but Harper is aware of just how lucky she is.’This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"It is reported that in order to celebrate Harper David's birthday, David and Victoria squandered cash and bought her a 7000 pound purebred pony."
"A few months ago, David and Victoria bought Harper some riding lessons, and she fell in love with the sport," a sur told the sun, according to the report
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"She's crazy. She's been pestering her parents for a pony for the past few weeks." According to reports, the 7-year-old also got a ride from Korn sadleri of Cheltenham
"It's clear that a horse is a huge commitment, and David and Victoria are impressed by how important it is for her to take care of it and get into trouble."
"They went to a saddle store last month and gave her all the accessories," the source added
"The pony was a luxury gift, but Harper realized how lucky she was." This content was imported from instagram



Number  719
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He will be sorely missed by everyone who had the privilege of knowing him.”
“He was a dear friend, a respected colleague, and a great guy.”
“He was at the helm of the studio for over a decade and was responsible for so many of it’s most beloved films.”
“Like so many of Brad’s friends, I’m in a state of shock.”Jim Gianopulos, Chairman & CEO of Paramount Pictures:All of us at Paramount are deeply saddened by the news of Brad Grey’s passing.”
“He and I worked together on every picture I made since, all the way through Silence, and he was always extremely protective of the creative process, very careful to keep it separate from all infighting and financial entanglements — in other words, the business.”
“Our professional relationship started with The Departed, which he basically shepherded into existence —sadly, he is uncredited as a producer on that picture, but that’s the title he deserved.”
“I’m going to miss him terribly.”Martin Scorsese, Oscar-winning filmmaker:“Brad Grey was a true friend, and he genuinely loved movies.”
“He loved his success and he made sure to share it with the people who surrounded him.”
“He loved movies, he loved entertainment, he loved life.”
“The thing I will remember most about Brad is his generosity.”


"Everyone who is lucky enough to know him will miss him very much."
"He is a dear friend, a respected colleague, a great man."
"He's been at the helm of the studio for more than a decade, responsible for so many of the most popular films."
"Like many of Brad's friends, I was shocked," said Jim gianopulos, Paramount's chairman and chief executive Photo: all of us in paramount are deeply saddened by the news of Brad Gray's death. "
"Since then, he and I have taken every picture I've taken, and he's been silent all the way, and he's always been extremely protective of the creative process, very careful to separate it from all the infighting and financial entanglements - in other words, the business."
"Our professional relationship started with the dead, and he was basically built under the guidance of the dead - unfortunately, he didn't qualify as a producer in this film, but that's the title he deserved."
Oscar winner Martin Scorsese said: "Brad gray is a real friend. He really likes movies."
"He loves his success and must share it with the people around him."
"He loves movies, entertainment and life."
"What impresses me most about Brad is his generosity."



Number  720
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And for more wedding rules the monarchy must hew to, learn the 20 traditions royal brides must follow.”
“(Prince Harry, in case you were wondering, was fifth at the time of his engagement to Meghan Markle, so he needed granny’s approval, too.)”
“William is second in line, so he needs Her Majesty's permission, which she happily gave.”
“In 2013, the traditional Royal Marriages Act was repealed in favor of the Successions to the Crown Act—meaning only the first six in line to the throne require the Queen's permission to marry.”
“...they wed otherwise the marriage is invalid...”
“WPA Pool Getty Images William had to ask his grandmother Queen Elizabeth II for her consent to marry Kate according to the Royal Marriages Act 1772 which decrees all descendants of George II must obtain the sovereign s agreement before...”
“Prince Harry also needed the queen's permission to marry Meghan Markle.”
“They needed permission to marry.”


"In order to have more wedding rules, the monarchy must abide by them and learn the 20 traditions that royal brides must follow."
"If you want to know, Prince Harry was fifth when he was engaged to Megan markel, so he also needed grandma's approval."
"William is second in order, so he needs her Majesty's permission, and she is happy to agree."
"In 2013, the traditional royal marriage act was repealed and replaced by the succession to the throne act, which means that only the first six heirs to the throne need the Queen's permission to marry."
“…… They are married, otherwise the marriage will be invalid... "
"According to the royal marriage act of 1772, Prince William had to ask his grandmother, Queen Elizabeth II, for permission to marry Kate. According to the act, all descendants of George II must be born in With the consent of the monarch... "
"Prince Harry also needs the Queen's permission to marry Megan Marcel."
"They need permission to get married."



Number  721
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...leave him after the slavery controversy...”
“It was one of their worst fights ever A few years ago A post shared by Kim Kardashian West kimkardashian on Nov 14 2017 at 1 43pm PST In a recent interview with the New York Times Kanye revealed that there was a moment he believed Kim was going to...”
““He doesn’t ever think of the repercussions it could have for her brands,” an insider reportedly said.”
“According to In Touch, a fight broke out between the couple following the controversial comments, with Kim calling Kanye out for his selfishness.”
“That sounds like a choice,” West said in the interview.”
““When you hear about slavery for 400 years … for 400 years?”
“In an interview with TMZ Live, back in May, West’s wildly controversial claim that slavery was a “choice” for African-Americans received an onslaught of backlash.”
“The New York Times interview that suggested divorce was on the table.”
“1.”
“Let’s look over the evidence, shall we?”


“… Leave him after the slavery dispute. "
"This is the most fierce battle in their history a few years ago. Kim Kardashian West kimkardishan shared a post in an interview with New York Times Kanye on November 14, 2017 at 1:43 p.m. PST, revealing that for a moment he believed Kim Kardashian would..."
According to reports, an insider said: "he never thought about the impact this would have on her brand."
"According to in touch, after the controversial remarks, the couple had a quarrel, and Kim Jong Un cried out for his selfishness."
"It sounds like a choice," West said in an interview
"When you heard about 400 years of slavery 400 years? "
"As early as may, in an interview broadcast live by TMZ, the controversial western view that slavery is a" choice "of African Americans was strongly opposed."
"A New York Times interview suggesting divorce is on the table."
“1.”
"Let's see the evidence, shall we?"



Number  722
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Taylor really believes he’s the one for her.”For more on Swift’s romance — and her post-album release plans — pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““She’s always said she wants a big family and she sees herself having kids with Joe down the line,” says the insider.”
“Says the insider, “Taylor loves to cook and bake for him.”One day, she envisions preparing meals for a whole brood.”
“At the singer’s NYC spread she and the actor — he filmed the 2018 biopic The Favourite with her pal Emma Stone — hang on her private roof deck, work out together, watch movies and enjoy an easy domesticity.”
“The family-oriented Brit (he still loves in London with his psychotherapist mom Elizabeth and documentarian dad Richard) and Swift enjoy a “boring relationship,” says the Swift insider.”
“Right.”
““She wants to reveal their relationship when the time is right.”She’s already fairly confident Alwyn is Mr.”
““He might attend,” says the insider, noting Swift is giving their debut a lot of thought.”
“Though she’s kept her nearly yearlong romance with Alwyn, 26, firmly under wraps, the insider says she’s considering having him join her at the November 12 Europe Music Awards in London.”
“And ready to show off just how happy she is.”


"Tyler really believes he's her favorite." For more about Swift's romance and her album release plan, please click on the new issue of American weekly and start now
"She always said she wanted a big family and she thought she had children with Joe line," said insider
"Tyler likes to cook and bake for him," the person said One day, she envisioned preparing meals for a whole family
"In the singer's New York spread, she and the actor - his favorite 2018 biopic with her friend Emma stone - hang on her private roof deck, work together, watch movies and enjoy a relaxed family life."
"The family oriented Englishman (who still likes to be in London with his psychotherapist mother Elizabeth and documentary producer father Richard) enjoys a 'boring relationship' with swift," the swift insider said
"Yes."
"She wants to reveal their relationship when the time is right." She was quite confident, Mr. Alvin
"He may be taking part," the person said, noting that Swift was giving them a lot of consideration for their debut
"Although she has kept her love affair with 26 year old Alvin secret for nearly a year, the person familiar with the matter said she is considering letting him join her in the European Music Awards in London on November 12."
"Ready to show off how happy she is."



Number  723
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Kevin Winter/Getty Images]”
“On the other hand, Tom Cruise’s representatives have not commented on the recent claims that suggest that he is planning to get Suri back in his life, as he reportedly moves ahead to settle down with Vanessa Kirby.”
“Tom, who is currently busy filming Mission: Impossible 6 with Vanessa Kirby, is reportedly planning to settle down.”
“According to reports, the actor is afraid that just like his father, he is also going to die of cancer and wishes to reunite with his 11-year-old daughter, Suri Cruise.”
“Ever since Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise announced their divorce, the entire entertainment world started to talk about Suri and how she would be raised without a father figure in her life.”
“However, Katie proved herself as an excellent mother, as she did not let any news affect her life with her daughter.”
“She was recently spotted enjoying a hockey game with Suri and even her Instagram pictures show the bond she shares with her daughter.”
“As Katie and Jamie are moving on together in their personal lives, recent reports suggest that even Tom Cruise has decided to settle down again.”
“It was recently reported by Inquisitr that Tom Cruise reportedly has the hots for his Mission: Impossible 6 co-star Vanessa Kirby.”
“An alleged insider revealed that Tom admired Vanessa’s work and reportedly persuaded other producers to give The Crown actress a crucial role in the sixth installment of Mission: Impossible series.”


"[close up by Kevin winter / Getty pictures]"
"On the other hand, Tom Cruise's representative did not comment on recent claims, which indicates that he is planning to bring Suri back to his life, as it is reported that he will continue to settle down with Vanessa Kirby."
"Tom is currently working on mission: impossible 6 with Vanessa Kirby and is reported to be planning to settle down."
"It is reported that the actor is afraid that he will die of cancer like his father and hopes to be reunited with his 11 year old daughter Suri cruise."
"Since Katie Holmes and Tom Cruise announced their divorce, the whole entertainment industry has been talking about Suri and how she grew up without a father."
"However, Katie proved to be an excellent mother because she didn't let any news affect her and her daughter's life."
"She was recently photographed playing hockey with Suri, and even her instagram photos showed her close relationship with her daughter."
"With Katie and Jamie growing together in their private lives, recent reports show that even Tom Cruise has decided to settle down again."
"According to investigators recently, Tom Cruise is said to have his mission fever: impossible 6 co star Vanessa Kirby."
"An alleged insider revealed that Tom enjoyed Vanessa's work and was reported to have convinced other producers to give the crown actress a key role in the sixth film of the mission: impossible series."



Number  724
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you want to see Jelena back together?”
“But, it looks like true love always finds its way.”
“And, they’ve allegedly been on the rocks for a while.”
“The breakup report comes just one day after she and her ex Justin Bieber spent all of Sunday together!”
“Selena Gomez, 25, and The Weeknd, 27, have split, multiple sources confirm to PEOPLE.”
““She and Abel have been going back and forth for a few months about their relationship,” an insider tells the mag.”
““It’s been hard with him being on tour and her shooting in New York.”
“That wasn’t easy on them.” Although Selena “always made an effort” to attend his shows around her busy schedule, “that played a part in them getting distant,” the source adds.”
““It’s over for now, but they’re still in touch.”The reported split has been tough on the couple, according to the mag.”
““It’s been hard for them to come to the realization that this is the direction things were heading, but it’s been hard for months,” the insider says, who adds that Selena is not back with her ex, Justin Bieber, 23.”


"Holly bugs, do you want to see Jenna make up again?"
"But it seems true love will always find a way out."
"Moreover, they are said to have been on the rocks for some time."
"The breakup report was released the day after she spent the whole Sunday with former Justin Bieber!"
"Serena Gomez, 25, broke up with the weekend, 27, and multiple sources confirmed it."
"She and Abel have been talking back and forth for months about their relationship," a person familiar with the matter told the magazine
"He's on tour and she's shooting in New York, which makes me sad."
"It's not easy for them." Although Serena "always worked hard in her busy schedule" to participate in his performance, "it played a role in their estrangement," the source added
"It's over now, but they're still in touch." According to the magazine, the couple's breakup has been difficult
"It's hard for them to realize that things are moving in this direction, but it's been difficult for months," the person said, adding that Serena didn't come back with her 23-year-old ex boyfriend Justin Bieber



Number  725
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kanye will stay out of Chyna’s beef with the Kardashians?”
“Yeah, she’s not holding back anymore, so it would be wise for Kanye to keep out of this mess.”
“Kim Kardashian wants to stop any type of rap war between hubby Kanye West and brother Rob’s ex Blac Chyna.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she wants to avoid the drama.”
“If there’s one person the Kardashian clan wants to stop from spilling their family secrets, it’s Blac Chyna, 29.”
“She’s currently at war with her ex and baby daddy Rob Kardashian, 30, and has taken out a restraining order against him that has already led to dramatic claims of violence and suicide attempts.”
“The last thing the family wants is more publicity towards this ugly feud, and Kim Kardashian, 36, wants to make sure her hubby Kanye West.”
“40, doesn’t escalate matters by starting a rap war with Chyna.”
“Especially since she’s starting a new career as a hip hop artist.”
““Kim is a bit disturbed with Blac Chyna’s recent legal action towards the family and she wants to avoid any talk or interaction with Chyna at all costs.”


"Holly worms, do you think Kanye won't meddle in the business of Gina and Kardashian?"
"Yeah, she won't back down any more, so it's wise to keep Kanye out of this mess."
"Kim Kardashian wants to stop any kind of rap war between her husband Kanye West and her brother Rob's former blac Chyna."
"We have exclusive details about how she wants to avoid the play."
"If there's one person the kardashians don't want to reveal their family secrets, it's Blake chener, 29."
"She is at war with Rob Kardashian, her 30-year-old former and youngest father, and has issued a restraining order against him, which has led to dramatic charges of violence and suicide attempts."
"The last thing the family wants is more publicity for this ugly feud. Kim Kardashian, 36, wants to make sure her husband Kanye West."
"At 40, it's not going to escalate because of the rap war with Zina."
"Especially when she started a new career as a hip-hop artist."
"Kim is a little upset about blac Chyna's recent legal action against her family and hopes to avoid any conversation or interaction with Chyna at all costs."



Number  726
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“10+ pictures inside of Robert Pattinson and Mia Goth in Germany…”
“They find themselves in the most unimaginable situation after a storm of cosmic rays hit the ship,” according to Deadline.”
“The film is “about a group of criminals who accept a mission in space to become the subjects of a human reproduction experiment.”
“Nearly two years after the project was announced, Rob and Mia are finally getting to work on their upcoming movie High Life.”
“The 31-year-old actor and the 23-year-old actress were spotted sight-seeing on Tuesday (August 22) in Cologne, Germany.”
“Robert Pattinson and Mia Goth are working on a new movie together and it looks like they’re getting to know each other off-set as well!”


"More than 10 photos of Robert Pattinson and Mia Goth in Germany..."
"They found themselves in the most unimaginable situation after a cosmic ray storm hit the ship," according to the deadline
The film is "about a group of criminals on a space mission to become the object of human reproductive experiments."
"Nearly two years after the project was announced, rob and Mia finally started their upcoming movie high life
"The 31 year old actor and 23-year-old actress were found touring Cologne, Germany, on Tuesday (August 22)
"Robert Pattinson and Mia Goth are working on a new film, and it looks like they're getting to know each other on set too!"



Number  727
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A source tells the site that Kanye's flu got "worse and worse" to the point that Kim felt he needed medical attention.”
“And according to the site, Kim never left her husband's side.”
“Mum-of-three Kim took her husband to West Hills Hospital, in the San Fernando Valley, on Sunday, reports TMZ .”
“It's said that the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star was so worried about her husband that dropped everything to accompany him to the emergency room.”
“(Image: Splash News)Kim was reported to have been by Kanye's side she'd been by Kanye's side when he was rushed to hospital with suspected flu.”
“Mirror Online has contacted representatives for comment.”
“(Image: Tidal) (Image: Tidal)Teyana, who shares two-year-old daughter with basketballer husband Iman Shumpert, has known Kanye since she signed to his record label GOOD in 2012.”
“"Kim trusts Kanye 100 per cent and she knows he loves her, but she cam't help feeling a bit resentful about the 'other woman,'" added the insider.”
“(Image: defjamrecords/Instagram) (Image: AFP/Getty Images)The insider claims Kanye has been 'singing Teyana's praises,' which has led to wife Kim feeling left out in the cold.”
“They've spend hours holed up in a studio over the past few months, which Kim feels more distant than ever from Kanye."”


A source told the website that kenye's flu was "getting so bad" that Kim felt he needed medical care
"According to the website, Kim has never been away from her husband."
Kim, the mother of three, took her husband to Westhill hospital in the San Fernando Valley on Sunday, TMZ reported
"I heard that the star in" after Kardashian "was very worried about his husband, so he put everything down and accompanied him to the emergency room."
"(picture: splash News) Kim Jong Il is reported to have been with kenno and she was with kenno when he was taken to hospital with suspected flu."
"Mirror online has contacted a representative for comments."
"(photo: tidal) (photo: tidal) Teyana has a two-year-old daughter with her basketball player husband, Iman shumpert, who has known Kanye since she signed up with his record company good in 2012."
"Kim trusts kenye 100 percent, and she knows he loves her, but she can't help but resent the 'other woman'," the person familiar with the matter added
(image: defjamrecords / instagram) (image: AFP / Getty Images) Kanye has been "eulogizing Teyana" all the time, which has left his wife Kim in the cold
"In the past few months, they've spent hours hiding in a studio, and Kim feels it's farther away from Kanye than ever before."



**Something goes wrong**
“And, for the record, Gossip Cop is told that no breeder legitimately connected to the actor leaked any real details about him getting a dog to this magazine.”
“This alleged information comes from a purported “top breeder,” but the actor likely wouldn’t be working with a specific breeder yet if he doesn’t know which kind of dog he wants.”
“But he is always obsessed with design and wants to get a pet that is beautiful, stylish and moves great.”
“A rep for Pitt also laughed off the tail, er, tale.”
“Brad Pitt is getting a dog for companionship, according to a tabloid that is seemingly unaware he already has a dog.”
“To exactly no one s surprise Gossip Cop can confirm this latest story about the actor was made up The piece in question can be found in the new edition of the National Enquirer under the headline Brad Panting Over Dog The article begins by asserting the lonely Pitt is...”
“...on the hunt for a furry new friend A purported top breeder is quoted as saying Brad has been searching for a dog He seems to have narrowed his search down to a poodle or a Portuguese water dog continues the gossip magazine s supposed tipster...”
“While that may sound plausible, particularly since Pitt’s interest in design is well-known, the sourcing here is fishy.”
“Though standard poodles and Portuguese water dogs are considered somewhat similar canines, responsible breeders typically specialize in a single breed.What’s most strange is that nowhere does the outlet acknowledge that Pitt already has a pooch, and one that’s very different from poodles and Portuguese water dogs.”
“It takes a lot of gall to write about Pitt, even on subjects as seemingly innocuous as getting a dog, after telling outright lies like that.”


"Moreover, as a record, the gossip police were told that none of the keepers who had a legal connection with the actor leaked any real details of his dog to the magazine."
"The so-called information comes from a person who is known as a" top breeder ", but if he doesn't know what kind of dog he wants, he probably won't cooperate with a particular breeder yet."
"But he is always obsessed with design and wants to get a beautiful, fashionable and graceful pet."
"One of Pete's representatives also laughed at the story."
Brad Pitt has been given a dog as a companion, according to a tabloid newspaper that doesn't seem to know he has a dog
"No one would be surprised that the gossip police can confirm that the latest story about the actor is a fabrication, which can be found in the new edition of the National Enquirer with the headline Brad gasping for the dog. At the beginning of the article, it asserts that the lonely Pete is... "
“…… In search of a furry new friend, a person who claims to be a top breeder said that Brad has been looking for a dog, and he seems to have narrowed his search to a poodle or a Portuguese water dog, continuing to gossip about the so-called informer in the magazine... "
"While that sounds reasonable, especially since Pete's interest in design is well known, the procurement here is questionable."
Although Standard Poodles and Portuguese water dogs are considered to be somewhat similar canine species, responsible breeders usually specialize in single breeding. What's most strange is that there is no export anywhere to admit that Pete already has a poodle, a very different poodle and Portuguese water dog
"It takes a lot of courage to write about Pete, even when seemingly innocuous subjects like dog ownership tell such a complete lie."



Number  729
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“'As long as she's happy,' the 36-year-old told The Howard Stern Show in February.”
“Belong Together singer denies the report branding it simply not true...”
“According to Life & Style magazine, the 47-year-old gives her boyfriend Bryan Tanaka $25,000 a month specifically so he can buy her gifts.”
“Sources claim the pop diva - who is worth around $520 million - is all too aware of the fact her backup dancer beau doesn't earn nearly as much as she does.”
“On the payroll: Mariah Carey gives her boyfriend Bryan Tanaka a $25,000 monthly allowance so he can buy her gifts, it's claimed by Life & Style magazineThe star, who is known for her lavish lifestyle, likes to be spoiled when she's in a relationship.”
“And after being engaged to Australian billionaire James Packer - who would reportedly shower her with expensive presents regularly - sources told the magazine she 'wants the same treatment from Bryan'.”
“'She doesn’t care that he’s using her money to do it,' added the insider.”
“Spoiled: Sources say the 47-year-old diva loves receiving presents.”
“She doesn t care that he s using her money to do it an insider claimed The good life According to sources Mariah had grown accustomed to being lavished with expensive gifts from her former fiance James Packer and expects the same from Bryan But a rep for the We...”
“'[Bryan] makes his own money, and what he can afford, he buys her,' an insider told Gossip Cop.”


"As long as she's happy," the 36 year old said on Howard Stern's show in February
Singh denied the report, saying it was not true at all
According to lifestyle magazine, the 47 year old gives her boyfriend Brian Tanaka $25000 a month so he can buy her a gift
"It's reported that the pop diva, who is worth about $520 million, knows very well that her replacement dancer boyfriend's income is far less than her."
According to lifestyle magazine, Maria Kelly gives her boyfriend Brian Tanaka $25000 a month in pocket money so he can buy her a gift. The star, known for his luxurious lifestyle, likes to be spoiled in love
"After her engagement to Australian billionaire James Parker, who is reported to give her expensive gifts on a regular basis, the source told the magazine that she" hopes Brian will give her the same treatment. "
"She doesn't care that he does it with her money," the person familiar with the matter added
"Spoiled: it's reported that the 47 year old Diva likes to accept gifts."
"She doesn't care that he does it with her money. A person familiar with the matter claims that Maria has been used to the luxury life of ex fiance James packer who gives her expensive gifts. She hopes Brian will do the same, but our representative..."
A person familiar with the matter told gossip police: "if (Brian) earns his own money, he will buy her whatever he can afford."



Number  730
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She has not been linked with anyone since their shock break-up.”
“7 Sienna Miller had a brief fling with Brad Pitt last year Credit Splash News 7 Brad Pitt at the Oscars with manager Cynthia Pett Dante Credit Getty Images Getty At a pre Oscars party in Los Angeles last week he posed with just one woman his manager Cynthia Pett...”
“The marriage-split star, 54, is focusing on a daily routine of sculpting, workouts and meditation to take his mind off it.”
“7 Vow... Brad Pitt is planning to stay off sex for a year Credit: Handout - GettyA source revealed: “Brad is really sorting himself out.”
““He’s getting trim, eating healthily and has cut out booze.”
““He has been in relationships for pretty much all of his entire adult life.”
““Now that he’s single, he’s doing things he’s previously been unable to do.”
“7 Brad Pitt split with wife Angelina Jolie in 2016 Credit: Getty Images - Getty"He’s looking after No 1.”Brad’s last fling was with Brit actress Sienna Miller, 36, during Glastonbury 2017.”
“Dante...”
“The couple, who have six kids, are now finalising their divorce.”


"She hasn't been in touch with anyone since they split up in shock."
"7 Sienna Miller had a brief affair with Brad Pitt last year. Brad Pitt was with agent Cynthia pater at the Oscars. Dante took a picture with a woman from agent Cynthia pater at the Oscars in Los Angeles last week
"The 54 year old star, whose marriage has parted ways, focuses on sculpture, exercise and meditation every day to free his attention from them."
"7 vows... Brad Pitt plans to stay away from sex for a year: gettya revealed: "Brad is really tidying himself up."
"He's getting slimmer, he's eating healthily, he's sober."
"He was in love almost all his adult life."
"Now that he's single, he's doing things he couldn't do before."
"7 Brad Pitt broke up with his wife Angelina Jolie in 2016 photo source: Getty Images Getty he's taking care of number one. Brad's last date was in 2017 when Glastonbury was with 36 year old British actress Sienna Miller. "
"Dante..."
"The couple, who have six children, are now finalizing a divorce agreement."



Number  731
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — are you surprised Chris supposedly doesn’t want to date right now?”
“The two were all smiles too as Jack rocked cowboy boots and a sunhat.”
“We exclusively learned the actor has zero interest in dating!”
“While we’re sure many women are pining after Chris Pratt, 38, after he and his wife Anna Faris, 40, announced their split last week, the truth is, Chris has no plans whatsoever to date in the near future.”
“Instead, the Passengers star is determined to stay focused on his booming career as well as being the best dad he can be to his and Anna’s son Jack Pratt, 4.”
““No one at all should even try to connect Chris with anyone because he is not looking to get into a relationship in any way shape or form,” a source close to Chris told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He is definitely mourning losing Anna and has to work that out before he even thinks about getting into another relationship.”
“He is going to drown himself into his work and being a great father only.” We can totally respect that!”
“After all, the favorite Hollywood couple tied the knot eight years ago, and their split came as a major shock to fans.”
“Anna especially is reportedly taking the separation particularly hard.”


"Tell us, Hollywood stars - are you surprised Chris doesn't want to date right now?"
"Jack shook his cowboy boots and sun hat, and they both laughed."
"We only know that the actor has no interest in dating!"
"While we are sure that many women miss Chris Platt, 38, after he and his wife Anna Faris, 40, announced their separation last week, the fact is that Chris has no plans to date in the near future."
"Instead, the passenger star is determined to continue to focus on his booming career and become the best father to him and Anna's 4-year-old son, Jack Pratt."
"No one should try to connect Chris with anyone because he doesn't want to enter into a relationship in any form," a source close to Chris told reporters
"He must be grieving for the loss of Anna, and he has to solve the problem before he can think about another relationship."
"He will devote himself to his work and be a great father." We can fully respect that! "
"After all, the most popular Hollywood couple got married eight years ago, and their breakup shocked fans."
"Anna is reported to be particularly tough about separation."



Number  732
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“She’s been shut out.”
“All of Katie’s calls to her ex-husband are allegedly being ignored, according to a new report!”
“This situation sounds so painful!”
“Tom Cruise, 55, reportedly hasn’t seen his 11-year-old daughter, Suri Cruise, in 1458 days.”
“Suri’s mom, Katie Holmes, 38, wants to remedy the situation and reunite him with their daughter, once and for all.”
“That’s why she’s reportedly called him over and over, according to a report from InTouch Weekly!”
“The problem is, Katie’s apparently hitting a wall when it comes to contacting her ex-husband.”
“Tom’s reportedly ignoring her desperate pleas.”
““[Katie] has reached out [to Tom] in the hopes of opening a dialogue about resuming contact with Suri,” a source told InTouch Weekly.”


"Let us know!"
"She was turned away."
According to the latest report, all of Katie's phone calls to her ex husband are said to have been ignored! "
"That sounds painful!"
"It is reported that Tom Cruise, 55, has not seen his 11 year old daughter Suri cruise for 1458 days."
"Suri's mother, Katie Holmes, 38, wants to make up for this and reunite Suri and their daughter once and for all."
That's why she called him again and again, according to touch weekly
"The problem is, when Katie contacted her ex husband, she obviously ran into a wall."
"Tom is reported to have ignored her desperate plea."
A source told touch weekly: "Katie has contacted [Tom] and wants to have a dialogue on resuming contact with Suri."



Number  733
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Here is every time the royal family has joked about the duke's lack of hair.”
“Of course, this isn't the first time that William's receding hair line has become the topic of conversation.”
“"She said, 'You need it more than me,' and pointed to his head and he laughed."”
“"The prince was interested in the alpaca, and as I showed it to them, the princess said he should put it on his head," Crejan told reporters.”
“While watching a shearing demonstration, Lyn Crejan, a farmer from Glenn Innes in New South Wales, showed the couple a tuft of alpaca wool that just so happened to be a similar shade to William's hair.”
“...husband s bald spot during the twosome s tour Down Under...”
“The Duke of Cambridge has endured years of humiliation as a result of his receding hair line and most recently became the butt of a joke thanks to wife Kate Middleton who couldn t help but poke fun at her...”
“While Prince William may lead the charmed life of a royal, it can't be easy having a wife with perfect hair and a brother who is a pro at cracking jokes.”


"It's a joke that the royal family seldom plays on the Duke."
"Of course, this is not the first time William's receding hairline has become a topic."
"She said," you need it more than I do. "Pointing to his head, he laughed
"The prince was very interested in alpacas. When I showed them, the princess said he should wear alpacas on his head," Keriyan told reporters
"While watching the wool shearing demonstration, Lynn crejan, a farmer from glenines, NSW, showed the couple a tuft of alpaca hair that was exactly the same color as William's hair."
“… Her husband's baldness is under the two men's tour. "
"The Duke of Cambridge has suffered humiliation for years because of the receding of his hair line. Recently, his wife Kate Middleton can't help but make fun of her and become a laughing stock..."
"Although Prince William may have a royal life, it's not easy to have a wife with perfect hair and a brother who is good at joking."



Number  734
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Only time will tell.”
“Perhaps that statement could be true again one day, albeit with a certain Queen Catherine formerly known as Kate Middleton.”
“After all, the Queen herself has four children.”
“And while the Duchess did experience serious medical issues during her previous pregnancies, they wouldn’t be the first royals to have a large brood.”
“While William is, of course, one of two, Kate grew up in a three-child household.”
“All joking aside though, might the duke and duchess be planning on baby number three?”
“Reacting in the moment, Middleton apparently joked to her husband, “We will just have to have more babies.”Unsurprisingly, the world’s joyous reaction was swift.”
“One such token-bearing person reportedly presented the duo with a gift fit for a newborn baby.”
“Poles greeted the duke and duchess with great enthusiasm, with many presenting the young royals with flowers or gifts.”
“(They were sans children, post-Prince George’s less-than-happy arrival.)”


"Only time can prove everything."
"Maybe one day it will be true again, even though there is a Queen Catherine named Kate Middleton."
"After all, the queen herself has four children."
"Although the Duchess did have serious medical problems during her pregnancy, they were not the first royal family members to have a large number of children."
"Of course, William is one of two children, and Kate grew up in a family of three."
"But don't be kidding. Are the Dukes going to have a third child?"
Middleton's reaction at the time was obviously to joke to her husband: "we just need to have more children." Not surprisingly, the joy of the world is responding quickly
"It is reported that one of the symbolic figures gave them a gift suitable for the newborn."
Poles warmly welcome the Duke and Duchess, and many offer flowers or gifts to young members of the royal family
(after Prince George's unhappy arrival, they had no children.)



Number  735
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It turns out the talented television personality is going to be a part of the festivities after all but not without a ton of pressure to look cool and collected as he deals with his tough issues behind the scenes.”
“4.”
“Despite the denial and support, after the claims, there was a lot of controversy on whether or not Ryan should be allowed to be a part of the red carpet interviews at the 2018 Oscars on Mar.”
“Ryan has publicly denied the claims more than once and wants to put the while issue behind him.”
“Kelly Ripa and Jimmy Kimmel have both expressed support for Ryan since the claims came out and his girlfriend, Shayna Taylor, took to social media to post a sweet message of love for the Live With Kelly & Ryan host.”
“She has reached out to Ryan to offer her love and support during his challenging time.”Kim isn’t the only one standing by Ryan during this trying time.”
“It hurts Kim to hear these things and she can’t believe any of it.”
“Kim has always known Ryan to be professional, respectful and a total gentlemen and so she was shocked when she found out what was being said about him.”
““Kim has known Ryan for years and gives him credit for much of her family’s success so it is hard for her to hear these bad things about him.”
““Kim is heartbroken over the horrible details of the sexual assault allegations about Ryan,” a source close to Kim EXCLUSIVELY shared with HollywoodLife.com.”


"It turns out that this brilliant TV star will eventually be part of the celebration, but he has to be calm and calm when dealing with tough issues behind the scenes."
“4.”
"Despite denials and support, there has been a lot of controversy over whether Ryan should be allowed to participate in the 2018 Oscar red carpet interview on March 18 after these claims."
"Ryan has publicly denied these claims more than once and wants to put the while issue behind him."
"Kylie Ripa and Jimmy Kimmel both expressed their support for Ryan after the announcement. His girlfriend Shana Taylor sent a sweet love message to the host of live with Kylie and Ryan on social media."
"She has reached out to Ryan and given her love and support in his challenging times." Kim is not the only one standing beside Ryan at this difficult time
"Kim was sad to hear that. She couldn't believe it at all."
"Kim always knew that Ryan was professional, polite and a perfect gentleman, so she was shocked when she found out what people thought of him."
"Kim has known Ryan for many years, and she thinks that Ryan is the hero of her family's success, so it's hard for her to hear these bad words about him."
A source close to Kim Jong Il told reporters exclusively: "Kim Jong Il is sad about the terrible details of Ryan's sexual assault charges."



Number  736
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And who’s next in line to the throne and where do Meghan Markle’s future children come?”
“Here are the weird royal rules she had to follow.”
“Camilla Parker Bowles, who is line before Kate, will technically become the Queen Consort also, but it has been said Camilla will adopt the style of Princess Consort.”
“Previously boys took precedence over any older siblings if they were girls, but new legislation was created before Prince George’s birth ending this tradition.”
“Princess Charlotte is fourth in line to the throne, after Prince Charles, Prince William and Prince George, but will be ahead of her new brother, even though he is male, due to a change in the law of primogeniture.”
“5 The mum-of-three gave birth to her third child with Prince William, on April 23, 2018 Credit: AP:Associated PressWhereas Kate will not be the official Queen, Princess Charlotte has the potential to hold that title, just like her great-grandmother Queen Elizabeth II.”
“While males are officially the consort, they may be referred to as Prince, as with the Queen and Prince Philip, although they can be referred to as Prince Consorts.”
“All females who marry sovereigns are styled as Queen Consorts, except in rare cases.”
“Kate, 37, will only hold the title of Queen Consort, and not be The Queen of England in the same way the sovereign is now.”
“Once Prince William then takes the throne and becomes the King of England, Kate will then be the Queen Consort.”


"Who is the next heir to the throne? Where will the children of the future go? "
"It's a strange royal rule she has to obey."
"Camilla Parker Bowles is ahead of Kate, and technically she will also be the Queen's spouse, but some say she will adopt the style of the princess."
"In the past, boys had priority over any older sibling if they were girls, but the new legislation was made before Prince George was born, ending the tradition."
Princess Charlotte is the fourth in line heir to the throne, next only to Prince Charles, Prince William and Prince George. However, due to the change of the eldest son inheritance law, Princess Charlotte will be ahead of her new brother, although he is male
"5 the mother of three gave birth to her third child with Prince William on April 23, 2018. Photo source: Associated Press: Although Kate will not be queen, Princess Charlotte may have the title, just like her great grandmother Queen Elizabeth II. "
Although men are official spouses, they can be called princes, just like the queen and Prince Philip, although they can be called princes' spouses
With very few exceptions, all women who marry the monarch are called queens
"Kate, 37, will only have the title of queen, not become the queen of England as the monarch is now."
"Once Prince William succeeds to the throne and becomes king of England, Kate will become the Queen's spouse."



Number  737
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We have a suspicion that there's more than meets the eye when it comes to Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle's relationship.”
“Let's take a closer look at the royal women's bond, and figure out the truth about how these two duchesses really feel about one another.”
“After all, it's not exactly common to forge a friendship while leading lives in the spotlight and keeping up with royal traditions.”
“But how close are they really?”
“...royal events together and grown their respective families...”
“However Middleton and Markle had started getting to know one another back during the days of Markle and Harry s headline making engagement and they ve no doubt only continued to learn more about one another as they ve attended...”
“...to Prince William out of recent memory...”
“The Truth About Kate Middleton And Meghan Markle s Relationship Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle became sisters in law when the former Hollywood actress tied the knot with Prince Harry on May 19 2018 effectively bumping Middleton s 2011 wedding...”


"We suspect that there are different views on the relationship between Kate Middleton and Megan markel."
"Let's take a closer look at the ties between royal women and find out how the two Duchess really feel about each other."
"After all, living in the spotlight and keeping up with the royal tradition, building friendships is not common."
"But how close are they?"
“… The grand events of the royal family develop their respective families together... "
"However, Middleton and mark began to get to know each other on the day of mark and Harry's engagement. There is no doubt that they just continued to get to know each other when they joined..."
“… For the memory of Prince William... "
"The truth of the relationship between Kate Middleton and Megan markel Kate Middleton and Megan markel married Prince Harry on May 19, 2018, which has a strong impact on Middleton's wedding in 2011..."



Number  738
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Pepsi Griffin.”
“It's not even a firsthand report of hearing the statement.”
“At the same time, some wonder if they should trust an official statement.”
“That was crushing for many to hear.”
“"Kendall is not pregnant."”
“But many who may hope to see Kendall and Blake produce yet another beautiful grandchild for Kris Jenner to love and monetize, Gossip Cop reports that they have a statement on record from Kendall's representative.”
“If Kendall really is pregnant, it is widely expected that the baby daddy would be Blake Griffin.”
“As in, not from someone who could be directly traced to the knowledge, but from someone who heard it from a friend or coworker.”
“But ... some people have pointed out that probably is how something like this would leak.”
“We have stressed from the beginning that this is not confirmed.”


"Pepsi Griffin."
"It's not even the first-hand report of hearing the statement."
"At the same time, some people doubt whether they should believe the official statement."
"It's hard to hear for a lot of people."
"Kendall is not pregnant."
"But a lot of people may want to see Kendall and Blake have a beautiful grandson and let Chris Jenner love and make money. The gossip police report that they have Kendall's statement on record."
"If Kendall does get pregnant, it's generally believed that the baby's father will be Blake Griffin."
"For example, it's not from someone who goes directly back to knowledge, but from someone who hears from a friend or colleague."
"But... It has been pointed out that such things are likely to leak out. "
"We stressed from the beginning that this has not been confirmed."



Number  739
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo by Rich Fury/Getty Images...”
“Of course, Ryan Seacrest is a pro, so he congratulated the couple before adding that Julianne looked “stunning” in her wedding gown.”
“Of course, Ryan Seacrest dated the Dancing with the Stars pro Julianne Hough for 3 years, from 2010-2013 and there were rumors that Ryan was so in love that he planned to pop the question.”
“Instead, it was reported that Ryan was left heartbroken when Julianne ended their relationship because she wasn’t ready for marriage and that the couple’s age difference (Ryan is 14 years older) also played a factor in their split.”
“Although Ryan Seacrest seems to have moved on, it still has to be awkward to be forced to talk about the wedding of an ex, and to have to do it on live television.”
“But thanks to shady co-host, Kelly Ripa, Ryan had to do just that.”
“During Monday’s Live!”
“...show, the co-hosts were supposed to discuss the weddings of both Julianne Hough and fellow Dancing With the Stars alum Peta Murgatroyd to Maksim Chmerkovskiy, who also married this weekend.”
“Instead of letting Ryan talk about the wedding of Peta and Maksim, shady Kelly Ripa handed Ryan the picture of Julianne Hough’s wedding, forcing him to comment on Julianne’s wedding details.”
“Although he stumbled a bit when looking at a picture of the couple who married on a lake in Idaho, saying, “I know this family.”


"Rich fury / Getty Images..."
"Of course, Ryan Seacrest is a professional, so he congratulates the couple and then says that Julian looks" glamorous "in her wedding dress
"Of course, Ryan Seacrest and dancing with the stars professional Julian Hoff dated for three years. From 2010 to 2013, there were rumors that Ryan was very in love, so he planned to propose."
"On the contrary, it was reported that when Julian ended their relationship, Ryan was heartbroken because she was not ready to get married, and the age difference between the couple (Ryan was 14 years older than her) was also a factor in their breakup."
"Although Ryan Seacrest seems to have left, it's embarrassing to be forced to talk about his ex girlfriend's wedding and talk about it live on TV."
"But thanks to sherdy's co host, Kelly Ripa, Ryan had to do it."
"Live on Monday!"
“…… In the show, the co organizers were supposed to discuss the wedding of Julian Hoff and "dancing with the stars" alum petta mugartroyd to maxim chimmerkovsky, who also got married this weekend. "
"Instead of letting Ryan talk about PETA and Maxim's wedding, Sadie Kelly Ripa handed Ryan photos of Julian Hoff's wedding, forcing him to comment on the details of Julian's wedding."
"Although he was a bit stumbling when he saw a picture of a couple married by a lake in Idaho, he said," I know this family. “



Number  740
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six.”
“Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise.”
“A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date.”
“ABC News, which produces the program, declined to make executives available for comment.”
“Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension...”
“...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m...”
“The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays.”
“One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show.”
“ABC said earlier this year it would replace “The Chew” with the new “GMA” hour.”
““Good Morning America” enjoyed an afternoon presence in the not-too-distant past.”


"Details of the hosts for the third" GMA "hour have been reported before page 6."
"Josh Elliott and Laura Spencer co hosted a good afternoon America skit between July and September 2012 to test franchise expansion."
"A person familiar with the show confirmed the details of the host and revealed the start date of the show."
ABC News, which produced the show, declined to let executives comment
"The launch of the show will expand GMA's program from its morning schedule to the station's daily schedule, and allow ABC to make bigger packages for advertisers, just as NBC did in four hours today. This idea will also promote the development of LianBo company, because ABC can promote this expansion... "
“… In the GMA main broadcast between 7am and 9am... "
"The new hour is expected to be recorded, not live. It starts at 1 p.m. on weekdays."
"One of the scenes discussed in the new hour is to use the studio audience who live broadcast the flagship show at 8 a.m. every day."
ABC said earlier this year that it would replace "the chew" with a new "GMA" program
Good Morning America enjoyed an afternoon's existence in the near past



Number  741
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““All you want to do is hit a home run.””
““Baseball is just like life,” she said.”
“Jennifer Lopez is not in a hurry to walk down the aisle with Alex Rodriguez, but she does want to spend the rest of her life with someone.”
““I do believe in marriage,” the Shades of Blue actress, 48, told Harper’s Bazaar in a story published on Thursday, March 15.”
““And I would love to grow old with somebody in a committed relationship.”
“But I’m not forcing anything right now.”As far as her relationship with the 42-year-old former Yankees player, she said: “It’s good, it’s healthy; we communicate well.”
“We understand each other’s lives in a way that most other people couldn’t.”She added: “We both entered the public eye in our early twenties and overachieved right from the start.”
“And that affects every dynamic in your life, from your family to your work to your relationships.”
“We have a similar makeup.”The pair celebrated their anniversary in February in Minneapolis, where the singer performed a concert ahead of the Super Bowl.”
“During the show, she debuted her single “Us” written by Poo Bear and produced by Skrillex, and dedicated it to Rodriguez, who was in the audience.”


"You just want to hit a home run."
"Baseball is like life," she said
"Jennifer Lopez is not in a hurry to get married with Alex Rodriguez, but she does want to spend the rest of her life with someone."
"I do believe in marriage," the 48 year old "blue shadow" actress told Harper market in a report published on March 15 (Thursday)
"I also want to grow old with someone who has feelings."
"But I'm not forcing anything right now." On her relationship with the 42 year old former Yankee, she said: "it's good, it's healthy; we communicate well."
"Our understanding of each other's lives is beyond most people's comprehension," she added. "We all came into the public eye in our early 20s and made remarkable achievements from the beginning."
"It affects every aspect of your life, from family to work to relationships."
In February, the two celebrated their wedding anniversary in Minneapolis, where the singer gave a concert in front of the super bowl
During the performance, she released her first single "we", which was created by bear dung, produced by scrilex and dedicated to Rodriguez in the audience



Number  742
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Theresa May, the Prime Minister, announced the decision from the 53 Commonwealth Heads of Government after private deliberations at Windsor Castle on Friday.”
““Meanwhile, I will continue to support Her Majesty in every possible way, in the service of our unique family of nations."”
“"I am deeply touched and honoured by the decision of Commonwealth Heads of State and Government that I should succeed The Queen, in due course, as Head of the Commonwealth,” he said.”
“The Prince will take on the honorary position in the Commonwealth at the same time he eventually becomes King, following the “sincere wish” expressed by the Queen this week.”
“...institution...”
“The Prince of Wales will one day succeed the Queen to become the next Head of Commonwealth it was confirmed on Friday night after leaders reached an agreement to honour Her Majesty s vision duty and steadfast service to the...”


British Prime Minister Theresa May announced the decision of 53 Commonwealth Heads of government after private discussions at Windsor Castle on Friday
"At the same time, I will continue to do everything possible to support her majesty and serve our unique family of nations."
"I am deeply moved and honored that the heads of state and government of the Commonwealth have decided to replace the queen as head of the Commonwealth at an appropriate time," he said
"In accordance with the Queen's" sincere wish "expressed this week, the prince will eventually become king while holding an honorary post in the Commonwealth."
“… Organization... "
"The news that the prince of Wales will one day succeed the queen as the next head of the commonwealth was confirmed on Friday night after leaders reached an agreement to fulfill her Majesty's vision and commitment to "Our firm service."



Number  743
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Real.”
“Is.”
“...it comes to infidelities the onus most definitely falls on the guilty party to show and prove and JAY Z is clearly putting in that work to show Bey he s a changed man...”
“Lucky I ain t kill you when I met that b Nah aight aight Y all know how I met her we broke up and got back together To get her back I had to sweat her Translation While it takes two to achieve true forgiveness in a marriage when...”
“He went to Jared, I went to Chaumet out in ParisYeah, you fucked up the first stone, we had to get remarriedYo, chill manWe keepin’ it real with these people, right?”
“Let’s break it down, shall we?”
“The album’s final track “LOVEHAPPY” says it all.”
“If you listen closely to the lyrics, they’re telling us just how far they’ve come together, how much love and passion they still share for each other, and perhaps most importantly, how committed they are to making their marriage work.”
“On Saturday, the couple released a surprise album—their first-ever joint release—titled Everything Is Love, and they couldn’t have picked a more fitting title to describe the new place they’ve arrived at together.”
“But, as it seems, while fans were still reeling from the heartbreak of learning that the Carters, like so many other married couples, weren’t living the picture-perfect life they believed they were, Beyoncé and JAY-Z were pressing reset and putting in the work to save their marriage.”


"Really."
"Yes."
“…… When it comes to infidelity, the responsibility falls entirely on the guilty party, who has to prove and prove it, while jay z is obviously trying to prove to be that he is a reformed man.... "
"Fortunately, I didn't kill you. When I met that girl, you all know how I met her. We broke up and got together again. In order to get her back, I had to work hard for her interpreter. In marriage, only two people can get real forgiveness, when..."
"He went to Jared, I went to Georgette in Paris, you messed up the first stone, we have to remarry, calm down, we have a real relationship with these people, right?"
"Let's break it down, shall we?"
The album's last song, "love happy," says it all
"If you listen to the lyrics carefully, they tell us how far they have come together, how much love and passion they have for each other, and perhaps most importantly, their commitment to marriage."
"Last Saturday, the couple released a surprise album, their first ever joint release, called everything is love, and they chose the most appropriate name to describe the new place they came together."
"But it seems that fans are still heartbroken when they learn that the cartels, like many other married couples, have not lived the perfect life they think. Beyonce and Jay-Z are pressing the reset button and working to save their marriage."



Number  744
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jen and Brad were married since 2000 to 2005, when she presented the petition for divorce, where argued “irreconcilable differences”.”
“According to the magazine, “Justin agrees to be friends” and know that “Jen just wants to be nice”.”
“The funny thing was the reaction of Theroux, who is aware of the situation.”
“And she was enjoying her birthday in Cabo San Lucas, Mexico, when her ex sent the greeting.”
“In this context there is a detail that is relevant: Aniston is married to Justin Theroux, protagonist of the The Leftovers series.”
““Brad confided in Jen and told him that he was going through some complicated times by the divorce (with Angelina Jolie) and they exchanged some texts in which they recalled their past”, the anonymous source said.”
““They began to speak once he wished her a happy birthday”, they told the publication from their surroundings.”
“Of Hollywood...”
“The American publication ensures that the 53 year old actor sent a message to former Friends to greet her for her birthday and that since then there has been a dialogue between those who at one time shaped as one of the most solid and attractive couples in the world...”
“That reported the magazine US Weekly.”


Jan and Brad got married from 2000 to 2005, when she filed for divorce, proposing "irreconcilable differences."
According to the magazine, "Justin agreed to be a friend" and knew "Jane just wanted to be a good person."
"What's interesting is seru's reaction, he knows the situation."
On her birthday in Cabo San Lucas, Mexico, her ex girlfriend sent a greeting letter
"In this case, one detail is relevant: Aniston is married to Justin seru, the leading character in the leftover series."
"Brad confided to Jan and told him that after the divorce (with Angelina Jolie) he went through some complicated periods, they exchanged some text messages and recalled the past," the anonymous source said
"Once he wished her a happy birthday and they started talking," they told the magazine from the people around them
"Hollywood..."
"This American magazine made sure that the 53 year old actor sent a letter to her former friend congratulating her on her birthday, and from then on, the conversation began between those who had been molded into one of the strongest and most attractive couples in the world..."
"That's from American weekly."



Number  745
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Strong-willed Angelina Jolie is known for cutting ties with her family – ex-husband Brad Pitt included.”
“But after their tumultuous divorce, Jolie isn’t looking back in his direction.”
“Jolie’s estranged uncle Chip Taylor exclusively revealed to RadarOnline.com secrets of Jolie’s post-Pitt life and what men she has reconnected with.”
““It was out of the blue,” Taylor recalled to Radar, detailing the last time he saw Jolie in September.”
“Taylor received a phone call from his brother and Jolie’s father, Jon Voight with a “last minute” invitation to Jolie’s premiere of First They Killed My Father in New York City.”
““Jon called me and said, ‘Angie would like to know if you’d like to come tonight,'” Taylor continued.”
““I certainly wasn’t expecting it.”
“It was very, very good to see her.”Taylor dished to Radar that before the premiere, it had been “years and years” since he had seen or spoken to Jolie.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"The strong willed Angelina Jolie is known for breaking up with her family - including her ex husband Brad Pitt."
"But after their terrible divorce, Julie didn't look back at him any more."
Julie's separated uncle chip Taylor told reporters exclusively RadarOnline.com "The secret of Pete's life after Julie, and the men she's reconnected with."
"It was unexpected," Taylor recalled radar, detailing the last time he saw Julie in September
Taylor received a call from his brother and Julie's father Jon Voith, inviting him to attend the premiere of "the first he killed my father" in New York at the "last minute."
"Jon called me and said, 'Angie wants to know if you'd like to come tonight,'" Tyler continued
"Of course I didn't think of it."
"It's great to see her." Taylor told radar that before the premiere, he had "not seen or spoken to Julie for years."



Number  746
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A studio rep calls the figures "inaccurate" but declines further comment.”
“PHOTOS: Hollywood's 10 Highest-Paid ActressesRounding out the list is Tara Reid, who is said to have joined Reunion for close to the $250,000 that Universal initially offered.”
“...far less say sources most in the 500 000 to 750 000 range though bonuses for some could kick in if the film is a hit as expected...”
“PHOTOS How I Met Your Mother and Fall TV s Other Returning Shows The rest of the cast which includes Chris Klein Eddie Kaye Thomas Thomas Ian Nicholas Natasha Lyonne Jennifer Coolidge Mena Suvari and Shannon Elizabeth is being paid...”
“And veteran Eugene Levy, who starred in four profitable direct-to-DVD Pie films that helped make the property a billion-dollar franchise, is said to have received a payday also in the $3 million range.”
“Alyson Hannigan, star of CBS' How I Met Your Mother, is getting about $3 million.”
“PHOTOS: Hollywood's 10 Highest-Grossing ActorsAccording to sources, Universal is paying Jason Biggs and Seann William Scott a robust $5 million each, plus a small slice of first-dollar gross, to reprise their roles.”
“Then the studio played hardball with the actors, who have experienced mixed levels of success outside of the franchise.”
“Production on the $50 million film, which wrapped this summer in advance of an April 6 release, was moved to Georgia to take advantage of a generous tax credit.”
“VIDEO: 'American Reunion' Photo Montage Brings Back Old MemoriesHow the studio met those challenges is a study in prolonging a franchise on a sensible budget.”


A studio representative called the data "inaccurate" but declined to comment further
Photo: the top 10 Hollywood actresses are Tara Reid, who is said to have joined reunion for close to the $250000 universal initially offered
“… Needless to say, most of the sources are between 500000 and 750000, but if the film is as hot as expected, some people's bonuses may play a role... "
"How did I meet your mother's photos and other fall TV comeback actors, including Chris Klein, Eddie Kay, Thomas, Ian Nicholas, Natasha, Marion, Jennifer Coolidge, MENA suvary and Shannon Elizabeth's other being paid..."
"And veteran film star Eugene Levy, who starred in four profitable direct to DVD movies, helped the property get a $1 billion franchise and is said to be paid around $3 million."
"Alison Hannigan, who starred in how I met your mother on CBS, got about three million dollars."
"Photo: Hollywood's top 10 box office actors, according to sources, Universal Pictures paid Jason Biggs and Sean William Scott $5 million each, plus a small part of the first box office, to play their roles again."
"Then there was a fierce battle between the studio and the actors, who experienced varying degrees of success outside the franchise."
"The $50 million film, which was completed this summer before its release on April 6, was moved to Georgia to take advantage of the huge tax credit."
"Video: 'reunion of America' photo montage brings back old memory studio, how to deal with these challenges is a reasonable budget for a study to extend the franchise."



Number  747
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"[Justin] did have input on it, I wouldn’t say it was just all me."”
“...the GRAMMYs it just shows you that you shouldn t always write stuff off Sheeran didn t elaborate on what kind of touch Bieber had on the song but he made sure to give the Purpose singer some credit...”
“So going from a song that would have never been released to being the biggest song of last year it just became Billboard s 1 of 2016 of the whole year and was nominated for Song of the Year at...”
“"And then Justin took it and did his thing on it, and released it as a single and made it what it is.”
“It just wouldn’t have made it," Sheeran explained in an interview with Carson Daly on 97.1 AMP Radio Monday morning (Jan. 9).”
““That was a song I had written for Divide.”
“Without Bieber, though, the chart-topping tune would still be nonexistent -- or may have never even come to fruition.”
“It's no secret that Ed Sheeran had a hand in writing Justin Bieber's megahit "Love Yourself," but the British singer-songwriter recently revealed that the Biebs actually wasn't the original artist in mind when he penned it.”


"(Justin) Yes, I don't think it's all my opinion."
“… The Grammy Awards just told you that you shouldn't always write things. Sheeran didn't elaborate on what kind of touch Bieber had on this song, but he must give some credit to the target singer... "
"So, from a song that has never been released to the biggest song of last year, this song has just become the billboard s 1 of 2016, and He won the song of the year nomination. "
"Then Justin took it, did his own thing, released it as a single, and made it what it is now."
"It's not going to work at all," Sheeran explained in an interview with Carson Daly's 97.1 amp radio on Monday morning
"That's a song I wrote to divide."
"But without Bieber, the number one song on this list will still be gone - and may never even have a result."
"It's no secret that ED Sheeran was involved in Justin Bieber's masterpiece love yourself, but the British singer and songwriter recently revealed that Bieber was not the original artist in his mind when he created this work."



Number  748
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The family is currently gearing up for the Steve Irwin Gala Dinner in Los Angeles on May 5.”
“As for the patriarch of the Irwin family Steve who died in September 2006 after being stung by a stingray while filming a documentary was honored with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame on Thursday April 26”
“Bindi later told Entertainment Tonight she knew Powell was the one after he put on a khaki Australia Zoo uniform saying It was kind of one of those moments that was a real defining moment for me only the people who are the closest to us that get their khakis...”
“So permission granted and it’s been wonderful ever since.”The happy couple debuted their romance in September 2015 at a taping for season 21 of Dancing With the Stars.”
“And I thought, who does that?”
“...to keep in touch with the Dancing With the Stars winner after meeting at her family s zoo has her seal of approval Chandler had his brother contact the zoo to ask my permission if Chandler could stay in touch with Bindi...”
“So for us in our relationship we re enjoying this moment and having so much fun traveling the world working with animals following our passion of conservation and just being together Bindi s mother Terri Irwin also told Us why the 21 year old who went out of his way...”
““As young people, it’s all about school and then college and then getting a house and getting married and that’s fantastic, but sometimes we forget to live in the now,” Bindi explained.”
“For us, we’re just enjoying this time.”The wildlife conservationist — who followed in the footsteps of her late father Steve Irwin — says that despite finding the “one”, she believes the couple should be focusing on enjoying their youth.”
“...s all very exciting...”


"The family is currently preparing for the Steve Owen dinner in Los Angeles on May 5."
"As for Steve, the head of the Irving family, who was stung by a stingray while filming a documentary, died in September 2006 and was named a star on the Hollywood Walk of fame on April 26 (Thursday)," he said
"Bingdi later told tonight's entertainment show that she knew Powell was the one who wore the Khaki Australian zoo uniform. She said that this was a really decisive moment for me. Only the closest people could wear Khaki Pants..."
In September 2015, the happy couple showed off their relationship for the first time in the recording of season 21 of dance with the stars
"Who did it, I think?"
“… In order to keep in touch with the winner of "dancing with the stars" who met in her zoo, Chandler got her approval. He asked his brother to contact the zoo and asked me if Chandler could keep in touch with Bingdi... "
"So, in our relationship, we enjoy this moment, the pleasure of traveling around the world with animals, our passion for protecting animals, and being with benty's mother, Terri Owen, who also tells us why benty, 21, is desperate to..."
"As young people, it's all about going to school, then going to college, then buying a house and getting married, which is great, but sometimes we forget about our life now," Bingdi explained
"For us, we're just enjoying the time." The wildlife activist, who followed in the footsteps of her late father, Steve Irwin, said that despite finding "one," she believed the couple should focus on enjoying their youth
“… It's all exciting... "



Number  749
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It shows she’s been accepted as a good companion for Prince Harry.”
““It shows the Queen is being accepting of who Meghan is and what she’s done with her life and I think that’s amazing,” he says.”
“He said he and brother Tyler, 24, “have always been supportive of her and always cherished what she was doing with her life.”
“I believe it was fate they fell for each other and I wish them both the best,” he says.”
““She is a lovely, warm and caring person and she seems super happy with Prince Harry.”
““It’s just a shame her own family are making up stories about her.”Thomas, who lives in a small mountain town in ­California, says he longs to see Meghan again.”
““I want people to know I have nothing to do with it and just apologise to her.”
“His behaviour since Meghan began dating Prince Harry has been completely appalling.”
““Me and my brother Tyler have nothing to do with our dad.”
“I feel terrible for Meghan.”


"It shows that she has been accepted as a good companion by Prince Harry."
"It shows that the queen is accepting who Megan is and what she has done to her life, and I think it's amazing," he said
He said he and his 24-year-old brother Taylor "have always supported her and cherished what she has done."
"I believe they are meant to be and I wish them both well," he said
"She is a lovely, warm and loving person. She seems to be very happy with Prince Harry."
"It's a pity that her own family is making up stories about her." Thomas, who lives in a small mountain town in California, said he would love to see Megan again
"I want people to know that I have nothing to do with it, just to apologize to her."
"Megan's behavior has been completely appalling since he started dating Prince Harry."
"My brother Taylor and I have nothing to do with our father."
"I feel sorry for Megan."



Number  750
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she’s the odd one out?”
“AdvertisementAre you surprised Kendall doesn’t want to be a mother anytime soon or not?”
“And seeing as Blake has two beautiful children already, she does not see him pushing for more kids in the near future either,’ our insider stated.”
“But at the moment, Kendall’s having a ball with her boy toy Blake Griffin.”
“Whenever she feels she is ready to write that chapter of her life, she will see what happens.”
“‘Kendall can do whatever she wants and is not limited to having to care for a baby.”
“...age...”
“She is not the odd woman out that is for sure It s not like she doesn t like kids in fact she is very fond of them especially her sisters little ones but she values her free time way too much to become responsible for another life at her...”
“As far as she is concerned, she is more than happy to be the coolest aunt who spoils her nieces and nephews and gives them back to their mommies.”
“‘Kendall does not feel left out at all about being the only Kardashian-Jenner sister who won’t have a child.”


"Do you think she's a weirdo?"
"Are you surprised Kendall doesn't want to be a mother in the short term?"
"Given that Blake has two beautiful children, she doesn't think he will fight for more in the near future," our insider said
"But now Kendall is playing with her boy toy, black Griffin."
"Every time she feels ready to write that chapter of her life, she sees what's going to happen."
"Kendall can do whatever she wants, not just take care of the children."
“… Age... "
"She's not a strange woman, that's for sure. It's not that she doesn't like children. In fact, she likes them very much, especially her sister and children. But she values her spare time so much that she can't be responsible for her other life..."
"As far as she is concerned, she is very happy to be the coolest aunt, spoiling nieces and nephews and giving them back to their mothers."
"As Kardashian Jenner's only sister without children, Kendall didn't feel left out at all."



Number  751
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She later dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer after her divorce from Pitt.”
“”The couple announced that they split at the end of the last year, however, they celebrated the New Year together with their annual vacation to Cabo San Lucas, Mexico alongside a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“She was spotted standing outside the Hollywood venue chatting with Pharrell.”
“On Saturday, Aniston made an appearance at Ellen DeGeneres‘ birthday party without Theroux.”
“They have also had a busy year as Aniston signed on with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and filmed Dumplin’ in Atlanta, while Theroux, 46, filmed the comedy The Spy Who Dumped Me in Budapest.”
“Theroux was often spotted in New York City away from their L.A. home.”
“The two spent quite a bit of time apart in recent months raising questions.”
“Image zoom Pharrell and Jennifer Aniston at Ellen DeGeneres’ birthday.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”
“Aniston celebrated in Malibu, California with a gathering including pals Courteney Cox, Andrea Bendewald, Leigh Kilton-Smith and Kristin Hahn on Sunday.”


"Then she divorced Pete and dated Vince Vaughn and John Mayer."
"The couple announced that they broke up at the end of last year. However, they celebrated the new year together, went on holiday in San Lucas, Cabo, Mexico, and had several close friends, including Jason Bateman and his family."
"She was found standing outside the Hollywood meeting and chatting with Farrell."
"Last Saturday, Aniston showed up at Ellen DeGeneres' birthday party without seru."
Aniston signed up with Reese Witherspoon for a new Apple TV series and "Dun Prince" in Atlanta, while serrux, 46, made the comedy "the spy who left me in Budapest."
"Theroux is often found in New York City, far from Los Angeles."
"In recent months, the two have been separated for quite a long time and raised some questions."
"Zoom in on Farrell and Jennifer Aniston's birthday at Ellen DeGeneres."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
On Sunday, Aniston held a celebration in Malibu, California, with friends including Courtney Cox, Andrea bendwald, Lee kilton Smith and Christine Hahn



Number  752
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’ll keep you posted on with members of the Kardashian fam do make an appearance — if any!”
“Kourtney Kardashian, 38, will reportedly go.”
“The event takes place one year after she was robbed at gunpoint at her luxury apartment in Paris, France.”
“Kardashian has said the experience was traumatic for her.”
“Paris Fashion Week started on September 26 and will end on October 3, the anniversary of Kardashian's robbery.”
“Kim Kardashian was robbed at gunpoint at her luxury apartment in Paris on October 3, and one year later, she’s understandably NOT interested in attending Paris Fashion Week.”
“Kim Kardashian, 36, "will not" be in Paris for Fashion Week this fall, as a source tells Us Weekly in a September 25 report.”
“Her sister Kendall Jenner, 21, will also not be walking or attending, the insider claims.”
“As we know, Kim was gagged and robbed at gunpoint in the early hours of Oct. 3, 2016, at her luxury apartment in the Hôtel de Pourtalès.”
“Paris Fashion Week starts today, September 26, and goes through October 3.”


"We'll keep you informed of any members of the Kardashian family, and if there are any, be sure to show up!"
"It is reported that Courtney Kardashian, 38, will leave."
"It happened a year after she was robbed with a gun in a luxury apartment in Paris, France."
"Kardashian said the experience was traumatic for her."
"Paris fashion week starts on September 26 and ends on October 3, the anniversary of Kardashian's capture."
"It's understandable that Kim Kardashian was not interested in Paris fashion week a year after she was robbed of her luxury apartment in Paris on October 3."
Kim Kardashian, 36, will not be in Paris for this fall's fashion week, a source told us in a weekly on September 25th
Kendall Jenner, her 21-year-old sister, will also not walk or participate in activities, people familiar with the matter said
"As far as we know, in the early hours of October 3, 2016, Kim was robbed with a gun in his luxury apartment in H ô Tel de pourtal è s."
"Paris fashion week starts today, September 26, and lasts until October 3."



Number  753
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“3 is here!”
“Kate Middleton and Prince William welcomed their third child on Monday, April 23 at 11:01 a.m. in the Lindo Wing at St. Mary’s hospital.”
“Just like when Prince George and Princess Charlotte were born, the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge stopped for a few quick photos in front of the hospital before they returned to Kensington Palace with their new prince.”
“Duchess Kate wore a red dress with a white lace collar by Jenny Packham, making this the third time she’s worn a bespoke dress by the British designer for her post-birth appearances.”
“Getty ImagesThe red dress appeared to be a nod to the outfit Princess Diana wore when she introduced Prince Harry to the world in 1984.”
“Both dresses were bright red with a white Peter Pan collar.”
“Getty ImagesThis wasn't the first time Kate paid homage to her late mother-in-law after giving birth.”
“Kate introduced Prince George to the world in July 2013 wearing a short-sleeved blue dress by Jenny Packham that nodded to the polka-dot dress Princess Diana wore when leaving the hospital with Prince William three decades earlier.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Here comes the third!"
Kate Middleton and Prince William greet their third child at 11:01 a.m. on Monday, April 23, on the Lindau floor of St. Mary's hospital
"Just like when Prince George and Princess Charlotte were born, the Duchess of Cambridge stopped in front of the hospital to take a quick picture before taking the new prince back to Kensington Palace."
"The Duchess of Kate is wearing a red dress with a white lace collar designed by Jennie parkham. It's the third time that she's wearing a dress made for her postpartum appearance by the British designer."
"Getty Images this red dress seems to be a tribute to the dress Princess Diana wore when she introduced Prince Harry to the world in 1984."
"Both clothes are bright red, and a white Peter Pan collar."
"It's not the first time Kate has paid tribute to her late mother-in-law after giving birth."
In July 2013, Kate introduced Prince George to the world. Wearing a short sleeve blue skirt, Jane Packham wore a polka dot skirt to Princess Diana when she left Prince William hospital three years ago.



Number  754
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her name is Kim!” Then he added, “That show ain’t going to last two weeks.””
“Simpson, Riccio said, spotted the show and said, “That’s my goddaughter.”
“According to Inside Edition, O.J.”
“Simpson—who is up for parole this October after serving the first nine years of a 33-year prison sentence on 12 charges, including kidnapping and armed robbery—has received comparatively cushy treatment while incarcerated.”
“He has even found a new favorite show.”
“You may have heard of it: Keeping Up with the Kardashians.”
“A former prison guard told the newsmagazine that Simpson “likes Keeping Up with the Kardashians.” More specifically: “He likes to keep up with all the gossip with them.”Last year, The People vs. O.J.”
“Simpson: American Crime Story illuminated the ties between the Simpson family and the Kardashian clan for casual fans who may not have been aware of their connection—largely helped by David Schwimmer’s “Juice!”-y performance as the late Kardashian patriarch, Robert.”
“Robert, father of Kim, Kourtney, Khloé, and Rob Kardashian, was one of Simpson’s best friends; his first wife (and the mother of his children), Kris, was very close with the slain Nicole Brown Simpson.”
“(Regrettably, Simpson has not seen American Crime Story, reports Inside Edition, “because the prison doesn’t get the FX network.”)At the time A.C.S.”


"Her name is Kim! "That show won't last two weeks," he added
"Simpson," Riccio said, found the show and said, "that's my goddaughter."
"According to the build, O.J."
Simpson, who served 33 years on 12 counts including kidnapping and armed robbery, will be released on parole in October after serving his first nine years. He was treated with relative ease during his imprisonment
"He even found a new and most popular show."
"You may have heard: keep up with Kardashian."
A former C.O. told news that Simpson "likes to keep in touch with the kardashians." More specifically, "he likes to keep in touch with the kardashians." Last year, the people and O.J
Simpson: the American crime story reveals the connection between the Simpson family and the Kardashian family. For ordinary fans who may not know their connection, this is largely due to David schweimer's juice! "As the patriarch of the late Kardashian, Robert, he was an amazing performance."
Robert is the father of Kim, Courtney, Heroe and rob Kardashian, and one of Simpson's best friends; his first wife (and mother of the child), Chris, is closely related to the murdered Nicole Brown Simpson
"It's a pity that Simpson didn't see the crime stories in the United States, the internal Journal reported," because there is no foreign exchange network in the prison. " At that time, a.c.s



Number  755
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Blake was sending Miranda a message with the song?”
“While working on The Voice that fall, Blake and Gwen bonded over their mutual heartbreak, and they’ve been happily in love ever since!”
““She’s confident Blake has no leftover feelings for Miranda.”Blake and Miranda abruptly divorced in July 2015, and just one month later, Gwen ended her marriage to Gavin Rossdale.”
““[Gwen] had absolutely no problem [with the song choice],” OK!’s source reveals.”
“Meanwhile, Blake’s girlfriend, Gwen Stefani, 47, didn’t join him, but she took to Instagram to reveal she was watching his performance from home.”
“It seems show producers made certain Miranda and Blake would not have an awkward run-in at the awards ceremony — he skipped the red carpet, while she walked with Anderson, and their seats were not near each other.”
“The mag claims Blake intentionally sang the track to send Miranda a message for ‘closure,’ however, HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned that the song choice was not calculated — Blake was simply singing his current single.”
““Miranda kept her cool during the performance, but it was really uncomfortable for her, especially with Anderson [there].” Eventually, though, she felt “touched” by what she heard.”
““No one [in the audience] quite knew where to look,” the source explains.”
“Cameras made sure not to cut to Miranda while Blake was onstage (it’s not even confirmed if she was in her seat at the time), but the mag claims she initially felt a bit awkward when the 40-year-old started singing.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think black is sending a message to Miranda?"
"In the production of the voice of autumn, black and Gwen had an indissoluble bond because of each other's heartbreak, and they have been happily in love ever since!"
"She believes black has no legacy of affection for Miranda." Blake and Miranda suddenly divorced in July 2015. Just one month later, Gwen ended his marriage to Gavin Rossdale
"[Gwen] absolutely no problem (song selection)," OK! The source of the message is displayed
"Meanwhile, Gwen Stefani, Blake's 47 year old girlfriend, did not join him, but revealed on instagram that she was at home watching Blake's performance."
"It seems that the producers have made sure Miranda and Blake won't run in awkwardly at the awards ceremony - he jumped the red carpet and she went with Anderson, and their seats are not close."
"The magazine claimed that Blake deliberately sang this song to send a" end "message to Miranda. He learned exclusively that the choice of this song was not calculated - Blake was just singing his current single."
"Miranda kept calm during the performance, but it was really uncomfortable for her, especially Anderson." however, in the end, she felt "moved" by what she heard
"No one (the audience) knows where to look," the source explained
"When black was on stage, the camera made sure it didn't cut into Miranda (not even sure if she was in her seat at the time), but the magazine said that when Miranda, 40, started singing, she initially felt a little embarrassed."



Number  756
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Politically vocal actors Mark Ruffalo and Jane Fonda sent messages of love and unity to protestors, while the likes of the Jane Goodall Institute, Bernie Sanders, Alyssa Milano, and Kerry Washington shared calls to action and messages of gratitude.”
“While tens of thousands of demonstrators joined marches around the world, activists, politicians, and actors expressed their support of today’s march on Twitter.”
“DiCaprio joined indigenous leaders to speak out against the devastating effects climate change is already having on native lands.”
“Leonardo DiCaprio and Lee Pace were among other celebrities showing their support for the cause.”
“He tweeted a call to action, referencing his climate change documentary An Inconvenient Truth (and its follow-up, An Inconvenient Sequel: Truth to Power, in theaters July 28) with the hashtag #BeInconvenient and encouraging his followers to stream the march live.”
“Environmental activist and former vice president Al Gore was among marching in Washington Saturday.”
“While the March for Science was dominated by scientists and researchers, the Climate March features labor activists, indigenous peoples affected by climate change, and more.”
“The Climate March focuses specifically on climate change and urging the world to take climate justice seriously.”
“...organizers and participants stress their overlapping yet different aims...”
“The march comes on the heels of Friday s announcement that the Environmental Protection Agency will remove a page on the science of climate change from its website while it is under review Saturday s demonstration comes just one week after Earth Day and a global March for Science but...”


"Politically speaking actors mark rufaro and Jane Fonda sent a message of love and unity to the protestors, while Jane Goodall Institute, Bernie Sanders, Eliza Milano and Kerry Washington shared a call for action and a message of thanks."
"When tens of thousands of protestors from all over the world joined the March, activists, politicians and actors tweeted their support for today's March."
"DiCaprio, together with indigenous leaders, has spoken out against the devastating impact of climate change on indigenous lands."
"Celebrities like Leonardo DiCaprio and Lee pace have expressed their support for the cause."
"He called for action on twitter, citing the label of his climate change documentary inconvenient truth (and its follow-up inconvenient sequel: truth to power, released on July 28) as" beinvenient "and encouraging his followers to travel live."
"Gore, an environmental activist and former vice president, took part in the march in Washington on Saturday."
"Although science parades are led by scientists and researchers, climate parades are characterized by labor activists, indigenous peoples affected by climate change, and so on."
"The Climate March pays special attention to climate change and urges the world to take climate justice seriously."
“…… Organizers and participants emphasize their overlapping but different goals... "
"The March follows Friday's announcement that the EPA will remove a page on climate change science from its website, which is under review. Saturday's demonstration was held a week after Earth Day and the global science March, but... "



Number  757
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The only thing this story is missing is Brad Ross-ing out on Jen and justifying banging Jolie with "We were on a break!"”
““And they’ve been helping each other through their respective troubles.”Look, we suppose there's a possibility this is really happening, but it all sounds a little too close to what magazines like In Touch and Life & Style would want to happen for it to be entirely believable.”
“His first wife, Jennifer Aniston, is very much not single, having married Justin Theroux in 2015.”
“But that hasn't stopped the tabloid press from reporting that the old flames are eager to rekindle their romance.”
“Of course, for these two A-listers to get back together, that means the pesky C-lister getting in their way will need to be disposed of.”
“Thus, gossip columnists the world over are employing the trick most often used by screenwriters of romantic comedies in which one half of the meet-cute pair is already taken.”
“Yes, they're leaning hard on the "Uh, her husband is a douche and they were already having problems before the hero entered the picture" narrative.”
“According to Life & Style, Jen and Justin have spent most of the past year apart.”
“The magazine claims they only recently reunited for a New Year's Eve trip to Mexico ... and they brought a huge group of friends along to make the situation less awkward.”
““They chose to go with friends during this particularly difficult time during their marriage.”


"The only thing missing in this story is that Brad Ross is furious with Jen and uses" we're resting! " To prove the relationship with Julie. "
"They help each other in their own troubles." Listen, we think it's really possible, but it all sounds a little too close to what magazines like contact and life and fashion want to do, so it's totally believable
"His first wife, Jennifer Aniston, was not single and married Justin Theroux in 2015."
"But that doesn't stop the tabloid press from reporting the desire for a resurgence."
"Of course, to get these two first-line stars back together, it means that the annoying first-line stars who get in their way need to be dealt with."
As a result, gossip columnists all over the world are using the most common tricks used by romantic comedy writers. In this comedy, half of a lovely couple are already married
"Yes, they tend to" Er, her husband is a fool, they have problems before the protagonist enters the picture. "
"According to lifestyle, Jane and Justin have been separated for most of the past year."
"The magazine claims that they recently reunited in Mexico on New Year's Eve... They also brought a large group of friends to reduce the embarrassment. "
"They choose to go with their friends at a particularly difficult time in their marriage."



Number  758
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below.”
““Jennifer thinks it’s hilarious that Drake is name-checking her in one of his songs, and kind of cute in a way,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“When Drake, 31, surprised fans on Friday night by dropping 2 brand-new tracks, he also let the world know he regrets losing Jennifer Lopez, 48, to her current boyfriend Alex Rodriguez, 42!”
““2010 was when I lost my halo, 2017 I lost a J. Lo,” he raps on his new track “Diplomatic Immunity.” Whoa!”
“But honestly, it’s hard to believe anyone would let J.”
“Lo get away!”
“Now, thanks to our insiders, we’re learning how the songstress is responding to the admission!”
“Head here for loads more photos of Jennifer looking unbelievable!”
““As far as she’s concerned, Drake was just a casual fling and a booty call, and not the real deal like Alex.” Just days ago, Jennifer and Alex were spotted sharing a kiss while attending the Duke vs. Miami College basketball game.”


"Please let us know in the comments section below."
"Jennifer thinks it's funny that Drake looks up her name in one of his songs, and it's cute to some extent," a source told reporters
"Here are all the exclusive details!"
"When Drake, 31, surprised fans by releasing two new songs on Friday night, he also let the world know that he regretted losing 48 year old Jennifer Lopez, whose current boyfriend is Alex Rodriguez, 42 years old!"
"2010 is when I lost my aura, 2017 is when I lost a J.Lo," he says in his new song, diplomatic immunity. "Wow
"But to be honest, it's hard to believe that anyone will let J
"Get out of here!"
"Now, thanks to our insiders, we know how the female singer responded to the admission!"
"Come here and see a picture of Jennifer. It's unbelievable!"
"As far as she is concerned, Drake is just a casual indulgence and a bargain, not a real deal like Alex." Just a few days ago, Jennifer and Alex were found kissing during a basketball game between Duke and Miami



Number  759
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is with husband Justin...”
“The trip is going to be a blast claims the source who adds I imagine Brad and Jen will steal private moments to they can have some emotional heart to hearts Reps for both Brad and Jen have denied Star s story and Jen has long said how happy she...”
“The magazine claims that Jen has booked a $10,000 a night chalet featuring multiple fireplaces and hot tubs.”
“Jen thought it was genius.”
“‘He pointed out that they could even hit the slopes together, since no one would recognise them in their ski masks, goggles and helmets.”
“‘He said he could fly over in his private jet and meet up with her there.”
“‘When Jen mentioned that she was planning to go skiing with friends in Aspen after New Year’s, a light bulb went off in Brad’s head,’ claims Star’s source.”
“While she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems there is room for Brad.”
“‘Jen has been a real source of comfort and strength for Brad, and during their long talks, they realised just how strong their bond still is.’The publication goes on to claim that the duo have arranged to meet up on a skiing break.”
“‘They’ve been growing closer ever since Jen reached out to Brad after his split from Ange,’ a source told Star.”


“… With her husband Justin... "
"This trip will be an explosive source of information who added that I think Brad and Jane will steal private moments, they can have some emotional heart for Brad and Jane to represent the story of denying the star, and Jane has long said how happy she is..."
"Zhan ordered a $10000 cabin with multiple fireplaces and hot tubs," the magazine said
"Jane thinks it's a genius."
He pointed out that they could even go uphill together because no one would recognize them wearing ski masks, goggles and helmets
"He said he could take a private plane and meet her there."
"When Jennifer mentioned that she was going skiing with her friends in Aspen after the new year, a light bulb suddenly fell out of Brad's head," the Star source said
"Although she will be accompanied by close friends, it seems that Brad still has room."
"Jennifer is Brad's real source of comfort and strength, and in their long talk, they realize that their relationship is still strong." The magazine went on to say that the two arranged to meet during the ski break
A source told the star: "since Jennifer and Angie broke up, her relationship with Brad has become closer and closer."



Number  760
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ve been feeling super anxious … but I don’t want the kids to not have their dad there.”In the end, Scott and Younes both attended, and even Caitlyn was invited, though she skipped out on the festivities.”
“(He’s been dating Sofia Richie since the fall.)”
“On Sunday night’s episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians, things were still tense between Kim and Khloé and eldest sibling Kourtney.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““We really haven’t resolved anything with Kourtney since the therapy sessions.”
“We have so much more to hash out,” Kim told the camera, adding that she felt like they were all “walking on egg shells.”Making things worse?”
“Kourtney didn’t want Scott Disick, the father of her three children, invited to Kris’ annual blowout — because then-boyfriend Younes Bendjima would be there.”
““He’s still part of our family,” Kris insisted.”
““What about my dad?” Kendall Jenner interjected, referring to Caitlyn Jenner, who’d fallen out with Kris and the Kardashian girls following the publication of her explosive memoir.”
““Nobody thats coming would even know how to respond to her,” Kris argued, adding that she has a friendly relationship with Scott and wanted him present.”


"I always feel very anxious But I don't want the children's dad not there In the end, Scott and younes both attended, and even Caitlin was invited, even though she didn't attend the celebration
"(he's been dating Sophia Ritchie since the fall.)
"On Sunday night's" keep up with Kardashian, "the relationship between Kim Jong Il and Heroe, as well as his elder brother kurtni, is still tense."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Since the treatment, we really haven't solved any problems with Courtney."
"We still have a lot of things to work out," Kim told the camera, adding that she felt they were all "walking on eggshells" to make things worse? "
"Courtney didn't want her father of three, Scott Disick, to be invited to Chris's annual feast because her then boyfriend, yones benjima, would be there."
"He's still a member of our family," Chris insisted
"What about my father? "Kendall Jenner interjected that she was referring to Caitlin Jenner, who fell out with Chris and the girls in the Kardashian family after the publication of her memoir."
"No one will know how to respond to her," Chris argued, adding that she had a friendly relationship with Scott and wanted him to be present



Number  761
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Turns out it was Priscilla Presley after surgery!” Scroll down to see her transformation over the years.”
“Following her last appearance on Lorraine in 2016, a viewer likened her to “Frankenstein’s monster.” Another wrote, “Flicking through channels on TV and thought I saw a Lizard being interviewed on Lorraine.”
“Unfortunately, this isn’t the first time Priscilla has been subjected to nasty comments online.”
“Some of his injections caused lumps, paralysis, and holes in his clients’ faces.”
“Ms. Presley dealt with this matter years ago and everything is now well.”Serrano, who wasn’t even licensed to practice medicine in the U.S., was deported to Argentina after serving 18 months in federal prison.”
““An investigation which uncovered his misconduct ultimately lead to his imprisonment.”
““Priscilla Presley was one of many documented victims of Dr. [Daniel] Serrano,” the actress’ rep previously shared.”
“Her spokesperson previously claimed that she unknowingly had industrial low-grade silicone — similar to what mechanics use to grease car parts — injected into her face.”
“...from a horror movie on ITV Lorraine The mother of two has spoken out about botched cosmetic procedures in the past...”
“Priscilla Presley what happened to aging gracefully one person wrote on Twitter while another said What has Priscilla Presley done to her face looks like she has a scary mask on A third person added Priscilla Presley looking like something...”


"It was Priscilla Presley after the operation! "Scroll down and see how she has changed over the years."
"After her last appearance in Lorraine in 2016, one audience compared her to" Frankenstein's monster. ". Another viewer wrote, "browsing the channel on TV, thinking I saw a lizard interviewed in Lorraine."
"Unfortunately, this is not the first time Priscilla has received bad reviews online."
Some of his injections resulted in lumps, paralysis and holes in the patient's face
"Ms. Presley dealt with this a few years ago and everything is fine now." Serrano, who did not even have a license to practice medicine in the United States, was deported to Argentina after serving 18 months in a federal prison
"The investigation into his misconduct eventually led to his imprisonment."
"Priscilla Presley is one of the many victims of [Daniel] Serrano," the actress's representative once said
"Her spokesman previously claimed that she had unwittingly injected low-grade industrial silicone into her face - similar to the silicone used by mechanics to lubricate car parts."
“…… In a horror film by the British Independent Television Station Lorraine channel, the mother of two children once said publicly that the plastic surgery procedure in the past was very bad... "
"Priscilla Presley is gracefully aging. What's going on?" one tweeted. Another tweeted about what Priscilla Presley did to her face. It looks like she's wearing a terrible mask on a third person, adding, "what does Priscilla Presley look like..."



Number  762
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As KUWTK fans may have noticed, she still likes an organized closet—but she’s only got time for her own now.”
“She has been known to toss Paris a #tbt.”
“Kim and Paris were besties-slash-colleagues until 2007, when Kim struck out on her own with Keeping Up With the Kardashians.”
“Paris turned to Kim and the world shifted a bit on its axis.”
“In 2006, reality TV’s original heiress was in need of a closet organizer and a friend who would be willing to tag along on photo ops.”
“It’s been 10 years since Kim Kardashian came into our lives, and we have Paris Hilton to thank.”


"As kuwtk fans may have noticed, she still likes a well-organized wardrobe, but now she has only her own time."
"Everyone knows she's going to throw TBTs at Paris."
"Kim and Paris were close colleagues until 2007, when Kim went out on his own to keep up with the kardashians."
"Paris turned to Kim Jong Il, and the world changed a little bit on its axis."
"In 2006, the original successor of reality TV needs a wardrobe organizer and a friend who is willing to take part in the photo taking activities."
"It's been 10 years since Kim Kardashian came into our lives, and we want to thank Paris Hilton."



Number  763
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image Credit: Getty Images...”
“In the meantime, don’t forget to check back with CDL for all the latest news and updates on Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner right here!”
“In fact, the talk show host and comedienne was spotted partying with newly single Jennifer Garner in Hollywood.”
“The two friends dined at hotspot Giogio Baldi in Santa Monica, which just happens to be the same place Jen’s ex-husband Ben Affleck and his new girlfriend Lindsay Shookus had their dinner date last weekend.”
“Earlier reports indicated that Chelsea Handler and Jennifer Aniston parted ways several months ago over a dispute The two ladies haven’t’ been seen with each other in months.”
“But that doesn’t seem to both Chelsea, as she’s managed to find a new, single actress in Hollywood to call her best female friend: Jennifer Garner.”
“The two ladies seemed to be in good spirits as Chelsea walked closely and rather protectively behind Jennifer as they exited the restaurant.”
“This new friendship means that Jennifer has someone new to confide in.”
“Many reports indicated that Jennifer knew that Ben was hooking up with Lindsay while the ex-couple were still married and even confronted Lindsay about the affair two years ago.”
“Of course, a lot of Jennifer Garner’s fans can’t help but wonder why she would suddenly hang out with someone like Chelsea Handler right now.”


"Photo source: Getty pictures..."
"At the same time, don't forget to check with CDL here for all the latest news and updates about Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner!"
"In fact, the talk show host and comedian was photographed in Hollywood having a party with new single Jennifer Garner."
"The two friends are dining in giogiogio Baldi, a hot spot in Santa Monica, where Jen's ex husband Ben Affleck and his new girlfriend Lindsay shookus dated for dinner last weekend."
"Earlier reports showed that Chelsea Handler and Jennifer Aniston broke up because of a dispute a few months ago. The two ladies haven't seen each other for months
"But it doesn't seem like two chelses because she managed to find a new, single actress in Hollywood who calls her best female friend: Jennifer Garner."
"When Chelsea got very close, the two ladies seemed to be in good spirits. When they came out of the restaurant, they walked behind Jennifer protectively
"This new friendship means that Jennifer has new people to talk to."
"Many reports show that Jennifer knows that Ben and Lindsay got together when the first two were still married, and even confronted Lindsay about it two years ago."
"Of course, a lot of fans of Jennifer Garner can't help wondering why she's suddenly with people like Chelsea Handler now."



Number  764
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They were married for two years after tying the knot in secret in 2015”
“But the pair were pictured on holiday a New Year holiday in Mexico, showing they were still in close contact.”
“This Morning's Martin Lewis left shaken as anti-vaxxers spew racist abuseAccording to Jen and Justin's statement, they split up at the end of the year, before the pictures were taken.”
“...be a paramedic FAMILY UNIT MAFS Australia s Cyrell Paule is now a mum with Love Island s Eden Dally GREATLY MISSED Father Ted star dies suddenly aged 67 how dare you...”
“STRICTLY OFF Strictly heartbreak for Ranvir as Giovanni says there s no way he d date her COWELL AND ABOUT Simon Cowell shows off 4 stone weight loss as he braves sub zero in London Exclusive WHAT S UP DOC Katie Price lands new documentary series where she learns to...”
“5 Jennifer Aniston was reportedly not happy about the pictures Credit Getty Contributor 5 The couple announced their split yesterday Credit Getty Contributor 5 They called their separation loving and insisted they will cherish their friendship Credit EPA Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have split Most Read In TV Showbiz...”
“Justin and Naomi have been friends for 16 years since they starred in David Lynch's cult 2001 movie Mulholland Drive.”
“At the time the National Enquirer reported the actress was not happy about the snaps.”
“However, the National Enquirer claimed the snaps upset Jen.”
“5 The pair have been friends for 16 years after starring in a movie together Credit: Rex FeaturesThey were shown catching up over drinks at the party, and chatting happily.”


"They got married in secret for two years in 2015"
"But photos of the two during their new year holiday in Mexico show that they are still in close contact."
"Martin Lewis left this morning shocked by the racist remarks of anti waxers. According to the statement of Jan and Justin, they broke up before the photo was taken at the end of the year."
“… Become a caregiver family unit MAFS Australia's Cyril Paul is now a mother and the Eden of Love Island. Daley misses his father Ted so much that the star suddenly died at the age of 67. How dare you... "
"Strictly closed strictly heartbroken Lanwei as Giovanni said he had no way to date Cowell and Simon Cowell showed him bravely in London exclusive what is doctor Katie Price land new documentary series, she learned..."
"It's reported that Jennifer Aniston is not happy with the photo. Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus announced their split yesterday. They say they like separation and insist on cherishing their friendship. Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus split up the most in the TV show business... "
"Justin and Naomi have been friends for 16 years since they starred in David Lynch's 2001 cult movie" journey to malholland. "
"At that time, the National Enquirer reported that the actress was not satisfied with the photos."
"However, the National Enquirer claimed that the photos made Zhan uneasy."
They have been friends for 16 years since they starred in the film credit: Rex. They were drinking and chatting happily at the party



Number  765
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or do you wish there was even more of it?”
“And those are just regular weddings; with, like 75 to 100 guests.”
“Sorry, let us try that again, this time with the proper level of enthusiasm one should muster for such an announcement:MEGHAN MARKLE AND PRINCE HARRY ARE GETTING MARRIED ONE MONTH FROM TODAY!”
“EEEEEEK!!!!”
“That's better, don't you think?”
“But even though one month is a very small period of time until the Royal Wedding bells ring, those close to Markle reportedly think it's not small enough.”
“They wish the wedding were taking place tomorrow.”
“Because then they'd only have 24 hour left to deal what one source is describing as the ultimate Bridezilla.”
“Yes, this source is looking at you, Meghan Markle.”
“Meghan s driving everyone crazy with her diva demands an insider tells Life Style adding of the bride to be She s a perfectionist and she s trying to control everything going on around her This is the first time...”


"Or do you want more?"
"Those are just ordinary weddings, with 75 to 100 guests."
"I'm sorry, let's try again. This time we should meet such a challenge with proper enthusiasm. Host: Megan marcel, Prince Harry will be married in a month!"
"Ouch!!"
"That's better, don't you think?"
"But while it's only a month before the royal wedding bell strikes, those close to Mr. markel are reported to think it's not small enough."
"They want the wedding tomorrow."
"Because then they only have 24 hours to deal with what one source calls the" ultimate bride. "
"Yes, the source is looking at you, Megan markel."
"Megan's heroine makes everyone crazy, which requires an insider to tell lifestyle that she is a perfectionist, and she tries to control everything around her, this is the first time..."



Number  766
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am mad as hell because my people’s lives are at stake.”
“| Credit: THAIS LLORCA/EPA-EFE/Shutterstock“I am done being polite, I am done being politically correct.”
“You’re going straight to hell.”
“You have been GOLFING.”
““She has been working 24/7.”
“Someone will say, ‘Right this way, sir.’ They’ll clear a path,” Miranda, 37, wrote, standing up for Cruz.”
“No long lines for you.”
““You’re going straight to hell, @realDonaldTrump.”
“Trump’s loudest critic was Pulitzer Prize winner and Hamilton creator Miranda — whose father, Luis A. Miranda, Jr., moved to New York as a teenager from Puerto Rico.”
“This is our responsibility.”“Trump continues to dominate the s——- president ever competition,” Legend, 38, wrote.”


"I'm very angry because the lives of my people are at stake."
"Credit: Llorca / epa-efe / shutterstock in Thailand" I'm no longer polite, I'm no longer politically correct
"You're going straight to hell."
"You've been playing golf."
"She works 24 hours a day."
"Someone would say," this way, sir. " They'll clear a way, "Miranda, 37, wrote on Cruz's side
"You don't have to line up."
"You're going straight to hell, @ realdonald trump."
"Trump's biggest critic is Pulitzer Prize winner and Hamilton creator Miranda, whose father, Luis A. Miranda Jr., moved from Puerto Rico to New York in his teens."
"It's our responsibility." "Trump continues to dominate the s-presidential race," the 38 year old legend wrote



Number  767
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Written by: CAT CASHMERE, CHRIS BROWN, DAVID BURD, DIJON MCFARLANE, TWICE AS NICE .”
“...licensed provided by LyricFind Lyrics Warner Chappell Music Inc...”
“...oh I just FaceTimed Kanye blip blip I told him I m his biggest fan yeah yeah Got all these hoes in my DM yeah I do Holy shit I got a kid oh Ohh I can sing so well...”
“Wonder if I can say the n word wait for real...”
“Wait, can I really say the n-word?”
“What up, my n---a?”
“(woo) What up, my n---a?”
“Big ups my n a we up my n a You pussy ass n a man fuck y all n as Cause I m that n a n a n a n a I m that n a I woke...”
“...up in Chris Brown s body oh yeah Somehow this shit turned into Freaky Friday But we got no choice but to turn this bitch sideways Oh yeah oh yeah I can t believe that it s Freaky Friday Yeah...”
“...it s Freaky Friday I m in Chris Brown s body I drive his Ferrari and I m light skinned black Ring ring What the fuck...”


"By cat cashmere, Chris Brown, David Byrd, Dijon McFarlane, double good."
“… Provided by lyricfind lyrics authorized by Warner chapel music... "
“… Oh, I just looked at Kanye blip blip. I told him I was his biggest fan. There are so many hoes in my DM. I have a son. Oh, oh, I sing so well... "
"I don't know if I can say n words, waiting for the truth..."
"Wait a minute, can I really say n words?"
"What's the matter, my aunt?"
"(woo) what's the matter, my aunt?"
"Big guy, mine, US, mine, you sissy, man, fuck you, because I'm that, I'm that, I wake up..."
“… In Chris Brown's body, oh, yes, somehow, this shit turns into a weird Friday, but we have no choice but to turn this bitch sideways, oh, yes, I can't believe it's a weird Friday, yes... "
"It's a strange Friday, I'm in Chris Brown's body, I'm driving his Ferrari, I'm a light skinned black ring, damn..."



Number  768
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Brad Pitt Says His Drinking Was Responsible For His Divorce...”
“They have six children together.”
“Pitt and Jolie announced they had filed for divorce in September 2016, as stories of Pitt’s alcohol and drug abuse started circulating.”
“They are said to have been introduced by Pitt’s Allied co-star Marion Cotillard, who is a close friend of Casiraghi’s.”
“Like Pitt, 53, Casiraghi, who is 31, has endured a high-profile separation and has children from a previous relationship.”
“GettyGettyBoth stories come from unnamed sources, so it’s impossible to know who’s telling the truth.”
“RELATED: Grace Kelly’s 19-Year-Old Granddaughter Looks Exactly Like HerPitt was reportedly spotted at a Los Angeles County Museum of Art event with the Princess – who is the granddaughter of Grace Kelly – but according to The Sun, they are not attached romantically.”


"Related report: Brad Pitt said his drinking was the main cause of his divorce..."
"They have six children in all."
"Pete and Julie announced their divorce in September 2016, and the story of Pete's drinking and taking drugs began to spread."
They are said to have been introduced by Peter's co star Marion godia, a close friend of cassiraj
"Like Peter, 53, kasiraji, 31, has experienced a high-profile separation and has children from his ex-wife."
"Both stories of gettygetty come from anonymous sources, so it's impossible to know who's telling the truth."
Related reports: as like as two peas, Grace Kelly's 19 year old granddaughter and Hepit (HerPitt) are identical with Grace Kelly (Grace Kelly)'s granddaughter Princess (Princess) at the Los Angeles County Museum of Art, but according to the sun, there are no two lovers in Losangeles.



Number  769
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Advertisementstephen.battaglio@latimes.comTwitter: @SteveBattaglio...”
“The program, launched in 2017, has not been a ratings success.”
“In the last year, NBC has departed from the formula with “Megyn Kelly Today,” which airs at 9 a.m. in a separate studio with an audience and a high-priced host, the former Fox News anchor Kelly.”
“The expanded hours give the network more commercials to sell while incurring relatively modest production costs as the programs are done in the same studio as the flagship program.”
“The program added the 9 a.m. hour in 2000 and 10 a.m. in 2008 with Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford.”
“NBC’s “Today” has demonstrated success in using its famous brand name beyond the traditional two-hour morning block.”
“ABC briefly experimented with a third hour of “GMA” in 2012 after the network cancelled the daytime talk show “The Revolution.” But “GMA Day” will be the first time it has fully committed to expanding its morning franchise to another time period.”
“ABC is using the new hour to replace “The Chew,” its food-centric talk show that aired in daytime since 2011.”
“Advertisement“GMA Day” will be taped immediately after the two-hour live broadcast in the morning.”
“Haines, 40, will move to “GMA Day” from the ABC News panel show “The View,” where she has been a co-host since September 2016.”


"Advertising Stephen.battaglio @ latimes.com Twitter: @ Steve batalio... "
"The program was launched in 2017, but the ratings were not successful."
"Last year, NBC was different from" Megan Kelly today, "which was broadcast in a separate studio at 9 a.m., with an audience and a high priced host, former Fox News Anchor Kelly
"As time goes on, TV stations can sell more commercials at a relatively low cost, because these programs and flagship programs are completed in the same studio."
"The project added 9am in 2000 and 10am in 2008, working with Hoda Kotb and Kathie Lee Gifford."
NBC's "today" program has proved that, in addition to the traditional two-hour morning program, it has successfully used its famous brand
ABC briefly tried GMA for a third hour after canceling the daytime talk show revolution in 2012. But GMA day will be the first time ABC is fully committed to extending its morning show to another segment
ABC is replacing the daytime food centric talk show chew with a new hour since 2011
"GMA day will be recorded two hours after the live broadcast in the morning."
"Haines, 40, will move from ABC News Group show the view to GMA day, where she has been co host since September 2016."



Number  770
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““He thinks she’s the hottest girl in Hollywood right now.”
“...magazine about Brad's pursuit of Margot.”
““They will always be her priority and she wouldn’t take that step if she didn’t see this romance lasting.”4.”
““She’s introduced him to the kids already, which is a sure sign that this is more than just a fling,” says the source.”
“Her kids have met him.”
““Apparently, they’re having romantic weekends in the English countryside, away from prying eyes, whenever they get the chance.”3.”
“A post shared by Angelina Jolie (@angiiii_jolie) on Jun 28, 2018 at 5:56am PDTSources on set say the actress only refers to her new beau “by one initial,” and has asked the producers to arrange her schedule so that she can leave town on weekends.”
“She's taking precaution to remain discreet.”
“She doesn’t want a media circus around her man.”2.”
““She doesn’t want his identity to be revealed until her divorce from Brad [Pitt] is official, so she’s playing coy whenever anyone asks about her love life.”


"He thinks she's the sexiest girl in Hollywood right now."
“… A magazine about Brad's pursuit of Margo. "
"They will always be her top priority, and if she doesn't see the relationship continue, she won't take that step."
"She has introduced him to the children, which definitely shows that it's not just an indulgence," the source said
"Her children have seen him."
"It's clear that whenever they get the chance, they will spend romantic weekends in the English countryside, away from prying eyes."
"At 5:56 a.m. on June 28, 2018, Angelina Jolie (@ angiiii / u Jolie) posted a post on the set saying that the actress mentioned her new boyfriend" with only one letter "and asked the producer to arrange her schedule so that she could be out of town at the weekend."
"She's taking precautions to be cautious."
"She doesn't want the media around her men."
"She didn't want Brad's identity to be exposed before she officially divorced him, so she put on airs whenever someone asked about her love life."



Number  771
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s done.”Relive the happy days and check out Kim and Kanye’s cutest social media moments in the gallery!”
““But this isn’t what Kim signed up for when she married Kanye.”
““She really thought Kanye was her soul mate and is absolutely devastated,” the source says.”
“Paranoia has taken over his life.”And while Kim feels the need to do what’s best for her and their children — North, 3, and Saint, 1 — the decision to leave Kanye hasn’t been an easy one.”
“He doesn’t trust anyone.”
“Another source adds, “He’ll walk into a room and look for recording devices behind frames and in flower arrangements.”
“MUST SEE: Kim Kardashian Diagnosed With a Mystery Illness“Before his breakdown, he was hearing voices and taking pills to sleep and to stay awake,” a Kardashian insider notes.”
“Multiple sources tell In Touch exclusively that Kim is “terrified” of her husband’s behavior — and was fearful even before he was checked in to the hospital.”
“The mom-of-two, 36, has been talking to divorce lawyer and confidante Laura Wasser as she moves to end her marriage to Kanye West.”
“Kim Kardashian and Kanye West to Divorce: “Paranoia Has Taken Over [Kanye’s] Life” (EXCLUSIVE)Kim Kardashian has had enough.”


"She's over." Relive the good times and see Kim and Kanye's cutest social media moments in the gallery! "
"But that's not what Kim and Kanye signed when they married."
"She really thinks Kanye is her soul mate, absolutely destroyed," the source said
"Paranoia has taken over his life." Although Kim felt it necessary to do the best for her and their children - 3-year-old Bei and 1-year-old Sheng, the decision to leave kenye was not easy
"He doesn't trust anyone."
Another source added: "he would walk into a room and look behind the photo frames and in the flower arrangements for recording equipment."
"Must see: Kim Kardashian was diagnosed with a mysterious disease," said one Kardashian insider. "Before he collapsed, he heard voices, took medicine, went to sleep, and stayed awake."
"Multiple sources told contact exclusive that Kim was" scared "of her husband's behavior - even before he was admitted to the hospital."
"The 36 year old mother of two has been talking to Laura Wasser, a divorce lawyer and confidant, about ending her marriage to Kanye West."
Kim Kardashian and Kanye West divorce: "paranoia has taken over (Kanye's) life" (exclusive) Kim Kardashian has had enough. "



Number  772
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Friends star’s estranged husband Justin Theroux doesn’t believe in having ‘ex’ partners...”
“MORE : Jennifer Aniston enjoys post-break up night out with Ellen DeGeneres and Courteney CoxMORE : Great news, Jen!”
“Apparently he’s now ‘fallen’ for Selena Gomez.”
“The Gomez has been mates with both Justin – who’s 21 years her senior – and Jen for years, but apparently things have gone into lover territory for Justin and the singer.”
“The two do share a manager, we should add, so it may be nothing more than a friendly friendship.”
“However, sources linked to the pair have gone and suggested the two have ‘totally fallen for each other’ and that Justin’s ex Jen ‘isn’t happy’.”
“These two have been pals, which isn’t awkward (Picture: Getty Images)Life and Style has reported the source claimed Justin and Selena (wow, she likes Justins, eh?)”
“...have ‘known each other for years through their manager’ but only recently started ‘falling for each other’.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementMuch falling, very celebrity.”
“It comes after Justin and wife of two years Jen separated after spending the past seven years together as a couple.”


Justin serrux, the husband of friends star separated, doesn't believe in an "ex" partner... "
More: Jennifer Aniston loves the night after breaking up with Alan DeGeneres and Courtney Cox more: good news, Jane
"It's clear that he's already" dumping "Serena Gomez."
"Gomez, Justin and Jennifer, 21 years older than her, have been partners for many years, but it is clear that Justin's relationship with the singer has entered the circle of lovers."
"We should add that the two do share a manager, so it may just be a friendly friendship."
"However, the sources related to the two have disappeared, suggesting that they have" completely fallen in love "with each other, and Justin's ex girlfriend Jen is" unhappy. "
"The two have always been friends, which is not embarrassing (photo source: Getty Images) life and style reports that the source claims Justin and Serena (Wow, she likes Justin, huh?)"
“…… I've known each other for many years through my manager, but I've just started to fall in love recently. "
"Advertising has fallen a lot. It's very famous."
"Before that, Justin and his wife of two years, Jennifer, had been together for the past seven years and then separated."



Number  773
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“During that time they do not engage in social media.”
“Ivanka Trump and her husband Jared Kushner are Orthodox Jews and observe the Sabbath, which begins Friday night at sundown and runs through Saturday at sundown.”
“...calling out racism white supremacy and neo nazis is the most specific language used by a member of the Trump family...”
“Following an eruption of violence in the college town where one person was killed and 19 people were injured after a car hit protesters leaving a rally.”
“On Saturday afternoon, President Trump condemned the violence but blamed “many sides.”The White House issued a statement Sunday saying "The President said very strongly in his statement yesterday that he condemns all forms of violence, bigotry, and hatred.”
“Of course that includes white supremacists, KKK Neo-Nazi and all extremist groups."”
“But the president has not used those words himself.”
“Republicans and Democrats criticized the president for not being more forceful in calling out white nationalists groups.”
“Trump “missed an opportunity to be very explicit here," Sen. Lindsey Graham, a Republican from South Carolina, said on Fox News Sunday.”
“The white nationalists seem to believe they have a friend in Donald Trump in the White House I would urge the president to dissuade them of the idea that he is sympathetic to their cause We need more from our president on this issue it s up to him to...”


"In the meantime, they don't participate in social media."
"Ivanka trump and her husband Jared Kushner are Orthodox Jews. They observe the sabbath, which begins at sunset on Friday night and continues until sunset on Saturday."
“…… Calling for racism, white supremacy and Neo Nazism is the most specific language used by trump family members... "
"After the violence broke out in the University Town, a car hit the protester who left the rally, killing one person and injuring 19 others."
On Saturday afternoon, President trump condemned the violence, but accused "many sides.". "In his statement yesterday, the president said very strongly that he condemned all forms of violence, prejudice and hatred," the White House said in a statement Sunday
"Of course, this includes white supremacists, KKK Neo Nazis and all extremist groups."
"But the president himself did not use these words."
"Republicans and Democrats criticized the president for not calling on white nationalist groups more forcefully."
"Trump" missed a very clear opportunity here, "South Carolina Republican Senator Lindsey Graham told Fox News on Sunday
"White nationalists seem to think that they have a friend of Donald Trump in the White House, and I urge the president to dissuade them from thinking that he sympathizes with their cause. On this issue, we need more support from our president. It's up to him..."



Number  774
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another.”Following the news, a source told PEOPLE Aniston is in positive spirits and has been spending time with friends.”
“For the past few days, they have enjoyed the sunny Cabo weather,” a source said of their trip, where they were joined by a handful of close pals including Jason Bateman and his family.”
“A list crowd at DeGeneres 60th birthday party...”
“I look around at my husband and my dogs and our home and there s nowhere else I want to be RELATED VIDEO Jennifer Aniston Has Seemed Fine Since Split from Justin Theroux Will Continue to Be Friends Feb 10 Aniston Attends Ellen DeGeneres Party The actress mingled with the...”
“Image zoom Jennifer Aniston in Architectural Digest | Credit: ArchDigest/Francois Dischinger“There was a time when I thought there was something romantic about picking up and trotting off somewhere different every three months,” Aniston recently told the outlet.”
“Below, a timeline of the actors’ split:Feb. 7: Aniston Shows Off Their Bel Air EstateAniston took Architectural Digest readers on a tour of the $21 million mansion she and Theroux purchased together in 2011.”
““They both seem great and very happy.”But in the following months, Aniston and Theroux’s marriage began to fall apart.”
““They have hosted friends by the pool and for dinner,” said the source.”
““Jen and Justin rang in the new year with friends.”
““Whatever else is printed about us that is not directly from us, is someone else’s fictional narrative.”


"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other." After the news release, a source told people that Aniston was in good spirits and had been with her friends all the time
"In the past few days, they have enjoyed the sunny cabo weather," a source said of their trip, where close friends including Jason Bateman and his family joined them
"The list of people at DeGeneres' 60th birthday party..."
"I look around my husband, my dog and our home, there is no other place I would like the video related to Jennifer Aniston seems good, because from Justin serrux will continue to be friends February 10 Aniston attended Ellen DeGeneres party with the actress..."
Jennifer Aniston in architectural Digest: archdigest / Francois dischinger "there was a time when I thought it was romantic to trot to a different place every three months," Aniston recently told the media
"Here's the cast's schedule: February 7: in 2011, Aniston took readers of architectural digest to a $21 million mansion she and Cyrus had jointly purchased to show off their baylair estate
"They all look great and happy." But over the next few months, Aniston and seru's marriage began to break down
"They hosted friends at the pool and invited them to dinner," the source said
"Jen and Justin call up with friends in the new year."
"Other printed materials about us do not come directly from us, but from other people's fictional stories."



Number  775
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Contrary to reports that claim Katy wasn't pleased with Taylor posting the note on social media, our source says she "wasn't upset" at all.”
“She wants all of the negative energy cleared from her life."”
“"She has been self-reflecting lately," the insider adds, "and feels it's better to clear the air than to have public disagreements and uncomfortable tension with people.”
“News Katy is "very relieved" and ready to "move forward."”
“After the American Idol judge sent the pop singer an olive branch, a peace offering that effectively ended their years-long feud, a source tells E!”
“Katy Perry and Taylor Swift are finally ready to make nice.”


"Contrary to reports that Katie was unhappy with Taylor's posting of the letter on social media, our source said she was" not upset at all. "
"She wants to get rid of all the negative energy in her life."
"She's been reflecting on herself recently," the source added. "She feels it's better to clarify the facts than to open up disagreements and uncomfortable tensions with people."
"News" Katie is "very pleased" and ready to "move forward"
A source told e
"Katie Perry and Taylor Swift are finally ready to make up."



**Something goes wrong**
“And this week - not long after the five-year mark had passed since Katie filed for divorce on June 29 2012 - she finally went public with Jamie Foxx.”
“(Image: Reuters) (Image: XPOSUREPHOTOS.COM)The settlement also reportedly contained “iron-clad” rulings that Suri would not be made a member of the controversial Church of Scientology, where Tom holds a high rank.”
“...open secret in Hollywood...”
“But while the public were wondering why it took them so long to confirm their relationship, it seems to stem back to her five-year marriage to Tom Cruise.”
“Much has been reported about their bizarre divorce - and how Katie literally fled the country to get herself and daughter Suri away - but the actress has never spoken publicly about life as part of TomKat.”
“Here we look back at the bizarre claims surrounding Tom s marriage rules for his wife Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto play soon 8 Cancel Play now Scientology elders audition for wives Image Eyevine After Tom s divorce from second wife...”
“Nicole Kidman he began getting more into Scientology the religious organisation he was introduced to by first wife Mimi Rogers in the late 1980s...”
“And there have been claims that Katie - who fancied Tom as a teenager - wasn't the Mission Impossible star's first pick.”
“According to the controversial book Going Clear: Scientology, Hollywood and the Prison Belief by Lawrence Wright, Tom invited Scientology elders to hold screen tests to find his next wife - a claim which the church's lawyers have denied.”
“But the author claimed a number of eligible Hollywood women were 'auditioned' by the church for the role of Tom's next spouse, including Lindsay Lohan, Scarlett Johansson and Jessica Alba.”


"This week, five years after Katie filed for divorce on June 29, 2012, she finally made it public with Jamie fox."
"(source: Reuters) (source: Reuters) Exposurephotos.COM According to the report, the settlement agreement also contains a "rock solid" ruling that Suri will not become a member of the controversial Church of Scientology, where Tom has a high status. "
“… Hollywood's open secret... "
"But when the public is wondering why it took them so long to confirm their relationship, it seems to go back to her five-year marriage to Tom Cruise."
"There have been a lot of reports about their bizarre divorce and how Katie fled the country to let herself and her daughter Suri go, but the actress has never talked publicly about her life as part of Tom Kate."
"Here, let's review the bizarre statement about Tom's wife's marriage rules. Video loading is not available. Click play. Click play will play the video automatically soon. 8. Cancel playing now. Now, after Tom divorced his second wife..."
"Nicole Kidman, who was introduced to Scientology by his first wife, Mimi Rogers, in the late 1980s, began to get more involved in this religious organization..."
"It's also said that Katie - who imagines Tom as a teenager - is not the first choice for impossible task."
"According to Lawrence Wright's controversial book going to the light: Scientology, Hollywood and the prison faith Clear:Socktology Tom invited the elders of Scientology to do a screen test to find their next wife, a claim denied by church lawyers
"But the author claims that some eligible Hollywood women have been taught to" audition "as Tom's next spouse, including Lindsay Lohan, Scarlett Johnson and Jessica Alba."



Number  777
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"It's also uncomfortable, restricts your movements, and if you wear it really tight, it can even make it difficult to breathe and theoretically could cause rib damage."”
“Once you take the garment off, your body will return to its usual shape.”
“Stormi on February 1”
“But after the 20-year old faced criticism for crediting waist trainers for her weight loss, insiders say Kylie believes everyone is just“jealous” of her.”
“A source told Radar Online: “Kylie has been getting so much hate from everyone over the fact that she is ashamed about how fat she got while pregnant.”
“Honestly, she couldn’t really care less what people think.”
“"She believes that everyone is just jealous that she is able to get so skinny so fast and they are not!"”
“(Image: Instagram/kyliejenner)Kylie has been inundated with comments from fans who believe she’s risking her health by using a waist trainer to reclaim her shape.”
“Dismayed, one fan said: "My God.”
“Is Kylie still advertising waist trainers to teenage girls?”


"It's also very uncomfortable, limiting your movement, and if you wear tight, it can even cause dyspnea, which could theoretically cause rib damage."
Once you take off your clothes, your body will return to its original shape
"Storm on February 1st"
"But after 20-year-old Kelly was criticized for losing weight thanks to the waist trainer, insiders said Kelly believed everyone was just 'jealous' of her."
A source told radar online: "Kelly was ashamed of being so fat when she was pregnant, which made everyone hate her."
"To be honest, she doesn't care what other people think."
"She believes that people are just jealous that she can get thinner so quickly, but they are not!"
"(picture: instagram / kyliejenner) Kelly was inundated with comments from fans who thought she was taking a health risk by using a waist trainer to get back in shape."
One fan said dejectedly, "my God."
"Is Kelly still advertising waist sneakers for teenage girls?"



Number  778
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“An ether of remorse already fogs the perception of Lauer s ousting though Lauer waited a day to issue a statement and in it said Some of what is being said about me is untrue or mischaracterized but there is enough truth in these stories to make me feel embarrassed...”
“And so it is no surprise that, to convey something like moral mooring to a vastly female audience, the networks rely on women anchors to break the public fall.”
“The opportunistic finesse of Kevin Spacey’s coming-out certainly tripped some social alarms, but he nonetheless garnered some sympathy.”
“Louis C.K.’s statement, for example, following the exposé in the Times of his sexual harassment of female comics, was not as passionate as, but was more coherent than, Harvey Weinstein’s ramblings about Jay-Z and the gun lobby.”
“As Rebecca Traister wrote earlier this month, a “powerful white man losing a job is a death.”We have witnessed a theatre of accountability insidiously refine itself, quite quickly, in the past few months.”
“Expressions of disorientation not dissimilar from expressions of mourning continued for the rest of the show.”
““We’re trying to process it and make sense of it, and it’ll take some time for that,” Kotb said.”
““As I’m sure you can imagine, we are devastated,” Guthrie said.”
“Lauer had been loved by so many; “we” loved him.”
“...as a news organization and do it in as transparent a manner as we can Then Guthrie and Kotb offered their personal expressions of shock and dismay...”


"Although Raul waited for a day to make a statement, some of what he said about me was untrue or wrongly described, but there was enough truth in these stories to embarrass me, but regret has blurred Raul's feeling of being expelled..."
"Therefore, there is no doubt that in order to convey moral ties and other things to the female audience, the television network relies on female anchors to break the public's decline."
"Kevin Spacey's opportunistic tactics of coming out of the closet certainly aroused some social vigilance, but he still won some sympathy."
"For example, Louis C.K.'s statement after the time magazine exposed his sexual harassment of women's comics is not as enthusiastic as Harvey Weinstein's ramble about Jay-Z and the gun lobby, but more coherent."
As Rebecca traister wrote earlier this month, "the loss of a powerful white man's job is death." In the past few months, we have witnessed a responsibility theater's rapid self-improvement
"The expression of disorientation is no different from the expression of mourning, which continues throughout the rest of the show."
"We're trying to deal with it and understand it, and it's going to take some time," Kotb said
"I'm sure you can imagine that we were destroyed," Guthrie said
"Raul is loved by so many people; we" love him. “
“…… As a news agency, they reported in the most transparent way possible, and then Guthrie and Kotb expressed their personal shock and frustration... "



Number  779
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Bear is our world and we ask that you respect his privacy as we navigate our way through this together."”
“Marie Claire also shared an article naming the tot as “Wayne ‘Window’ Payne”.”
“Bear...”
“Liam Payne reveals he didn t meet Cheryl s father until she was pregnant with their son Bear high steaks Liam Payne reveals mother in law Joan jokingly waved a knife at him when he ordered a 300 steak for dinner Why did Liam Payne and Cheryl call their baby...”
“Cheryl shows off her slim post baby body just five months after giving birth as she s spotted in public signing autographs for fans Exclusive LIAM PLOTS TOT TAT Liam Payne planning large chest tattoo to mark becoming a dad to son Bear with long term girlfriend Cheryl Dad date...”
“Bear BOUNCE BACK BODY Cheryl is back to a size six after daily workouts yoga during baby Bear s naps and a low carb diet BACK TO WORK Cheryl to fly to America to record fifth album following first public appearance after maternity leave mummy bear s back...”
“...son Bear to speak Spanish ONE S YOUR LOT Cheryl tells Liam Payne she s not ready for another baby after he admitted he wanted a second child COULDN T BEAR TO LEAVE Cheryl and Liam Payne deny they re quitting the UK for a life in Hollywood with baby...”
“2 Cheryl revealed her bump for the first time in a campaign for L Oreal and The Prince s Trust latest on cheryl HOT MAMA Pregnant Vogue Williams wows fans with her toned abs in tough workout session TOP OF THE TOTS Liam Payne and Cheryl teach 7 month old...”
“The baby name became the subject of an April Fool's prank, with Directioners making the name Lionel trend as the baby's name.”
“He made the confession during a radio interview in the US and admitted he’d had an “internal battle” about the moniker.”


"The bear is our world, and we ask you to respect his privacy, because we walked this road together."
Mary Claire also shared an article that named the child "Wayne window Payne."
"Bear..."
"Liam Penn revealed that he didn't meet Cheryl's father until she was pregnant with their son Xiong Gao steak. Liam Penn revealed that his mother-in-law Joan jokingly waved a knife when he ordered 300 steak for dinner. Why did Liam Penn and Cheryl call their children..."
"Cheryl showed off her slim baby figure five months after giving birth to her baby. She signed for her fans on public occasions and planned to have a tattoo on her big chest in memory of becoming a father to son bear and dating Cheryl's long-term girlfriend Dad..."
"Bear rebounds. After Cheryl recovered to the 6th, she took yoga every day. After her baby took a nap and ate a low carbohydrate diet, she returned to work. After Cheryl flew to the United States to record her fifth album and made her first public appearance, mother bear came back from maternity leave..."
“… The son bear speaks Spanish. One is your destiny. After Cheryl tells Liam Penn that she is not ready for another child, he admits that he wants a second child and can't bear to leave. Cheryl and Liam Penn deny that they want to leave the baby living in Hollywood in England... "
"2 Cheryl first exposed her lump in a promotional campaign of L'Oreal. Prince trust's latest Cheryl hot mama pregnant vogue Williams won fans' praise for her strong abdominal muscles in hard training, surpassing seven month old Liam Penn Payne and Cheryl teach... "
"The baby's name became the protagonist of April Fool's Day prank, and the directors took the name Lionel trend as the baby's name."
"In a radio interview in the United States, he confessed to this fact and admitted that he had had an" internal struggle "over the nickname."



Number  780
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““They were all focused on making it a special birthday for Kendall.””
“Although Kardashian West publicly supported Jenner’s transition, she cut ties after reading her book Secrets of My Life, which alleged Kris knew more about her gender identity crisis than she’s admitted — a claim Kris denies.”
“...mending fences or throwing shade at stepdad Caitlyn Jenner...”
“On Friday, the KKW Beauty mogul posted a throwback photo of Caitlyn prior to her transition in 2015.”
“In the picture, Caitlyn — dressed in a silk robe — holds a glass of champagne while sitting on the edge of a bathtub where former wife Kris Jenner is appears to be nude and covered in bubbles.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““TGIF,” Kardashian West captioned the shot.”
“It didn’t take long for social media to react, many questioning why the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star was posting a picture of her estranged family member.”
“Image zoom Caitlyn Jenner and Kim Kardashian West“Petty at its finest,” commented one Instagram user on her post.”
“Others shared the shot on Twitter, asking, “Is this Kim throwing shade at Caitlyn or is it just me?”Perhaps one tweeter put it best: “WHAT DOES THIS MEAN!”


"They're all preparing a special birthday for Kendall."
"Although Kardashian West openly supported Jenner's transition, she broke up after reading her book the secret of my life, which claims that Chris knows more about her gender identity crisis than she admits - Chris denies that."
“… Mending fences or throwing shade at stepfather Caitlin Jenner... "
"Last Friday, the kkw beauty tycoon released a retro photo of Caitlin before her transformation in 2015."
"In this photo, Catherine in a silk robe is sitting next to the bathtub with a glass of champagne in her hand. Her ex-wife, Kris Jenner, seems to be naked and covered with bubbles."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"TGIF," Kardashian West said under the title of the camera
"It wasn't long before social media reacted, and many people questioned why the star of" keep up with Kardashian "posted photos of her estranged from her family."
One instagram user commented in her post: "image zooming Caitlyn Jenner and Kim Kardashian West are" the best little people. "
Others shared the photo on Twitter and asked, "is Kim casting a shadow on Caitlin, or is it just me? Perhaps one twitter user said it best: "what does that mean?"



Number  781
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For now, though, it seems like he and Stefani are content to take things slow.”
“Kevin Winter/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesEventually, that blossomed into a romance.”
“So, it's time to set the record straight: Are Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton engaged?”
“It's far from the first time such reports have circulated, and when the couple has shut down gossip in the past, they've made clear they're in no rush to tie the knot.”
“"Everything's crazy right now so no, absolutely not," Stefani said in June 2016 during 94.7 Fresh FM's The Tommy Show last summer when asked if she was engaged.”
“"Can you imagine the amount of gossipy, weird stories people make up?”
“To me, it makes me laugh every day.”
“I actually do Google my name just so I can see the next one that's gonna happen, because it's gotten so out of control."”
“That may have been a while ago, but there's been no comment to the contrary from the couple in regards to engagement and marriage.”
“Both Shelton and Stefani have been married before.”


"But for now, he and Stefani are content to take their time."
"Kevin winter / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images in the 1970s, it became a romance."
"So it's time to clear up: is Gwen Stephanie engaged to Blake Sheldon?"
"This is far from the first time such reports have been circulated. When the couple closed the scandal in the past, they made it clear that they were not in a hurry to get married."
"It's all crazy now, so no, absolutely not," Stefani said when asked if she was engaged on 94.7 fresh FM's "Tommy show" last summer in June 2016
"Can you imagine how many rumors and weird stories people have made up?"
"For me, it makes me laugh every day."
"In fact, I Google my name just to see what's going to happen next, because it's out of control."
"That may have been a long time ago, but the couple didn't comment to the contrary on engagement and marriage."
"Sheldon and Stephanie have been married before."



Number  782
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He is not in a place where he wants to spend time with her right now.”AdvertisementFans hope that Jolie and Pitt will be able to put their differences aside for the children.”
“He has his fun stuff planned with the kids to celebrate Halloween, and they do not include Angelina.”
“He has been busy working a lot and is leaning towards not participating in the trick-or-treating with the kids and his ex.”
“...answer...”
“Brad will be at the kids graduations weddings or other major life events so Angie figures they need to learn how to spend time together for the sake of the kids The source went on to reveal But Brad is not having it and has not given her a clear...”
“Brad has been through a lot this year, and Angelina knows that he will forever be a part of the kids lives so why not invite him along?”
“She knows how much he loved going out with the kids during the one holiday where they could all be disguised and blend in with regular people, so Angie invited Brad to join her and the kids.”
“The person familiar with the story said: “Angie invited Brad to go trick-or-treating with the kids next week.”
“The insider went on to say: “She is completely redoing the house and really going all out!”According to Hollywood Life, Pitt will be at the event and is even expected to go trick-or-treating with his youngest children.”
“A source spoke to Us Weekly and explained that Jolie had hired professional set and costume designers to drastically transform her home for the party that all Hollywood will be talking about.”


"He doesn't want to be with her now." Fans want Julie and Pete to put aside their differences for the kids
"To celebrate Halloween, he and the children planned some interesting things, but they didn't include Angelina."
"He has been busy with his work and now tends not to take part in the sugar free jokes about his kids and ex boyfriends."
“… Answer... "
"Brad will attend the children's graduation ceremony, wedding or other important life activities, so Angie thinks that for the children, they need to learn how to spend time together." The source then revealed, but Brad didn't, and didn't give her a clear answer... "
"Brad has gone through a lot this year, and Angelina knows that he will always be a part of the children's life. Why not invite him along?"
"She knows how much he likes to go out with the children on a holiday, and they can all pretend to be ordinary people, so Angie invites Brad to join her and the children."
"Angie invited Brad to play trick or treat with the kids next week," the person said
"She's totally rebuilding the house. She's really going all out," the insider said! "According to Hollywood life, Pete will attend the event and is even expected to play trick or treat with his youngest child."
"A source told us weekly that Julie has hired professional set and costume designers to reinvent her home for the party that Hollywood is talking about."



Number  783
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“According to a report on simplesurrogacy.com, several factors of the surrogacy process combined with advancements in in vitro fertilization technology make it likely for multiple embryos to mature.”
“While the rumors about Kardashian seem to be false, it is true that surrogates have a high chance of gestating twins, triplets or more.”
“The story began in Closer, where a a report suggested that Kardashian wanted to have triplets as a birthday surprise for her husband, Kanye West.”
“The article, headlined: “Kim: ‘Surprising Kanye With Triplet News Will Save Our Marriage,'” also indicated that their marriage was crumbling, though that too appears to be unfounded.”
“In the piece, sources claimed that Kardashian is “keen to set the wheels in motion for her next surrogacy."”
“Alleged insiders said that she intends to complete her family with triplets They went on to frame it as a birthday gift claiming that she is determined to surprise West on his 41st birthday with the news that their surrogate is ready to get pregnant again Kim s been racking...”
“...her brains over what to give Kanye for his birthday and she says that giving him more children would be the best present he could ever wish for the source claimed...”
“After his recent public meltdown Kardashian reportedly believed that the best thing for him is to focus on family and what better way than celebrating baby news The source explained that the plan was for Kardashian s surrogate to be implanted with three embryos to maximize their chances of conceiving...”
“...a bigger family...”
“They added that West laughed when Kim suggested triplets but she knows he s always wanted a big family so she s sure he ll be ecstatic with her decision They even included the alleged reaction of Kourtney and Khloe Kardashian saying the sisters have warned Kim that it could...”


"According to a simplesurrogacy.com Several factors in the surrogacy process, together with advances in in vitro fertilization technology, have made it possible for multiple embryos to mature
"Although the rumors about Kardashian seem to be false, surrogate mothers are very likely to have twins, triplets or more."
"The story begins with closer. It's reported that Kardashian wants to have triplets as a birthday surprise for her husband Kanye West."
The title of the article: "Kim: 'the three news series that surprised Kanye will save our marriage'", also shows that their marriage is collapsing, although it seems groundless
In this article, it is reported that Kardashian "is eager to prepare for her next surrogacy."
"It is said that people familiar with the matter said that she planned to use triplets to complete her family. They then took it as a birthday gift, claiming that she was determined to surprise West on his 41st birthday because their surrogate mother was going to get pregnant again, and Kim had been torturing him all the time..."
“… Her brain was thinking about what to give Kanye for his birthday. She said that giving him more children would be the best source of gifts he hoped for
"It's reported that after Kardashian's recent public collapse, Kardashian thinks that the best thing for him is to focus on his family. What better way to celebrate baby news than to do so? The source explained that the plan is to allow Kardashian's surrogate mother to implant three embryos to maximize their chances of conception... "
“… A bigger family... "
"They also said that when King proposed triplets, West laughed, but she knew that he always wanted a big family, so she was sure that he would be overjoyed by her decision. They even mentioned the so-called reaction of coultney and Carol Kardashian, saying that the sisters warned king that this might..."



Number  784
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Thomas said all the other photos that were being taken of him were “derogatory” so he “thought this was a nice way of improving my look.”
“...did it because he wanted to change his image...”
“He was asking me how I was feeling that day and I was telling him how unhappy I was with the President,” Thomas explained.”
““He said ‘Hello Thomas’ and I said ‘Hi Harry’ and it became a conversation back and forth mostly about politics.”
“...casual and friendly...”
“That was his politics I have my politics Thomas also touched on Harry s views about Brexit saying the Prince seemed open to the experiment When asked about his first phone conversation with Harry Thomas claimed it was all very...”
““I was complaining I didn’t like Donald Trump, he said ‘give Donald Trump a chance.’ I sort of disagreed with that, but I still like Harry.”
“He’s a smart guy.”“We talked a few times about Donald Trump and Brexit, things like that, and he’s an interesting guy,” Thomas continued.”
“We’ve had interesting conversations on the phone.”
““We have yet to see each other face to face.”


Thomas said all the other photos taken of him were "derogatory," so he "thought it was a good way to improve my appearance."
“… Because he wanted to change his image. "
"He asked me how I felt that day and I told him how unhappy I was with the president," Thomas explained
"He said 'Hello, Thomas' and I said' Hi, Harry ', which became a round-trip conversation mainly about politics."
“… Feel free to be friendly... "
"That's his politics. I have my politics. Thomas also talked about Harry's views on brexit. He said that when asked about his first telephone conversation with Harry Thomas, the prince seemed to be open to this experiment. He claimed that all this was very..."
"I'm complaining that I don't like Donald Trump. He said," give Donald Trump a chance. " I don't agree, but I still like Harry
"He's a smart man." "We've talked about Donald Trump and brexit a few times, and he's an interesting person," Thomas continued
"We had an interesting conversation on the phone."
"We haven't met yet."



Number  785
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s what parents do!” Be sure to check out all the recent pics of Caitlyn and Sophia in our gallery above!”
“Yes, it’s on the other side of the world… But I would’ve gone to the moon and back to share in the joy of my darling son & his beautiful bride getting married!”
“Along with posting a Nihi Sumba Resort, Linda wrote in the caption, “This is the beautiful location where @brodyjenner & @kaitlynn got married!”
“Recently, Caitlyn was shaded by her ex Linda Thompson for missing Brody Jenner‘s wedding.”
“...a complete fabrication...”
“Fame has destroyed Cait s relationship with her grown children and she s not letting that happen again if she and Sophia adopt We reached out to Caitlyn s rep who has denied Radar Online s report and called it...”
““Cait’s made it clear to Sophia she doesn’t want the baby to have anything to do with television or reality TV.”
“...her prom dress the source went on to say...”
“Cait s considering it Sophia has always wanted to be a mother and raise a little girl and have the opportunity to do fun girly things like get her hair and nails done with her and take her shopping for...”
““Sophia loves children and has been giving Cait little hints that she’s interested in a baby.”


"That's what parents do! "Be sure to see all the latest photos of Caitlin and Sophia in our gallery above!"
"Yes, it's on the other side of the world But I will go to the moon and come back to share the joy of my dear son's marriage to his beautiful bride
While posting the nihi Sumba resort, Linda wrote in the title: "this is@ brodyjenner&@kaitlynn A beautiful place to get married
"Recently, Caitlin was hoodwinked by her ex girlfriend Linda Thompson for missing Brody Jenner's wedding."
“… Totally fabricated... "
"Fame ruined the relationship between Caitlin and her adult children. If she and Sophia adopted Caitlin, she would not let this happen again. We contacted Caitlin's representative, who denied the report of radar online and called it...."
"Kate has made it clear to Sophia that she doesn't want her children to have anything to do with TV or reality shows."
“… Her prom dress source went on to say
"Katie thinks Sophia has always wanted to be a mother, raise a little girl, and have the opportunity to do some interesting girl things, such as fixing her hair and nails, taking her shopping..."
"Sophia likes children and has been suggesting that Kate is interested in them."



Number  786
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As she videoed her spouse, the former Spice Girls star exclaimed: “Even the ducks like you!””
“Laughing at the attention the animals were paying to the 43-year-old, Victoria teased her husband over his popularity.”
“The fashion-forward star sported an all-black ensemble, as he donned a pair of jeans, a hooded jumper and matching flat cap.”
“Treating fans to a clip from their day out, David could be seen feeding some ducks as the duo spent time in a park.”
“Sign up fornow for the biggest moments from morning TVThe 44-year-old made the most of the good weather today, as she took a stroll with the former professional footballer.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"Even ducks like you!" exclaimed the former Spice star as she videotaped her spouse
Victoria scoffed at animals' attention to the 43 year old and her husband's popularity
The fashion avant-garde star was dressed in black with a pair of jeans, a hooded Pullover and a matching flat hat
"When they spend time in the park, David can be seen feeding ducks."
"Sign up for the most important moment in the morning TV show. The 44 year old made the most of today's fine weather to take a walk with the former professional footballer."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  787
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“And very sad as well,” the source added.”
“The actor, 54, will soon be in London, where ex Angelina Jolie is currently filming Maleficent 2, to see his children for a second time in recent weeks.”
“The visit comes after a judge presiding over the former couple’s divorce proceedings established a detailed schedule for him to spend time with Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and nine-year-old twins Vivienne and Knox.”
““Having kids was always very special to him.”
“He wanted kids for years before he met Angie.”
“He was dreaming about being a dad.”
“And he has always been a great dad.”
“Very involved and present.”
“He talks about the kids non-stop now.”


"Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more..."
"It's sad, too," the source added
The 54 year old actor will soon be in London, where former Angelina Jolie is filming maleficent 2, the second time he has seen her child in recent weeks
"Previously, the judge who presided over the divorce proceedings of the former couple set a detailed schedule for him to spend time with parks, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and twins Vivian and Knox, 9."
"It's always special for him to have children."
"He wanted to have children for many years before he met Angie."
"He dreams of being a father."
"He's always been a good dad."
"Very engaged, very expressive."
"He's talking about children all the time now."



Number  788
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The two actually first met in the early 2000s while on the Hollywood club scene and had many mutual friends which meant they hung out regularly, so they were friends for 10 years before starting a romantic relationship.”
“What many don’t know, however, is that the pair were actually friends first.”
“Friends FirstMany times Ashlee Simpson and Evan Ross’ romance has been called a “whirlwind” relationship because of the pace in which they started dating and became engaged.”
“7.”
“Now the twosome are one of Hollywood’s most adorable and low-key couples, so here are 7 things you never knew about the pair and their relationship.”
“After her highly publicized marriage and divorce from Fall Out Boy’s Pete Wentz, Ashlee Simpson has once again found love with Evan Ross who is an actor and musician, and also the son of the iconic singer Diana Ross.”
“For many years Ashlee Simpson was simply known as Jessica Simpson’s younger sister, but through her own musical career she began to take on the spotlight for herself.”


The first time they met was in the early 21st century, when they were in the Hollywood club and had a lot of friends in common, which meant they were often together, so they were friends for 10 years before starting a romantic relationship
"What many people don't know, however, is that they are actually friends first."
"For the first time, many times, Ashley Simpson's relationship with Evan Ross is called" whirlwind "because they start dating and getting engaged very quickly."
“7.”
"Now this couple is one of the loveliest and most low-key couples in Hollywood, so here are seven things you never know about this couple and their relationship."
After her high-profile marriage and divorce from "down boys" Pete Wentz, Ashley Simpson once again fell in love with actor and musician Evan Ross, the son of idol singer Diana Ross
For many years, Ashley Simpson has been known as Jessica Simpson's sister, but through her music career, she began to become the focus of attention



Number  789
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Earlier this month breast surgeon Dr Andrea Giannitrapani claimed Kylie Jenner had had a secret boob job and was suffering from post-surgery swelling.”
“Britney isn’t the only star to raise eyebrows when it comes going under the knife.”
“...makeup and styling...”
“However, one aspect of the blonde’s appearance remains cloaked in mystery – her involvement with plastic surgery.”
“Other than cryptically confessing that she’s partial to the odd lip filler "and other fun stuff" back in 2014, the Slumber Party crooner has remained tight-lipped about her age-defying looks.”
“But fans on social media haven’t just been questioning how the 35-year-old continues to trump Father Time.”
“(Image: GETTY)Some have suggested that she completely transformed herself in the run up to comeback album Glory, her first release in nine years.”
“Daily Star Online reached out to experts at cosmetic surgery specialist MYA to get a professional opinion on the subject.”
“They suspected that Britney had pretty much overhauled her entire face in one way or another.”
“"I believe that Britney has had a nose job to create a slimmer and more feminine shape to her front profile.”


"Earlier this month, Dr. Andrea giannitrapani, a breast surgeon, claimed that Kylie Jenner had undergone a breast augmentation in secret and had swelling after the operation."
"Britney Spears is not the only star to cause a stir at the edge of the knife."
“… Make up and styling... "
"However, one aspect of the blonde's appearance is still a mystery - she's involved in plastic surgery."
"As early as 2014, the sleeping party singer confessed her strange lipstick and other interesting things," she kept silent about her anti aging appearance.
"But fans on social media are not just questioning how the 35 year old continues to surpass his father's time."
(photo: Getty) some people think that in the process of preparing for her comeback album glory, she completely changed herself. This is her first release in nine years
"Daily Star Online contacted the experts of cosmetic surgery expert Mya for professional advice on this issue."
"They suspect Britney has almost had her whole face done in one way or another."
"I believe Britney Spears has had nose surgery to make her front face more slim and feminine."



Number  790
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The truth is they can’t wait to be together again.””
“No one is cheating, no one is getting divorced.”
“...in PrisonTeresa and Joe Giudice can’t wait to “be a family again,” a source tells PEOPLE.”
“This week, the Real Housewives of New Jersey couple celebrated their 46th birthdays apart while Joe serves out his 41-month sentence for mail, wire and bankruptcy fraud.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Joe, who transferred from the Federal Correctional Institution in Fort Dix, New Jersey, to a federal prison in Pennsylvania last November, has completed 27 months of his sentence thus far.”
“Teresa served a little over 11 months in prison herself for the same crimes and was released on Dec. 23, 2015.”
“According to the source, the couple — who share daughters Gia, 17, Gabriella, 14, Milania, 12, and Audriana, 9 — “can’t wait to be reunited.”“These last few years have been tough on everybody,” the insider adds.”
“Want to keep up with the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”


"The fact is they can't wait to be together again."
"No one cheated, no one divorced."
“… At prison, Teresa and Joe Giudice can't wait to be a family again, "a source told people
A real New Jersey housewife celebrated their 46th birthdays this week, while Joe served 41 months in prison for mail, telegrams and bankruptcy fraud
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Joe was transferred from the Federal Correctional Institution in dixburg, New Jersey, to the federal prison in Pennsylvania in November last year, and has completed 27 months of imprisonment so far."
"Teresa herself served more than 11 months in prison for the same crime and was released on December 23, 2015."
"According to sources, the couple - who have their daughter Jaya, 17, Gabriella, 14, mirania, 12, and audriana, 9 - can't wait to get together again." "It's been tough on everyone these years," the person familiar with the matter added
"Want to keep up with the latest news from people?"
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."



Number  791
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us!”
“#Rihanna A post shared by The Shade Room (@theshaderoom) on Aug 7, 2017 at 6:03pm PDTHollywoodLifers, do you think Drake and Rihanna will ever rekindle their romance?”
“Chris Brown nearly broke the internet when he liked Rihanna’s sizzling Crop Over pic.”
“After hearing about Breezy’s flirty comment, we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned that Drizzy thinks his ‘creeping’ is coming across as ‘desperate.’Rihanna, 29, looked drop-dead gorgeous at the Crop Over Festival, so of course she was getting all sorts of attention.”
“Her ex, Chris Brown, 28, publicly thirsted over her sexy style, commenting a googly-eyed emoji underneath one of her smoldering pics.”
“Now, we’ve learned that Drake, 30, thought her former flame was trying way too hard.”
““Drake thinks Chris looks sad, lonely and desperate for comment creeping on Rihanna’s Instagram,” a source close to Drizzy tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Drake feels it is time for Chris to grow up and move on from Rihanna.”
“Drake is very protective and has a lot of love for her even though he is not with Rihanna Drake is not afraid of Chris and even reached out to Rihanna to let her know that he is willing to talk to Chris if she needed him to tell Chris...”
“...to back off our insider revealed...”


"Tell us!"
"A post Rihanna shared in the shadow room (@ theshadroom) at 6:03 p.m. on August 7, 2017, do you think Drake and Rihanna will rekindle their romance?"
"Chris Brown almost broke the Internet when he liked Rihanna's sexy work rather than photos."
"After listening to breezy's flirting comments, we learned exclusively that Drizzy thought his" crawling "gave the impression of" despair. ". Rihanna, 29, looked beautiful when she saw the film at the festival, so of course she got all kinds of attention. "
Her 28 year old ex boyfriend, Chris Brown, publicly expressed a desire for her sexy style, commenting on a dull looking emoticon beneath a smoldering picture of her
"Now, we learn that Drake, 30, thinks her former lover worked too hard."
"Drake thinks Chris looks sad, lonely and eager to comment on Rihanna's instagram," a source close to Tracy told reporters
"Drake thinks it's time Chris grew up and left Rihanna."
"Drake is very protective of her and has a lot of love for her. Even if he is not around Rihanna, Drake is not afraid of Chris. He even takes the initiative to contact Rihanna and let her know that if Chris needs him to tell Chris, he is willing to talk to her..."
“… In order to prevent our insider disclosure... "



Number  792
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Now I think of it more as a health decision.”Image zoom Katie Holmes | Credit: Ben WatsHolmes also likes group workout classes like SoulCycle, sharing that she enjoys the “sense of community.””
““It used to be about fitting into my jeans, and I’m so sick of that,” she said of her eating habits.”
“...is in her best shape ever...”
“The 39-year-old actress covers the April issue of Women’s Health, where she talks about amping up her workout routine for the upcoming action-thriller The Doorman.”
“To get the look of an ex-Marine, Holmes’ gym time consisted of lifting weights and personal training sessions that sometimes lasted two hours.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I wanted to be authentic to a person who trained in the military,” she said.”
“Which means someone who wasn t always paying attention to the mirror and who was in shape not for vanity but because that s what her job called for Image zoom Credit Ben Wats But her intense training had offscreen benefits as well including stronger muscles and a newfound love...”
“...of boxing...”
““I was a five-pound weight person, and now I can do 15, 20,” Holmes shared.”


"Now I think it's more like a healthy decision." Image zooming Katie Holmes | credit: Ben wats Holmes also likes group fitness classes, such as soulcycle, to share her "sense of community"
"It used to be to fit my jeans. I'm fed up with it," she said of her eating habits
“… It's the best she's ever been... "
The 39 year old actress reported in the April issue of women's health on her exercise program for the upcoming action thriller the doorman
Holmes' fitness time includes weight lifting and personal training, sometimes lasting for two hours
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I want to be honest with someone who has been trained in the army," she said
"It means that a person who doesn't always pay attention to the mirror, her figure is not for vanity, but because this is the credit of image zooming required by her work, but her high-intensity training has off-screen benefits, including stronger muscles and newly found love..."
“… Boxing... "
"I used to be a 5-pound person, now I can do 15 pounds, 20 pounds," Holmes said



**Something goes wrong**
““He still considers Jen the love of his life,” In Touch’s source says.”
““She’d be beyond thrilled to win an Academy Award for Best Actress — something that’s evaded both her and Angelina.”We wouldn’t be surprised if Brad and Jen reconvene in some capacity, though it seems he’ll always want her back by his side.”
““He wants Jen involved again as he produces and develops more and more high-quality film and cable TV products.”That kind of professional partnership could pay off for Jen, too, since the insider says she wants in on “prestige projects” under his production banner.”
““They worked well together” when they formed the production company Plan B in 2001, an insider close to Brad tells In Touch.”
“If they can’t be romantic partners, though, the War Machine star wants Jen to be his partner in other pursuits.”
“And while Brad would “never dream of” ruining his ex’s new marriage, he “would take a second chance at love with Jen in a heartbeat.” (He could have that chance if it’s true that Jen and Justin are having marital discord.)”
“Jennifer has been married to Wanderlust co-star Justin Theroux for two years now.”
“Brad keeps telling friends that he’s seeing everything more clearly.”Getty ImagesOf course, these realizations may be coming too late.”
““And while Brad’s not in love with Jen, he realizes how much he does love her.”
““He’s come to realize that leaving Jen for Angelina was one of the biggest mistakes of his life,” the source adds.”


"He still thinks Jane is the love of his life," an in touch source said
"She would be very excited to win the Best Actress Oscar - something neither she nor Angelina thought of." We won't be surprised if Brad and Jan get together again in some capacity, even though he always seems to want her to come back to him
"He wants Jen to be involved again in the production and development of more and more high-quality movies and cable TV products." This professional partnership is also good for Zhan, because people familiar with the matter say she hopes to participate in the prestige project under his production banner
"They worked very well together," they set up production company plan B in 2001, an insider close to Brad told touch
"However, if they can't be romantic partners, the war machine star wants Jan to be his partner in other pursuits."
Although Brad "never dreamed" of ruining his ex-wife's new marriage, he "would fall in love with Jen once more in the heartbeat." (if it's true that Jen and Justin don't get married, he might have the chance.)
"Jennifer has been married to Justin Cyrus, CO star of vagabond for two years."
"Brad kept telling his friends that everything he saw was clearer." "Of course, it may have come too late," Getty said
"Although Brad didn't love Jane, he realized how much he loved her."
"He began to realize that leaving Jane for Angelina was one of the biggest mistakes of his life," the source added



Number  794
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The actress-turned-director added that acting is a creative job and it helped her in exploring different times in history.”
“Despite the initial success, the actress revealed she never truly felt at home in front of the camera.”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie supported each other when they were a couple.”
“Even after their split in September 2016, none of the stars have publicly spoken ill about the other one.”
“Angelina Jolie’s recent podcast conversation has made some to believe that the reason behind her split with husband Brad Pitt was her cancer scare.”
“One publication, Philippine Daily Inquirer, even reported that Jolie supposedly said her health concerns led to her divorce with Pitt.”
“Reportedly, the actor was afraid of her cancer and decided to end the marriage.”
“In a recent interview on the Hollywood Reporter‘s podcast for her film First They Killed My Father, Angelina Jolie candidly revealed that her health problems reportedly took a toll on her married life with Brad Pitt.”
“Back in 2013, Angelina Jolie underwent a preventive double mastectomy after learning from her doctors that she had an 87 percent risk of developing breast cancer due to a defective BRCA1 gene.”
“Angelina’s mother, Marcheline Bertrand, also had breast cancer and died from ovarian cancer when she was just 56 years old.”


"The director, who started as an actress, added that acting was a creative job, which helped her explore different times in history."
"Despite her initial success, the actress revealed that she never really felt at home in front of the camera."
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie supported each other as children."
"Even after the breakup in September 2016, no star spoke ill of each other in public."
"Angelina Jolie's recent podcast conversation has led some to believe that the reason behind her breakup with her husband Brad Pitt is her fear of cancer."
A publication in the Philippine Daily Inquirer even reported that Julie was said to have divorced Pitt for health reasons
According to reports, the actor was afraid of cancer and decided to end the marriage
Angelina Jolie recently revealed in an interview for her film "the first time they killed my father" on the Hollywood Reporter podcast that her health problems are reported to have affected her marriage with Brad Pitt
"As early as 2013, Angelina Jolie learned from her doctors that her risk of breast cancer was as high as 87% due to the BRCA1 gene defect, so she received preventive double mastectomy."
"Angelina's mother, Marceline Bertrand, also had breast cancer and died of ovarian cancer when she was 56."



Number  795
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLife reached out to Carrie Underwood’s rep for comment but did not immediately hear back.”
“Their main inspiration?”
“Having two on the way!”
“If this report about Carrie’s alleged pregnancy is true, she and her husband Mike must be doubly excited.”
“Could it be?”
“Carrie Underwood, 35, and her husband Mike Fisher, 38, are reportedly expecting twin girls, according to In Touch.”
“And if being three months along isn’t the best news to get Carrie’s mind off of her scary new scar and back to better things, we don’t know what is.”
“She already has one adorable kid in her brood — Isaiah Michael, who she gave birth to in 2015 — but “they’ve been trying for a baby for the past few months,” sources close to the couple told the mag.”
““She and Mike are beyond thrilled that their little family is going from three to five in one big jump.”The fact that Mike has retired from the NHL makes this report even more exciting!”
“Instead of being on the road with his team, he’d be right at home with his growing fam.”


"Hollywood Life contacted a representative of carrier Underwood for comments, but did not get an immediate response."
"What was their main inspiration?"
"There are two on the way!"
"If this story about Carrie's pregnancy is true, she and her husband Mike will be excited."
"Will it?"
"Kelly Underwood, 35, and her husband, Mike Fisher, 38, are reported to be pregnant with twin daughters."
"We don't know what it's like to say that three months together can't free Carrie from her terrible new scar and return to a better life."
"She has had a lovely child in her parenting - Isaiah Michael, who she gave birth in 2015 - but" they've been trying to have a child in the past few months, "the source close to the couple told the magazine
"She and Mike are very excited, because their small family will change from three to five in a big leap." The fact that Mike has retired from the NHL makes this report even more exciting
"Instead of going on the road with his team, it's better to stay at home with his growing family."



Number  796
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The reason for her social media action is unknown.”
“That baby is so cute, little True.”Two days ago, Kardashian disabled her comments on her Instagram.”
“On Friday, an insider revealed to US Weekly that Kardashian and Thompson are "fully back together," despite the fact that prior to their daughter's birth, videos and photos of the basketball star visibly cheating on the reality star with at least five different women surfaced back in April.”
“Now that the two have reportedly decided to move on from the past the source said that new mom thinks that the whole world is against Tristan and no one in her world is supporting Tristan and she s still in love with him According to the source Kardashian has...”
“...viewed the photos and videos of her boyfriend with the various other women...”
““Those around Khloé are trying to be as supportive to her as they can.”
“It’s hard because if everyone distances themselves from Tristan, they’ll risk losing Khloé,” the insider explained.”
““Luckily there’s this buffer time.”
“She always planned to stay in Cleveland the first three months.”
“Now with Tristan in the playoffs for possibly another month no decision needs to be made right now Rumors began to swirl that the couple may have gotten back together after the pair were snapped on Friday laughing and chatting together at what appeared to be a lunch with friends...”


"The reason for her social media actions is not known."
Two days ago, Kardashian banned her comments on instagram
"On Friday, an insider told us weekly that Kardashian and Thompson were" completely reunited ", although videos and photos of the basketball star apparently cheating at least five different women with reality TV stars surfaced as early as April before their daughter was born."
"It's reported that now they have decided to leave the past. The source said that the new mother thinks that the whole world is against Tristan. No one supports Tristan in her world. She still loves him. According to the source, Kardashian has..."
“… I saw pictures and videos of her boyfriend and other women... "
"The people around khlo é are trying to support her."
"It's hard because if everyone is away from Tristan, they risk losing Heroe," the person familiar with the matter explained
"Fortunately, there is a buffer time."
"She always plans to stay in Cleveland for the first three months."
"Tristan may still be in the playoffs for a month now, and there is no need to make any decision yet. It is rumored that the couple may have been reunited because they were photographed laughing and chatting together when they seemed to be having lunch with friends last Friday..."



Number  797
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She has undergone a knee surgery before which she was a college football player for the Graceland Yellowjackets.”
“She is the celebrity from the reality show “Keeping Up with Kardashians” along with her daughters.”
“The sight of lumpy flesh doesn’t upset her.”
“It said:“She has this weird sense of joy when she sees patches of cellulite on her thighs, hips and tummy.”
“Let’s see what the article had to say other than that.”
“Maybe her excessive talking needed a halt and this quoted name of her may stop her from talking much now.”
“She blabbering about things that makes no sense.”
“And I don’t think it could be wrong.”
“Just to remind you, the article also called her a “blabbermouth”.”
“She is WAITING for the summer just to show it off!”


"She had knee surgery and was a college football player with the grayland yellow jackets."
"She's a celebrity on the reality show follow Kardashian, and her daughters."
"She's upset at the sight of the meat."
"She had a strange sense of happiness when she saw the fat mass on her thighs, hips and stomach," it said
"Let's see what else this article has to say."
"Maybe she says too much and needs to stop. The quoted name may prevent her from saying too much now."
"She chattered on about meaningless things."
"I don't think it's wrong."
"To remind you, this article also calls her a" chatterer. "
"She waited for summer just to show off!"



Number  798
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If they aren’t interested then so be it.””
““She likes Bey and Jay and would love to be friends—but it has to be a two-way street.”
““Kim would like nothing more than to drop the whole feud and move on with their lives,” the source told Hollywood Life.”
“One of those rants took aim at Jay and Beyoncé.”
“The hospitalization shortly after Kanye delivered a series of bizarre rants delivered during his Saint Pablo Tour.”
“After Kim was robbed at gunpoint last October in Paris, Kanye was committed to the UCLA Medical Center for psychological evaluation.”
““Kanye had a real difficult time last year and is still coming out of it, so to hit him like that wasn‘t cool.”It’s no secret the Kardashian-West family endured a difficult 2016.”
““She gets very protective of her husband, like a mama bear […] She thinks it was a low blow to diss Kanye and throw around words like ‘insane’ after all he’s been through,” a source told the news site.”
“According to Hollywood Life, sources claim the 36-year-old reality TV star is upset about Jay’s lyrics and believes it was an insensitive move.”
“But is Kim convinced Ye is the target?”


"If they're not interested, that's it."
"She likes Bei and Jay Chou and wants to be friends, but it has to be two-way."
The source told Hollywood Life: "Kim's best hope is to let go of all the grudges and go on with their life."
"One of the snarls was directed at Jay and Beyonce."
"Shortly after Kanye made a series of bizarre growls during his tour of San Pablo, he was hospitalized."
"Last October, after Kim was robbed in Paris with a gun, Kanye was sent to UCLA Medical Center for psychological assessment."
"Kanye went through a very difficult period last year and is still out of the woods, so it's not cool to hit him like that." It's no secret that the Kardashian West family has had a tough 2016. "
"She's very protective of her husband, just like mother bear," a source told the news website ]She thinks that after Kanye has gone through so much, it's a very low blow to abandon him and say things like "Crazy" everywhere. "
"According to Hollywood life, the 36 year old reality TV star is upset about Jay Chou's lyrics, saying it's a insensitive move," he said
"But is Kim sure that ye is the target?"



Number  799
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also is obsessed with blackjack and was booted from a top casino!”
““His head took the brunt of the fall,” the informant dished to Radar.”
““And this time, friends are terrified he’s pushed himself too far!” Click through for more on the disturbing story.”
“Thrill-seeking boozehoundis facing a brain damage crisis after getting into a horrifying motorcycle crash on a crowded L.A. street late last month, and RadarOnline.com has exclusively obtained bone-chilling photos of the scene!”
““Ben’s been pushing himself to the limits after the bust-up of his marriag e to” a source close to the out-of-control 45-year-old told Radar.”
“Ironically, the bloated Batman star, who is still in booze rehab, wrecked his new bike — hailed as the world’s fastest motorcycle — on his way to church!”
“The troubled actor hit his head against a curb after crashing his 194-horsepower Suzuki Hayabusa, which retails for nearly $20,000 — and was somehow able to hobble away from the accident!”
“However, friends and medical insiders fear the long-term effects of the crash!”
““He was wearing a helmet, but God knows what kind of damage he may have suffered!”Doctors believe the fall may have caused injuries to Affleck's skull that could have frightening implications.”


"He's also addicted to Blackjack and kicked out of the top casinos!"
"His head bears the brunt of the fall," the informant told the radar
"And this time, my friends were afraid that he would push himself too far! "Click to see more about this disturbing story."
At the end of last month, a terrible motorcycle crash happened on a crowded street in Los Angeles, and buzehorndi, who is seeking stimulation, is facing the crisis of brain injury RadarOnline.com The website got the creepy photos of the scene
"Ben has been pushing himself to the limit since his marriage broke up," a source close to the runaway 45 year old told radar
Ironically, the bloated Batman star is still on the road of abstinence, crashing his new bike on his way to church - hailed as the fastest motorcycle in the world
The beleaguered actor bumped into his 194 horsepower Suzuki Hayabusa, which retailed for nearly $20000, and then bumped his head into a curb, somehow hobbling through the accident! "
"However, friends and people in the medical industry are worried about the long-term impact of the crash!"
"He's wearing a helmet, but God knows what kind of injury he might have been!"! "Doctors believe that the fall may cause injury to Affleck's skull, which may have a terrible impact."



Number  800
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Vanity Fair has reached out to the Palace for comment on the report.”
“...that trip does not involve a stop to see him...”
““COMING TO AMERICA!” the cover line shouts (with the similarly all-caps question touted beneath: “BUT IS HER DAD ON THE LIST?”).”
“Yes the magazine claims that per a Palace insider Harry and Meghan are in the midst of planning a U S tour in the spring of 2019 their first full scale overseas tour as a married couple is set for...”
“...this October when they will travel to Australia and New Zealand timed for the Invictus Games...”
““They are so excited to head to the U.S.” the insider told the magazine.”
“Meghan is looking forward to introducing Harry to everything she loves about the U S Feel free to begin searching through the entries from the Tig you printed and arranged in a scrapbook to start deducing to which eateries and...”
“...boutiques Meghan might introduce her husband...”
“Us Weekly has additional posited details it is offering up as well claiming that the duo are thinking New York Washington D C and California though they are working to finalize locations and venues In California they will reportedly visit...”
“San Francisco where they will meet with C E O s and female tech entrepreneurs to encourage their involvement in the industry Perhaps Meghan can pitch some Silicon Valley types on a Tig esque recommendations app or Harry can offer...”


"Vanity Fair has contacted the Palace Museum to comment on the report."
“… That trip didn't need to stop to see him... "
"Come to America! "But is her father on the list?" the front line shouts ).”
"Yes, the magazine claims that according to a palace insider, Harry and Megan are planning a trip to the United States in the spring of 2019, and their first full overseas trip as a married couple is scheduled to..."
“…… In October this year, they will go to Australia and New Zealand for the inviolable games... "
"They are so excited to go to America." Insiders told the magazine
"Megan is looking forward to introducing to Harry everything about the United States she loves. You can start to search for TIG's items you printed and organized in your scrapbook, and start to infer which restaurants and..."
“… The boutique Megan might introduce her husband... "
"US weekly provides more hypothetical details and claims that the two are considering New York, Washington, D.C., and California, although they are trying to finalize the location and location in California, and it is reported that they will visit..."
"In San Francisco, they will meet with CEOs and women technology entrepreneurs to encourage them to participate in the industry - maybe Megan can introduce some silicon valley type people on the TIG style recommendation app, or Harry can offer..."



Number  801
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The family is currently gearing up for the Steve Irwin Gala Dinner in Los Angeles on May 5.”
“As for the patriarch of the Irwin family Steve who died in September 2006 after being stung by a stingray while filming a documentary was honored with a star on the Hollywood Walk of Fame on Thursday April 26”
“Bindi later told Entertainment Tonight she knew Powell was the one after he put on a khaki Australia Zoo uniform saying It was kind of one of those moments that was a real defining moment for me only the people who are the closest to us that get their khakis...”
“So permission granted and it’s been wonderful ever since.”The happy couple debuted their romance in September 2015 at a taping for season 21 of Dancing With the Stars.”
“And I thought, who does that?”
“...to keep in touch with the Dancing With the Stars winner after meeting at her family s zoo has her seal of approval Chandler had his brother contact the zoo to ask my permission if Chandler could stay in touch with Bindi...”
“So for us in our relationship we re enjoying this moment and having so much fun traveling the world working with animals following our passion of conservation and just being together Bindi s mother Terri Irwin also told Us why the 21 year old who went out of his way...”
““As young people, it’s all about school and then college and then getting a house and getting married and that’s fantastic, but sometimes we forget to live in the now,” Bindi explained.”
“For us, we’re just enjoying this time.”The wildlife conservationist — who followed in the footsteps of her late father Steve Irwin — says that despite finding the “one”, she believes the couple should be focusing on enjoying their youth.”
“...s all very exciting...”


"The family is currently preparing for the Steve Owen dinner in Los Angeles on May 5."
"As for Steve, the head of the Irving family, who was stung by a stingray while filming a documentary, died in September 2006 and was named a star on the Hollywood Walk of fame on April 26 (Thursday)," he said
"Bingdi later told tonight's entertainment show that she knew Powell was the one who wore the Khaki Australian zoo uniform. She said that this was a really decisive moment for me. Only the closest people could wear Khaki Pants..."
In September 2015, the happy couple showed off their relationship for the first time in the recording of season 21 of dance with the stars
"Who did it, I think?"
“… In order to keep in touch with the winner of "dancing with the stars" who met in her zoo, Chandler got her approval. He asked his brother to contact the zoo and asked me if Chandler could keep in touch with Bingdi... "
"So, in our relationship, we enjoy this moment, the pleasure of traveling around the world with animals, our passion for protecting animals, and being with benty's mother, Terri Owen, who also tells us why benty, 21, is desperate to..."
"As young people, it's all about going to school, then going to college, then buying a house and getting married, which is great, but sometimes we forget about our life now," Bingdi explained
"For us, we're just enjoying the time." The wildlife activist, who followed in the footsteps of her late father, Steve Irwin, said that despite finding "one," she believed the couple should focus on enjoying their youth
“… It's all exciting... "



Number  802
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Kevin Winter/Getty Images]”
““Jenner shocked the world when she attended President Donald Trump’s inauguration in Washington DC last week, with not a single family member by her side.”
“Jenner, who has become somewhat distant to the rest of the Kardashian family in recent years, has remained on good terms with West, it’s been claimed, with Radar Online adding that the two have particularly bonded over their views regarding politics.”
“While Kanye made it perfectly clear at one of his concerts back in November that he did not vote during the election, the rapper has certainly been favoring Trump in recent weeks, having even accepted an invitation to meet up with the president in New York, back in December.”
“The father-of-two later revealed that the meeting was rather positive, insinuating that he was actively working with Donald Trump to make America great again, a slogan that has been used throughout the 70-year-old’s campaign for the presidential position.”
“With this in mind, Caitlyn Jenner reportedly doesn’t see anyone better to fill Trump’s position than Kanye, a source tells Radar Online.”
“Caitlyn is brutally honest with Kanye, stressing that he stands a chance to make it into the White House — and when he does, it will be him sitting in the Oval Office, making decisions on behalf of the nation.”
“It’s been a conversation that’s really brought the twosome closer, and Jenner certainly seems to be the motivation that Kanye has needed to take it more seriously.”
“Whenever Jenner and West get together, the political talk has only made the troubled rapper more determined about his forthcoming run to win the presidential election in 2020.”
““Caitlyn Jenner is just the latest reality TV star with political ambitions.”


"[close up by Kevin winter / Getty pictures]"
"Jenner shocked the world when he attended president Trump's inauguration in Washington last week. There was no family around him."
"Jenner has been estranged from other members of the Kardashian family in recent years and is said to have maintained a good relationship with West, adding that they are particularly close on political points of view."
"Although Kanye made it very clear at a concert last November that he did not vote during the election, the rapper certainly has a good feeling for trump in recent weeks. He even accepted the invitation to meet the president in New York last December."
"The father of the two later revealed that the meeting was quite positive, implying that he was actively working with Donald Trump to make America great again, a slogan that has been used in the 70 year old presidential campaign."
"With that in mind, Caitlin Jenner is reported to believe that no one can fill Trump's position better than Kanye," a source told radar online
"Caitlin was very honest with Kanye and stressed that he had a chance to be in the White House - when he was in the White House, he would be sitting in the Oval Office and making decisions on behalf of the country."
"It's a really close conversation, and Jenna is obviously kenye's motivation to take it more seriously."
"Whenever Jenner and west get together, political talk only makes the troubled rapper more determined to run for the 2020 presidential election."
"Caitlin Jenner is just the latest reality TV star with political ambitions."



Number  803
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She can next be seen in Ocean's Eight with Sandra Bullock and Cate Blanchett.”
“Valerian And the City Of A Thousand Planets hit theaters on July 21.”
“And a source told Hollywood Life on Friday that the 29-year-old Diamonds crooner is fine with her look.”
“'Rihanna is happy and feels sexy and more confident than ever with her new curves,' said a source.”
“Knockout Rihanna seen here on Tuesday is happy with her new curves a source told Hollywood Life on Friday Stay as you are RiRi She thinks she looks fabulous and is not going to change for anyone added the insider She thinks she looks fabulous and is not going to...”
“...change for anyone...”
“The Kiss It Better singer has been dating businessman Hassan Jameel, who has been romantically linked to Naomi Campbell in the past.”
“'She has always wanted a man who can handle her and is not intimidated by her femininity,' added the friend.”
“Her guy: The Kiss It Better singer has been dating businessman Hassan Jameel.”
“'She has always wanted a man who can handle her and is not intimidated by her femininity,' added the friend'She is definitely not going to change for a man.”


"Next she's going to play ocean eight with Sandra Bullock and Kate Blanchett
"Valeriana and the city of a thousand stars will be released on July 21."
"On Friday, a source told Hollywood daily that the 29 year old diamond singer was very satisfied with her look."
"Rihanna is happy that her new curve is sexier and more confident than ever," a source said
"Selehanna, who saw the elimination here on Tuesday, is very satisfied with her new curve. A source told Hollywood Life on Friday that you are Riley. She thinks she looks great and won't change because of anyone. People familiar with the matter added that she thought she looked great and would not... "
“… Change for anyone... "
"Kiss it better singer has been dating businessman Hassan Jamil, who had a romantic relationship with Naomi Campbell in the past."
"She always wanted a man who could control her without being intimidated by her femininity," the friend added
"Her man: kiss it better singer has been dating businessman Hassan Jamil."
"She always wanted a man who could control her without being intimidated by her femininity," the friend added. "She would never change for a man."



Number  804
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Webb was transported to the Clark County Detention Center.”Image zoom Credit: Las Vegas Metropolitan Police DepartmentJust before the show, Spears had tweeted a warm message to her Vegas audience.”
“Webb was asked to leave the concert by security prior to him jumping on stage and dancing,” the statement read.”
“...fan rushed the stage...”
“The incident occurred Wednesday night just as the 35-year-old pop star finished performing “(You Drive Me) Crazy” towards the end of her set at the AXIS auditorium inside Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino.”
“In a video obtained by TMZ, Spears engaged the crowd, initially unaware that a man had climbed onto the stage, attempting to get her attention.”
“Quick-thinking dancers encircled the crasher until security agents arrived onstage and surrounded the headliner.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: X17Online/YouTube“Is something OK?” Spears asked.”
““What’s going on?”
“What’s wrong?” Then — visibly frightened — she gasped, “He’s got a gun?” Her mic was switched off as she was rushed to safety offstage.”


"Webb was taken to Clark County Detention Center." Photo credit: just before the show started, spears tweeted a warm message to her Las Vegas audience
"Webb was asked by security to leave the concert before he stepped on the stage to dance," the statement said
“…… Fan Chong came to the stage... "
"It happened on Wednesday night when the 35 year old pop star was performing" you're driving me crazy "in the axis auditorium at Hollywood planet Resort and casinos."
"In a video obtained by TMZ, spears attracted the audience. At first, she didn't know that someone had climbed onto the stage to try to attract her attention."
"Quick thinking dancers surrounded the Crashers until security officers came on stage and surrounded the headlines."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“Image zoom  Credit:X17Online/YouTube ”Is that ok? "Asked spears
"What's the matter?"
"What's the matter? And then - obviously scared - she gasped and said, "does he have a gun? "When she was rushed backstage, her microphone was turned off."



Number  805
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For further exclusive content, please go to www.redonline.co.uk.”
““I had two kids by the time I was 27 and I’d been married for four years.”
“The cover star opened up about her first marriage to Tom Cruise and what it’s like celebrating a decade of marital bliss with her second husband, country singer Keith Urban.”
““When you’re older, you’ve been through things, you’ve made mistakes,” Kidman said, adding that the first three months of marriage to the singer were tough.”
““So you come into it [a second marriage], still giddy, but wanting it to last.”
“We always consider the us We say Is this going to be good for us It s the simplest phrase but it works The Oscar winning actress also opened up about her nearly 11 year marriage to Eyes Wide Shut co star Tom Cruise saying that she was so young...”
“...when the two wed I look back now and I m like What You look at Taylor Swift I mean how old is she...”
“She’s 26,” Kidman said.”
“But that’s what I wanted.”MANAGEMENT ARISTS SYNDICATION Red So gorgeous.”
“The full interview appears in the November issue of Red, available on U.K. newsstands Oct. 4.”


"For more exclusive content, please visit www.redonline.co.uk 。”
"I had two children when I was 27, and I've been married for four years."
"The cover star made public her first marriage to Tom Cruise and her 10-year celebration with her second husband, country singer Keith Urban."
"When you grow up, you go through a lot of things and make a lot of mistakes," Kidman said, adding that the first three months of marriage to the singer were tough
"So you joined (the second marriage) and are still dizzy, but hope it lasts."
"We always think that what we say about America will be good for us. This is the simplest sentence, but it works. The Oscar winning actress also disclosed her nearly 11 years of marriage to Tom Cruise, CO star of" open eyes, close eyes ", saying that she is too young..."
"When they got married, I think back now, I was like you were looking at Tyler swift. I mean, how old is she..."
"She's 26," Kidman said
"But that's exactly what I want." Management scientist syndicate is so beautiful
"The full interview was at red in November, at the British newsstand on October 4."



Number  806
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They are friends who want to help the helpless."”
“...campaign for local L.A. shelters...Trevor is a big animal and human rights advocate...”
“Both are big animal lovers and advocates and are working on a ‘Be Pawsome, Adopt!'”
“His rep told Just Jared in a statement, "They are just friends.”
“Jackson and Donovan have yet to comment on the outing.”
“...white tennis shoes...”
“The rising star kept it casual in a pair of loose fitting cargo pants and nude tank top as she stuck close to the actor who looked ready for the beach in a pair of shorts graphic T shirt and...”
“News the pair is definitely just friends.”
“But despite their obvious display of what some would consider romantic affection, a source tells E!”
“Michael Jackson's 19-year-old daughter was photographed holding hands with the 90210 alum, 38, while out and about in Malibu this past weekend, per photos obtained by The Daily Mail.”


"They are friends who want to help the helpless."
“… Los Angeles local shelter movement Trevor is a big animal and human rights advocate... "
"Both of them are big animal lovers and advocates. They are both committed to a" become a paw, adopt it! "
"They're just friends," his representative told Jared in a statement
"Jackson and Donovan have yet to comment on the expedition."
“… White tennis shoes... "
"The rising star keeps casual in baggy cargo pants and nude vest, because she is next to the actor in shorts and graphic T-shirt, and he looks ready to go to the beach..."
"They are absolutely just friends."
But, despite their apparent display of what some people consider romantic feelings, one source told e! "
"Michael Jackson's 19-year-old daughter was photographed holding hands with 38 year old 90210 alum as she walked around Malibu last weekend, according to the daily mail



Number  807
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When do you think Liam and Cheryl will announce it?”
““Liam is being careful to protect his new family and has no plans to take his baby out into the world anytime soon,” an insider revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“But, as far as the public knows, the newborn still doesn’t have a name!”
“HollywoodLife.com learned EXCLUSIVELY that’s actually for a very good reason though.”
“Find out what all the secrecy is about here!”
“Now that Liam Payne‘s, 23, a father, he knows exactly what it’s like to want to protect your child at all costs.”
“And that’s exactly what he’s doing!”
“Everything changed for the One Directioner when his girlfriend Cheryl Fernandez-Versini, 33, gave birth to their first child, a baby boy, on Mar.”
“22.”
“And while we have seen a pic of Liam holding the tiny bundle of joy, that will most likely be the only photo we see of the infant for quite a while.”


"When do you think Liam and Cheryl will announce?"
"Liam is very careful to protect his new family and has no plan to have a baby in the short term," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"But, as far as the public knows, the newborn still has no name!"
"But there's a good reason for that."
"Find out the secret here!"
"Now that Liam Penn, 23, is a father, he knows exactly what it's like to protect a child at all costs."
"That's what he did!"
"Everything changed for the director when his 33 year old girlfriend Cheryl Fernandez wisini gave birth to their first child, a baby boy, on March 1."
“22.”
"Although we saw a picture of Liam holding a small bundle of joy, it's probably the only picture of a baby we've seen for quite a long time."



Number  808
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“'Big Bang Theory' Actress and Husband Buy New Home Kaley Cuoco Pregnant?”
“'Big Bang Theory' Actress and Husband Buy New HomeEmail Print Img No-img Menu Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin CommentIs Kaley Cuoco pregnant?”
“There are rumors that "The Big Bang Theory" actress is getting ready to start a family with her husband, Ryan Sweeting.”
“The couple has just bought Khloe Kardashian and Lamar Odom's former home in Tarzana, California, and according to reports, they have converted what used to be Odom's man cave into a nursery.”
“Though Cuoco is not pregnant as of the moment, fans of the actress are supporting her if ever she does decide to have a baby anytime soon.”
“For now, Cuoco is busy filming the eighth season of "The Big Bang Theory" and caring for her dogs.”
“The actress is also a known advocate for animal rights and adoption of rescue dogs, and she has been seen frequenting events which support those causes.”
“Recently, the actress made headlines when she successfully secured a new contract for the show, with the actress now set to earn $1 million per episode.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
"The big bang actress and her husband are buying a new house. Is Kylie cuckoo pregnant?"
"Big Bang actress and husband buy new family email print img no img menu WhatsApp Google reddit digg stumpon LinkedIn comment is kaley cuoco pregnant?"
"It's rumored that the heroine of the Big Bang is getting ready to marry her husband, Ryan swift."
"The couple just bought Khloe Kardashian's and Lamar Odom's home in Tarzana, California, and they are reported to have converted what used to be Odom's burrow into a nursery."
"Although Kuko is not pregnant yet, her fans will support her if she really decides to have a baby in a short time."
"At the moment, Kuko is busy filming season 8 of big bang, taking care of her dog."
The actress is also a well-known advocate of animal rights and adoption of rescue dogs. She often attends activities to support these causes
"Recently, the actress has made headlines with a new contract to perform, and now she's making $1 million per episode."



Number  809
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The couple continues to support one another through their separate endeavors, as Shelton flies back and forth to Vegas for Stefani’s show while filming season 14 of NBC’s The Voice.”
“...so grateful this is how much you influenced me and gave me life she told Extra s Mark Wright...”
“That was a magical night and I loved the flowers Shelton s inspiration influenced Stefani s Las Vegas residency show Gwen Stefani Just a Girl when she sported a cowgirl inspired ensemble for Make Me Like You That part of the show is my super love note my I am...”
“...first time Stefani explained...”
“I hardly ever carried a purse Her affection for the I Lived It singer carried over to her answer to the question of What s your favorite thing that you ve ever worn The red Yanina Couture dress I had on when Blake and I stepped out together for the...”
“Even in my 30s, I was a tomboy.”
“I enjoy letting that part of me come out now because when I was in No Doubt, I never thought of myself as sexy.”
““It’s probably because I’m super in love and have a really manly man [Shelton].”
““More feminine than ever before,” Stefani shared.”
“During a conversation with supermodel Heidi Klum for InStyle, Stefani was asked to describe her current style.”


"The couple continued to support each other through their own efforts, and Sheldon flew back to Las Vegas to participate in Stephanie's show while filming NBC's Season 14 the voice."
"Thank you so much. That's how you influenced me and gave me life," she told S. mark Wright
"It was a magical night, and I like to spend Sheldon's inspiration on Stefani's Las Vegas residence, showing that Gwen Stefani is just a girl, when she sports a cowboy Girl's inspiration ensemble, which makes me like you, this part of the program is my super love note, I am..."
“… Stefani explained for the first time
"I almost never bring my wallet - her love for the singer of my life leads to her answer to this question: what's your favorite thing? When Blake and I went out to the wedding, the red Yana dress you were wearing was mine... "
"Even in my 30s, I was a tomboy."
"I like to show that part of myself now, because when I have no doubt about it, I never think I'm sexy."
"Maybe it's because I'm in love with a man (Sheldon),"
"More feminine than ever," Stefani shared
"In a conversation with the superstar Heidi Klum, Stephanie was asked to describe her current style."



Number  810
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
“Who are you hoping wins?!”
“We’re guessing you’re probably not alone!”
“And our insiders say Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott also have a friendly bet going!”
“Here’s what the winner gets!”
“Nothing like a little competition to spice up a relationship!”
“As a nail-biter of a World Series between the Houston Astros and the LA Dodgers draws to a close, we’re hearing that your favorite celeb couple has a cute bet riding on the Fall Classic!”
“According to our insider, Travis Scott, 25, and his reportedly pregnant girlfriend Kylie Jenner, 20, made a little wager on the winner, but don’t worry it’s not money!”
“Head here to see more adorable pics of Kylie and Travis!”
““Travis is a huge Astro’s fan and he’s betting big on them winning the World Series,” a friend of Kylie’s tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Tell us next!"
"Who do you want to win?"
"We guess you may not be alone!"
"Our insiders say Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott have a friendly bet, too!"
"This is what the winner gets!"
"Nothing can stimulate a relationship more than a small match!"
"When the world series between the Houston astronomers and the Los Angeles Dodgers is coming to an end, we heard that your favorite celebrity couple has a lovely bet on the fall classic!"
"According to our inside information, Travis Scott, 25, and his girlfriend Kylie Jenner, who is reported to be pregnant, have made a little bet on the winner, but don't worry, it's not money!"
"Come here and see more lovely pictures of Kelly and Travis!"
A friend of Kelly told reporters: "Travis is a big fan of Astro Boy. He's betting that they will win the world series." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  811
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Schure ends the statement with quite the clapback You are the saddest individuals and picking on a pregnant lady is tantamount to possessing the coldest despicable heart...”
“I stood silent during Beyoncé s first pregnancy when you thought it was okay to bully her like the cowards you are when you accused her of never being pregnant but I simply cannot this time FROM COINAGE Jay Z Beyoncé All the Ways J and Bey Get Paid Noel...”
“...the statement continues...”
“Image zoom RELATED VIDEO Pregnant Beyoncé Gives Closer Look at Her 7 560 Courtside Date Night Ensemble But the sacrifice to our faces our feet and our entire bodies is something we welcome because we bring beautiful humans into the world who will one day combat your hate and negativity...”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Do you know that it sometimes affects our speech, our ability to chew intently and a host of other things?”Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
““Did you know that in addition to weight gain there is often a dramatic change in the blood flow in the system and increased fluid causing swelling?”Continues Noel-Schure, “Do you know that often women’s gums get swollen?”
“Please tell me,” read the statement, in response to a MediaTakeOut rumor speculating that the expectant singer had undergone lip injections.”
““What do you know about the effects of pregnancy on a woman’s entire body?”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"At the end of this passage, Shuer said that you are the saddest person. Choosing a pregnant woman is equal to having the coldest and meanest heart..."
"When Beyonce was pregnant for the first time, when you accused her that she had never been pregnant, you thought it was OK to bully her like a coward, but I stood there silently, but this time I couldn't get paid for all the coining methods of jay z Beyonc é, Noel..."
“… "Continue..."
"The video about image zooming pregnant Beyonce let us take a closer look at her 7560 on-the-spot date night ensembles, but we welcome the sacrifice of our face, feet and whole body, because we bring beautiful human beings to this world, and they will one day fight against your hatred and negativity..."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Did you know that it sometimes affects our language, our ability to concentrate on chewing and many other things? "Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Did you know that in addition to weight gain, the blood flow in the system often changes dramatically, and the increase of body fluid can cause swelling? Noel Schur continued: "do you know that women's gums often swell?"
"Please tell me," the statement said in response to media rumors that the singer to be received lip injections
"How much do you know about the impact of pregnancy on a woman's whole body?"
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  812
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From GOBankingRates...”
“The song became a cornerstone of West’s 2004 debut album “The College Dropout,” which received 10 Grammy nominations.”
“Kevork Djansezian / Getty ImagesKanye West burst onto the scene in 2004 with the release of his album “The College Dropout,” and he has since become a fashion designer, actor, film producer, screenwriter, music video director and entrepreneur.”
“According to Celebrity Net Worth, Kanye West’s net worth is $3.2 billion, although Forbes puts him at a lower $1.3 billion.”
“Net worth 1 3 billion 3 2 billion 1 3 billion 3 2 billion Date of birth June 8 1977 June 8 1977 Primary sources of wealth Yeezy music Yeezy music Career highlights 12 albums 70 Grammy nominations and 21 wins West s net worth is a combination of his...”
“...real estate holdings music catalog Yeezy brand and website and other assets...”
“Read: Taylor Swift and 24 More of the Richest MusiciansEarly Life and CareerKanye West was born in Atlanta but moved to Chicago with his mother when he was 3.”
“He became interested in music after meeting producer and DJ No I.D.”
“West dropped out of college after a year to pursue music.”
“His talent as a producer was clear, and after moving to New York, more and more rap and pop artists requested his services, including Alicia Keys, Jay-Z, Ludacris, Beyoncé and John Legend.”


"More from gobankingrates..."
The song became the cornerstone of West's 2004 debut album college dropouts, which received 10 Grammy nominations
"In 2004, kevork djansezian / Getty Images Kanye West became popular with the release of his album the college dropout. Since then, he has become a fashion designer, actor, film producer, screenwriter, music and video director and entrepreneur."
"Kanye West's net worth is $3.2 billion according to celebrity net worth, but Forbes has set his net worth at a lower $1.3 billion."
"Net worth 1.332 billion 1.332 billion date of birth June 8, 1977 main source of wealth yeezy music career highlights 12 albums 70 Grammy nominations and 21 titles West s net worth is his combination..."
“… Real estate holdings music catalog yeezy brand and website and other assets... "
"Reading: Taylor swift and the richest musician over 24, syley West, were born in Atlanta, but moved to Chicago with his mother when he was 3 years old."
"After meeting with producer and DJ no.d., he became interested in music."
"West dropped out a year later to pursue music."
"His talent as a producer is obvious. After moving to New York, more and more rap and pop singers have asked to serve him, including Alicia case, Jay-Z, Ludacris, Beyonce and John Legend."



Number  813
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although they are said to be uncertain about the future, Khloe has been attending all of Tristan’s home games.”
“Thompson are trying to work through their relationship issues after the NBA star was busted cheating on the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star last month just days before she gave birth to their first child daughter True...”
“Now, rumors are circulating that Khloe has been banned from attending Cleveland Cavaliers games.”
“According to a May 23 report by Gossip Cop, Khloe Kardashian has not been forbidden from attending Tristan Thompson’s basketball games at home in Cleveland.”
“The rumor originated from a report by Media Take Out.”
“The site claimed that LeBron James specifically asked Tristan to keep Khloe away from Quicken Loans Arena on game days.”
““‘Lebron James asked Tristan to ban the Kardashian from all remaining playoff games,’ insisted the website.”
“The outlet maintained the prohibition applied to the NBA finals as well.”
“The online publication cited unspecified “reports” as the basis for its contentions, but a Google search indicated the claims originated with MTO.”
“In fact, when lemmings like HollywoodLife also spread these allegations, they credited MediaTakeOut as the source.”


"Although they are said to be uncertain about their future, Chloe has played in all of Tristan's home games
"Thompson is trying to solve the problem of their relationship, because last month, the NBA star was caught for secretly photographing Kardashian a few days before Kardashian was born. She gave birth to their first daughter. Really..."
"Now, it's rumored that Chloe is banned from the Cleveland Cavaliers."
"According to gossip police on May 23, Kardashian has not been banned from playing Tristan Thompson's home basketball game in Cleveland."
"The rumor originated from a report in the media."
"The website claims that LeBron James specifically asked Tristan to keep Chloe away from the quick loans arena on race day."
"LeBron James asked Tristan to ban Kardashian from all remaining playoffs," the website insisted
"The media maintained the ban applicable to the NBA finals."
The online publication cited unspecified "reports" as the basis for its arguments, but Google search showed that the claims originated from MTO
"In fact, when lemmings like Hollywood life spread the charges, they thought mediatakeout was the source."



Number  814
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on Gossip Cop:Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt are NOT getting married again despite reportFergie's national anthem is NOT a result of drug relapse despite reportIs Tiffany Haddish dating Lamar Odom?”
“This latest article surrounding a "detox diet" is more lies.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk this story.”
“We're told there's no truth to it.”
“Getty Images"Pretty Flabby Woman?”
“Julia's Detox Diet Driving Danny Moder Mad," reads a new RadarOnline headline.”
“The accompanying article says Roberts is trying to lose weight after portraying a frumpy mom in the upcoming drama Ben Is Back, but she's also making her husband eat the same healthy foods as her.”
“A supposed source tells the site, "She's demanding they eat only 'colorful' fruits and veggies, raw nuts and seeds… No meat, no dairy, no sugar, no processed stuff."”
“The alleged insider further contends that Roberts acts like "a crazed hungry person" and gets "irritable" whenever she's dieting, which leads to fights between the actress and her husband.”
“The suspicious tipster also claims that Moder will sometimes attempt "to sneak out for a snack," but "Julia actually smells his breath when he gets back."”


"More about gossip police: Jennifer Aniston Brad Pitt won't get married again, even though Fergie's national anthem is not the result of a drug relapse, even though Tiffany hadish is dating Lamar Odom?"
"This latest article on" detoxification diet "is more of a lie."
"The gossip police can completely expose this story."
"We were told that there was no truth in the matter."
"Getty Images" beauty
"Julia's detoxification diet drives Denny Maud crazy," a new radaroline headline reads
"The accompanying article says that Roberts plays a frugal mother in the upcoming TV series Ben is back. She is trying to lose weight, but she also makes her husband eat the same healthy food as she does."
A hypothetical source told the website, "she asked them to eat only 'colorful' fruits and vegetables, raw nuts and seeds No meat, no milk, no sugar, no processed things. "
The alleged insider further argued that Roberts acted like "a crazy hungry man" and became "irritable" whenever she went on a diet, leading to a fight between the actress and her husband
The suspicious source also claimed that Maud sometimes tried to "slip out for a snack," but "Julia did smell him when she came back."



Number  815
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Give us all your thoughts below!”
“Does she need to stop using their relationship as material?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Miranda’s songs about Blake?”
“In fact Gwen’s little boys — Kingston, 10, Zuma, 8, and Apollo, 3– idolize Blake so much that they recently drew temporary versions of the singer’s tattoo on their own arms so they could be more like him!”
“The country music crooner has been happily involved with fellow Voice coach Gwen Stefani, 47, since the fall of 2015 and is only growing closer with her and her family by the day.”
“...good things going on in his life to be too concerned about it...”
“Blake is hoping that Miranda finds new inspiration for her music and that she doesn t spend the rest of her life singing about him Though Blake might be irritated by the idea that Miranda could be singing about him for years to come he has definitely got too many...”
“All the things that make for a great country song.”[interaction “Blake is relieved to have moved on from the most challenging time in his life, but he worries that Miranda has enough material to write several more albums about their time together,” the source continued.”
““Blake is not surprised at all that Miranda wrote so many hit songs about her heartbreak because their marriage was full of passion, drinking and love.”
““Blake [Shelton] is genuinely happy for all of Miranda [Lambert]‘s success,” an insider told HollywoodLife.com of how the 40-year-old “Came Here to Forget” singer feels about his 33-year-old ex-wife.”


"Tell us what you think!"
"Does she need to stop treating their relationship as material?"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Miranda's song about black?"
"In fact, Gwen's little boys - 10-year-old Kingston, 8-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo - adore Blake so much that they recently painted the singer's temporary tattoo on their arms so they can be more like him!"
"Since the fall of 2015, the country singer has been working happily with Gwen Stefani, a 47 year old vocal coach, and her relationship with her family has been growing."
“… Don't care too much about the good things that happen in his life... "
"Blake hopes that Miranda can find new inspiration for her music and that she will not spend the rest of her life singing his songs, although Blake may be annoyed that Miranda may sing his songs in the next few years. He must have too many..."
"All of these are part of a great country song." [interaction] Blake is pleased to come out of the most challenging moment of his life, but he worries that Miranda has enough material to write more albums about their time together, "the source continued
"It's no surprise to black that Miranda has written so many popular songs about her heartbreak, because their marriage is full of passion, drinking and love."
"Black (Sheldon) is really happy for Miranda's success," an insider told Hollywood life. Com how the 40 year old singer "came here to forget" her 33 year old ex-wife



Number  816
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““So if he is thinking of getting back with Kourtney she wants none of it.”HollywoodLife.com has reached out to Younes Bendjima’s and Scott Disick’s reps for a comment.”
“...in 2015 haven t publicly taken a family vacay with the kids in Mexico since 2016”
“Is it her ex, Younes Bendjima?”
“Here’s another plot twist in Kourtney Kardashian’s love life.”
“The KUWTK star is allegedly pregnant after publicly being seen with “what appeared to be a bump” in L.A. on July 30, a new report by OK!”
“...magazine claims!”
““It was strange to see because she’s usually so perfectly svelte,” a source told the outlet, and a friend to Kourt added, “Everyone is whispering that she’s pregnant with her fourth child.” If Kourtney is supposedly pregnant, then who on Earth is the father to baby number four?”
“And by that, we mean, is it once again baby daddy Scott Disick, 35, or ex-boyfriend Younes Bendjima, 25?”
“Naturally, one would assume it’s the younger model, who to the world was Kourtney’s boyfriend up until recently.”
“But Kourtney’s anonymous friend makes a shocking claim — it’s more than likely Scott!”


"So if he wants to go back with Courtney, she doesn't want it at all." Hollywood life has contacted representatives of younes bendjima and Scott disc for comments. "
“…… In 2015, since 2016, I have never had a family holiday with my children in Mexico in public. "
"Is it her ex boyfriend yones benjima?"
"This is another turning point in Courtney Kardashian's love life."
According to the latest report of OK, the Kuyt star is said to be pregnant after taking a photo with look like a lump in Los Angeles on July 30
“… The magazine claims
"It's strange, because she's usually very slim," a source told the media, adding that a friend of curt's "everyone is whispering that she's pregnant with a fourth child." If Courtney is thought to be pregnant, who is the father of baby number four? "
"We mean, another 35 year old father, Scott Disick, or 25-year-old ex boyfriend, yones bengima?"
"Naturally, people think it's a young model, and until recently, she was Courtney's boyfriend."
But Courtney's anonymous friend came up with a shocking statement - probably Scott! "



Number  817
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Said the source, “Her kids have seen Justin there, but he’s been around the family for so long it’s no big deal.”We pay for juicy info!”
“As for Kardashian’s children with Scott Disick — Mason, 7, Penelope, 4, and 2-year-old Reign — having Bieber around has become a commonplace occurrence.”
““They’re constantly texting and calling when they’re apart, but when they’re in the same town, she’ll usually stay at his place if they go out, or he’ll be at hers,” said the insider.”
“And now that Bieber has headed back out on the road for his Purpose tour, they aren’t slowing down.”
““They’re totally inseparable and people are beginning to wonder if it’s the real deal.”As Radar reported, Kardashian, 37, and 23-year-old Bieber have been spotted going out together whenever they get the chance, including a February visit to a Los Angeles church.”
““They even have matching toothbrushes at each other’s houses,” said the source.”
“Kourtney Kardashian and Justin Bieber‘s relationship continues to heat up and an insider exclusively revealed to RadarOnline.com that the sexy twosome are already co-habitating!”
“Kourtney Kardashian & Justin Bieber Playing House As Scott Disick Spirals 'People are beginning to wonder if it's the real deal.'”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Her children met Justin there, but it's no big deal that he's been at home so long," the source said
"As for Kardashian and Scott Disick's children - 7-year-old Mason, 4-year-old Penelope and 2-year-old reggine - it's common to have Bieber around."
"They often text and call when they are apart, but in the same town, if they go out, she usually stays in his place, otherwise he will be in her place," the person familiar with the matter said
"Now that Bieber is on his tour, they are not slowing down."
"They're completely inseparable, and people are starting to wonder if it's true." According to radar, Kardashian, 37, and Bieber, 23, go out whenever they have a chance, including a church in Los Angeles in February
"They even have matching toothbrushes at each other's homes," the source said
"Courtney Kardashian's relationship with Justin Bieber continues to heat up, an insider told reporters exclusively RadarOnline.com Website sexy two people already cohabited
"Courtney Kardashian and Justin Bieber play Scott Disick in the house." people start to wonder if this is a real deal. "



Number  818
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share your thoughts and reactions in the comments section below.”
““Matt’s problem is that he doesn’t have much of a filter, he speaks his mind and it often lands him in hot water.”
“Here’s how the A-lister is reacting to the controversy.”
“Matt Damon, 47, has completely stepped in it!”
“After the leading man decided to try and point out the difference between sexual harassment and sexual assault on ABC News’ Popcorn with Peter Travers, he was lambasted by the likes of Alyssa Milano, 44, and Minnie Driver, 47, for his poor choice of words!”
“Now, we’re hearing how Matt is reacting to the backlash.”
““Matt does not want to get dragged into yet another controversy, he’s only just recovered from the Project Greenlight diversity fiasco,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He does truly believe what he said though, and, like many other men, he can’t help feeling like there’s a witch hunt mentality right now.” Head here to see more photos of Matt through the years.”
“The source added that Matt’s tone-deaf response says more about his loose tongue than defending Hollywood’s alleged sexual predators.”
“Matt’s got four daughters of his own, and he really believes he’s not got an ounce of misogyny in him.”


"Share your thoughts and reactions in the comments section below."
"Matt's problem is that he doesn't have too many filters, he says what he thinks, which often gets him into trouble."
"Here's the first-line star's reaction to the controversy."
"Matt Damon, 47, is fully involved!"
"When the hero decided to point out the difference between sexual harassment and sexual assault in ABC News Program popcorn with Peter Travers, he was denounced by Eliza Milano, 44, and Minnie deriver, 47, for misusing words!"
"Now, we hear how Matt copes with this rebound."
"Matt doesn't want to get involved in another argument. He just recovered from the failure of the green light diversity project," a source told reporters
"He did believe what he said, and, like many others, he couldn't help feeling that there was a sense of political persecution." Come here and see more pictures of Matt over the years. "
"The source added that Matt's tone blindness reaction is more about his laxity than defending Hollywood's so-called sex offenders."
"Matt has four daughters of his own, and he really believes he doesn't dislike women at all."



Number  819
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kendall's team included mother Kris Jenner, sister Khloe, cousin Cici Bussey, grandma M.J. and family friend Jonathan Cheban, who faced off against Kim, Kanye and his cousins, Jalil, Kim Wallace and Ricky Anderson.”
“"Donald Trump," said Kendall, who scored a point with the quip, which made everyone laugh out loud.”
“"If you had a wild party and everybody's naked, who is someone you would hate to see show up?," host Steve Harvey asked.”
“Trump.”
“One of the other highlights of the show was when model Kendall Jenner threw some not-so-subtle shade at 'Ye over his support for Pres.”
“Without hesitating, 'Ye slapped the red button and answered "Lips."”
“Kanye was all smiles during the show, with a quick buzzer hand when host Steve Harvey teed up the first question: "Name the top five reasons why Steve Harvey is a good kisser."”
“The episode, which was taped in February, featured the Kardashian/Jenners playing against the Wests for $25,000 benefitting the Children's Hospital of Los Angeles.”


"Kendall's team includes his mother Chris Jenner, sister helo, cousin sissy busey, grandmother M.J. and family friend Jonathan Cheban. They fight Kim, Kanye and his cousins Jalil, Kim Wallace and rich Anderson."
"Donald Trump," said Kendall, who scored a point with the quip and made everyone laugh
"If you had a crazy party where everyone was naked, who would you hate to see?" Asked host Steve Harvey
"Trump."
"Another highlight of the show is that model Kendall Jenner cast some less subtle shadows on her support."
"Without hesitation," Ye patted the red button and replied, "lips."
"In the show, Kanye was smiling. When the host Steve Harvey asked the first question, he used a fast honking hand:" name five reasons why Steve Harvey is good at kissing. "
"This episode was recorded in February and Kardashian and Janice played West for $25000, which benefited Los Angeles children's hospital."



Number  820
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us here!”
“See the cutest photos of the adorable couple here!”
“The Weeknd plans on taking girlfriend Selena Gomez to Paris for her special day, and HollywoodLife.com has all the EXCLUSIVE details here!”
“Au Revoir!”
“The Weeknd, 27, is proving he’s the best boyfriend ever with his major plans to celebrate his lady love, Selena Gomez‘s 25th birthday on July 22.”
“He’s taking her to one of the most beautiful cities in the world: Paris, a source EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
““Abel (The Weeknd’s real name) is planning to go all out for Selena’s birthday,” the source said.”
“With the way these two have been lovingly supporting each other lately, this comes as no surprise!”
“They seem to be more in love than ever before and we can’t get enough of it.”
“Since the “Can’t Feel My Face” singer is on tour, how will he get the amazing time off?”


"Tell us!"
"Look at the cutest picture of this lovely couple!"
This week, I plan to take my girlfriend Selena Gomez to Paris for her special day. Here are all the exclusive details
"Goodbye!"
Serena Gomez, 27, celebrated her 25th birthday on July 22. This week, he plans to celebrate his valentine's day to prove that he is the best boyfriend ever
"He's taking her to one of the most beautiful cities in the world: Paris," an exclusive told Hollywood life
"Abe (Zhou's real name) is planning to go all out for Serena's birthday," the source said
"It's not surprising that these two people have been supporting each other recently!"
"They seem to love us more than ever, and we can't be satisfied."
Now that the singer who can't touch my face is on tour, how will he spend this wonderful holiday



Number  821
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… He’s not here!””
“...was infamously found not guilty.”
“Simpson may be Khloe Kardashian’s father, the disgraced athlete is putting those rumors to rest.”
“In video obtained by TMZ, a photographer asked Simpson, 70, if congratulations were in order in reference to Kardashian’s pregnancy.”
“Simpson’s response made it clear that the late Robert Kardashian was in fact Khloe’s biological father.”
““Well, for Bob, God bless his soul, yeah.”
“I don’t know for me,” Simpson said in the video.”
““I don’t think for me.”
“I have nothing to do with it.”He added: “I would be proud … but trust me, I had nothing to do with it.”Robert was Simpson’s defense attorney in his 1995 murder trial over the death of his wife, Nicole Brown Simpson, in which O.J.”
“At the time of her death, Nicole was Robert’s ex-wife Kris Jenner’s best friend and Kris has spoken publicly about how the case caused tension between her and Robert.”


“… He's not here! "
"Infamously acquitted."
"Simpson may be Kardashian's father, and the discredited athlete is quelling these rumors."
"In the video obtained by TMZ, a photographer asked Simpson, 70, if it was appropriate to congratulate him on Kardashian's pregnancy."
"Simpson's answer made it clear that the late Robert Kardashian was actually helo's biological father."
"Well, for Bob, God bless his soul, yes."
"I don't know myself," Simpson said in the video
"I don't think for me."
"I have nothing to do with it." He added: "I would be proud But believe me, I have nothing to do with it. " Robert is Simpson's defense lawyer in a murder trial in 1995 for the death of his wife Nicole Brown Simpson
"At the time of her death, Nicole was Robert's ex-wife, Chris Jenner's best friend, and Chris had publicly talked about how the case caused tension between her and Robert."



Number  822
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To celebrate finally tying the knot, they took the whole of Liam's family on a ski trip honeymoon to Montana.”
“I’ve said it before & it remains true, I love Liam and always will."”
“"Any reported quotes attributed to me are false.”
“"This is a private matter and I have not made, nor will I be making, any comments to any journalists or media outlets.”
“On August 13, Liam posted on Instagram: "Just a quick note to say that Miley and I have recently separated and I wish her nothing but health and happiness going forward.”
“5 Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth met on the set of 2009's The Last Song Credit: The Mega AgencyWhy did Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth split?”
“I have nothing to hide."”
“"What I cannot accept is being told I'm lying to cover up a crime I haven't committed.”
“5 Credit: MileyCyrus/TwitterMiley also slammed the criticism she was getting by tweeting: "I can accept that the life I've chosen means I must live completely open and transparent with my fans who I love, and the public, 100% of the time.”
“"Liam and I have been together for a decade.”


To celebrate their marriage, they took Liam's family on a ski trip to Montana for their honeymoon
"I've said before & it's true, I love Liam and will always be."
"Any report about me is false."
"This is a private matter, and I have not and will not comment on any journalist or media."
On August 13, Liam posted a post on instagram, saying, "I broke up with Miley recently. I just hope she will be healthy and happy in the future."
"5 Millie Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth meet on the set of 2009's the last song: Why did super agent Millie Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth break up?"
"I have nothing to hide."
"What I can't accept is that people say I lied to cover up crimes I didn't commit."
"5 credit: Miley Cyrus / twitter Miley also attacked the criticism she received on Twitter:" I can accept that the life I choose means that I have to live 100% of the time in full transparency with my fans and the public I love. "
"Liam and I have been together for ten years."



Number  823
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Brad Pitt ‘gave Angelina Jolie millions in child support’ as divorce battle rages onMORE : Angelina Jolie keen for quickie divorce amid claims Brad Pitt has not paid ‘meaningful child support’”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Got a showbiz story?”
“Brad is understood to have spent some quality time with his children in London recently where Angelina was filming Maleficent 2, and also in Los Angeles where he has been shooting Once Upon a Time in Hollywood.”
“Angelina and Brad share six children: Maddox, 17, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 10.”
“A source told us that Brad ‘fulfils his commitments’.”
“However, the actor countered that he has paid Angelina over £1 million for their children and even lent her £6.25 million to buy a new home for their family.”
“Angelina has physical custody of their six children (Photo by Samir Hussein/WireImage)Last week, Angelina is reported to have filed legal papers claiming that Brad has not paid any ‘meaningful’ child support in the two years since their split.”
“He is trying to keep the status quo.’Metro.co.uk understands that Brad never discusses anything to do with his children but will always do whatever he can support them and the family.”
“Brad does not want to have to fly eight or nine hours each time he wants to see his children.”


"More: Brad Pitt has" given Angelina Jolie millions of child support, "and the divorce dispute has intensified: Angelina Jolie is keen on a quick divorce, claiming that Brad Pitt has not paid" meaningful child support. "
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Is there a story about the show business?"
"It is understood that Brad recently had a good time with the children in London, where Angelina shot maleficent 2, and he also shot once in Los Angeles and Hollywood."
Angelina and Brad have six children: 17-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 12-year-old Shiloh and 10-year-old twins Vivian and Knox
"A source told us that Brad" kept his promise. "
"However, the actor retorted that he had paid Angelina more than 1 million pounds to their children and even lent her 6.25 million pounds to buy a new house for their family."
"Angelina has actual custody of their six children (Samir Hussain / wire image) last week, it was reported that Angelina filed legal documents claiming that Brad had not paid any 'meaningful' child support in the two years after their breakup."
"He's trying to maintain the status quo." He understands that Brad never discusses anything with his children, but he will do everything he can to support them and their families. "
"Brad doesn't want to fly eight or nine hours every time he wants to see a child."



Number  824
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But clearly, the Lifetime movie plays up it all up for our amusement — likely far more than anything that actually happened in real life.”
“E!”
“In the made for TV movie the almost royal is excluded from a pretty significant Middleton family gathering ahem our girl Pippa s wedding ceremony and as it turns out the real Meghan Markle wasn t at Pippa s wedding ceremony either but she managed to make it to the...”
“...reception...”
“In the movie, the fictional Markle is on the phone with her mother, slightly sad about being left out, when Harry bursts in to take her to the party after all — where she met Harry's parents for the first time.”
“In the film, Kate Middleton blames her sister's "no ring, no bring" policy — meaning only engaged or married couples were allowed — for Markle being benched.”
“(In real life and in the movie, Markle and the prince were not yet betrothed.)”
“As it turns out, this plus one policy was the real deal, but as PEOPLE noted, both James Middleton's longtime girlfriend Donna Air and Princess Eugenie's longtime boyfriend Jack Brooksbank attended the ceremony.”
“Additionally, according to The Telegraph, Markle was fully invited to Middleton's May 2017 wedding despite the "no ring no bring" policy, but at the last moment Markle did not appear at the ceremony itself.”
“So what gives?”


"But it's clear that this lifetime movie is all about our entertainment - probably more than anything that actually happens in real life."
“E！”
"In this movie made for TV, Megan markel, who is almost a member of the royal family, is excluded from a very important family gathering in Middleton. At Pippa's wedding, it turns out that the real Megan markel didn't attend Pippa's wedding, but she successfully arrived..."
“… Reception... "
"In the movie, the fictional markel is talking to her mother on the phone, a little sad about being excluded, and Harry suddenly breaks in and takes her to the party - where she meets Harry's parents for the first time."
In the film, Kate Middleton blames her sister's "no ring, no gift" policy - that is, only engaged or married couples are allowed - for keeping markel on the bench
(in real life and movies, markel and the prince are not engaged yet.)
"It turns out that this one plus one policy is a real deal, but as people have noticed, James Middleton's longtime girlfriend Donna Al and Princess Eugenie's longtime boyfriend Jack Brooksbank both attended the wedding."
"In addition, according to the daily telegraph, despite the" no ring, no ring "policy, markel was fully invited to Middleton's wedding in May 2017, but he did not appear at the last moment."
"What good is that?"



**Something goes wrong**
“AdvertisementOn the first night of the residency, Gwen Stefani told the crowd that it is a fantasy come true to wear a cowgirl costume in front of Blake Shelton.”
“While singing Make Me Like You – a song she says is about Shelton – she wears a cowgirl outfit.”
“Stefani is performing at the Zappos Theater at Planet Hollywood – which has 4,600 seats – but her concerts aren’t even close to selling out.”
“For her next show later this week, there are still 1,200 seats (26 percent) available.”
““She can’t sell tickets,” says an insider.”
““There are literally thousands of seats still available this month!”Radar Online is reporting that the remaining four July dates all have at least 1100 empty seats, and this failure has “devastated” Stefani.”
“Thank u for coming to Vegas gx A post shared by Gwen Stefani (@gwenstefani) on Jul 14, 2018 at 1:52pm PDTThe next round of shows will be from December 27th to the 31st, but sales aren’t any better.”
“According to Ticketmaster, there are over 1,300 seats available for the December 30th concert, which is her worst night of sales.”
“Since there are still so many seats available for multiple shows, discount sites like GoodSeatTickets.com have slashed prices up to 75 percent.”
“The show runs through Mid-March of next year, but if it turns out to be a bust, sources say she can always go back to The Voice.”


"On the first night of his internship, Gwen Stephanie told the audience that it was a dream come true to wear jeans in front of black Sheldon."
"When she sang make me like you, she said it was about Sheldon - she was wearing jeans."
"Stefani is performing at the Zappos theater on Planet Hollywood, where there are 4600 seats, but her concert is not even sold out."
"For her next performance later this week, there are 1200 seats (26%) to choose from."
"She can't sell tickets," one insider said
"There are thousands more seats this month! Radar Online reported that there were at least 1100 empty seats on the remaining four appointments in July, and the failure had "destroyed" Stefani
"Thank you for coming to Las Vegas. Gwen Stefani (@ gwenstefani) posted a post at 1:52 pm on July 14, 2018. The next round will be held from December 27 to 31, but the sales situation has not improved. "
According to Ticketmaster, the concert on December 30, with more than 1300 seats, was her worst selling night
"Since there are so many seats to choose from for many performances, discount websites such as GoodSeatTickets.com The website has reduced the price by 75%. "
"The play will last until the middle of March next year, but if it turns out to be half done, there is news that she can always return to the original sound."



Number  826
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — are you hoping to see more pics of Rumi and Sir soon?”
““Although they’re completely exhausted, and it seems like life is now consumed by feedings and dirty diapers, they wouldn’t change a thing.” Aw!”
“We learned exclusively the 2 didn’t expect taking care of twins would be so challenging & since their arrival, they’ve ‘hardly slept!’ Find out if it’s affecting their marriage.”
“While Beyonce, 36, and JAY-Z, 47, have been parents for over five years now, as their five-year-old daughter Blue Ivy was born back in 2012, nothing could have prepared the couple for welcoming twins!”
“In fact, the two apparently have their hands totally full with newborns Rumi and Sir Carter, who were born on June 13.”
“But although it’s tough, Jay and Bey are also making time for each other — and so far, so good!”
“Click here to see Beyonce’s hottest pics since giving birth.”
““After raising Blue Ivy for five years, Beyonce really thought she had the whole parenting thing in the bag — but oh boy was she in for a shock!” a source close to Beyonce told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Everything she thought she knew is out the window when it comes to twins.”
“Beyonce knew it wouldn t be easy and that two newborns means twice the work but she really didn t imagine it would be THIS hard Although the two artists do have plenty of help with their kids they reportedly...”


"Tell us, Holly bug - would you like to see more pictures of rummy and Mr. Bush?"
"Although they are exhausted and their lives seem to be consumed by feeding and dirty diapers, they will not change at all." Ah
"We learned that they didn't expect that taking care of twins would be so challenging & they've hardly slept since they came here! "See if it's affecting their marriage."
"Although 36 year old Beyonce and 47 year old Jay-Z have been parents for more than five years, their five-year-old daughter, Lanai Wei, was born as early as 2012. Nothing can prepare the couple for the twins!"
"In fact, the hands of these two people are obviously full of new babies, rummy and Sir Carter, who were born on June 13."
"But it's tough, but Jay and bay are making time for each other - so far, so good!"
"Click here to see Beyonce's hottest photo since childbirth."
"After five years of ivy, Beyonce really thinks she's ready for parenting - but God, she'll be surprised!"! A source close to Beyonce told reporters, "exclusive to Hollywood life."
"When it comes to twins, she thinks everything she knows is groundless."
"Beyonce knows it's not easy, two newborns means twice the work, but she really didn't think it would be so difficult, although the two artists do have a lot to help their children, they are said to..."



Number  827
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m gonna play y’all a piece of my art and I hope y’all have a good time.””
“We are undeniably the influence, the thought leaders.”
“As an encore to last year s epic rant Kanye West made the most of his allotted four minutes stretching it to almost seven during Sunday s Video Music Awards when he graced the stage inside Madison Square Garden to...”
“...praise his one and only himself...”
““I am Kanye West.”
“And that feels really great to say that especially this year,” West began.”
““I came here to present my new video, but before I do that imma talk.”“Now later in the night, ‘Famous’ [West’s music video] might lose to Beyoncé.”
“But I can’t be mad, I’m always wishing for Beyoncé to win,” he alluded to the VMAs moment from years past, in which he swiped the mic from Taylor Swift in the great stage crash of 2009.”
“West, 39, referenced his ongoing feud with Swift, 26, saying, “We came over in the same boat, now we’re all in the same bed.”
“Well, maybe different boats, but … If you think about last week, there was 22 people murdered in Chicago.”


"I'm going to play you one of my songs. I hope you have a good time."
"There is no denying that we are influential and thought leaders."
"As a duet to last year's epic roar, Kanye West made full use of the four minutes allocated to him at the video music awards ceremony on Sunday, extending the time to nearly seven minutes when he gracefully walked onto the stage of Madison Square Garden..."
“… Praise his only self... "
"I'm Kanye West."
"It feels good to say that, especially this year," West began
"I'm here to show my new video, but before I do ima's talk." "Later now, 'famous' (West's music video) may lose to Beyonce."
"But I can't be angry. I always wanted Beyonce to win," he alluded to the Vmas moment many years ago, when he snatched the microphone from Taylor Swift in the 2009 Grand Stage crash
"We came in the same boat, and now we're all in the same bed," said West, 39, referring to his feud with swift, 26
"Well, maybe it's a different boat, but If you think about it, last week, 22 people were murdered in Chicago. "



Number  828
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““So she’s trying to control as much as she can.”We pay for juicy info!”
““She’s really into Alex and wants it to work,” a source told US Weekly.”
“As fans know, the singer hired a private investigator over the summer to keep tabs on Rodriguez, 42, after the couple was plagued by cheating rumors when the National Enquirer published an interview with his alleged former mistress Lauren Hunter.”
“If Alex wants to spend the rest of his life with her, he’s going to have to play by her rules.”This isn’t the first time Lopez has attempted to control her baseball beau.”
“Jennifer is seriously controlling, but she knows what she wants.”
“The insider spills, “She also loves Alex’s fit physique and wants formal assurances he won’t let himself go as soon as she says ‘I do’!”
“...his old house Is Lopez 48 letting her shallow side get in the way of true love...”
“Moving in together is going to have to happen before any kind of engagement says the informant noting But Jen will keep her home and wants Alex to give up his It s how she did things when she and Marc Anthony first got together and he let go of...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"So she's controlling herself as much as she can." We pay for interesting information! "
"She really likes Alex and hopes it works," one source told us
Fans know that the 42 year old Rodriguez couple, who suffered a lot from deceptive rumors after publishing an interview with their former mistress Lauren hunt in national inquirer magazine, hired a private detective to spy on Rodriguez this summer
"If Alex wants to spend the rest of his life with her, he has to follow her rules." It's not the first time Lopez has tried to control her baseball boyfriend
"Jennifer has a lot of control, but she knows what she wants."
"Insider," she also likes Alex's healthy physique and wants formal assurance that he won't let himself go as long as she says "I do!"
“… His old house is Lopez 48, and her superficial side gets in the way of true love... "
"Before any kind of engagement, it's necessary to move," the source said. But Jane will leave her at home and hope Alex will give up his plan. That's what she did when she and Mark Anthony were together for the first time. He let go... "



Number  829
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The estranged couple started to date in 2011 and got married in May of 2015.”
“Jennifer is the mega rich star between the tandem, considering all the money she has banked from Friends, and Us Weekly writes that these assets are well "protected."”
“Us Weekly: To kick off 2018, Anison and Theroux took a vacation in Cabo San Lucas with Jason Bateman and his wife, Amanda Anka.”
“This is what we've been able to dig up thus far, courtesy of various outlets on the Internet...”
“Where does each go from here?”
“How did Aniston and Theroux try to salvage their romance?”
“What brought it about?”
“), we figured we'd go deep into this likely divorce.”
“It's too late for that?”
“Before the Aniston-Brad Pitt reconciliation rumors start in earnest (What?”


"The separated couple started dating in 2011 and got married in May 2015."
Jennifer is a superstar between the two, and given the money she saves from her friends, US weekly wrote, these assets are well "protected"
US Weekly: in order to kick off 2018, anison and Cyrus are on vacation with Jason Bateman and his wife Amanda Anka in St. Lucas
"This is what we have been able to dig up so far, thanks to all kinds of channels on the Internet..."
"Where does everyone go from here?"
"How did Aniston and seru save their love?"
"What's going on?"
"), we think we'll go deep into this possible divorce."
"Too late?"
"Before the rumors of Aniston Brad Pitt's reconciliation officially begin (what?"



Number  830
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Unless they can come to terms with their issues, they’re headed for divorce.””
““Julia and Danny’s marriage is hanging by a thread,” says the insider.”
“When the actress took the part of a worker at a secret government facility on Homecoming, an upcoming political thriller on Amazon, she knew just who she wanted as her co-star: her old pal Dermot Mulroney.”
“She lobbied for him to join the show, and on March 8, it was officially announced that Dermot, 54 — who starred with Julia in My Best Friend’s Wedding and August: Osage County — would play her character’s boyfriend.”
“Julia and Dermot.”
“She was thrilled.”
“Her husband?”
“Furious.”
““Julia’s reunion with Dermot hasn’t gone down well with Danny,” an insider tells Life & Style.”
““Even though Julia’s reminded him that Dermot is happily married with children, Danny’s jealous.”It’s just one of many issues causing problems in Julia and Danny’s marriage.”


"Unless they can accept their problems, they're going to divorce."
"Julia and Denny's marriage is in jeopardy," the person familiar with the matter said
"When the actress plays a member of a secret government agency in Amazon's upcoming political thriller" coming home, "she knows who she wants to be with: her old friend Dermot muroni."
"She lobbied him to join the show and officially announced on March 8 that Dermot, 54, would play her role's boyfriend. Dermot and Julia in my best friend's wedding and August: Osage County（ August:Osage County ）She starred Julia in the movie
"Julia and Dermot."
"She's very excited."
"Her husband?"
"Anger."
"The reunion of Julia and Dermot didn't go well for Denny," one insider told life and fashion
"Although Julia reminded him that Dermot was happy to get married and have children, Denny was jealous." It's just one of many problems in Julia and Denny's marriage



Number  831
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“No matter what, though, we wish both Jen and Brad all the happiness in the world!”
“We’re getting serious nostalgia from the former lovebirds and it will be interesting to see how things progress from here.”
“...terms is totally amazing...”
“Nothing romantic has happened yet but who knows what could happen down the line anything is possible We have to admit that although a rekindled romance may be risky for these two the fact that they ve been able to put their rocky past behind them and be on good...”
“At this point they’re still in the early stages of rekindling a friendship but there’s always been an undeniable chemistry between them.”
““Her attraction to him is still alive and well.”
““A few weeks ago at a dinner party in L.A., she admitted that she still thinks he’s the hottest man she’s ever been with,” the friend continued.”
“It makes sense they’d be worried, Brad’s her kryptonite.”Although Jen and Brad haven’t been together since 2005, the former Friends funny lady still thinks he’s the most attractive man she’s ever been with.”
“But not a lot of people in her life are encouraging the friendship, the fear of course is that she’ll fall for him again and he’ll break her heart all over again.”
““For years she was so angry at him, it’s a relief to have that all be water under the bridge.”


"Anyway, we wish Jan and Brad happiness!"
"We get serious nostalgia from our former lovers, and it's going to be fun to see how things go."
“… The terms are amazing... "
"Nothing romantic has happened yet, but who knows what will happen next? Everything is possible. We have to admit that although the rekindled romance may be dangerous for these two people, in fact, they have been able to put their rough past behind them and have a good life.... "
"At this point, they are still in the early stage of rekindling friendship, but there has been an undeniable chemical reaction between them."
"Her attraction to him is still there."
"A few weeks ago, at a dinner in Los Angeles, she admitted that she still thought he was the sexiest man she had ever been with," the friend continued
"They have a reason to worry. Brad is her kryptonite." Although Jane and Brad haven't been together since 2005, the funny lady, an ex friend, still thinks he's the most attractive man she's ever had
"But there are not many people in her life who encourage this friendship. Of course, she is worried that she will fall in love with him again and he will break her heart again."
"She has been very angry with him for many years. Now there is water under the bridge. It's a relief."



Number  832
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Cyclizine which is an anti histamine and works to combat vomiting and Ondansetron to prevent nausea and vomiting...”
“You have the fact that your other children are going to lose out on Mummy and you have that guilt at not being able to spend so much time with them As for treatment guidelines from the Royal College of Obstetricians and Gynecologists include a first line of medication like...”
“Having battled severe pregnancy sickness, or Hyperemesis Gravidarum (HG), while expecting her first two children, Prince George and Princess Charlotte, the royal mom would have been told by her medical team that the odds meant she would likely have the debilitating condition again.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Caitlin Dean, who is chairperson of the U.K.’s Pregnancy Sickness Support, is also a mother of three who suffered from HG in each of her pregnancies.”
““A lot of people go into the second [pregnancy] hoping that it will not happen again, thinking [HG] will be one pregnancy and that every pregnancy is different,” says Dean.”
““But once you have it twice, that delusion is pretty much blown out of the water.”
“So you have to prepare and be ready for this.”
“For myself I found it mentally and physically easier during subsequent pregnancies because I knew that I was going to have this and I knew what to expect from the treatment and what to expect generally Image zoom Credit Lia Toby WENN On the flip side she notes for some...”
“...women the symptoms get worse each time Dean says that for women who have previously battled HG there s a trepidation mixed in with the joy of anticipating a new baby...”


"Cyclohexazine is an antihistamine which can inhibit vomiting. Ondansetron can prevent nausea and vomiting..."
"You have a fact that your other children will lose their mummies, and you have a sense of guilt because you can't spend so much time with them, because the Royal College of Obstetrics and Gynecology treatment guidelines include a first-line drug, such as..."
The Royal mother, who was pregnant with her first two children, Prince George and Princess Charlotte, had struggled with severe pregnancy sickness (Hg). Her medical team will tell her that this possibility means that she is likely to suffer from this debilitating disease again
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
Caitlin Dean is the president of pregnancy disease support in the UK and the mother of three pregnant women.
"A lot of people go into the second [pregnancy] hoping it won't happen again, thinking [Hg] is a pregnancy, and every pregnancy is different," Dean said
"But once you have it twice, the illusion almost disappears from the water."
"So you have to be prepared."
"For myself, during the subsequent pregnancy, I found it easier mentally and physically, because I knew I would have such an experience, I knew what I would get from the treatment, and I knew what I would get. Generally speaking, this is the other side of Leah Toby win, and she remembered some..."
“… Every time dean says that women who have fought with mercury in the past will have a mixture of fear and the joy of expecting a new baby, and the symptoms will get worse... "



Number  833
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They’re both decent people who love each other and their kids and are trying to work it out.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter.”
““They’re constantly told how much their public marriage and kids have meant to the gay community, and both take that seriously and want to remain role models,” says the insider.”
““Neil went up to my friend and said, ‘Hey, you’re really sexy.”
“Can I give you my number?’ and, ‘Come to my hotel later,’” a source exclusively tells In Touch of the alleged encounter, which happened during the actor’s trip to the Windy City for a Dec. 8 book signing.”
““My friend, who’s a fan of Neil’s, told him he’s straight and said, ‘I’m confused.”
“Aren’t you married?’ Neil told him, ‘My marriage isn’t working out.’ ”It wasn’t just a pickup line: In Touch has learned that Neil and husband David Burtka, who’ve been together since 2004, are facing a relationship crisis.”
““They’re on shaky ground,” an insider close to the actor, 44, and the chef, 42, tells In Touch.”
“And while David always knew Neil is a big flirt, “lately, it’s been more of an issue,” adds the insider.”
““They love each other and their kids [seven-year-old twins Gideon and Harper], but they want their relationship and lives to be more harmonious.”
“Right now, the marriage could go either way.”(Photo Credit: Getty Images)They’re fundamentally different people.”


"They are decent people, they love each other and their children, and they are trying to solve problems." For more information on this, please read the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please sign up for our newsletters. "
"They are often told how important their open marriage and children are to the gay community, and they all value that and want to continue to be role models," the person said
"Neil came up to my friend and said," Hey, you're so sexy. "
"Can I give you my number? "And," come to my hotel later, "an exclusive source told contact magazine. It was a so-called encounter that happened when the actor went to Fengcheng on December 8 to participate in a book signing activity
"My friend, a fan of Neil, told him he was heterosexual and said: 'I'm confused.'
"Aren't you married? "Neil told him that my marriage was not going well." "It's not just a chat up line: Contact magazine learned that Neil and her husband, David burtka, who was together in 2004, are facing a crisis."
"They are in a precarious situation," an insider close to the 44 year old actor and 42 year old chef told in touch
"Although David has always known that Neil is a big flirt," recently, it's a bigger issue, adding, "insiders
"They love each other and their children (7-year-old twins Gideon and Harper), but they want their relationship and life to be more harmonious."
"Now, this marriage can go any way." (photo source: Getty Images) they are totally different people



Number  834
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The film also features Rosamund Pike and Scott Wilson in pivotal roles.”
“The period drama, directed by Scott Cooper, is a period movie set in 1892 and is about a legendary Army captain who agrees to accompany a Cheyenne chief and his family.”
“Meanwhile, on the work front, the actor is currently busy with an upcoming period drama Hostiles.”
“However, Bale is not a part of the Dracula reboot movie neither he is planning to "avoid sun" for any of his Vampire related movies, Gossip Cop reported.”
“Everyone's praying he doesn't start drinking blood like a real vampire," the source said, adding, "But no one would be surprised if he did take a swig of the stuff to make the scenes look real."”
“"This is a guy who will do anything to make the character look real to his audience and to himself.”
“"Christian is already fair-skinned, but he's been avoiding the California sun to get that unnatural skin tone like Dracula's," the magazine quoted a source as saying.”
“Bale wants to make his skin as pale as possible to play the role of a Dracula.”
“[VIDEO]According to National Enquirer, the actor will feature in the reboot of the iconic horror franchise Dracula and to get into the skin of the character he plans to avoid the sun.”
“Also Read: Was James Corden manhandled by Bryan Cranston?”


"The film also features Rosamond Peck and Scott Wilson."
Directed by Scott Cooper, this age film is set in 1892. It tells the story of a legendary army captain who agrees to accompany a chief Cheyenne and his family
"At the same time, in terms of work, the actors are currently busy with the upcoming drama hostile."
"However, bell is not part of Dracula's restart movie, and he is not planning to" avoid the sun "for his vampire related movie, gossip police report
"Everyone is praying that he doesn't start sucking like a real vampire," the source said, adding, "but no one will be surprised if he really takes a big sip of blood and makes the scene look real."
"It's a person who does whatever it takes to make the character real to the audience and to himself."
"Christian's skin is already fair, but he has been avoiding the California sun to get the unnatural complexion of Dracula," the magazine quoted a source as saying
"Bell wants to make his skin as pale as possible and play the role of Dracula."
"[Video] according to the national inquirer, the actor will appear in the reopening of the horror film series Dracula the vampire and enter the skin of his character who plans to avoid the sun."
Also read: did James cordon get roughed up by Brian Cranston? "



Number  835
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Jason Kempin/Getty Images]”
“The outlet suggests that Drake and Kylie would make a perfect couple, especially with Kris Jenner under their wings, who is already said to be working her magic to make it happen.”
“Kylie who allegedly called it quits with her on again off again beau is said to have been devastated by the split but according to reports things were becoming too much with the drama concerning Blac Chyna and her claims that Tyga wasn t being faithful to the 19 year...”
“...old...”
“Kylie Jenner was allegedly concerned by some of the allegations Chyna had made regarding failed child support payments and claims that Tyga had hooked up with men that only the mother-of-two knew about, and she claims to have evidence.”
“Of course, the Blac Chyna drama hasn’t been the only thing on Kylie Jenner’s mind.”
“Reports also claimed that the lip kit businesswoman was annoyed with the supposed fact that Tyga would spend more time at the club with his friends than with her at their home in Calabasas.”
“As of right now, it doesn’t seem as if Kylie Jenner has any plans to get back with the “Rack City” rapper in the near future, which has led Kris to throw in her two cents, allegedly telling her daughter that she should consider the idea of dating Drake.”
“The “One Dance” hitmaker has become a very close friend to the Kardashians over the last couple of years, having even attended Kylie’s 17th birthday party two years ago.”
“The family famously invited Drake over for dinner a year ago, having also attended their Christmas party in 2015.”


"[Jason keppen close up / Getty pictures]"
"The media suggested that Drake and Kelly would be a perfect couple, especially Chris Jenner. Under their wings, it is said that she is using her magic to make this come true."
"It's said that Kelly and her broke up intermittently. It's said that Bo was exhausted by the break-up, but it's reported that the drama about Blake chener and her claim that TEGA is not loyal to these 19 years make things too much..."
“… Old... "
"Kelly Jenner is said to be concerned about some of Zina's allegations of unpaid child support and claims that TEGA is in collusion with a man known only to the mother of two children, and she claims to have evidence."
"Of course, it's not just Blake ziner's plays in Kelly Jenner's mind."
"The lipstick businesswoman was annoyed that TEGA spent more time with her friends at the club than at her home in Calabasas," the report said
"So far, Kelly Jenner doesn't seem to have any plans to make a comeback with rap City rapper in the near future, which cost Chris two cents. She is said to have told her daughter that she should consider the idea of dating Drake."
"In the past few years, the solo killer has become a close friend of the Kardashian family. Two years ago, he even attended Kelly's 17th birthday party."
"A year ago, the family was famous for inviting Drake to dinner, and in 2015, Drake went to their Christmas party."



Number  836
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, it’s unclear how long the this romance lasted, as they’ve since broken up.”
“The two celebs took their romance public on Instagram.”
“However, it’s confirmed that the breakup rumours aren’t true.”
“...month old child...”
“...photography by steve granitz contributor getty November 2011 Jelena is over apparently Rumours that Gomez has dumped the Canadian pop star begin to surface after a Bieber fan claimed she had sex with him backstage at a show in October 2010 and that he is the father of her 4”
“Oh, young love.”
“...photography by Kevin Mazur/Contributor/GettyMay 2011: Billboard Music AwardsJelena looked happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards.”
“Aren’t they adorable?”
“Photography by Jon Kopaloff/FilmMagicFebruary 2011: Jelena steps out on red carpet at the Vanity Fair Oscars partyYup, they finally made our dreams a reality by walking the red carpet together for the first time, thus confirming their young love.”
“But it wasn’t until January 2011 that the pop stars confirmed their romance, namely by partaking in major PDA while on vacation together in St. Lucia.”


"However, it's not clear how long the relationship lasted, because they have broken up."
"The two celebrities made their relationship public on instagram."
"However, it has been confirmed that the rumor of breaking up is not true."
“… One month old... "
“… Photography contributed by Steve granitz Getty in November 2011, jelina was apparently rumored that Gomez dumped a Canadian pop star and began to surface after a Bieber fan claimed that she had sex with him backstage on a show in October 2010 and that he was the father of her four children
"Oh, young love."
“… Photographer Kevin mazul / writer / Getty Mae 2011: Billboard Music Awards: Jenna looks happy and strong at the Billboard Music Awards. "
"Aren't they cute?"
"Jon kopaloff photo / filmmagic February 2011: Jelena stepped on the red carpet of the vanity fair Oscar Party. They walked on the red carpet together for the first time and finally realized our dream, thus proving their young love."
"But it wasn't until January 2011 that the two pop stars confirmed their romance by taking part in a big PDA while on holiday in Saint Lucia."



Number  837
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below!”
“Kylie is realizing she is by herself making these choices and it might be a long road ahead of her if she has to raise her baby by herself.”HollywoodLifers, do you feel as bad as we do for Kylie?”
“Who will she let join her in the delivery room?!”
“Let’s admit it, Kylie Jenner‘s reported baby’s arrival is the event of the year and fans everywhere are going to be clamoring for details when that day arrives!”
“However, we’re hearing that those in her inner circle aren’t exactly getting along lately!”
“According to our insiders, the 20-year-old’s parents Kris Jenner, 62, and Caitlyn Jenner, 68, are fighting and Ky is terrified that, if they’re both with her for the pregnancy, the moment could be ruined!”
““Kylie has her whole family arguing about who will be with her in the delivery room and it is becoming a real problem for her as she will be forced to make the decision soon,” an insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Kylie is torn between her mom and her dad who have been at odds for a while and both expect to be holding Kylie’s hand as she delivers.”
“She fears the negative energy in the room if she says yes to both of them… they can’t stop arguing.” Oh no!”
“The sources went on to add that she’s also dealing with her BF Travis Scott‘s, 26, neglect.”


"Please let us know in the comments section below!"
"Kelly realized that she made these choices on her own, and that if she had to raise her children on her own, she might have a long way to go." Hollywood stars, do you think Kelly is as sad as us? "
"Who will she let in the delivery room?"
"Let's admit that the arrival of baby reported by Kelly Jenner is a big event this year. When that day comes, fans from all over the world will rush to ask for details!"
"But we've heard that people in her circle haven't been getting along very well lately!"
"According to our insiders, the 20-year-old's parents, Chris Jenner (62) and Caitlin Jenner (68), are fighting. Katie is worried that if they both get pregnant with her, this moment may be ruined!"
"Kelly's family are arguing about who will go to the delivery room with her, which is a real problem for her because she will be forced to make a decision soon," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Kelly was torn by the conflict between her mother and father for some time, and they both hoped to hold her hand when Kelly gave birth."
"She's afraid of the negative energy in the room if she says yes to both of them They can't stop arguing. " Oh, no
"The source went on to add that she also dealt with her boyfriend Travis Scott, 26, who was ignored."



Number  838
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel about Christmas proposals, below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do YOU think Ariel Winter will get engaged soon?”
“They may be both, as HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned Ariel Winter is hoping to get engaged this holiday season!”
““Ariel [Winter] is dropping hints that her and Levi [Meaden] are going to get engaged soon.”
“She’s hoping to get a ring for Christmas.”
“She’s already shown Levi the ring she wants, it’s something they’ve openly talked about.”
“Ariel’s sure that he’s the one for her and they do seem to be a really good match.”
“It’s a healthy relationship.”
“He’s very sweet to her — it’s obvious he adores her,” a friend of Ariel’s tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Click here to see more pics of Ariel and Levi!”


"Please tell us what you think of the Christmas plan below!"
"Holly bugs, do you think Ariel winter will get engaged soon?"
"They may all be, just as Hollywood life has learned exclusively that Ariel winter wants to get engaged this holiday!"
"Ariel (winter) hinted that she and levy (midden) would be engaged soon."
"She wants a ring for Christmas."
"She's already shown Levi the ring she wants, and that's what they're talking about in public."
"Ariel is sure that he's her favorite and they look really good together."
"It's a healthy relationship."
A friend of Ariel told reporters: "he was very kind to her and obviously he adored her." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Click here to see more photos of Ariel and levy!"



Number  839
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m not blaming Harry or anyone else but they are following rules that don’t make sense to me.””
““How about you pay tribute to your own father?!”
“She has found certain rules in the royal household difficult to understand like the fact that the Queen prefers women in dresses or skirts rather than trouser suits and is often asking Harry why things have to be done in...”
“...a certain way a source told People of the Suits star...”
“Meghan has been quick to adapt to life in Kensington Palace since marrying Prince Harry, 33, in May, though she has ruffled some feathers as she continues to iron out some of the more traditional protocols.”
“She caught flak last month for crossing her legs while sitting at an event with Queen Elizabeth, and last week made headlines for reportedly telling an Irish senator she was “pleased” that Ireland recently voted to legalize abortion.”
“It’s policy that members of the royal family do not comment publicly on political issues.”
““I think she finds it a little frustrating at times, but this is her new life, and she has to deal with it,” the source told the magazine.”
“The Duchess 36 has been viewed by many as a breath of fresh air to the more traditional royal family as she has long been a vocal advocate for gender equality her official biography on the royals website even includes...”
“...a quote of Meghan declaring herself a proud feminist...”


"I don't blame Harry or anyone else, but the rules they follow mean nothing to me."
"Why don't you pay homage to your father?"
"She found it difficult to understand some royal rules. For example, the queen prefers women in skirts or skirts to women in trousers suits. She often asked Harry why things have to be done in..."
“… A source told people about a certain way of being a suit star... "
"Megan has adapted to Kensington Palace life since her marriage to 33 year old Prince Harry in May, but she's a little annoyed as she continues to refine some of her more traditional manners."
Last month, she was criticized for crossing her legs at an event with Queen Elizabeth, and last week, it was reported that she told an Irish senator that she was "happy" that Ireland recently voted to legalize abortion
"It is a policy that members of the royal family do not comment publicly on political issues."
"I think she sometimes feels a bit depressed, but this is her new life and she has to face it," the source told the magazine
"Duchess 36 is regarded by many as a fresh air of a more traditional royal family because she has long been an active advocate of gender equality. Her official biography on the Royal website even includes..."
“… To quote Megan as a proud feminist



Number  840
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Has that ever happened before?” one waiter asked another, who shook his head, wide-eyed.”
“At the end of the evening, after an emotional speech in which he praised the “one great love” in his life, the actor came backstage and thanked the catering crew.”
“Nice to meet you by the way Presenters Courteney Cox and Jennifer Aniston onstage during the American Film Institute s 46th Life Achievement Award Gala Tribute to George Clooney Bill Murray and Miley Cyrus enjoy a drink together Cate Blanchett...”
“She’s great,’” Kendrick said as a way to assure Blanchett she would have a cheerleader in the crowd during her speech.”
““I’m gonna go have a whiskey, then I’m gonna go laugh so hard and be like, ‘This fucking bitch.”
““I was just crying in the bathroom,” Blanchett replied.”
“We could just say no,” Kendrick said.”
““Why do we do this?”
“...at this For what it s worth no she s not but isn t it sort of comforting to know that even the seemingly dauntless Blanchett feels anxious before giving a speech...”
“Exiting and clearly relieved after finishing her remarks Kendrick bumped into George s The Monuments Men and The Good German co star Cate Blanchett who looked up from a printout of her speech notes and declared I m so bad...”


"Has it happened before? One waiter asked the other. He shook his head and opened his eyes wide
"At the end of the evening, in a touching speech, he praised the" great love "in his life. After that, the actor came backstage to thank the catering staff."
"It's a pleasure to meet you on stage at the 46th life achievement awards of the American Academy of film, hosts Courtney Cox and Jennifer Aniston, to pay homage to George Clooney Bill Murray and Millie Cyrus, and to have a drink with Kate Blanchett..."
"She's great," Kendrick said, assuring Blanchett that she would have a cheerleader in the crowd during her speech
"I'm going to have a whisky, and then I'm going to laugh and say, 'this damned bitch.'"
"I was just crying in the bathroom," Blanchett replied
"We can say no," Kendrick said
"Why are we doing this?"
“…… In this case, she is not worth it, but it is not a comfort to know that even the seemingly fearless Blanchett will feel anxious before his speech. "
"Kendrick left with a sigh of relief. She ran into Kate Blanchett, CO star of George's" the man of the monument "and" good Germany ". Kate looked up from the printed speech and said that I was too bad..."



Number  841
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLife.com has reached out for comment.”
“Both stars have not addressed the marriage reports.”
“The dress, the decor, the venue, and more… a new report claims to have ALL the answers!”
“Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie Foxx, 50, are finally ready to say “I do,” according to Ok!”
“...magazine, which claims Jamie has convinced a “reluctant” Katie to get married.”
““They’re in a really good place.”
“Jamie’s done everything possible to show Katie that he’s in it for the long haul,” a source tells the mag, adding that Katie has “finally agreed” to get married.”
““They’re really excited.”
“There’s talk of a small, intimate ceremony, but of course they want to make sure whatever they do goes off without a hitch,” the insider reveals.”
“However, the couple needs the approval of one important person before they can move forward with any official nuptials.”


"Hollywood Life" we've already contacted
"Neither star spoke in the wedding paper."
"Clothes, decorations, venues and so on A new report claims to have all the answers! "
Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie fox, 50, are finally ready to say, "I will!" according to OK
“… The magazine claimed that Jamie had convinced a "reluctant" Katie to get married
"They're in a very good place."
"Jamie has done everything possible to show Katie that he is long-term," a source told the magazine, adding that Katie "finally agreed" to get married
"They're really excited."
"Some people say it's going to be a small, intimate ceremony, but of course they want to make sure that everything they do goes smoothly," a person familiar with the matter said
"However, the couple need the approval of an important person to have any formal wedding."



Number  842
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Sofia may be mature for her age, but she is still really young and is in no way ready to be a mom.””
““She loves Scott’s kids but they are a handful,” our source added.”
“...his work cut out for him...”
“Even though they have the help of nannies on their spring break trip to Mexico Sofia is quickly realizing how much work it takes to be a parent My A post shared by Sofia Richie sofiarichie on Mar 26 2018 at 5 10pm PDT So it looks like Scott has...”
““Sofia is already over mommy duty, after just a few days away with Scott and his kids,” another insider told us EXCLUSIVELY in March.”
“In fact, earlier this year, the fivesome vacationed together in Mexico, and afterwards, Sofia was more sure than ever about waiting to have kids.”
“Although Sofia does love spending time with Mason, Penelope, and Reign Disick, she enjoys having her freedom –at least for now.”
“After all, the model is still so young.”
““He doesn’t need to be married to her — just like it was with Kourtney — but he is having baby fever, and he would like to convince her to be a mother herself.” However, as we’ve reported before, Sofia is NOT down to get pregnant.”
““Its been a about a year that Scott and Sofia have been together, and he wants to make things a little more official by trying to talk to Sofia about starting a family,” a source close to Scott shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Sophia may be older than her age, but she's really young and not ready to be a mother at all."
"She loves Scott's children, but they are in the minority," our source added
“… His job suits him... "
"Although they were helped by nannies during their spring vacation trip in Mexico, Sofia Richie sofiarichie quickly realized how hard it would take to become a parent. Sofia Richie sofiarichie posted a post on PDT at 5:10 p.m. on March 26, 2018. It seems that Scott has..."
"Sophia has ended her duties as a mother, a few days after leaving Scott and his children," another insider told us exclusively in March
"In fact, earlier this year, after the five children were on holiday together in Mexico, Sofia was more determined than ever to wait for a baby."
"Although Sofia does like to be with Mason, Penelope and Rafe Disick, she enjoys her freedom - at least for now."
"After all, models are still so young."
"He doesn't need to marry her - like Courtney - but he has a baby fever and he wants to convince her to be a mother himself." However, as we reported earlier, Sophia is not pregnant
A source close to Scott told reporters: "Scott and Sophia have been together for about a year. He wants to make things more formal by trying to talk with Sophia about starting a family." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  843
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us in the comments!”
“Her wish is to have a healthy, beautiful little girl she can dress up and play dolls with and do all the things she hasn’t experienced as a mom to her sons.”That’s so lovely!”
“After seeing how close her sons have become with Blake Shelton, Gwen allegedly wants to adopt a little girl to make their family complete!”
“‘The Voice’ judge has a deadline in mind, too, according to a new report!”
“Gwen Stefani, 47, has the perfect life, and she wants to share it with someone special: a daughter!”
“The “Make Me Like You” singer has always daydreamed about having a little girl of her own, according to a report from InTouch Weekly, and now she allegedly wants to make her wishes a reality!”
“Gwen reportedly has plans in place to adopt a little girl, and is confident that partner Blake Shelton, 40, would be on board with the life-changing plan.”
“She reportedly has the whole adoption process planned out!”
““Gwen is considering not just an infant, but children under the age of 5,” a source told InTouch Weekly.”
““She wants to have a little girl before Christmas.”


"Tell us in the comments!"
"Her wish is to have a healthy and beautiful little girl who can put on her clothes, play with her dolls and do all the things she has never experienced as a mother." That's lovely! "
"After seeing their sons' intimate relationship with Blake Shelton, Gwen wants to adopt a little girl to make their family complete!"
"The voice judge also has a deadline, according to a new report!"
"Gwen Stephanie, 47, has a perfect life and wants to share it with a special person: a daughter!"
According to a report in touch weekly, the singer who "makes me like you" has always dreamed of having a little girl of her own, and now she is said to want to make her wish come true
"Gwen is reported to have made a plan to adopt a little girl and believes her 40 year old partner Blake Shelton will be involved in the life changing plan."
"It's reported that she has planned the whole adoption process!"
"Gwen's thinking is not just about a baby, but about children under the age of five," a source told touch weekly
"She wants to have a little girl before Christmas."



Number  844
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Hailey Baldwin for the First Time Bieber and Baldwin first met in 2009 in a fan meet and greet caught on video...”
“What can I say He later complimented Kardashian on the radio show calling the mother of three great and saying he s known the family for years A post shared by Justin Bieber justinbieber on Oct 10 2015 at 11 42am PDT January August 2016 Bieber Romantically Links Up With...”
“That’s where he met model Barbara Palvin, who saw the Broadway musical The Lion King with Bieber the following evening.”
“November 2012: He and Model Barbara Palvin Went on a Date to a Broadway Show The 2012 Victoria’s Secret Fashion Show was a busy time for Bieber, not just regarding his performance during the show itself.”
“Baldwin wasn’t the first girl he gave a ring to, but Gomez and him called it quits for the first time in 2012.”
“Oh my gosh!” but their appetite fed into a two-year commitment -- replete with red-carpet dates, a private viewing of Titanic at Staples Center, and a “J” diamond ring as a Valentine’s Day present.”
“She told Us Weekly that “It was pancakes!”
“December 2010-November 2012: A Silly IHOP Date with Selena Gomez Turns Into a Serious Relationship Before the roller coaster romance between Bieber and Selena Gomez took off, the two met for pancakes at an IHOP in Philadelphia in December 2010.”
““It comes from really anything when you’re in the eye and when you date somebody who’s a pop star.” They later both mutually decided to stay friends.”
““I got a couple middle fingers in the crowds, a little bit,” she said.”


"Haley Baldwin first met in 2009. Bieber and Baldwin first met at a fan meeting shot in a video..."
"What can I say? He later praised Kardashian on the radio show call the mother of three a great mother and said he had known the family for many years. Justin Bieber published an article at 11:42 a.m. on October 10, 2015. From January to August 2016, Bieber and Romantically connected. "
"There he met model Barbara parvin, who watched the Broadway musical lion king with Bieber the next night."
"November 2012: he and model Barbara Palin go to a show on Broadway. Victoria's Secret Fashion Show in 2012 is a busy time for Bieber, not just about his performance during the show."
"Baldwin wasn't the first girl he gave the ring to, but Gomez and he broke up for the first time in 2012."
"My God! But their appetite led to a two-year commitment - a red carpet date, a private view of the Titanic at Staples Center, and a "J" diamond ring as a Valentine's Day gift
She told us every week, "pancakes!"
"December 2010 - November 2012: before Bieber and Selena Gomez's roller coaster romance begins, their stupid IHop date with Selena Gomez turns into a serious relationship, and they meet for pancakes at IHop in Philadelphia in December 2010."
"When you date a pop star, everything in your eyes feels like this." They all decided to continue to be friends
"I have a few middle fingers in the crowd, a little bit," she said



Number  845
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It’s like she realized she doesn’t have to be married to be in a happy and serious relationship.””
“In July, a source close to Lopez revealed to PEOPLE that the relationship has made the singer and actress “more mature and peaceful.”
“RELATED: Jennifer Lopez Is ‘More Mature and Peaceful’ with Alex Rodriguez — Inside Their Happy Blended FamilyRodriguez also posted another image of himself on a boat, again looking dashing in all white.”
“The couple has been showing off their glamorous adventures since Tuesday, when Rodriguez shared a clip of Lopez singing Journey’s classic hit “Don’t Stop Believing” on a boat.”
“!..” he captioned his snap.”
““Apple anyone?”
“Rodriguez posted a picture of the couple in the same outfits happily shopping at an outdoor market.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“She captioned the photo “Capri 2018” with an Italian flag and kissing lips emoij.”
“Lopez shared a candid shot of herself, dressed in a white lace gown, and Rodriguez in a white sweater and pants relaxing on some city steps.”


"It's like she realizes that she doesn't have to get married to have a happy and serious relationship."
In July, a source close to Lopez revealed to people that the relationship has made the singer and actress "more mature and peaceful."
"Related reports: Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are" more mature and peaceful "- in their happy mixed family, Rodriguez also released another picture of himself on board, dressed in white and looking smart."
Since Rodriguez shared a clip of Lopez's classic song "don't stop believing" on board on Tuesday, the couple have begun to show off their fascinating adventures
"!.." he captioned his snapshot. "
"Is apple taken?"
"Rodriguez posted a picture of two people wearing the same clothes and shopping happily in the outdoor market."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
She captioned the photo "Capri 2018" with an Italian flag and kissing lips
"Lopez and Rodriguez frankly shared a picture of themselves, wearing a white lace robe, a white sweater and pants, relaxing on the steps of some cities."



Number  846
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But it’s going to take a lot of hard work and e ort for Jamie to get back into Katie’s good graces, because his behavior is unforgivable.””
““It’s taken her years to trust Jamie enough to publicly be seen with him,” the insider explains, “and he showed a blatant lack of respect.”(Photo Credit: Getty Images)Jamie doesn’t want to give up either woman.”
“Jamie Foxx is jeopardizing his relationship with his longtime girlfriend, Katie Holmes, by texting his ex.”
“The 50-year-old actor was all smiles as he met up with a beautiful brunette for lunch in LA on Feb.17 — but it wasn’t Katie, with whom he’d just spent Valentine’s Day.”
“For the second time that week, the Oscar winner was hanging out with Kristin Grannis, the mother of his daughter Annalise.”
“And according to witnesses, Jamie even brought her a gift: a black designer purse.”
“Now Katie is starting to suspect that they’re more than just friendly exes.”
““She recently found out about a string of texts Jamie sent to Kristin that included details of secret meetings — and him admitting he still loved her,” an insider exclusively tells In Touch of the relationship, which has reportedly caused problems for the actor in the past.”
“And after nearly five years of dating Jamie under the radar following her 2012 divorce from Tom Cruise, this latest betrayal is devastating to the 39-year-old actress.”
““He insisted there was nothing more to the relationship than him and Kristin discussing their daughter,” the insider says.”


"But it will take a lot of effort and effort for Jamie to regain Katie's favor, because his behavior is unforgivable."
"It took her many years to trust Jamie and make him public," the person familiar with the matter explained. "He showed obvious disrespect." (photo source: Getty Images) Jamie doesn't want to give up any women. "
Jamie fox is endangering his relationship by texting his ex girlfriend Katie Holmes
"On February 17, the 50 year old actor had lunch with a beautiful brunette in Los Angeles with a smile on his face - but it wasn't Katie who had just spent Valentine's day with him."
"That week, the Oscar winner was with Christine Grannis, the mother of his daughter annalis, for the second time."
"According to witnesses, Jamie even brought her a gift: a black brand wallet."
"Now Katie is starting to suspect that they're not just friendly predecessors."
"She recently discovered a series of text messages sent by Jamie to Christine, including details of secret meetings - he admitted that he still loved her," a person familiar with the matter revealed exclusively in contact magazine, which reported that the relationship had caused problems for Christine in the past
"Jamie has been in close contact with the outside world for nearly five years since her divorce from Tom Cruise in 2012, and the latest betrayal is devastating for the 39 year old actress."
"He insisted that there was nothing else in the relationship except that he and Christine discussed their daughter," the person familiar with the matter said



Number  847
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s sick to death of Blake carrying on in interviews about how Gwen ‘saved my life’ and saying he was ‘at rock bottom, in the middle of hell’ after their divorce.”Scroll through the gallery to relive Blake and Miranda’s cutest moments!”
““Miranda is tired of Gwen incessantly gushing about her romance with Blake,” said another source.”
“She’s also taken issue with the constant gushing Gwake does over each other in public.”
““Miranda would welcome a showdown with Gwen, to get everything in the open once and for all,” a source previously told In Touch.”
“The “Little Red Wagon” singer moved on shortly after with Anderson — though these ladies have been at odds ever since the mother-of-three started dating her co-star.”
“It was revealed in November of that year that Gwen and Blake started dating.”
“The couple announced back in July 2015 that they finalized their divorce after four years of marriage, which was right around when Gwen filed to end her marriage from the Bush front man.”
““I just want to say thank you for letting me release my heartbreak and sharing it with me,” she said.”
“None of them need to be living in the past!”Even though Miranda has moved on with Anderson East, who accompanied her to Sunday night’s show, she still made it a point to bring up the “heartbreak” that her ex-husband caused.”
““Gwen struggled to get over Gavin [Rossdale] but she did it and now it’s all about her relationship with Blake.”


"She told Blake in the interview about how Gwen" saved my life "and said that he was" in the bottom, in the hell "after the divorce and felt sick to death." Scroll through the gallery and revisit the most lovely moments of black and Miranda
"Miranda is tired of Gwen talking about her romance with black," another source said
"She also expressed dissatisfaction with Gwak's constant talk to each other in public."
"Miranda will welcome a showdown with Gwen to make everything public once and for all," a source told the contact earlier
The "little red car" singer soon broke up with Anderson - though the women have been at loggerheads since the mother of three started dating her partner
"In November of the same year, Gwen and black started dating."
"The couple announced as early as July 2015 that they had finalized the divorce agreement four years after their marriage, when Gwen proposed to end the marriage to President Bush."
"I just want to say thank you for letting me release my heartbreak and share it with me," she said
"They don't need to live in the past! "Although Miranda has been with Anderson East, who accompanied her on the Sunday evening show, she has deliberately mentioned the" heartbreak "caused by her ex husband."
"Gwen tried to overcome Gavin (rosdale), but she did. Now it's all about her relationship with Blake."



Number  848
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are super happy.”Reets celebrated the early success with a Fifty Shades inspired snap.”
“He gushed: “Me and Rita are absolutely overjoyed with the reaction so far to For You.”
“And he couldn’t be happier to have another hit under his belt.”
“Fortunately Liam was on hand and got involved thanks to Rita, who had the tune prepped with songwriter pals Ali Payami, Ali Tamposi and Andrew Watt.”
“...as well However after a turbulent 14 month concert tour Justin is intent on having a break and made it clear he would not be taking on any extra recording commitments...”
“Image GETTY They had the world s biggest female pop star in Taylor Swift do the last film so they were keen for something a bit different because Zayn Malik sang that with her and he comes from One Direction...”
““He’s the biggest male pop star in the world and so that’s what they aimed for.”
“A source told me: “Originally Universal Pictures wanted Justin Bieber to sing a song on the soundtrack, either with or without Rita.”
“But producers of the upcoming movie sequel had different plans for the first single and wanted Justin Bieber to be the man to get listeners hot under the collar.”
“...sexy Fifty Shades Freed duet with the 1D star For You is on course to become the biggest new entry on the official charts this week...”


"We are very happy." Liz celebrated his early success with a 50 degree snapshot
"Rita and I have been very happy with your reaction so far," he gushed
"He's not happy anymore because there's another blow under his belt."
"Fortunately Liam was there, and thanks to Rita, she worked with her composing partners Ali Payami, Ali temposi and Andrew watt to prepare the music."
“…… However, after 14 months of tumultuous tour, Justin plans to take a rest and make it clear that he will not undertake any additional recording obligations... "
"They let the world's biggest female pop star Taylor Swift make the last film, so they long for something different, because zayn Malik sings with her, he comes from one direction..."
"He's the biggest male pop star in the world, so that's their goal."
"Universal initially wanted Justin Bieber to sing a song on the soundtrack, with or without Rita," a source told me
"But the producers of the upcoming film sequel have different plans for the first single, and they want Justin Bieber to be an exciting person for the audience."
“… Sexy 50 shadow free duet with 1D stars for you is on the course to become the biggest new entrant to the official chart this week... "



Number  849
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...the past few weeks Jolie and the children have been back in Los Angeles where they have been spotted shopping at Whole Foods or going to a movie...”
“Moreover, with the Clooneys taking Pitt’s side in the breakup, Jolie also was developing an “insane” jealousy over Amal Clooney, an international human rights attorney and mother of 1-year-old twins.”
“But very soon after, the 43-year-old actress, director and globe-trotting humanitarian began to appear in not-so-admiring news stories reporting that she had been accused by a judge of undermining estranged husband Brad Pitt’s relationship with their six children.”
“Jolie started to come across even to friends as “crazy and manipulative” for going public earlier this month with her efforts to portray Pitt as a deadbeat dad, having her lawyers say he was shirking his responsibility to pay his fair share of childcare expenses, Page Six reported.”
“So perhaps it’s no surprise to learn this week that she and Pitt quietly reached a temporary custody agreement that would put off arguing their respective cases in a court hearing, according to People.”
“Actually, this interim custody agreement keeps in place the one imposed by a judge in June, which said that “Angelina must let Brad see the children,” a source close to Pitt told Page Six.”
“The agreement also may only put off the custody hearing for a few weeks, the source added.”
“Still, there appears to be a temporary truce in play.”
“Was this a matter of Jolie “waving the white flag,” as Us Weekly put it?”
“Another Page Six report earlier this week said that Jolie’s decision to escalate her fight against Pitt was losing her friends in Hollywood — according to some of those friends.”


"In the past few weeks, Julie and the kids have returned to Los Angeles, where they were found shopping at whole foods or going to the movies..."
In addition, as the couple split up on Pete's side, Julie became "Crazy" jealous of Amal Clooney, an international human rights lawyer and mother of 1-year-old twins
But not long after, the 43 year old actress, director and world travel humanitarian began appearing in less admirable news reports that she was accused by a judge of undermining the relationship between her separated husband Brad Pitt and their six children
Earlier this month, Julie publicly portrayed Pitt as a rogue father and asked her lawyer to say that Pitt was evading his responsibility to pay his reasonable share of child care expenses, which even made her friends feel that she was "crazy and nosy."
"Therefore, according to people familiar with the matter, it may not be surprising to learn this week that she and Pete have quietly reached a temporary custody agreement to postpone the debate on their respective cases in court."
"In fact, this interim guardianship agreement retains an agreement enforced by the judge in June, which stipulates that" Angelina must let Brad see the children, "a source close to Pete told page 6
"The agreement may also postpone custody hearings only for a few weeks," the source added
"But it seems that a temporary truce is around the corner."
"Is this the problem of Julie" waving the white flag "as American weekly said
"Earlier this week, another six page report said Julie's decision to escalate her fight with Pitt cost her friends in Hollywood - according to some of them."



Number  850
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Continue reading: Iron Man 3 Review...”
“And with his constantly surprising character, Kingsley very nearly steals the show.”
“These include Tony's old pal (Cheadle), two self-healing goons (Dale and Szostak) and a pre-teen (Simpkins) who helps Tony.”
“Which not only deepens Tony and Pepper as characters, but makes the surrounding people more interesting.”
“So even if the dialog is peppered with technical gibberish, at least it has a personal dimension.”
“It also makes the action set pieces even more spectacular, since they're not mere robot-vs-robot animated battles.”
“Intriguingly, the script keeps Tony out of the Iron Man suit for much of the film's running time, which makes his character feel much more grounded than ever before.”
“And the Mandarin's next target is Tony.”
“And both seem somehow connected to a wave of nasty bombings that is terrorising America, masterminded by a menacing man who calls himself the Mandarin (Kingsley).”
“Then two faces from the past reappear: bio-scientist Maya (Hall) is an old colleague of Tony's, while technical genius Aldrich (Pearce) has a past with Pepper.”


"Read on: Iron Man 3 Review..."
"Kingsley almost snatched the show with his constantly unexpected character."
"They include Tony's old friend (Cheddar), two self-healing idiots (Dale and Shostak) and a preschooler (simpkins) who helps Tony."
"It not only deepened Tony and pepper's character, but also made the people around him more interesting."
"So even if the conversation is full of technical nonsense, there is at least a personal level."
"It also makes the action scenes more spectacular, because they are not just robot to robot animation wars."
"It's intriguing that the script allows Tony not to wear Ironman for most of the film, which makes his character feel more down-to-earth than ever before."
"The next target for Mandarin is Tony."
"And the two bombings seem to have something to do with the terrorist bombings that threaten the United States. The mastermind of the bombings is a threatening figure who claims to be Chinese (Kingsley)
"Then there are two faces of the past: the biological scientist Maya (Hall) is Tony's old colleague, and the technical genius Aldrich (Pierce) has a past with pepper."



Number  851
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Check out the gallery for more details on Harry and Meghan’s whirlwind royal romance!”
“MORE: Meghan Markle Had the Best Response to Being Asked If She’d Get Married to Prince Harry…“However, he does plan to add a few personal touches, including photos ofhis family,” the source added.”
““She’s got great taste when it comes to interior design, so Harry has no problem leaving it up to her,” the insider continued.”
“Interestingly, the actress has a knack for interior decorating, so Harry wants Meghan to take care of sprucing up their new space!”
“But in the meantime, Harrywants her to live like a princess,” the source said.”
“MORE: Prince Harry to Propose to Meghan Markle With an Engagement Ring That Once Belonged to Princess Diana“Eventually, Meghan will move to London.”
“Though the couple — who began dating in August 2016 — often get together at Harry’s Kensington Palace residence, it would be easier for Harry and Meghan to spend most of their time in Canada, outside of the royal spotlight.”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images)Meghan currently lives in Toronto because that’s where she films her hit USA TV show, Suits.”
“Meghan (left) and Harry (right).”
““Harry wants to find something that is larger than Meghan’s current home and has state-of-the-art security,” the insider revealed.”


"For more details about Harry and Megan's whirlwind Royal Romance, check out the gallery!"
"More: Megan markel got the best answer when asked if she would marry Prince Harry..." "However, he does plan to add some personal information, including photos of his family," the source added
"She has a lot of taste in interior design, so it's entirely up to her to decide Harry," the person familiar with the matter added
"Interestingly, the actress is very good at interior decoration, so Harry wants Megan to clean up their new space!"
"But at the same time, Harry wants her to live like a princess," the source said
"More: Prince Harry proposed to Megan Marcel with an engagement ring that once belonged to Princess Diana." eventually, Megan will move to London
"Although the couple, who have been dating since August 2016, often meet at Harry's residence in Kensington Palace, it will be easier for Harry and Megan to spend most of their time in Canada without Royal attention."
(photo source: Getty Images) Megan currently lives in Toronto because that's where she filmed the hit American TV show suit
"Megan (left) and Harry (right)"
"Harry wants to find something bigger than Megan's home and with the most advanced security," the source said



Number  852
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...p m 6 30 p m CBS Evening News 7 p m CBS 6 News at 7 p m 7 30 p m Access Hollywood...”
““He’s lost every chance he has in life.”
“Bro opens up about her daughter, Heather Heyer, and tells Ellen she’s on a mission to keep her daughter’s voice alive after hatred tried to silence her.”
“She shares her last conversation with Heather, which was eerily about Bro becoming the beneficiary on Heather’s insurance policy.”
“Bro said that while she is crushed over her daughter’s death, the tremendous amount of public support is helping her stay strong.”
““I can’t even begin to tell you how much love around the world has lifted me up,” Bro said.”
““So often we’re in times of grief that people come to us and they give us hugs.”
“So many people have been awesome to us… Even though we’ve lost Heather, our lives have been enriched in so many ways.”Bro also says that she feels sorry for James Alex Fields Jr., who she believes thought hate was going to solve the world’s problems.”
““All I keep thinking is how sad for his mother.”
“She’s lost her son, too,” Bro said.”


“… 6:30 PM CBS Evening News 7:00 CBS 6:00 news 7:30 Hollywood... "
"He lost every chance in his life."
"My brother made public about her daughter Heather hayer and told Ellen that she was on a mission to keep her voice alive after hatred tried to silence her."
"She shared her last conversation with Heather about her brother becoming the beneficiary of Heather's policy."
"The elder brother said that although she was sad about her daughter's death, the great public support helped her stay strong."
"I can't even tell you how much love in the world cheers me up," my brother said
"We are so often in times of grief that people come to us and hug us."
"So many people are great for us Even though we lost Heather, our lives have been enriched in many ways. " The brother also said that she felt sorry for James Alex fields Jr. and that she thought hatred could solve the world's problems. "
"I've been thinking about how upset his mother is."
"She lost her son, too," said the brother



Number  853
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“...and distract from the fact that he has not fully met his legal obligations to support the children The Blast reported that sources very close to Pitt say that Jolie s claims that she is hard up for cash and struggling to take care of the children while she has...”
“Brad Pitt is reportedly dismissing ex Angelina Jolie’s claim that she’s hurting for money as their bitter divorce battle continues.”
“According to The Blast, Pitt is scoffing at Jolie’s alleged financial woes — because she was just paid more than $20 million for her role in Maleficent 2!”
“The actors are embroiled in a vicious court feud over their divorce and custody of their six kids.”
“As RadarOnline.com has reported, in the past week, legal papers have shown that Jolie, 43, accused Pitt, 54, of not paying her enough child support over the past two years.”
“The River Runs Through It star then slammed back, saying he actually gave her a loan of $8 million to buy her L.A. mansion and gave her an additional $1.3 million for their children.”
“Jolie soon countered saying that A loan is not however child support and to represent it as such is misleading and inaccurate The Tomb Raider actress attorney Bley DeJean later said to PEOPLE What has been filed by Brad s side today is a blatant attempt to obfuscate the truth...”
“...primary custody are crazy Jolie will star in the upcoming Disney sequel Maleficent 2 which is scheduled to come out in 2020”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
“… And diverting attention, he didn't fully fulfill his legal obligation to support the children's explosion report, saying the source was very close to Pete saying that Julie said she was cash strapped and worked hard to take care of the children while she had... "
"Brad Pitt is reported to have refuted former Angelina Jolie's claim that she was injured for money as their fierce divorce dispute continued."
According to sources, Pitt scoffs at Julie's so-called financial difficulties because her role in villain 2 has just received more than $20 million
"The actors are involved in a vicious court dispute over divorce and custody of six children."
"As RadarOnline.com According to the website, in the past week, legal documents showed that Julie, 43, accused Pitt, 54, of not paying enough alimony in the past two years
"The river crossed it, and the star hit back, saying he actually gave her $8 million in loans to buy her La mansion and another $1.3 million for their children."
"Julie quickly retorted that the loan was not child support, and used it to show that it was misleading and inaccurate. Tomb Raider actress Brad Jean later said that people had submitted Brad's side today and it was a blatant attempt to confuse the truth..."
“… The main custody is that crazy Julie will play in the upcoming Disney sequel Devil 2, which is scheduled to be released in 2020. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  854
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gammill also brought up the point of Karrueche never reporting any of the alleged behavior to authorities.”
“Karrueche told Gammill she never planned to return the rings because they were hers.”
“Chris Brown's attorney, David Gammill, grilled Karrueche on cross-examination, and pressed her on allegedly taunting Chris about the rings by saying she had sold them.”
“Karrueche also testified that Chris had beaten her before.”
“She says he also once wrote "Imma kill blood" under a photo of her and actor Michael B. Jordan.”
“She claims he also texted her more violent threats like ... "I can get my money back and I'm tired of playing games" as well as "Bitch I will beat the s**t out of you" and "I promise you I will make your life hell."”
“I m out in public I m going to ban you from all events...”
“Karrueche explained that in text messages between herself and Chris post breakup he would say things like I m not being nice to you no more if I see you out in public again and I m there I will make you hate me even more don t be anywhere...”
“When she refused ... Karrueche says Chris became aggressive.”
“Karrueche took the stand Thursday in her restraining order case against Chris, telling a judge after she broke up with the singer ... he demanded diamond rings he bought for her to be returned.”


"Kamir also mentioned that karuche has never reported any alleged acts to the authorities."
"Karuche told gamir that she never intended to return the rings because they were hers."
Chris Brown's lawyer, David GAMIL, made a mockery of him by questioning karuche and forcing her to say that she had sold the ring
"Karuche also testified that Chris had beaten her before."
She said he also wrote "ima killed" under a photo of her and actor Michael Jordan
"She claimed that he also texted her more violent threats, such as..." I can get my money back, I'm tired of playing games, "and" bitch, I'm going to beat your ass "and" I promise I'll make your life hell. "
"I will forbid you to take part in any activities in public..."
"Karuche explained that in the text message between her and Chris after the break-up, he would say that I am no longer good to you. If I see you in public again and I am there, I will make you hate me more. Don't be anywhere..."
"When she refused... Karuche said Chris became aggressive
"Karuche testified in the restraining order against Chris on Thursday and told the judge after she broke up with the singer... He asked for the diamond ring he had bought for her



Number  855
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Justin Timberlake boastfully announced, “All you people out there, Satan is my master.”
“She has told him to leave but he resists and she said he’s in her for a reason.”
“Deceptive, isn’t it?”
“In Russian the meaning of Sasha is: defender of man.”
“However, many people don’t know that she has admitted countless times that she is possessed by a spirit guide she named Sasha Fierce.”
“This chick is one of the most powerful influencers of adults and children alike.”
“Back to Beyonce.”
“What I discovered was shocking!”
“At first, I just wanted to confirm what I had seen first hand while working in LA and verify some of the stories friends shared with me who had the 411 from the inside.”
“Check it out for yourself.”


Justin Timberlake boasted, "you people, Satan is my master."
"She told him to leave, but he refused. She said he was in her for a reason."
"Deceptive, isn't it?"
"In Russian, Sasha means: the defender of mankind."
"However, many people don't know that she has admitted countless times that she is possessed by a spiritual mentor named Sasha Firth."
"This chick is the most influential of adults and children."
"Back to Beyonce."
"What I found was shocking!"
"At the beginning, I just wanted to confirm what I saw with my own eyes when I was working in Los Angeles, and verify the story of having 411 from the inside that some friends shared with me."
"See for yourself."



Number  856
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“9.”
“Her "little nugget" even has his own Instagram!”
“WATCH: Justin Bieber Deletes Instagram Account Amid Feuds3.”
“Read more on that HERE.”
“She has since apologized over Snapchat, however.”
“Selena weighed in, leaving a few messages in the comments section before Justin ultimately deactivated his account.”
“He warned followers that he was going to make his account private if they continued to harass his new love interest.”
“It all went down after Justin noticed his fans were leaving cruel comments about Sofia on his Instagram.”
“Ironically, Selena was one of the people to publicly shade Justin and Sofia's relationship.”
“She Once Snapped a Photo With Justin's Famous Ex-Girlfriend, Selena GomezStar Traks PhotoBack in 2009, Sofia attended Selena's debut concert at The Roxy in West Hollywood, California, with her sister and brother-in-law, Joel Madden.”


“9.”
Her little nugget even has its own instagram
"Note: Justin Bieber has deleted instagram account 3."
"Read more here."
"But then she apologized to snapchat."
"Serena joined in, leaving a message in the comments section before Justin finally stopped his account."
"He warned followers that if they continue to harass his new relationship, he will keep his account secret."
"Justin noticed that after his fans made cruel comments on Sophia on his instagram, it was all over."
"Ironically, Serena is one of the people who openly covered up Justin's relationship with Sophia."
"She was photographed with Justin's famous ex girlfriend Selena Gomez star traks. As early as 2009, Sophia and her sister and brother-in-law Joel Madden attended Selena's first concert in Roxy, West Hollywood, California."



Number  857
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: MEGADid this vacation also include them getting MARRIED?”
“Did Kourtney Kardashian and Younes Bendjima just get married during their vacation in Rome?”
“The mother-of-three just posted a major wedding photo on her Instagram stories Tuesday.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAThe two were spotted hand in hand while vacationing in Rome this week.”
“Source: MEGAKourtney showed off her assets in a black bra and baggy green pants, while Younes looked relaxed in his t-shirt and jeans combo.”
“Don't forget about her Fendi purse that she was carrying, as it was sort of hard to miss!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGADinner was also on the menu during their beautiful vacation, as they were seen feasting it up with one another on Tuesday.”
“Kourtney has been sharing photos from her trip all over social media, which included a major wedding snap that was a "blink and you miss it" kind of thing on her Instagram stories.”
“Source: MEGADo you think wedding bells are in the future for Kourtney and Younes?”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Source: Megan, does this holiday also include their marriage?"
Did Courtney Kardashian and yones benjima get married on holiday in Rome? "
"The mother of three just released an important wedding photo on instagram on Tuesday."
"The article continues with the following advertising source: Mega, the two were found holding hands while vacationing in Rome this week."
"Source: megacourtney shows off her assets in a black bra and baggy green pants, while younes looks relaxed in his T-shirt and jeans combination."
"Don't forget the findy purse she has with her, because it's hard to miss!"
The article continues below. Source: megadiner was also on the menu during their beautiful holiday, because they were seen eating and drinking together on Tuesday
"Coultney has been sharing her travel photos on social media, including an important wedding snapshot, in her instagram story, a 'blink, you missed' or something."
"Source: Megane, do you think the wedding bells of Courtney and yones will ring in the future?"



Number  858
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And now, the Inquisitr notes one source says she wants to be even thinner than she was before baby Stormi was ever in the picture.”
“During her pregnancy, however, she gained upward of 50 pounds.”
“Here’s the problem, though: Teas don’t actually have the ability to “detox” your body.”
“She posted a photo of her holding two of her favorite detox formulas on Instagram and promoting their cleansing effects.”
“This wouldn’t be Kylie’s first attempt at weight loss with these teas, either.”
“She may be a fan of ‘detox teas’A source says in addition to a very strict diet, Kylie is drinking “detox teas” to help drop pounds, reports Hollywood Life.”
“2.”
“Next: Kylie has been a fan of this dangerous weight-loss method for a while.”
“Along with that, Kim suggested Kylie eats no carbs or sugar, despite her “addiction” to fast food.”
“The Independent says Kim advised Kylie to stick to a strict 1,500 calorie-a-day diet, according to one source.”


"Now, prosecutors have noticed that a source said she wanted to be thinner than before baby Tommy appeared in the picture."
During her pregnancy, however, she gained more than 50 pounds
"But the problem is that tea doesn't actually" detoxify "your body."
"She posted a picture on instagram with two of her favorite detoxification recipes and promoting their cleaning effects."
"It's not the first time Kelly has tried to lose weight with these teas."
Kelly may be a fan of Detox Tea, Hollywood life reported. It is reported that in addition to strict diet, Kelly also drinks "detoxification tea" to help lose weight
“2.”
"Next step: Kelly has been enjoying this dangerous way of losing weight for a while."
In addition, Kim advises Kelly not to eat carbohydrates or sugar, even though she is "addicted" to fast food
According to a source, Kim suggested Kelly stick to a strict diet of 1500 calories a day, the independent said



Number  859
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“IG | selenagomez via Stories: pic.twitter.com/Qa9aXeXTr9 — Selena Gomez News (@SelenaHQ) December 4, 2017HollywoodLifers, what do you think Selena’s latest Instagram Story means?”
“Or, possibly, something’s going on in her personal life that she wants to distance herself from momentarily.”
“The ‘Wolves’ singer looked upset in an Instagram story that said she needed ‘alone time.’ Is she sad about how things are going with Justin Bieber?”
“Selena Gomez, 25, has been living her best life lately.”
“From being named Billboard‘s Woman of the Year to her blonde makeover to her sweet reunion with Justin Bieber, 23, she’s proven that she’s doing things on her own terms — and it’s working.”
“But even the “Wolves” singer needs a break sometimes.”
“She recently posted a video on her Instagram story that shows herself frowning.”
““I need some alone time,” she captioned the short clip.”
“Is she alright?”
“There are a million reasons why the “Wolves” singer would need some space.”


"Ig | selenagomez through the story: pic.twitter.com/Qa9aXeXTr9 -Selena Gomez news (@ selenahq) December 4, 2017 Hollywood lifers, what do you think Selena's latest instagram report means? "
"Or maybe something happened in her personal life that she wanted to keep away from for a while."
In an instagram report, the "wolf" singer looked frustrated, saying she needed "time alone.". Is she upset about Justin Bieber? "
"Serena Gomez, 25, has been living her best life recently."
"From being named Billboard's woman of the year, to her blonde makeover, to her sweet reunion with 23-year-old Justin Bieber, she has proved that she does things her way - and that it works."
"But even wolf singers sometimes need a break."
"She recently posted a video on instagram that showed that she was sad."
"I need some time alone," she wrote in the title of the video
"How is she?"
"There are a million reasons why wolf singers need some space."



Number  860
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Standard Online has contacted representatives for Rihanna for comment.”
“The singer broke down in tears after she sang the track, which details her depression and sexual assault, with Camila Cabello, Cyndi Lauper, Julia Michaels, Bebe Rexha and Andra Day at the ceremony.”
“Some felt the singer – who was unable to attend the bash – was undeserved of the Best Solo Performance gong which they claimed Kesha should have won for her emotional song, Praying.”
“British star Ed Sheeran was honoured with Best Solo Performance for Shape of You and Best Vocal Album for Divide, but he was booed by some on being announced.”
“Grammy Awards 2018 in 90 secondsBruno Mars swept the board as he took home the top trio of Song, Album and Record of the Year.”
“Give it up.”Another posted: “Ya'll been saying rihanna pregnant for like 80 weeks now lmao (sic).”Rihanna was among the night’s big winners after taking home the gong for Best Rap/Sung Performance for her track Loyalty with Kendrick Lamar.”
“She’s obviously pregnant, carrying a billionaire’s child too.”Others shut down the speculation with one tweeting: “Rihanna been pregnant since 2016 to y’all.”
“Her face full and she’s glowing crazy.”A third wrote: “Why are they stressing Rihanna on that stage with all that dancing?”
“One user tweeted: “A part of me feels like Rihanna is pregnant.”Another posted: “Rihanna is pregnant.”
“: Rihanna leaves 1Oak in New York (Splash News) / Pap Nation/Splash NewsFans flocked to Twitter to comment on her “glowing” appearance, with many speculating that she could be pregnant.”


"Standard online has contacted Rihanna's representative for comments."
The singer sang the song, describing her depression and sexual assault in detail. Camilla Cabello, Cindy Lauper, Julia Michaels, Bebe Reza and Andra day attended the ceremony, and then she burst into tears
"Some people think that the singer who failed to attend the carnival should not win the best individual performance award. They think that Kesha should win the award for her touching song" pray. "
British film star ed Sheeran won the best individual performance award for "your shape" and the best vocal album Award for "split", but he was booed by some people as soon as he was announced
"The Grammy 2018 90 second Bruno Mars sweeps the board and he brings home the song, album and album of the year trio."
"Give up." Another post said, "you would say Rihanna is 80 weeks pregnant and now it's Rama." Rihanna was one of the big winners of the night and won the best rap / singing performance award for her loyalty to Kendrick Lamar
"She's obviously pregnant and pregnant with a billionaire child." Others tweeted: "Rihanna has been pregnant since 2016."
The third person wrote, "why do Rihanna dance so well on stage and they have to put pressure on her?"
"Part of me feels Rihanna is pregnant," one user tweeted Another user said, "Rihanna is pregnant."
": Rihanna left 1oak (splash News) / PAP nation / splash news in New York, fans flocked to Twitter to comment on her radiant face, and many people speculated that she might be pregnant."



Number  861
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman reveal filming for Big Little Lies 2 has officially wrapped upMORE : Does Reese Witherspoon’s ‘twin’ body double hint at Big Little Lies drama?”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Normally sporting long blonde locks, the Moulin Rouge star is seen in a scene from her new film Destroyer, in which she plays LAPD detective Erin Bell.”
“And it’s quite the departure from the Kidman we’re used to seeing on the red carpet.”
“The star is sat with a dark, choppy wig, no glamourous makeup and a plain top as she stares off into the distance.”
“Kidman’s new role is bound to be compelling (Picture: Annapurna Pictures)She’s sporting weathered bags under her eyes, with a stern look of worry etched across her face.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementIn the upcoming movie, Nicole’s character is traumatised after going undercover in a criminal gang, which might explain the vibe we’re seeing here.”
“Furthermore, Destroyer’s director Karyn Kusama told Vanity Fair she wanted Kidman’s character’s trauma to be shown in her appearance, 20 years after initially going undercover.”
“‘We always knew that what we wanted her to look like was a real middle-aged woman with a past that she wears on her face,’ she said.”
“‘With sun damage and sleep deprivation and stress and rage, just in her whole physical body.’Kusama added Kidman isn’t the biggest fan of such drastic makeover, so they had to be quick with their work for her character.”


"More: Reese Witherspoon and Nicole Kidman reveal that the filming of" big lie 2 "is officially over. More: does Reese Witherspoon's twin body suggest the story of big lie?"
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"The Moulin Rouge star usually has long blonde hair. She plays detective Irene bell of the Los Angeles police department in the new film" the destroyer. "
"It's totally different from the Kidman we often see on the red carpet."
"The star sat there, with a dark wig on his head, no charming make-up, and a plain coat, staring into the distance."
"Kidman's new character is going to be very attractive (photo source: Annapurna pictures) she's got weather beaten bags under her eyes and a serious look of worry on her face."
"In the upcoming movie, Nicole's character is traumatized after being undercover by a criminal gang, which may explain the atmosphere we see here."
"In addition, destroyer director Kushan told vanity fair that she wanted Kidman's role traumatized to show in her appearance 20 years later, initially going undercover."
"We always know that we want her to look like a real middle-aged woman with traces of the past on her face," she said
Ms. Hayama also said that her whole body was hurt by the sun, lack of sleep, stress and anger, and that Kidman was not the biggest fan of this dramatic transformation, so they had to quickly transform her role



Number  862
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s just a lost cause!””
““It’s so sad,” the source told The ENQUIRER.”
“She soon, however, tumbled once more off the wagon.”
“What’s more, a second source dished that pot-smoking Miley had briefly behaved when first getting back together with Liam.”
“...but reconciled last year when the tongue wagging 24 year old emerged wearing a gold diamond band on her left ring finger...”
“Miley Cyrus Keeps Her Word Leaves USA After Trump Win Liam wants her to cut the crap and get healthy and get help because he loves her The on again off again couple officially broke off their engagement in 2013”
““Miley’s drug problem has been an ongoing issue ever since she and Liam got back together,” the source said, “but it’s taken a really bad turn and gotten worse in the last several weeks.”
“...a spy exclusively spilled to The National ENQUIRER”
“Fed up with her erratic drug fueled bad girl behavior the 27 year old Hunger Games adonis blew his stack at his Jan 13 birthday party after the Wrecking Ball singer disappeared into the ladies room for some extracurricular activity...”
“Unhappy hunk Liam Hemsworth has smacked his trainwreck fiancée Miley Cyrus with a sobriety ultimatum — give up the drugs or the wedding is off!”


"She's just a failed career!"
"It's pathetic," the source told the questioner
However, she soon fell off the carriage again
"Also, another source said marijuana smoker Miley had a brief behavior when she first got back together with Liam."
“… But at the time of reconciliation last year, the 24-year-old with her tongue swaying appeared on her left ring finger, wearing a gold diamond ring... "
"Miley Cyrus kept her promise to leave the United States because trump Wyn Liam wanted her to stop talking nonsense, get back to health and get help. Because he loved her, the couple officially broke their engagement in 2013."
"Since Millie and Liam got back together, her drug problem has been an ongoing problem," the source said, "but in recent weeks things have become very bad and getting worse."
“… A spy divulges it to the state inquirer
"Fed up with her unstable drug-induced bad girl behavior, Adonis, a 27 year old hunger game, was furious at her birthday party on January 13 because the billiard singer disappeared in the women's room to participate in some extracurricular activities..."
"The unfortunate big Liam Hemsworth hit his fiancee, Miley Cyrus, with a sober ultimatum - give up drugs or the wedding will be over!"



Number  863
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a sneak peek clip from an all-new episode of Keeping Up With the Kardashians, the 35-year-old reality star pulls a prank on Kris Jenner after Khloe claims she was art shamed by her famous momager.”
“Scott meets up with an actor named Richardson Jones, who he hires to play "very famous artist" Art Vandelay, a person made up by George Costanza on Seinfeld.”
“"Today will be the day that we introduce Kris to this artist," Scott explains.”
“"Hopefully everything goes well and she falls for it."”
“"You have to remember here, this guy has absolutely no knowledge of art," he adds.”
“"The only thing he knows is how to basically pretend that he knows."”
“When Kris arrives, Scott introduces her to Art immediately.”
“"You're name is Art?”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"The 35 year old reality star plays a prank on Chris Jenner in a voyeuristic clip from the new series" keep up with Kardashian "because Chloe claims she was humiliated by her famous mother."
Scott met with an actor named Richardson Jones, who hired him to play "very famous artist" art vanderey, a character played by George Costanza in the biography of Seinfeld
"Today will be the day for us to introduce Chris to the artist," Scott explained
"I hope everything goes well. She will be taken in."
"You have to remember, this guy doesn't know art at all," he added
"All he knows is how to pretend he knows."
"As soon as Chris arrived, Scott introduced art to her."
"Your name is art?"



Number  864
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: DOBN/RMBI/BACKGRIDOne small blessing from this week:Martin’s ex-wife, Gwyneth Paltrow, is preparing to marry her fiancé, the television producer Brad Falchuk at the end of the summer.”
“They were photographed walking a dog in Malibu on Sunday.”
“I try hardest to be the best mother,” she said in her speech, according to People.”
“Then, Victoria gave a speech at the Forbes Women Summit in New York, where she mentioned David specifically and called him an “incredible husband.”“I try really, really hard.”
“This, to me, would be the strongest sign of an impending split, but the Beckhams quickly denied the report.”
“Last week, the Daily Mail reported that David left his longtime manager, who also manages Posh, for a new team led by his friend David Gardner.”
“(It’s F-I-N-E, according to their publicist, who called the rumors “Journalist Chinese whispers and fake news fueled by social media.”) And another is: What’s going on with the Beckhams’ businesses?”
“Another is: What have the Beckhams said about their marriage?”
“One is: Do you care?”
“There are a few factors to consider when weighing the possibility of divorce.”


"Photo: dobn / RMBI / backgridone blessing week from here: Martin's ex-wife Gwyneth Paltrow is planning to marry her fiance, television producer Brad falchuk this summer
"They were photographed walking dogs in Malibu on Sunday."
"I try my best to be the best mother," she said in her speech, according to people
Later, Victoria delivered a speech at the Forbes women's summit in New York, especially referring to David as "an incredible husband" and "I really, really worked hard."
"For me, it would be the strongest sign of a breakup, but the Beckhams quickly denied the report."
Last week, the Daily Mail reported that David left his old club and he also managed bosh for a new team led by his friend David Gardner
"This is f-i-n-e. according to their PR, he called the rumors" the whispers of Chinese journalists and the fake news promoted by social media. " Another question is: what happened to the Beckhams' business
Another question is: what do the Beckhams think of their marriage? "
"One is: do you care?"
"There are several factors to consider when weighing the possibility of divorce."



Number  865
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do YOU think of these juicy details?!”
“Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“With the holidays arriving Scott Disick, 34, and girlfriend Sofia Richie, 19, appear closer than ever!”
“And, according to our insiders, their love life is white hot as well!”
“¨Scott and Sofia‘s relationship is very passionate and dramatic—they’re always fighting and making up,” a source close the reality TV personality tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Scott says all the drama makes for amazing sex, and lots of it!” Want more images of Scott and Sofia?”
“Head right here!”
“The insider went on to add that the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star is glad to have found someone who can, ahem, keep up with him.”
““Scott has a really super-high sex drive and he was always complaining that Kourtney [Kardashian, 38] never wanted to be intimate.”


"Please let us know in the comments section below!"
"Holly bug, what do you think of these interesting details?"
"Here are all the exclusive details!"
"With the holiday coming, 34 year old Scott Disick and 19-year-old girlfriend Sophia Ritchie seem to be closer than ever!"
"Moreover, according to our insiders, their love life is also white hot!"
"Scott and Sophia's relationship is very passionate and dramatic, they always fight and make up," a source close to reality TV characters told Hollywood Life exclusive
"Scott said that all plays bring amazing sex, and a lot of it! "Want more pictures of Scott and Sophia?"
"Here's the head!"
"Kardashian is happy to find someone who can keep up with him," the source added
"Scott has a high sexual desire. He always complains that Courtney (Kardashian, 38) never wants to be intimate with others."



Number  866
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“This is what Sahar reportedly looks like without make-up and Photoshop This is what Sahar reportedly looks like without make-up and Photoshop...”
“They are definitely a far cry from her gaunt appearance that shot her to internet fame.”
“Untampered photos of Sahar have surfaced on the internet, which allegedly show what she actually looks like.”
“"Over time I post a photo, I make my face more fun and funny, it is a form of self-expression, a kind of art," Sahar said, adding that her "fans" knew that this was not her real face.”
“The teenager, whose Instagram followers multiplied since the pictures went viral, called it a "form of self-expression".”
“According to reports, Sahar told Russian news outlet Sputnik that she used a combination of make-up and Photoshop for the photos, which she doctored to "amuse" herself.”
“Sahar, who was looked at as the poster child of plastic surgery gone wrong, has now revealed that the pictures were fake.”
“Last week, pictures of 19-year-old Sahar Tabar from Iran went viral after it was reported that she underwent a whopping 50 surgeries to look like Angelina Jolie.”


"It's reported that this is what Sahar looks like without makeup and Photoshop. This is what Sahar looks like without makeup and Photoshop..."
"It's a far cry from her fame for her haggard appearance."
"Raw photos of Sahar have appeared on the Internet and are said to show her real face."
"Over time, I released a photo, I made my face more interesting, it's a kind of self-expression, an art," said Sahar, whose "fans" knew it wasn't her real face
The teenager called it a "form of self-expression" and his instagram fans have multiplied since the photos became popular
"According to reports, Sahar told Russian news agency Sputnik that she used a combination of makeup and Photoshop in her photos and that she modified them to" entertain "herself."
"Sahar is seen as the poster child who made mistakes in plastic surgery, and now he has revealed that the photo is fake."
"Last week, photos of Sahar Tabar, a 19-year-old girl from Iran, quickly became popular after reports that she had undergone as many as 50 operations and looked like Angelina Jolie."



Number  867
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“Markle has prepared for her new chapter and is excited to work “as a team” with her husband… something the rest of the U.S. and the U.K. alike are excited to see pan out.”
“Stop swearing.”
“Stop biting my nails.”
““Run a marathon.”
“She’s working on her languageWhile Markle made it a goal to need the disclaimer ‘Pardon my French’ less frequently, she also wanted to become fluent in the language.”
“The following former resolutions and future hopes are unlike any another future royal family member has publicly made and may surprise you.”
“Markle’s bucket list, of sorts, is relatable and, unsurprisingly, as down-to-earth as the former actress and philanthropist appears.”
“The resolutions she listed (we’ll go over those next) coincide with her future goals as a member of the royal family.”
“You can apply them any year, at any time, as Markle intended.”


"Follow the memo on Facebook!"
"Markle is ready for her new chapter and is excited to work with her husband." as a team People in the United States and the rest of the UK are excited to see Paine.
"Stop swearing."
"Don't bite my nails."
"Run a marathon."
"She's trying to learn her own language, and Marcel's goal is to reduce the frequency of the" forgive me for French "Disclaimer, and she wants to be fluent in the language."
"The following previous resolutions and future hopes are different from those made publicly by any future member of the royal family, which may surprise you."
"In a sense, Marcel's wish list is reliable, and it's no surprise that it's as down-to-earth as the former actress and philanthropist has shown."
"The resolutions she listed (which we will discuss below) are consistent with her future goals as a member of the royal family."
"You can use them any year, any time mark wants."



Number  868
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For that reason, this probably isn’t the last we’ve heard of this conspiracy theory.”
“As Buzzfeed explained in an article titled Here s How I Accidentally Made An Old Avril Lavigne Death Hoax Go Viral that Brazilian post made it clear at the beginning that it was created to show how conspiracy theories can look true And yet despite that disclaimer the theory quickly...”
“On the 15th anniversary of the pop star’s hit single “Complicated,” a conspiracy theory claiming that she died in 2003 and has been replaced by a lookalike has resurfaced.”
“If you aren’t familiar with the theory, this blogpost dating back to 2011 from a Brazilian site should bring you up to speed.”
“The basic idea is that Lavigne, who was at the peak of her career at the time, committed suicide after her grandfather’s death in 2003.”
“Rather than coming to terms with what had happened, Lavigne’s record company used Melissa Vandella – Lavigne’s doppleganger who was supposedly hired to pose as Lavigne for paparazzi – in her place to profit off of her celebrity.”
“As the story goes, Vandella then went to record “Under My Skin” as Lavigne (“From here it was no longer the real Avril,” the blog post reads, “but ‘Avril Lavigne’ under the skin of the other singer”) and left subtle hints along the way about what had really happened.”
“That, along with pictures of how Lavigne’s face and handwriting had changed, was all the proof they needed.”
“There’s just one problem.”
“...spread like wildfire thanks to the Buzzfeed writer sharing the conspiracy theory as a joke with his fellow Americans following a visit to Buzzfeed Brazil...”


"So this may not be the last time we've heard of this conspiracy theory."
"As buzzfeed explained in an article entitled" this is how I accidentally made an old Avril Lavigne's death scam popular, "the Brazilian post made it clear from the beginning that it was created to show how the conspiracy theory looked real, but despite such disclaimers, the theory was quickly spread..."
On the 15th anniversary of the pop star's hit single complex, a conspiracy theory has resurfaced, claiming that she died in 2003 and was replaced by a similar person
"If you're not familiar with the theory, this 2011 blog post from Brazil should keep you up to date."
"The basic idea is that ravini, who was at the peak of his career at the time, committed suicide after his grandfather died in 2003."
"Instead of accepting what has happened, ravini's record company replaced her with Melissa Vandella, ravini's cover singer, who is believed to have been hired to impersonate ravini for the paparazzi."
"The story goes like this, and fandera then recorded" under my skin "as Lavigne (" from here on, it's no longer the real Avril, "the blog wrote," but "Avril Lavigne" under another singer's skin ") and left subtle hints about what happened during the recording process."
"These, together with photos of lavini's face and handwriting, are all the evidence they need."
"There's only one problem."
“… After visiting Brazil, the author of buzzfeed shared the conspiracy theory with his American compatriots as a joke and spread it like a raging fire. "



Number  869
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also said in 2016 she would move to Canada if "misogynistic" Donald Trump was elected US president.”
“She had never previously shied away from voicing her opinions on issues that were close to her heart.”
“...life since marrying Prince Harry...”
“Members of the public watching Meghan's transformation from Hollywood actress into the Duchess of Sussex could be forgiven for thinking she'd taken to her new role with ease.”
“She made an effortless joint engagement with the Queen to open a new bridge, attended the RAF centenary flypast, was a guest of the Irish President alongside Harry, joined sister-in-law Kate Middleton at Wimbledon and looked stunning at Prince Louis' christening.”
“But she is reportedly confused about aspects of royal life and the old-fashioned ways of the Windsor household.”
“A source told People.com how Meghan "has found certain rules in the royal household difficult to understand, like the fact that the Queen prefers women in dresses or skirts rather than trouser suits, and is often asking Harry why things have to be done in a certain way".”
“(Image: Getty) (Image: PA)The source added: "I think she finds it a little frustrating at times, but this is her new life, and she has to deal with it.”The monarchy website includes a reference to Meghan as a "feminist".”
“But protocol prohibits royal family members from expressing political opinions.”
“Aged just 11 she successfully campaigned to have a washing detergent advert's sexist language changed.”


"She also said in 2016 that she would move to Canada if Donald Trump, the" feminist averse "was elected president of the United States."
"She's never evaded expressing her opinions on her inner problems before."
“… Life after marrying Prince Harry... "
"The public who saw Megan's transformation from Hollywood actress to Duchess of Sussex thought it was forgivable for Megan to play her new role with ease."
"She joined hands with the queen to open a new bridge, attended the centennial celebration of the Royal Air Force, became a guest of the president of Ireland with Harry, met her sister-in-law Kate Middleton at Wimbledon, and looked beautiful at the baptism of Prince Louis."
"But she is reported to be confused about all aspects of royal life and the old-fashioned way of the Windsor family."
A source told reporters how Megan "found some rules of the royal family hard to understand. For example, the queen preferred women in skirts or skirts to women in pants, and often asked Harry why things had to be done in some way."
"(photo: Getty) (photo: PA) the source added:" I think she sometimes feels a bit depressed, but this is her new life and she has to face it. " Megan is mentioned on the monarchy website as a "feminist"
"But etiquette forbids members of the royal family to express their political views."
"At the age of 11, she successfully launched a campaign to change sexist language in laundry powder advertisements."



Number  870
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“Angelina misses Brad a lot more than she ever thought she would.”
“Would she call the divorce off, too?”
“We’ve learned EXCLUSIVELY that there’s one reason that Angelina would welcome Brad back with open arms.”
“Hope may not be lost after all for Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt‘s marriage.”
“While they are firmly split and on their way to an official divorce, a source close to the couple tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that Angelina changing her mind could still be a possibility!”
“She and Brad, and their family, have been through so much after breaking up nearly one year ago.”
“But there’s still love there, and it’s up to Brad to make her feel it again!”
““Angelina definitely has regrets about splitting from Brad and about the end of their marriage.”
“At the time of the breakup things were really bad between them — they had been fighting a lot — and she felt that Brad had checked out of their relationship,” a source told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Let us know!"
"Angelina misses Brad more than she thought."
"Will she cancel the divorce, too?"
"We learned that Angelina welcomed Brad back with open arms for a reason."
"Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt's marriage will not lose hope after all."
A source close to the couple told reporters that although they have parted ways and are about to officially divorce, the only possibility is that Angelina has changed her mind! "
"She and Brad, and their family, went through so much after they broke up nearly a year ago."
"But there's still love there, and it's up to Brad to make her feel love again!"
"Angelina must feel sorry for breaking up with Brad and the end of their marriage."
"When they broke up, their relationship was really bad - they had a lot of fights - and she felt Brad had ended their relationship," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  871
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Celeb Nip Slips: 48 Greatest Celebrity Nip Slips of All Time!”
“Do you think that Vanessa Lachey will win this season of ‘DWTS?’ Sound off in the comments below.”
“But since the two reconciled, they have been on fire.”
“As fans know, Chmerkovskiy skipped the show on October 2 after an alleged blowout fight with Vanessa over her diva antics.”
“Sadly, Vanessa’s hunky hubby Nick Lachey, 43, was eliminated last night, which also means the end of the road for partner Peta Murgatroyd, 31 – the wife of Vanessa’s pro Chmerkovskiy, 37.”
“Before Vanessa was a celebrity in her own right, she was an entertainment new reporter, so she definitely knows how to make headlines.”“Vanessa is loving the attention she is getting right now,” the insider added to Radar.”
“She isn’t stupid.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Celebrity note: 48 of the greatest celebrity notes of all time!"
"Do you think Vanessa Lach will win DWTS this season? "Please comment in the comments below."
"But since they made up, they've been on fire."
"Fans all know that on October 2, chimmelkovsky was absent from the show because of a quarrel between the heroine's antics and Vanessa."
"It's a pity that Vanessa's handsome husband Nick Lachey, 43, was eliminated last night, which also means that her 31 year old partner PETA murgatroyd's road has come to an end - Vanessa's 37 year old wife, who is close to chmerkovskiy."
"Before Vanessa became a celebrity in her own capacity, she was a new reporter in the entertainment industry, so she certainly knew how to make the headlines." "Vanessa loves the attention she's getting now," the insider added
"She's not stupid."



Number  872
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hopefully it’s not just because she’s been biting Kourtney’s style.”
“Scott’s so obsessed with Sofia.”
“Lately, every time we see a photo of Sofia Richie, 19, we can’t help but wonder if we’ve seen her gorgeous look before.”
“From her new brown hair extensions, to her sexy outfits, Sofia’s turning into a total Kourtney Kardashian clone!”
“And there’s a huge reason why, a source close to Sofia told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“She knows that Scott Disick has always drooled over Kourtney, and she wants to catch that same, sexy attention.”
“Sofia wants to keep Scott interested and turned on in the bedroom so she went through a mini, sexy, Kourtney-style makeover,” the source told us.”
““ Sofia is taking cues from Scott to keep him interested.”
“From her hair to some specific clothing items like the g string underwear she s now wearing wants to keep Scott interested and turned on in the bedroom so she went through a mini sexy Kourtney style makeover the source...”
“...told us...”


"Hopefully it's not just because she's been biting Courtney's style."
"Scott's crazy about Sophia."
"Recently, every time we see a picture of 19-year-old Sophia Ritchie, we can't help wondering if we've seen her gorgeous look before."
"From her new brown hair to sexy clothes, Sophia has become a complete cloner of Courtney kadeshan!"
A source close to Sofia told reporters: "there is a huge reason for this. Hollywood life is exclusive."
"She knew Scott Disick was always salivating over Courtney, and she wanted to get the same sexy attention."
"Sophia wanted to keep Scott interested, so she turned on the power in her bedroom, and she did a mini, sexy, Courtney transformation," the source told us
"Sophia got clues from Scott to keep him interested."
"From her hair to some specific clothing items, such as the G-shaped underwear she is wearing now, Scott wants to keep interested, so she turns on the power in her bedroom, and she makes a mini sexy Courtney style transformation..."
“… Tell us... "



Number  873
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble in a Motion Picture Wonder Woman WINNER Baby Driver Dunkirk Logan War For The Planet Of The Apes...”
“Anthony Anderson Black ish Aziz Ansari Master of None Larry David Curb Your Enthusiasm Sean Hayes Will Grace William H Macy Shameless WINNER Marc Maron GLOW Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble in a Comedy or Drama Series Game of Thrones WINNER GLOW Homeland Stranger Things The Walking Dead...”
“...the New Black Veep WINNER Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Comedy Series Uzo Aduba Orange Is the New Black Alison Brie GLOW Jane Fonda Grace and Frankie Julia Louis Dreyfus Veep WINNER Lily Tomlin Grace and Frankie Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Comedy Series...”
“Missouri WINNER Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Supporting Role Mary J Blige Mudbound Hong Chau Downsizing Holly Hunter The Big Sick Allison Janney I Tonya WINNER Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird Outstanding Performance by an Ensemble in a Comedy Series Black ish Curb Your Enthusiasm GLOW Orange is...”
“Lies Geoffrey Rush Genius Alexander Skarsgard Big Little Lies WINNER Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Supporting Role Steve Carell Battle of the Sexes Willem Dafoe The Florida Project Woody Harrelson Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri Richard Jenkins The Shape of Water Sam Rockwell Three Billboards Outside Ebbing...”
“Laura Dern Big Little Lies Nicole Kidman Big Little Lies WINNER Jessica Lange Feud Bette Joan Susan Sarandon Feud Bette Joan Reese Witherspoon Big Little Lies Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Television Movie or Miniseries Benedict Cumberbatch Sherlock Jeff Daniels Godless Robert De Niro The Wizard of...”
“Wright House of Cards Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Drama Series Jason Bateman Ozark Sterling K Brown This Is Us WINNER Peter Dinklage Game of Thrones David Harbour Stranger Things Bob Odenkirk Better Call Saul Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Television Movie or Miniseries...”
“Ensemble in a Drama Series The Crown Game of Thrones The Handmaid s Tale Stranger Things This Is Us WINNER Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Drama Series Millie Bobby Brown Stranger Things Claire Foy The Crown WINNER Laura Linney Ozark Elisabeth Moss The Handmaid s Tale Robin...”
“WINNER Margot Robbie I Tonya Saoirse Ronan Lady Bird Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Timothee Chalamet Call Me by Your Name James Franco The Disaster Artist Daniel Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour WINNER Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Outstanding Performance by an...”
“Outstanding Performance by a Cast in a Motion Picture The Big Sick Get Out Lady Bird Mudbound Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri WINNER Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in a Leading Role Judi Dench Victoria Abdul Sally Hawkins The Shape of Water Frances McDormand Three Billboards Outside Ebbing Missouri...”


"The stunt group's excellent action performance in the movie" Wonder Woman "won baby driver Dunkirk Logan's" battle of the ape planet "..."
"Anthony Anderson black Aziz Ansari no master Larry David suppresses your enthusiasm Sean Hayes will perform excellent action for mark Malone glow, winner of William H. Macy's shameless award, by stunt ensemble in the comedy or drama series" game of Thrones "winner glow home stranger's thing" walking dead "..."
“… The new black veep winners in the comedy series, performed by actress Uzo aduba orange, are the new black Alison brie glow Jane Fonda grace and Frankie Julia Louis Dreyfus, performed by actors in the comedy series, and the outstanding performances of Lily Tomlin grace and Frankie veep Winners... "
"Missouri winner excellent performance by actress as supporting role Mary J. Bregg muddle headed Hong Zhou narrow Holly Hunter sick Alison Jennie I Tonia winner Laurie Metcalf Lady Bird excellent performance by ensemble comedy series black suppress your passion glow orange is..."
"Lies" Jeffrey rush talent Alexander scarsgarde "big and small lies" winner actor's excellent performance in supporting actor Steve Carrell's "battle of the sexes" William Dafoe Florida project woody hallerson three billboards out of the Missouri ebb Richard Jenkins water shape Sam Rockwell three billboards out of the ebb
"Laura Dean big lies little lies Nicole Kidman big lies little lies champion Jessica Lange field Betty Joan Susan Sarandon field Betty Joan Reese Witherspoon big lies little lies actor's excellent performance in TV movies or miniseries Benedict Cumberbatch Shylock Jeff Daniels godless Robert DeNiro's wizard..."
"Wright's house of cards actor's excellent performance in TV series Jason Bateman Ozark Sterling Brown this is the American champion Peter dinkrach's game of Thrones David Harper's stranger's thing Bob odenkel best calls sol the actress's excellent performance in TV movies or miniseries..."
"In a drama series of the crown game, the maid's story, the stranger's story, this is the outstanding performance of the American winner by an actress in a drama series of Emily Bobbie Brown's stranger's story, Claire foy Crown winner Laura Linny ozak, Elizabeth Moss's maid's story, Robin..."
"Award winner Margot Robbie I Tonya saoirse Ronan Lady Bird outstanding performance actor timothye chalamet calls me your name James Franco disaster artist Daniel carua stands out Gary Oldman darkest moment award winner Denzel Washington Roman J. Elise ESQ outstanding performance by a
"In a movie, the actor's excellent performance, the woman who got out of prison sick, made trouble on three billboards outside the ebb of Missouri, and the winner's excellent performance on the heroine Judy Dench, Victoria Abdel Sally Hawkins created Francis mcdorman of water on three billboards outside the ebb of Missouri..."



Number  874
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Caitlyn’s comments?”
“Read her extremely controversial remarks here!”
“Well, these comments are going to make for an awkward situation during the next extended family get-together.”
“Caitlyn Jenner, 68, all but called her daughters Kendall Jenner, 22, and Kylie Jenner, 20, a burden all while essentially disowning the rest of the Kardashians.”
“In a recent interview with Piers Morgan, 52, on the show Life Stories, Caitlyn said, “I don’t talk to the Kardashians anymore.”
“The only ones I am concerned about are Kendall and Kylie.”
“They are my biological kids.”
“I spent 23 years carting them around.” Whoa, whoa, whoa.”
“Did Caitlyn just summarize her role as a parent as hauling around Kylie and Kendall for over two decades?”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Hollywood, what do you think of Caitlin's comments?"
"Read her controversial remarks here!"
"Well, these comments will create an embarrassing situation at the next big family gathering."
"Caitlin Jenner, 68, almost calls her daughters Kendall Jenner, 22, and Kylie Jenner, 20, a burden, while basically breaking away from the rest of the Kardashian family."
"I don't talk to the kardashians anymore," Caitlin said in a recent interview with Piers Morgan, 52, on life stories
"The only thing I care about is Kendall and Kelly."
"They are my own children."
"It took me 23 years to get them around." Whoa, whoa, whoa. "
"Does Caitlin summarize her 20 years as a parent around Kelly and Kendall?"



Number  875
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Than you for understanding.”Scott told TMZ on February 17 that his little one is “beautiful.””
“I could burst!”
““I’ve never felt happiness like this.”
““I’m sorry for keeping you in the dark through all the assumptions,” she tweeted, revealing she had given birth on the first of the month.”
“A source previously told Us Weekly that Jenner is “very involved and hands-on” with Stormi and “she’s never seemed happier.”Jenner shocked the world on February 4 when she finally confirmed her pregnancy after months of speculation and revealed that she had given birth.”
“The Lip Kit creator has maintained a low profile since Stormi came on to the scene, preferring to stay at home with her newborn.”
“The custom vehicle — reportedly worth $1.4 million — features red interior and butterfly doors.”
“He gifted his girlfriend of 11 months a black Ferrari as a push present.”
“But Scott doesn’t just do gifts that need water to survive.”
“Stormi was born at 4:43 p.m. on February 1.”


On February 17, Scott told TMZ that his baby was "beautiful"
"I'll explode!"
"I've never had such a sense of happiness."
"I'm sorry to keep you in the dark under all the assumptions," she said on her microblog
"A source told us weekly earlier that Jenner and Tommy were" very committed and committed "and that" she has never been so happy as she is now. " On February 4, after months of speculation, Jenna finally confirmed that she was pregnant and revealed that she had given birth, which shocked the world. "
"Since Tommy came to the scene, the creator of the lip bag has kept a low profile. She prefers to stay at home with her newborn."
"The custom car is reported to be worth $1.4 million and features a red interior and butterfly door."
"He gave his girlfriend of 11 months a black Ferrari as a push gift."
"But Scott is not just a gift that needs water to survive."
"Tommy was born at 4:43 p.m. on February 1."



Number  876
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...creative device...”
“They re burning all the witches even if you aren t one They got their pitchforks and proof Their receipts and reasons They re burning all the witches even if you aren t one So light me up This whole section is sung in Auto Tune Kanye s much loved...”
“...since and resents it So why d you have to rain on my whole parade she sings...”
“Weeks later the party was over when Kardashian exposed Swift on Snapchat for having lied about not approving controversial lyrics about her on Kanye s song Famous The one where he calls Tayor a bitch and half jokes that they might still have sex Swift has been playing defense ever...”
“She’s referring specifically to her 2016 Fourth of July party, the last time the court of public opinion largely ruled in her favor.”
““Feeling so Gatbsy for that whole year,” she reminiscences about what was meant to be her hiatus.”
“Back when she was “throwing nice big parties,” “jumping to the pool from the balcony,” and enjoying an embarrassment of riches that come with being a pop star so titanic that she seemed untouchable.”
“To begin, she sets the scene and rewinds the clock back to the simpler times of last July.”
“Here, she’s the attacker.”
““This Is Why We Can’t Have Nice Things”There are lines on other songs that speak more broadly to Taylor’s perceived victimization by Kanye, but “TIWWCHNT” turns the tables on her enemy.”


“… Creative devices... "
"They burn all the witches, even if you're not one, they get their pitchfork, prove their receipt and reason, they burn all the witches, even if you're not one, so lighting up the whole part of me is singing kenye's deep love in auto tune..."
“… In that case, why do you want to rain on my whole parade, she sings... "
"A few weeks later, when the party ended, Kardashian exposed Swift's lies on snapchat, saying that he didn't approve Kanye's controversial lyrics about her in his famous song he calls Tyrol a whore, and half joked that they might still have sex. Swift has been defending..."
"She specifically refers to her political party on July 4, 2016, which was a ruling in the court of public opinion that was basically in her favor."
"It was a very uncomfortable year," she recalled, when she was supposed to rest
When she "held a big party", "jumped from the balcony to the swimming pool", enjoying the embarrassment of being a superstar, she seemed unreasonable
"First of all, she set the scene and put the clock back to the simpler times of last July."
"Here, she's the attacker."
"That's why we can't have good things." lines in other songs more broadly express Taylor's view that Kanye sees her as a victim, but "tiwalsht" points the finger at her enemies



Number  877
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, how are you going to spend your New Year’s Eve?”
“Either pack a suitcase or have a long distance relationship.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s pleading with him to come to Calabasas.”
“Kylie Jenner is looking at one lonely New Year’s.”
“The allegedly pregnant 2o-year-old is going to have to do some serious traveling if she wants to see boyfriend Travis Scott, 25, as he’s got back to back gigs lined up in Las Vegas on Dec. 30 and Miami on Dec. 31.”
“Since she doesn’t want to leave the house and have anyone risk seeing her baby bump, she wants her honey to come home to her after his Vegas set so that he doesn’t end up staying in Sin City and partying the night away with other women.”
““Kylie is pleading with Travis to be with her to ring in the new year.”
“Travis has a DJ set in Las Vegas the night before New Years Eve and Kylie is urging him to get back to Los Angeles quickly after he’s done.”
“She can’t stand the thought of him being in Vegas during New Years doing who knows what.”
“She knows it’s easy to fall into making the wrong decisions there and it would put her incredibly at ease if he wasn’t there and was with her instead,” a Calabasas insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Holly worms, how are you going to spend New Year's Eve?"
"Pack your suitcase or have a long-distance relationship."
"We have exclusive details of how she begged him to come to Calabasas."
"Kelly Jenner is looking at a lonely New Year present."
"If the 20-year-old girl who is said to be pregnant wants to meet her 25-year-old boyfriend Travis Scott, she will have to take some serious trips because he will hold concerts in Las Vegas on December 30 and Miami on December 31."
"Since she doesn't want to leave home and let anyone risk seeing her pregnant, she wants her baby to come back to her after his performance in Las Vegas, so he won't stay in sin city and spend the night with other women."
"Kelly begged Travis to spend the new year with her."
"Travis had a DJ in Las Vegas the night before New Year's Eve, and Kelly urged him to return to Los Angeles as soon as possible after new year's Eve."
"She can't stand him doing who knows in Vegas during the new year."
"She knows that it's easy to make wrong decisions there, and if he's not there, but with her, it's going to make her very relaxed," an insider in Calabasas told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  878
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...he’s getting what he’s long deserved.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter.”
“...her confessional songs and is going to be for a long time to come Miranda will keep speaking out says the source and if Blake s reputation takes a beating along the way...”
“On June 19 — two years after writing about her painful divorce from Blake Shelton on her double album, The Weight of These Wings — she again opened up about the split in an interview released on the website HITS Daily Double.”
“She admitted that Blake — who blindsided her in 2015 when he ended their marriage and pushed her out of the town where they’d built a life — broke her heart.”
“Going through a divorce so publicly made her “feel so alone….”
“I feel like I’ve captured the seven stages of grief [on the album],” she revealed.”
““But it took me 24 songs to get there.”Grief is an understatement.”
“Miranda, 34, was devastated when Blake, 42, suddenly left her and took up with his fellow Voice coach Gwen Stefani, 48, just months later, sources tell In Touch.”
““She wears her heartbreak like a badge.”
“The cold-blooded way Blake broke her heart, cut her out of his life and shoved his romance with Gwen in her face is something that will scar her forever,” says one source.”


“…… He got what he deserved for a long time For more information, please read the latest issue of contact - for more exclusive content, please visit our newsletters
“… Her confessional song, and will be in the future for a long time, Miranda will continue to speak to sources that if Blake's reputation is hit along the way
"On June 19 - two years ago, she wrote the story of her painful divorce from Blake Sheldon on her double album the weight of these wings - in an interview posted on hits daily double, she once again made the break-up public."
"She admitted that it broke her heart that black ended their marriage in 2015 and drove her out of the town where they lived."
Public divorce made her "feel very lonely..."
"I feel like I've captured seven stages of sadness [in the album]," she revealed
"But it took me 24 songs to get there." Sadness is understated
"Miranda, 34, when Blake, 42, suddenly left her and took up with his fellow vocal coach gwenster Vanni, 48 months later, the source told in touch."
"She's heartbroken like a badge."
"Blake cold bloodedly broke her heart, cut her off from his life, and pushed the romance between him and Gwen to her face, which would leave her permanent scars," a source said



Number  879
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“ReplyParentThreadLinkIt's legally an adult but they're still mentally a child and need guidance in life.”
“They're still adolescents.”
“But to me it's not about not trusting the kid(s) it's about not trusting the world.”
“...kids...”
“Like legit not joking I d get something like the pet tracker thing and I d never tell anyone not even my partner if I have one This thinking is really fucked up I know so maybe it s a good thing that I don t plan on having any...”
“ReplyParentThreadLinkI don't plan on having kids because the world is so unbelievably fucked up but if I do I've decided that I'll put several GPSs on their things and one on their person maybe behind an ear or back of a knee.”
“That cracked my ass up.”
“ReplyParentThreadExpandLinkMy fam had that, too, and my sister was ALWAYS tracking our dad but he never tracked her back.”
“Once she got to college she basically immediately realized how fucked up everything was and cut them out of her life.”
“Once she was late getting home by like 15 minutes because she offered to drive a classmate home who missed the bus, and she said her grandparents took her tv and computer away from her for two weeks for that.”


"Replyparentthreadlinkit are adults in law, but they are still children in spirit and need guidance in life."
"They're still teenagers."
"But for me, it's not that I don't believe in children, it's that I don't believe in the world."
“… The kids
"Just like legit is no joke, I will get something like a pet tracker, and I will never tell anyone, even my partner, if I have such an idea, it's really a mess, I know, so maybe it's a good thing, I don't intend to have any..."
"Repparentthreadlink I'm not going to have a baby because the world is a mess, but if I do, I decide I'll put a few GPS on their things, a GPS on their people, maybe behind their ears or behind their knees."
"That messed me up."
"So does my family. My sister always follows our father, but he never follows her."
"As soon as she got to college, she immediately realized how bad everything was, so she took them out of her life."
"Once she came home about 15 minutes late because she offered to drive a classmate who missed the bus home. She said her grandparents took her TV and computer away from her for two weeks."



Number  880
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“All it did was really force her to up her game this week because she does not want to get kicked off before Heather does!”Who do you think will make it further on DWTS, Nancy or Heather?”
““Nancy knows that Heather does not like her, but she is used to it.”
““The level of competition is giving her so much motivation,” the source revealed of Kerrigan.”
“Kerrigan, who was famously injured by an attack orchestrated by her competition, Harding in 1994, isn't phased by the tension between her and her co-star.”
“Article continues below advertisement“She was overheard telling another contestant that she does not really care if she wins," the source said, "as long as she beats out Nancy.” Kerrigan's also been making enemies with her "incredibly bossy" attitude on the show.”
“It's especially embarrassing given that Morris has a background in professional dancing, which the DWTS cast was not happy about.”
“Judges called the Olympic ice skater’s samba routine “the best of the season,” and an insider working on the show told Radar that Morris was "livid."”
“Article continues below advertisementLast night on DWTS, Morris and Kerrigan tied with a score of 33 out of 40 from the judges, and the drama didn't end after the cameras stopped rolling, according to RadarOnline.”
“The Dancing With the Stars competitors' feud has reached a boiling point and Morris is determined to do whatever it takes to beat Kerrigan!”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"It really forced her to win this week because she didn't want to be kicked out before Heather! "Who do you think will go further on DWT, Nancy or Heather?"
"Nancy knows Heather doesn't like her, but she's used to it."
"The level of competition gave her so much motivation," kligan's source revealed
"It's not because of the tension between her and her partner that kelligan was injured in an attack orchestrated by rival Harding in 1994."
The article continued below the ad: "someone overheard her telling another contestant that she didn't really care whether she won or not as long as she beat Nancy," the source said
"It's particularly embarrassing because Morris has a professional dance background and the DWTS actors are not satisfied with it."
The judges called the Olympic skater's Samba "the best of the season," an industry source involved in the show told radar that Morris "turned blue"
"The article continued in DWTS's ad last night, with Morris and Kerrigan tied for 33 of the judges' 40 points, and the scene didn't end after the camera stopped turning, according to radaronline
"The discord between the competitors dancing with the stars has reached the boiling point. Morris is determined to beat Kerrigan at all costs!"



Number  881
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Both her parents are expected to attend her wedding on May 19 at St George’s Chapel, Windsor Castle.”
“In addition to a successful career, Markle’s father Tom, 72, once won the lottery, winning an estimated £532,222 ($750,000), according to the Daily Mail.”
“Living a real-life fairytale, Ms Markle will leave her American roots and career behind and join her new husband in London.”
“But as the upcoming royal wedding becomes an increasingly popular topic of conversation, many are wondering who exactly will be footing the bill, how much money the actress has - and who pays for her expansive wardrobe.”
“As it turns out, the former actress and philanthropist is much more than just a future royal - and she has a pretty impressive net worth in her own right.”
“Here’s everything you need to know about Meghan Markle’s age, future royal status, net worth and family.”
“What is her age?”
“Surprisingly, Meghan Markle is actually three years older than her future prince - and her real name is Rachel Meghan Markle.”
“Ms Markle was born on August 4 1981 in Los Angeles, California.”
“She is currently 36 years old.”


Both her parents will attend her wedding on May 19 at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle
According to the daily mail, "in addition to his successful career, markel's 72 year old father, Tom, once won the lottery, winning an estimated 532222 pounds (about 750000 dollars),"
"Living in a real fairy tale, Ms. markel will leave her American roots and career and join her new husband in London."
"But as the upcoming royal wedding becomes a more and more popular topic, many people wonder who will pay for it, how much the actress has, and who will pay for her gorgeous wardrobe."
"It turns out that the former actress and philanthropist is not just a future member of the royal family, she has considerable net worth."
"Here's all the information about Megan markel's age, future royal status, net worth and family."
"How old is she?"
"It's amazing that Megan markel is actually three years older than her future Prince - her real name is Rachel Megan markel."
Ms. markel was born on August 4, 1981 in Los Angeles, California
"She's 36 now."



Number  882
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Dubbo Regional Airport in Dubbo AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures October 2018 Harry and his wife Meghan watch aboriginal dances at Victoria Park in Dubbo AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures October 2018 The Duke and Duchess of Sussex meet with...”
“...of Sussex during a visit to Taronga Zoo in Sydney AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures October 2018 Prince Harry looks on as his wife Meghan the Duchess of Sussex is hugged by student Luke Vincent of Buninyong Public School following the couple s arrival at...”
“Markle pose for a photograph in the Sunken Garden at Kensington Palace following the announcement of their engagement AFP Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures November 2017 Meghan Markle shows off her engagement ring AFP via Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures December 2017 Prince William...”
“It was created by the Duke of Sussex and aims to use the power of sport to inspire recovery support rehabilitation and generate a wider understanding of all those who serve their country Invictus Games Foundation Getty Prince Harry and Meghan Markle in pictures November 2017 Prince Harry and Meghan...”
“The Invictus Games is an international sport event for wounded, injured and sick (WIS) servicemen and women, both serving and veteran.”
“Prince Harry and Meghan Markle – in pictures Show all 55 1 /55 Prince Harry and Meghan Markle – in pictures Prince Harry and Meghan Markle – in pictures September 2017 Prince Harry and Meghan Markle at the Invictus Games in Toronto, Canada.”
“Dooley is not revealing...”
“These benefits make for a great all around versatile strain for any medical patient or recreational consumer The Markle Sparkle tests at 23 per cent THC the active ingredient in marijuana and is made by crossbreeding three varieties including NYC Diesel Northern Lights with Blueberry and a secret strain which...”
“...high as well it says...”
“...very sweet silky taste with notes of fresh blueberry and a unique fruity and smooth flavour leafbuyer com As for its effect the drug is supposed to provide users with an uplifting experience and a tingling body sensation There is a sense of relief and euphoria that comes with the...”


"Dubo airport, Dubo, AFP, photographed by Prince Getty Harry and Megan markel, Harry and his wife Megan watch aboriginal dance in Dubo Victoria Park in October 2018. AFP, photographed by Prince Getty Harry and Megan markel, met the Duke and Duchess of Sussex in October 2018..."
“… Prince Harry looks at his wife, the Duchess of Megan Sussex, who is hugged by student Luke Vincent at bunnyong public school in October 2018 during a visit to Sydney's Taronga Zoo by AFP through Getty Harry and Megan markel in pictures
"Mark is taking a picture in the sunken garden of Kensington Palace. After they announced their engagement, the picture shows Getty Harry and Megan mackle. In November 2017, Megan mackle shows her engagement ring through the picture of Getty Harry and Megan mackle. Prince William in December 2017..."
"It was created by the Duke of Sussex to use the power of sports to motivate and support rehabilitation, and to give all those who work for the national inviolable game foundation a wider understanding of the November 2017 photo of Prince Harry and Megan by Getty Harry and Megan markel..."
"The inviolable games is an international games for injured soldiers, including active servicemen and veterans."
"Prince Harry and Megan markel - the picture shows all 55 1 / 55 of Prince Harry and Megan markel - the picture shows Prince Harry and Megan markel - the picture shows Prince Harry and Megan markel at the inviolable games in Toronto, Canada in September 2017."
"Dooley didn't disclose..."
"These benefits provide a full range of multi-functional strains for any medical patient or entertainment consumer - the 23% Markle sparkle test of Ephedra active ingredients, which is a hybrid of three varieties, including New York diesel, Aurora Borealis and blueberry, and a secret strain..."
“… It's also very high... "
“… Very sweet and silky, with fresh blueberry flavor and unique fruit and smooth taste. As for its effect, the drug should provide the user with an exciting experience and a tingling body feeling, a sense of relaxation and pleasure, accompanied by



**Something goes wrong**
““New Year’s Day””
““Call It What You Want”15.”
“The record will notably feature a collaboration with Ed Sheeran and Future titled End Game The album will also include previously released songs Look What You Made Me Do Gorgeous Call It What You Want and Ready For It Swift served as executive producer on Reputation while Jack Antonoff Max...”
“Martin and Shellback also contributed production...”
“***Taylor Swift‘s new album Reputation will not be available on streaming services upon its release November 10th, Bloomberg reports.”
“The record is expected to be withheld through its first week of sales, though Swift is reportedly still negotiating the specifics with various platforms.”
“Despite its absence from streaming services, Reputation will still be available via digital retailers like iTunes.”
“A representative for Swift did not immediately return Rolling Stone‘s request for comment.”
“Swift has been one of the most vocal critics of streaming services, even temporarily pulling her music from all of them in 2014.”
“Around the same time, Swift called streaming “a grand experiment” and said she was apprehensive about how fairly it compensated artists, producers and songwriters.”


"New Year's Day"
"Call it whatever you like" 15“
"This album will feature a collaboration with ED Sheeran and a future end game. It will also include previous releases like look what you made me do, gorgeous call it it it you want and ready for you Swift is the executive producer of reputation, while Jack
"Martin and shelbeck were also involved in the production..."
"* *" Taylor Swift's new album will not be able to gain a reputation on streaming media services after its release on November 10, according to a report by Bloomberg
"This record is expected to be retained in the first week of the sale, but swift is still reported to be negotiating with the platforms on specific details."
"Although there is no streaming service, it can still gain reputation through digital retailers such as iTunes."
"A swift representative did not immediately respond to rolling stone's request for comment."
"Swift has always been one of the most influential critics of streaming services, and even temporarily removed her music from all streaming services in 2014."
Around the same time, swift called streaming "a great experiment" and said she was worried about how it would fairly compensate artists, producers and songwriters



Number  884
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'The response has been 99% positive,' she exclaimed in the interview.”
“December 20 saw Khloe share an Instagram post of her baby daddy Tristan Thompson cradling her burgeoning baby bump.”
“...choice Kourtney was the only one with the Vogue model s back And the drama didn t end there with Kendall continuing to convince the family that no matter what had happened it was still the nice thing to do and the situation was no different to that of Scott...”
“Kris reasoning No one would know how to respond to her because of all the things she began to explain She got the last word As Kris Kim and Khloe continued to explain how the situations were different and at the end of the day it was the momager s...”
“'No-one would know how to respond to her because of all the things,' she began to explain.”
“And although Kendall continued to defend Cait and fight for her right to make the invite list, the Kardashian matriarch wasn't convinced.”
“They have both done f**ked up things in different ways'.”
“They have both done f**ked up things in different ways'Not having a bar of it, a livid and insulted Kendall replied: 'Is that actually a joke?”
“Not having a bar of it, a livid and insulted Kendall replied: 'Is that actually a joke?”
“...to listen to Kourtney s wishes of not inviting her ex boyfriend Scott Disick to the family party If Scott s invited why not Caitlyn...”


"99% of the answers are in the affirmative," she lamented in the interview
"On December 20, Khloe shared on instagram a picture of her little father Tristan Thompson holding her new lump."
“…… Choice Kourtney is the only one with the return of fashion models. The play is not over yet. Kendall continues to convince his family that no matter what happens, it's still a good thing. The situation is no different from that of Scott... "
"Chris reasoned that no one would know how to respond to her, because she started to explain everything, and she got the last word, because Christian and Khloe continued to explain how the situation was different, and at the end of the day, it was the mother's..."
"Because of all the things, no one will know how to respond to her," she began
"Although Kendall continues to defend Kate and fight for her right to be on the invitation list, Kardashian's matriarch is not convinced."
"They all screwed things up in different ways."
"They all mess things up in different ways," replied an angry, insulting Kendall, without a bar. "Is this really a joke?"
"Is this really a joke?" said Kendall, a pale, insulting man
“… Listen to Courtney's wish and don't invite her ex boyfriend Scott Disick to a family party. If Scott invites Caitlin, why not... "



Number  885
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He knows how to go hard, yet stay in control in the paint.”
“— Tristan Thompson, 26.”
“He’s been averaging about 33.4 points, 9.0 rebounds and 7.1 assists per game in the postseason.”
“But, at 32-years-old, King James is playing the best basketball of his life.”
“And, I know what you’re saying, “Well, that was last year.” Oh, I know.”
“Damn, that gets me every time.”
“He went back to Cleveland and brought them their first championship in a half century!”
“First of all, have we forgotten about LeBron James’ insane performance in the 2016 finals, when he was the catalyst who brought the Cavs back from a 3-1 deficit?”
“Now, let’s break this down.”
“Their resume, 3-point shooting, mentality, players in the paint, and the big three, LeBron James, 32, Kyrie Irving, 25, and Kevin Love, 28.”


"He knows how to work hard, but he can still control the situation."
"Tristan Thompson, 26."
"He averaged 33.4 points, 9.0 rebounds and 7.1 assists in the playoffs
"But King James, 32, is playing the best basketball of his life."
"And I know what you're talking about," well, that was last year. "Oh, I know."
"Damn it, every time."
"He came back to Cleveland and brought them their first championship in half a century!"
"First of all, have we forgotten LeBron James' crazy performance in the 2016 finals when he was the catalyst to bring the Cavaliers back from a 3-1 deficit?"
"Now, let's analyze it."
"Their resume, three-point shooting, mentality, inside players, as well as the big three, LeBron James, 32, Kelly Owen, 25 and Kevin rove, 28



Number  886
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She wrote,I am now so excited my daughter will have forever best friends with Chicago and Stormi!!”
“...feeling very fortunate to be having a little lady...”
“...post confirming her pregnancy...”
“EARLIER Before we dive into the Kardashian love fest let s go back to where it all began That fateful day of Dec 20 2017 when Khloé Kardashian gave the world a Christmas miracle in the form of an Instagram...”
“It's a girl!"”
“Jenner posted a photo to Snapchat using a filter that read, "Kongrats, Khloé!”
“UPDATE 1: Kylie Jenner has also sent her congratulations to her big sister on the birth of her baby girl.”
“She also tweeted, "You guys she’s so gorgeous!!!!!"”
“I’m so happy I was able to return the favor of holding your leg while you pushed LOL."”
“I can’t wait for our baby girls to grow up as best friends the way we are!”


"I'm very excited now, she wrote, and my daughter will always be best friends with Chicago and stolmy!"
“… I feel very lucky to have a little lady... "
“… After confirming that she was pregnant... "
"Before we start Kardashian's love feast, let's review the day that it all started on December 20, 2017, when heloe Kardashian brought a Christmas miracle to the world in the form of instagram..."
"It's a girl!"
Jenner posted a photo on snapchat with a filter that said "kongrats, khlo é!"
"Update 1: Kelly Jenner also congratulated her elder sister on the birth of her baby girl."
She also tweeted, "you guys, she's beautiful."
"I'm glad I can give you a leg when you push lol." “
"I can't wait for our baby girl to grow into a best friend like this!"



Number  887
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scott was referring to the fact that Bruce was largely absent while his 31-year-old son Brody Jenner was growing up.”
“Angry over the remark, Scott continued to Kourtney, adding: 'I wonder what Brody would have to say about that.'”
“...s ex...”
“Feeling sour Apparently Scott Disick vents about Bruce s L parenting tips calling him out for not always being around for his own son Brody Jenner R Bruce got on his high horse on how to be the world s best dad the father of three vented about Kris Jenner...”
“Apparently Kourtney's longtime boyfriend Scott Disick also airs some grievances while dune buggying in Pismo Beach.”
“However, Kim, Khloe, and Kourtney are not the only ones who appear to be turning on the show's patriarch.”
“Gossip: The sisters are apparently heard venting in one scene, in which they say Bruce is 'almost completely out of the picture'Kim then references Bruce's ongoing transition, adding: 'Things are only going to get more difficult and complicated.'”
“Then one of the girls is said to continue: 'Maybe it's time to admit to themselves that they're barely even enough of a family anymore to go on vacation [with us].'”
“'Bruce and the boys are almost completely out of the picture,' the three older siblings apparently gossip.”
“TMZ The site reported that the girls one point discussed how infrequently Bruce visits them according to a source connected with production...”


"Scott refers to the fact that Bruce was largely absent when his 31 year old son Brody Jenner grew up."
Scott was angry at the remark and continued to say to Courtney, "I don't know what Brody would say."
“… For example
"It's sour, and it's obvious that Scott Disick let out Bruce's parenting secrets because he wasn't always with his son Brody Jenner. Bruce is furious about how to be the best father in the world - the father of three venting Chris Jenner... "
"Obviously, Courtney's old boyfriend, Scott Disick, also expressed some dissatisfaction while walking in the sand dunes of Pismo Beach."
"However, Kim, Chloe and kurtney are not the only people who seem to have an impact on the main characters of the play."
"Gossip: in one scene, it's obvious that the two sisters are venting. They say Bruce is" almost out of the game. "Kim then mentions Bruce's ongoing transformation, adding:" things will only become more difficult and complicated. "
"Then, it's said that one of the girls went on saying: 'maybe it's time to admit to themselves that they don't even have a family to spend their holidays with."
"Bruce and the kids are almost out," the three brothers and sisters were apparently gossiping
"TMZ reported that the girls discussed little by little how often Bruce visited them, according to sources related to production..."



Number  888
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She’s even open to dating, and she’s looking for a hot, younger guy to have some fun with.”
“Plus, she’s “stronger and more grounded,” so she’s been able to handle this divorce better than the split with Brad.”
“Unlike her split from Brad, this breakup with Justin was “more of a mutual decision,” a source close to her EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com.”
“While Angie is stewing over the reports of her ex hanging out with his other ex, Jen is living her best life.”
“Considering all the “strong feelings” she still has for her ex-husband, it’s no wonder that the last thing she wants to do is go out to eat with Ms. Aniston.”
“Angie was reportedly “furious” after hearing about the rumored rendezvous, and she just was not in the mood to bury the hatchet with Jen.”
“Angie reportedly shot down a chance to have her own face to face with Jen as In Touch says she rejected Jennifer s offer for a dinner date...”
“She says she doesn t want to hear about Brad but she can t help but monitor what is being reported If Angie is losing sleep worrying about Brad and Jen hanging out a second source has EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife com that the reports of their meetings are totally false...”
“To know that he could be seeing his ex, Jen, after so much that has happened between all of them, feels like a betrayal and a punch in the gut to Angie.”
““The divorce has been hard on Angelina,” the insider tells HollywoodLife.com, “but she still has very strong feelings for Brad.”


"She's even open to dating, and she's looking for a sexy, young guy to play with."
"In addition, she is' stronger and more down-to-earth ', so she can handle the divorce better than breaking up with Brad."
Unlike her break-up with Brad, the break-up with Justin is "more about the decision of both sides," a source close to her told Hollywood life
"While Angie is bothered by reports that her ex-wife is with another ex-wife, Jane is living her best life."
"Given her" strong feelings "for her ex husband, it's no wonder the last thing she wants to do is go out to dinner with Aniston."
"Angie is reported to be very" angry "after hearing the rumored date. She is just not in the mood to go to court with Jane."
"It's reported that Angie refused the chance to meet Jennifer face to face because contact said she refused her dinner date invitation..."
"She said she didn't want to hear about Brad, but if Angie was worried about Brad and Jan going out to play and losing sleep, she couldn't help monitoring the story. Another source told Hollywood life that the reports about their meeting were completely false... "
"Knowing that he might meet his ex girlfriend, Jane, after so many things happened between them, it felt like betrayal and a heavy blow to Angie."
"It's hard for Angelina to divorce," a person familiar with the matter told Hollywood life. Com. "But her feelings for Brad are still strong."



Number  889
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Related Gallery...”
“Gwen Stefani Serenades Blake Shelton for His 42nd BirthdayGwen Stefani Attends Wedding with Blake Shelton, Dances to 'Hollaback Girl' at Reception: Watch!”
“The country star appears on Sunday's upcoming episode of Sunday TODAY With Willie Geist and gives insight into the start of his relationship with the pop princess.”
“When I was going through my divorce and just hit rock bottom just like anyone does when they go through something that devastating it s a miracle that I met somebody that was going through the same exact thing that I was at the exact same moment in time Shelton...”
“42 says...”
“Both Shelton and Stefani, 48, divorced their partners — Miranda Lambert and Gavin Rossdale respectively — in 2015, before confirming their relationship in November of that year.”
“For that reason, many people, Shelton and Stefani included, assumed they would have a quick rebound relationship.”
“"I think if Gwen and I were being honest right now talking about this, I think in the back of our minds we both kind of thought this is a rebound deal," Shelton reveals.”
“"I mean, because we're both coming out of a pretty low spot in our lives and we're kind of clinging to each other to get through this."”
“The couple is still going strong, though.”


Related libraries
Gwen Stefani serenades Blake Sheldon for his 42nd birthday. Gwen Stefani and Blake Sheldon attend the wedding and dance with "Hollywood girl" at the reception: Look
"The country star will be on Sunday with Willie gaster and will have a deeper understanding of the beginning of his relationship with the pop diva."
"It's a miracle when I go through a divorce and fall to the bottom like everyone else, when they go through something devastating. I meet someone who is going through the same thing as me at the same time, Sheldon..."
"42 said..."
"Both Sheldon and Stefani, 48, divorced their partners Miranda Lambert and Gavin Rossdale in 2015 and confirmed their relationship in November of the same year."
"As a result, many people, including Sheldon and Stefani, think their relationship will recover quickly."
"I think if Gwen and I are honest about this now, I think deep down in our hearts, we all think it's a rebound deal," Shelton revealed
"I mean, because we're all out of the bottom of our lives, and we're holding each other tight to get through it."
"But the couple are strong."



Number  890
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He informed his close pal her love life was “not the area right now that’s reaching its peak.”The mind reader later told how he could spot a clock imagery and added it symbolised: “A schedule or two people’s schedules would not be ideal for a cohesive relationship.””
“...broadcaster Tyler Henry, who doubles as a medium, appeared on the new mum’s reality TV show Keeping Up With The Kardashians in November, and warned despite being loved up, her relationship was on rocky ground.”
“Meanwhile, E!”
“(Image: Instagram/Khloe Kardashian)The hurt TV star is also sad to have issued the father to her baby with an ultimatum if they were to make their relationship work.”
“The couple decided to put the drama temporarily to one side to announce the name of their first tot, True.”
“A woman who is thought to have accompanied Tristan back to his hotel room in New York also took to social media to claim that she’s expecting.”
“...was three months pregnant...”
“Rob feels Tristan not only embarrassed himself but Khloe and the entire family so he wants him cut off now Image Getty His comments come after images showing Tristan apparently kissing two women at hookah lounge in Washington D C came to light in shots taken while KUWTK star Khloe...”
““Rob thinks it is horrible what Tristan has done to his sister.”
“(Image: Getty)According to US website Hollywood Life, Rob has waded into her romance drama, with a source telling the publication: “Rob is pleading with Khloe to not wait until Tristan is done with the playoffs, but to break up with him immediately.”


He told his close friend that her love life "is not where it's peaking now." The mind reader later told him how to find a clock image, adding: "a schedule for one or two people is not ideal for an intimate relationship."
“…… Meanwhile, media broadcaster Tyler Henry appeared on the new mom's reality show "keeping with the kardashians" in November last year and warned that despite her love, her relationship is still on an unstable basis. "
"At the same time, e!"
"(photo source: instagram / Khloe Kardashian) the injured TV star is also upset. She has issued an ultimatum to her children if they want their relationship to work properly."
"The couple decided to put the plot aside for a while and announce the name of their first child, really."
"A woman thought to have accompanied Tristan back to his hotel room in New York also claimed on social media that she was pregnant."
“… Three months of pregnancy... "
"Rob thinks Tristan is embarrassing not only himself, but Chloe and the whole family, so he wants to cut him off now. Photo source: after the exposure of Tristan kissing two women at the hookah hall in Washington, D.C., kutek star Chloe... "
"Rob thinks what Tristan did to his sister was terrible."
(photo: Getty) according to Hollywood life, rob got involved in her love drama. A source told the magazine: "rob begged helo not to wait for Tristan to finish the playoffs, but to break up with him immediately."



Number  891
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Mr. & Mrs. Smith actors — who are the parents of Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Knox and Vivienne, 9 — are currently working on finalizing their divorce.”
““Brad’s absolutely smitten by her,” the source revealed exclusively to Us.”
“Brad Pitt’s new girlfriend, Neri Oxman, was spotted out and about on Wednesday, April 18, heading to teach a class at the Massachusetts Institute of Technology.”
“The MIT professor, 42, was walking through the campus in Cambridge, Massachusetts, dressed in a black turtleneck, trench coat and matching pants.”
“The award-winning architectural designer wore her hair up in a loose bun with dark sunglasses and carried a copy of The Voyager Golden Record.”
“As Us Weekly previously reported, Oxman has been quietly seeing the War Machine actor, 54, for six months.”
“An insider close to the actor told Us that Pitt has been glowing around her The Oscar winning actor first reached out to her after he saw a line of her 3 D printed chaise lounges and headed to meet with her at MIT where she teaches media arts and...”
“...sciences at the Massachusetts school s Media Lab...”
““Their chemistry is off the charts.”“They got romantically involved almost right away,” the insider continued.”
““Being around Neri is intoxicating as if you’re flying high above the mountains.”Oxman is the first woman Pitt has been linked with since his split from Angelina Jolie in September 2016.”


"The Smiths' parents are 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian. They are working hard for a final divorce."
"Brad is totally fascinated by her," the source told us exclusively
Brad Pitt's new girlfriend, Neri Oxman, was found out for classes at the Massachusetts Institute of technology on Wednesday, April 18
The 42 year old MIT professor wears a black turtleneck, windbreaker and matching pants on campus in Cambridge, Massachusetts
"The award-winning architect has his hair in a loose bun, dark sunglasses and a Voyager golden record in his hand
"As US Weekly reported earlier, Oxman has been quietly meeting the 54 year old war machine actor for six months."
"An insider close to the actor told us that Pete was always around her and was radiant. The Oscar winner first contacted her when he saw her row of 3D printed reclining chairs and went to meet her at MIT, where she taught media art and..."
“… Science in the MIT Media Lab
"They overreacted." "They fell in love almost immediately," the person familiar with the matter continued
"It's intoxicating to be with neili, just like you are flying in the mountains." Oxman is the first woman Pitt has contacted since breaking up with Angelina Jolie in September 2016



Number  892
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See snaps from her trip below!”
““My office for the day,” Kim said as she strolled along a deck on the beach.”
“Kourtney is there with her boyfriend Younes Bendjima, and has also been documenting her trip on social media.”
“PHOTOS: Check out the latest pics of Kim KardashianKim showed off her figure in a hot Chanel red string bikini mirror selfie video while on vacation with her sister, Kourtney.”
“The 37-year-old Keeping Up With The Kardashians reality star showed off her killer bikini body while on a trip to Turks and Caicos on Sunday (April 8) on her Instagram.”
“Kim Kardashian is looking so hot!”


"Look at the pictures of her trip below!"
"Today is my office," said Kim, who strolled along the deck on the beach
"Courtney was there with her boyfriend, yones benjima, and has been documenting her travels on social media."
"Photos: take a look at the latest photos of Kim kadeshan Kim and his sister kurtni on holiday, showing their body in a Chanel red line bikini mirror."
"The 37 year old Kardashian reality star showed off her killer bikini figure on instagram when she went to the Turks and Caicos Islands on Sunday (April 8)," he said
"Kim Kardashian looks so sexy!"



**Something goes wrong**
“...head during an appearance with the sports entertainment company back in 2007”
“Original Trump Train image was a cartoon by Gary Varvel was of Democrats trying to stop Trump pic twitter com 9k4TpcSgQl Charlie Spiering charliespiering August 15 2017 Back in July Trump also shared an GIF of himself beating up WWE CEO Vince McMahon also bearing the CNN logo over his...”
“— Olivia Nuzzi (@Olivianuzzi) August 15, 2017See more reactions to the retweet:According Breitbart, the original Trump image was a cartoon created by artist Gary Varvel, showing Democrats unsuccessfully trying to stop the "Trump Train."”
“After a woman was fatally run over at a white nationalist rally, the president shares a rendering of a 'TRUMP' train hitting a CNN reporter.”
“...the president shares a rendering of a TRUMP train hitting a CNN reporter...”
“SEE ALSO Internet explodes as Trump shares video of him beating up CNN The meme that Trump retweeted after Heather Heyer was killed by a Nazi living protester s car in Charlottesville one reporter tweeted while another wrote After a woman was fatally run over at a white nationalist rally...”
“The president's decision to retweet the cartoon was criticized by some reporters, who compared it to the deadly rally that took place over the weekend in Charlottesville -- resulting in the death of at least three victims.”
“"Fake news can't stop the Trump Train," the cartoon meme, which was initially shared by one of his supporters, was captioned.”
“He has since deleted the tweet.”
“President Donald Trump sparked outrage after he retweeted a cartoon "Trump Train" running into a person bearing the CNN logo for a head on Tuesday morning.”


"When I showed up at a sports entertainment company in 2007"
"The original picture of Trump's train was a cartoon by Gary Varvel. It was a picture of Democrats trying to stop trump. Twitter com 9k4tpcsgql Charlie spiering Charlie spiering on August 15, 2017. As early as July, trump also shared a picture of himself beating Vince McMahon, CEO of WWE McMahon's GIF photo, the CNN logo on the photo is also printed on his face... "
"- Olivia Nuzzi (@ olivianuzzi) August 15, 2017 view to forward: according to brebart, the original image of trump is a cartoon created by artist Gary wavel, which shows that the Democratic Party failed to stop the" trump train "
"At a white nationalist rally, after a woman was run over to death, the president shared a picture of a trump train crashing into a CNN reporter."
“… The president shared the picture of Trump's train hitting CNN reporter... "
"In addition to the Internet explosion, trump shared his video of beating CNN - meme forwarded by trump after Heather hayer was killed by a living Nazi protester's car in Charlottesville - a reporter tweeted, another reporter wrote at a white nationalism conference after a woman was killed..."
"The president's decision to forward this cartoon has been criticized by some journalists who compared it to a deadly rally in Charlottesville last weekend that killed at least three victims."
"Fake news can't stop Trump's train," the cartoon fan was originally shared by one of his supporters under the headline
"He later deleted the microblog."
"President Donald Trump forwarded a cartoon" trump train "on Tuesday morning and caused anger when it collided with a man with CNN logo on his head."



Number  894
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Avril announced her separation from the Nickelback frontman via Instagram in late 2015, more than two years after they tied the knot at the Chateau de La Napoule in the South of France following their one-year relationship.”
“She also went through a painful divorce from Chad Kroeger.”
“The "Sk8ter Boi" hitmaker has been battling Lyme Disease since 2015, though.”
“A source close to Avril tells Gossip Cop that the singer finds the death hoax "bizarre."”
“But of course Avril is very much alive.”
“One other said, "Just got up to date on the Avril Lavigne conspiracy theory...it almost had me believing it."”
“There's also a fan who expressed, "I can't sleep and I'm scared to walk outside my room because of the Avril Lavigne theory."”
“Avril Lavigne was replaced by Melissa Vandella but I am saying that I ve never seen them in the same room tweeted another fan...”
“...so she decided to hire a look alike to walk around LA for her and pose for the paparazzi avril on the left look alike on the right pic twitter com wNSrDVh09i givenchyass May 13 2017 I m not saying...”
“Some confused fans commented on the social media, with one user who was fooled by the theory writing, "I want to sleep but is Avril Lavigne really Avril Lavigne."”


"Avril broke up with Nickelback's team leader through instagram at the end of 2015. They had a year long relationship in Chateau de la Napoule in southern France more than two years ago."
"She also experienced a painful divorce from Chad Kruger."
"However, this' sk8ter boi 'killer has been fighting Lyme disease since 2015."
A source close to Avril told gossip police that Avril thought the death scam was "very strange"
"But Avril is still alive, of course."
Another said, "just got the latest news about Avril Lavigne's conspiracy theory It almost convinced me. "
"Another fan said that because of Avril Lavigne's theory, I couldn't sleep and didn't dare to go out of the room."
"Avril Lavigne was replaced by Melissa Vandella, but I have to say that I have never seen them in the same room, and another fan tweeted that..."
“… So she decided to hire someone who looks like her to walk around Los Angeles and pose for the paparazzi. Avril on the left and the person who looks like her on the right. The picture is the twitter website wnsrdvh09i givenchyass, May 13, 2017. I'm not saying... "
"Some confused fans commented on social media, and one user who was fooled by the theory wrote," I want to sleep, but is Avril Lavigne really Avril Lavigne? "



Number  895
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The upcoming film is said to have the backdrop of Sharon Tate’s murder, which shocked the nation in 1969.”
“Most recently, his name was linked with his former wife, Jennifer Aniston.”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie’s official announcement to end their two-year marriage came as a surprise to their fans and well-wishers.”
“Ever since their official separation, a lot has been written and said about the private lives of Brad, Angelina, and their six children.”
“Most recently, it was claimed by several outlets that in order to move on in his life, Brad had reportedly vowed to remain celibate for a year.”
“However, Gossip Cop debunked the claims.”
“In a recent report from The Sun, it was allegedly claimed that the award-winning actor is determined to not get intimate with anyone as he still continues to mend his broken heart after ending a decade-long romance with Angelina Jolie.”
“Brad Pitt has not been in a relationship since his split with Angelina Jolie, but has been linked with several celebrities.”
“In the recent months, his name was allegedly linked with Sienna Miller and Princess Charlotte Casiraghi.”
“But apparently, the actor wants to focus on himself and his projects, revealed a source to The Sun.”


"It is said that the upcoming film is set in the murder of Sharon Tate, which shocked the whole country in 1969."
Recently, his name was linked to his ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie officially announced the end of their two-year marriage, which surprised their fans and benefactors."
"People have written and talked a lot about Brad, Angelina and their six children's private lives since they officially separated."
"Recently, several media claimed that Brad had vowed to be single for a year in order to continue his life."
"However, the gossip police have exposed these claims."
"In a recent report in the sun, the award-winning actor is said to be continuing to mend her broken heart after ending her 10-year relationship with Angelina Jolie, determined not to have a close relationship with anyone."
"Brad Pitt hasn't been in love since he broke up with Angelina Jolie, but has been in touch with several celebrities."
"In recent months, his name is said to be related to Sienna Miller and Princess Charlotte cassilagi."
"But it's clear that the actor wants to focus on himself and his project," a source for the sun said



Number  896
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Very important people – such as ambassadors and members of parliament – are just the crowd an aspiring politician like Ange would be keen to mingle with.”
“The new mansion is just minutes away from the Houses of Parliament in St James’s Park, where residents are influential.”
“But while the estate boasts standout features like a wine cellar and a media room, it’s all about location, location, location for Ange.”
“According to insiders, Ange is eyeing up an 18th- century, seven-bedroom property worth a whopping $34 million.”
“She’s spending up big to make it happen.”
“...life in London...”
“And now that they re all used to being home schooled and are being taught by their separate tutors in subjects from languages to physics Ange is moving full speed ahead with her long held dream of living a political...”
“Indeed, throughout the bitter custody battle with Brad, Ange, 42, has always maintained that their six kids – Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Knox and Vivienne, nine – are her top priority.”


"Very important people - ambassadors and congressmen, for example - are the people that aspiring politicians like Angus want to integrate into."
"The new building is only minutes away from the parliament building in St James Park, where the residents are very influential."
"However, although the manor has outstanding features such as wine cellar and media room, it is all about the location, location and position of Angus."
"According to people familiar with the matter, Angie is looking at an 18th century seven bedroom property worth as much as $34 million."
"She spent a lot of money to achieve that."
“… Life in London... "
"Now they are used to studying at home, and their tutors teach courses from language to physics. Angu is pushing forward her long-term dream of political life at full speed..."
"In fact, in the fierce custody battle with Brad, Angie, 42, insists that their six children - Maddox, 16, parks, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Knox and Vivian, 9 - are her top priority."



Number  897
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Has the cancer returned?”
“AdvertisementSeeing how horrible it looks now, it is hard to believe it is merely sun damage.”
“As you may know already, the Jenner confessed back in 2013 that because skin cancer was detected, the medical specialists took a chunk of tissue from her nose.”
“‘While I am under, maybe they can give me another boob job while they’re at it,’ she apparently told some of her pals.”
“...around her friends making light of the danger...”
“Other sources stated that she was going overboard about dying She is taking desperate measures and calling everyone about needing to spend time with her because she does not know what is going to happen with her health However that did not stop Jenner from joking about the terrible situation...”
“[media-credit name=”Source: radaronline.com” align=”aligncenter” width=”1024″] [/media-credit]Our snitch also claims that Cait has been using her health problem to guilt trip her family into sending a lot more time with her.”
“With all of her plastic surgeries on her nose over the years, there is not much there, to begin with!’ the source added, explaining that she is really scared of losing her nose.”
“‘She has been having a breakdown about it.”
“One insider close to the transgender icon told us that ‘Caitlyn’s biggest fear’s that she’ll lose her nose.’Apparently, Caitlyn is afraid that the damage ’hs spread’ and the doctors will need to cut the dead tissue off again.”


"Has the cancer recurred?"
Seeing how terrible the situation is, it's hard to believe that it's just the damage caused by the sun
"As you probably know, Jenner admitted in 2013, medical experts removed a large piece of tissue from her nose because of the detection of skin cancer."
"Maybe they can do another breast augmentation while I'm away," she apparently told some of her friends
“… Belittle danger around her friends... "
"Other sources said that she had gone too far about dying, that she was taking desperate measures and called everyone to say that she needed to be with her because she didn't know what would happen to her health, but that didn't stop Jenna from joking about the terrible situation..."
"[media credit name]" source: radaronline.com Our informants also claim that Kate has been using her health problems to make her family spend more time with her
"She's had cosmetic surgery on her nose all these years, not many at the beginning! The source also explained that she was really afraid of losing her nose
"She's been falling apart about it."
"An insider close to the transsexual idol told us," Caitlin's biggest fear is that she will lose her nose. " Obviously, Caitlin is afraid of damage "HS spread", and doctors need to cut off the dead tissue again. "



Number  898
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Source: Your Tax Free Donations Are Appreciated and Help Fund our Volunteer Website and Orphanage...”
“The website in question also quotes the model saying that Victoria’s Secret’s models are “Illuminati prostitutes” who are “degraded on a daily basis by the worst kind of guys – followers of Satan.”Apparently Jenner added, “You wouldn’t believe what these girls are forced to go through.”
“While Gigi and Bella Hadid return to the stage, VS has cut off Kendall Jenner’s wings.”
“The fashion world is gearing up for the biggest fashion event of the year – Victoria’s Secret Fashion Show.”
“The lingerie brand have shortlisted the models who will walk the ramp this year and have handed out their wings.”
“While model-sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid have reclaimed their wings and are preparing to return to the stage, the organisers have dropped Kendall Jenner from this year’s line up.”
“The 21-year-old, who has been a part of the prestigious fashion event for two years now, will not return this year and the news has left the Kardashian family member disappointed.”
“Reports suggest that Jenner is so mad with the brand that she is going about dissing and name-calling them.”
“A website named News Punch claimed that Jenner was overheard telling friends that she was not added to this year’s show because she told the brand’s bosses that she doesn’t worship Satan, indirectly hinting them as illuminati.”
“They tried to lure me into the cult but I had to take a step back to hold onto my soul.”


"Source: Thank you for your tax-free donation and help to fund our volunteer website and orphanage..."
The website also quoted the model as saying that Victoria's Secret models are "Illuminati prostitutes" who are "belittled every day by the worst men, followers of Satan." Obviously, Jenner added, "you don't believe what these girls are forced to go through."
"When Gigi and Bella Hadid returned to the stage, vs had cut off Kendall Jenner's wings."
"The fashion world is preparing for the biggest fashion event of the year - Victoria's Secret Fashion Show."
"The underwear brand has been shortlisted for the model who will walk the slope this year, and has distributed wings."
"Kendall Jenner has been removed from this year's lineup by the organizers when model sisters Gigi and Bella Hadid are back on their feet and ready to return to the stage."
"The 21-year-old Kardashian has been at the Fashion Fair for two years and won't be back this year. The news disappointed Kardashian's family."
"It was reported that Jenner was so angry with the brand that she had to disagree with them and name them."
"A website called news punch claims that Jenner was overheard telling a friend that she didn't join this year's show because she told the brand owners that she didn't worship Satan and indirectly implied that they were the Illuminati."
"They tried to tempt me to join the cult, but I had to step back to capture my soul."



Number  899
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“BUT … through it all … when we finally get to the place where we can give and receive love in its most pure state … ego free … it is only ever … beauty.”Scroll through to see what Smith and Pinkett Smith have said about their marriage through the years.”
“The pair’s son, Trey, arrived in November 1992.”
“Will Smith and Jada Pinkett Smith’s 20-plus years of marriage have outlasted many Hollywood relationships.”
“The couple seem as though they have figured out the magic formula to keeping the spark alive — even if they had to address rumors throughout their decades together.”
“The actor met the Red Table Talk cohost when she auditioned to play his girlfriend on The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air.”
“Pinkett Smith did not get the role — Nia Long ended up playing the part — but the two later struck up a romantic relationship.”
“Smith and Pinkett Smith tied the knot in December 1997.”
“They went on to welcome son Jaden in July 1998 and daughter Willow in October 2000.”
“Prior to his marriage to the actress, the Bad Boys for Life star wed Sheree Zampino in May 1992.”
“Smith and the Hollywood Exes alum divorced in 1995.”


"But After all this When we finally reach a place where we can give and receive love in the purest state No self This is forever Beautiful. " Scroll to see what Smith and pinkert Smith have thought about their marriage over the years
"Their son, Trey, arrived in November 1992."
"Will Smith and Jada pinkert Smith have been married for more than 20 years, longer than many relationships in Hollywood."
"The couple seems to have found the magic formula to keep sparks alive - even if they have to face rumors for decades together."
"The actor is a red table conversation cohabitant he met while auditioning for his girlfriend in Fresh Prince of bel air."
"Pinkert Smith didn't get the role - NIA long eventually played it - but the two later developed a romantic relationship."
"Smith and pinkert Smith were married in December 1997."
"They then welcomed their son Jaden in July 1998 and their daughter Yangliu in October 2000."
In May 1992, before marrying the actress, the "bad boy of life" star married Shirley zanpino
"Smith and his Hollywood ex divorced in 1995."



Number  900
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’re in it for the long haul?”
““Jamie and Katie have been talking at great length about having a child together,” a source for the magazine recently told the publication.”
“Looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie Foxx, 50, may be more serious than fans previously thought!”
“While the couple had kept their relationship hidden for years, the two stepped out as a duo just last year.”
“Since then, they’ve been spotted out and about together in public on multiple occasions — including making a big splash sitting side-by-side at Clive Davis’ pre-Grammy gala in NYC on Jan. 27.”
“From the photos, Katie and Jamie looked happier than ever, and a new report claims that could be because they’re FINALLY on the same page about wanting to start a family together!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Katie Holmes with her daughter Suri Cruise.”
“Although it reportedly took some time for Katie to be on board, she apparently feels ready to have a baby with her new man — at least according to Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s crazy about her and thinks they’ll have an adorable baby.” In fact, some witnesses at the gala last month allegedly think Katie could actually already be expecting.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — would you love to see Jamie and Katie have a child together?”


"Do you think they will be involved for a long time?"
"Jamie and Katie have been talking about having a child together," a source for the magazine recently told the publication
"It looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie fox, 50, may be more serious than fans thought before!"
"Although the couple have been hiding their relationship for years, just last year, they came out as a couple."
"Since then, they have been found together in public many times - including Clive Davis sitting side by side at the Grammy Awards in New York on January 27."
"From the photos, Katie and Jamie look happier than ever, and a new report says it may be that they have finally reached a consensus on how to form a family together!"
"Click here to see a lovely picture of Katie Holmes and her daughter Suri cruise."
"Although it was reported that it took Katie some time to get on the plane, she clearly felt ready to have a baby with her new boyfriend - at least according to life and fashion magazine."
"He was fascinated by her and thought they would have a lovely child." In fact, some witnesses at last month's party claimed that Katie might be pregnant
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - would you like to see Jamie and Katie have a baby together?"



Number  901
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Today in unexpected couples, Emma Stone has been spotted on vacation in the South of France with Justin Theroux.”
“Since he split from Jennifer Aniston in February, Theroux has been linked to a number of different women, including Selena Gomez, Aubrey Plaza, and Petra Collins.”
“And now, rumors that Theroux is dating Stone have surfaced after the pair were photographed vacationing together at Hotel du Cap-Eden-Roc in Saint-Paul-De-Vence, and attending the Louis Vuitton Cruise 2019 show at The Maeght Foundation this week.”
“Getty ImagesStone and Theroux were also photographed with the actress, Laura Harrier.”
“Theroux and Stone are co-stars in Netflix's forthcoming series, Maniac, and have been spending a lot of time together as a result.”
“However, rumors that the pair might be more than friends started earlier this month when they were seen leaving a Met Gala after-party together.”
“E!”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Among the unexpected couples today, Emma stone and Justin serux are on holiday in southern France."
"Since breaking up with Jennifer Aniston in February, Cyrus has been associated with many different women, including Selena Gomez, Aubrey square and Petra Collins."
"Now, after the two were photographed together on holiday at the ducap Eden Rock Hotel in Devons, Sao Paulo, and taking part in this week's Louis Vuitton 2019 tour at the MAE foundation, rumors have surfaced that Theroux is dating stone."
"Getty Eaglestone and seru are also photographed with actress Laura Harrell."
"Theroux and stone are co stars in Netflix's upcoming series maniac, so they've always been together."
"However, rumors that the two may be more than just friends began earlier this month when they were seen leaving a blind date after a party."
“E！”



Number  902
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Selena is going to do what she wants to do.””
““She is not responding to anyone’s texts, calls or emails at the moment,” the insider said, adding, “Her mother is worried about her and has been for quite some time now.”“No one can really do anything at this point,” the insider added of the couple, here in Toronto.”
“Gomez, who has endured multiple stints at rehab , was spotted partying with The Weeknd at this year’s Coachella Music Festival in April.”
“She even played arm candy on the Met Gala red carpet this year in New York.”
““She is not working right now and has put her career on hold to follow The Weeknd around on his world tour,” the pal dished to Radar.”
“With only one project in the works — Hotel Transylvania 3 — Gomez has a lot of time on her hands to play second fiddle to her superstar boyfriend.”
““Selena has completely shut out her family and friends for over a month now,” the insider said.”
“And her man is all she has right now, sources revealed.”
“Gomez hit New York in a sheer dress with her man by her side.”
“Click through 9 jet-setting photos to find out why.”


"Selena is going to do what she wants to do."
"She hasn't responded to anyone's text messages, phone calls or e-mails at the moment," the person familiar with the matter said. "Her mother has been worried about her for quite some time." "Nobody can really do anything right now," the source added, adding that the couple are in Toronto
"Gomez has been trained many times in the rehabilitation center. At the cochella Music Festival in April this year, he was found gathering with people at the weekend."
"She even played arm candy on the red carpet at this year's Metropolitan party in New York."
"She's not working now and her career has been put on hold in order to follow him around the world," the friend told radar
"With only one project in progress - Hotel 3 in Transylvania - Gomez has a lot of time to act as a deputy to the superstar's boyfriend."
"Selena has completely shut out her family and friends for more than a month," the person familiar with the matter said
"And her man is all she has now," the source said
"Gomez ran into New York in a transparent dress and her man was right beside her."
"Click on nine background photos of the jet to find out why."



Number  903
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Richard Gere recently got married.”
“Uh huh.”Who could it be?”
“That someone is Anwar Hadid, the 18-year-old model brother of Jenner’s friends Gigi and Bella Hadid.”
“Kendall Jenner, who once comically referred to Richie as one of Disick’s children, kissed someone in public.”
“Please pray that all relevant parties see reason soon.”
“But Sofia seems committed: She referred to Disick as her “whole [heart emoji]” on Instagram yesterday.”
“Us Weekly reported last week that Lionel threatened to cut Sofia out of his will if she continued her relationship with Disick.”
““Lionel and her family encouraged the split and are very upset and disappointed that she decided to get back with him,” a source told the site.”
“The breakup, however, lasted just 48 hours, as Disick quickly won Richie back with promises to “change.”According to E!, Richie has been living at Disick’s house in L.A., but she stayed at her father Lionel Richie’s house during the short separation.”
“I think that shows the Kardashians still have a long way to go in terms of accepting the relationship.)”


"Richard Kiel got married recently."
"Aha." Who could it be? "
"That's Anwar Hadid, Jenna's friend Gigi and Bella Hadid's 18-year-old model brother."
Kendall Jenner once jokingly called rich one of desik's children, and he kissed a man in public
"Please pray that all parties concerned will understand the truth as soon as possible."
"But Sophia seems to be engaged: yesterday she called desik her" whole (heart) emoticon "on instagram
"US Weekly reported last week that Lionel threatened to remove Sophia from her will if she continued her relationship with desik."
"Lionel and her family encouraged the breakup and were very upset and disappointed at her decision to get back together with him," a source told the website
However, the break-up lasted only 48 hours, and desik soon won back rich with the promise of "change"! "Richie has always lived in desik's house in Los Angeles, but during her brief separation, she stayed with her father, Lionel Richie."
"I think it shows that the kardashians have a long way to go in terms of accepting the relationship."



Number  904
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are you surprised she and Kylie have reportedly been talking so much?”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Kourtney will have more kids?”
“In fact, HL learned exclusively they’re practically inseparable!”
“Kylie Jenner‘s, 20, unborn baby is already bringing people together!”
“Bonding like never before, Kylie and big sister Kourtney Kardashian, 38, have become super close since Kylie found out she was pregnant.”
“Kourtney, being a mom-of-three, has been helping her sis through her first pregnancy, giving her tips every step of the way.”
“And while the expectant mother has been seeking support from ALL of her sisters, Kourtney has surprisingly been her rock during this nerve-wracking period of transition.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of the Kardashian kids.”
““Kylie is leaning heavily on her sisters, especially Kourtney,” a Kardashian insider shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““They’ve been working closely together on a special line of cosmetics with Kourtney’s name attached, and they’ve become very close.” But their time together’s apparently not all about the new makeup line.”


"Are you surprised she said so much to Kelly?"
"Tell us, Hollywood - do you think Courtney will have more children?"
"In fact, they are inseparable!"
"Kelly Jenner, 20, unborn, has brought people together!"
"Kelly's relationship with her 38 year old sister Courtney Kardashian has never been closer since she found out she was pregnant."
"Courtney, a mother of three, has been helping her sister through her first pregnancy, tipping her at every step."
"Although the mother to be has been seeking the support of all her sisters, it's amazing that Courtney has been her rock in this tense transition."
"Click here to see lovely photos of Kardashian's children."
"Kelly relies heavily on her sisters, especially Courtney," a Kardashian insider told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"They've been working closely on a cosmetics train with Courtney's name on it, and they're very close." But their time together is obviously not all about the new cosmetics line



Number  905
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thanks for all of your emails about this!”
“UPDATE: The dog in these photos with Glen appears to be Nina's dog, Maverick.”
“Who’s John with right now?”
“Oh, he’s checking Melissa.”
“It was first reported back in January that Nina Dobrev and Glen Powell were checking each other.”
“They showed up to the same parties, they hung out in the same circles, they were seen on Instagram… and then in April, at Coachella, according to PEOPLE, Nina was “dating” Orlando Bloom.”
“Even though five minutes later he was all over some model.”
“As noted at the time, obviously whatever did or didn’t happen between Nina and Orlando was temporary because she and Glen are now official.”
“Nina is tight with Julianne Hough who got married this weekend.”
“Nina and Glen were at the wedding.”


"Thank you for your email!"
"Update: the dog in these photos with Glen seems to be Nina's dog, maverick."
"Who is John with now?"
"Oh, he's checking Melissa."
"As early as January, it was reported that Nina Dobrev and Glenn Powell were checking each other out."
"They show up at the same party, they hang out in the same circle, they're seen on instagram Then in April, in cochella, according to people magazine, Nina was "dating" Orlando Bloom
"Even though in five minutes he was hooked on a model."
"As pointed out at the time, it's clear that what happened or didn't happen between Nina and Orlando is temporary, because she and Glen are now official."
"Nina is close to Julian Hoff, who is getting married this weekend."
"Nina and Glen are at the wedding."



Number  906
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While the Duchess of Cambridge paid a touching tribute to Princess Diana in the red and white dress she wore today.”
“"One minute William was leaping down the steps to collect the small siblings with his arms swinging like pendulums to suggest the look of a jaunty, confident dad-of-three.”
“The Duke of Cambridge, 35, looked loving as he held wife Kate, 36, who gave birth to a baby boy just after 11am today, but also signalled they may not want a fourth child with a self-protective gesture.”
“5 Kate Middleton and Prince William looked unusually intimate when they introduced their third child to the world today Credit AFP or licensors 5 The Duke of Cambridge held his wife s back and clasped her hand as they left...”
“...the Lindo Wing Credit Getty Images Getty Speaking to the Sun Online author Judi James has revealed the signals the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge gave with their tiny gestures...”
“The happy couple emerged from the private Lindo Wing, at St Mary's Hospital, London, just before 6pm today - as they showed their son off to the waiting crowds.”
“Around an hour and a half earlier, Wills had brought Prince George, four, and Princess Charlotte, two, to meet their baby brother - and played the confident dad-of-three as he led them up the hospital steps.”
“But his body language totally changed when Kate joined him on the steps - according to Judi.”
“5 Wills looked confident when he brought Prince George 4 and Princess Charlotte 2 to meet their baby brother Credit AFP or licensors She said With her choice of a striking red dress and killer heels for her hospital exit...”
“...outfit Kate seemed to have been keen to signal an anxiety free approach to the birth of her third baby...”


"The Duchess of Cambridge paid a touching tribute to Princess Diana in her red and white dress today."
"A minute ago, William jumped down the steps, swinging his arms like a pendulum, to pick up the little brothers and sisters, making people feel that he is a lively and confident father of three children."
"The 35 year old Duke of Cambridge looks very loving with his 36 year old wife Kate. Kate just gave birth to a baby boy at 11 a.m. this morning, but she also suggests with a gesture of self-protection that they may not want a fourth child."
"Kate Middleton and Prince William are very close today when they introduce their third child to the world. According to Agence France Presse, the Duke of Cambridge took his wife by the back, clenched her hand and left... "
“…… In an interview with the sun's online author Judi James, Lindo wing credit Getty Images Getty revealed that the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge used their tiny gestures to send signals... "
"Before 6 p.m. this afternoon, the happy couple came out from the Lindau building of St. Mary's Hospital in London to show their son to the waiting crowd."
About an hour and a half ago, wells took four-year-old Prince George and two-year-old Princess Charlotte to see their little brother. He played a confident father as he led the three children up the hospital steps
"But according to Judy, when Kate walked up the steps with him, his body language completely changed."
"When he took Prince George No. 4 and Princess Charlotte No. 2 to see their little brother or permittee, will No. 5 looked confident. She said that she chose a striking red skirt and deadly high heels as her discharge gift.... "
“…… Kate seems to have been keen to send a no anxiety signal to the birth of her third child... "



Number  907
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Producers have offered to have Joaquin home-schooled or provide a tutor for him, but she won’t pull him out of school.”Producers are trying to convince Ripa to get on board — even if it’s just during the period when Idol goes live, the source said.”
“...to Seacrest and she s not going to take it anymore...”
““Kelly’s announced that if push comes to shove, she’s ready to walk,” said an insider close to the syndicated show.”
““Kelly’s given them an ultimatum — it’s her way or the highway!” continued the insider.”
“She feels that she was stabbed in the back over the whole Michael Strahan fiasco and she s not going to allow it to happen again According to sources Ripa exploded when Seacrest pushed for Live with Kelly and Ryan to be moved permanently to Los Angeles to suit his...”
“...schedule after ABC announced he ll return as host of the rebooted American Idol next year...”
“That meant Seacrest, 42, would have to be in L.A. on Sunday nights to film Idol, then board a red-eye flight to New York to be on set for Live on Monday morning and host his radio show.”
“Apparently that was too daunting for Seacrest — and he pushed for the L.A. move.”
““After Ryan made his demand, network brass wanted Kelly to uproot her family and move to California,” tattled a source close to Seacrest.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"The producer has offered to educate or tutor Huajin at home, but she won't let him drop out of school." The producers are trying to persuade Ripa to join - even if only during idol's launch, "the source said
“… To Seacrest, she'll never accept it again... "
"Kelly announced that she was ready to go if she ran into difficulties," said one person familiar with the matter
"Kelly has given them an ultimatum - is this her way or the highway! "The insider continued
"She felt that she had been stabbed in the back in Michael Strahan's fiasco, and she would not let it happen again. According to the source, when Seacrest asked to live with Kelly and Ryan, Ripa suddenly revealed that in order to adapt to his situation, she would move to Los Angeles forever..."
“… Schedule after ABC announced that he will return to the hosting position of American Idol next year... "
"That means Seacrest, 42, has to shoot idol in Los Angeles on Sunday night, board the red eye flight and fly to New York for a live broadcast on Monday morning and host his radio show."
"Obviously, it's too daunting for Seacrest - he's driving the Los Angeles operation."
"After Ryan's request, Internet brass wants Kelly to uproot her family and move to California," a source close to Seacrest said in a post



Number  908
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  909
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— “She knows Neri is not Brad’s type, or at least doesn’t fit into his group of ex’s.””
“Why?”
“However, “Angelina is also in a bit of denial about Brad‘s possible new relationship,” the source reveals.”
“As Brad’s love life has taken over the news, Angie can’t help but be a witness to it all.”
““She’s hearing that people think she looks like Neri and the whole thing is weird and uncomfortable for Angie,” the insider admits.”
“Instead, “Angie might feel more comfortable if her ex were dating another Hollywood actress.”Another thing that’s “unnerved” Angie is that many people are comparing her to Oxman in terms of looks.”
“It’s Neri‘s incredible intelligence that has thrown Angie off balance,” the source admits, explaining, “An MIT professor is the last person Angie would have picked for Brad.”
““Angie saw pictures of Neri and felt a bit jealous.”
““She doesn’t like to hear any of the dating rumors about her ex… She can‘t handle it.”For the first time ever, or at least in a while, Angie has found herself a bit intimidated, which the insider says, does not happen often with the actress.”
“In fact, “Angelina is steaming with emotions and jealousy,” a source close to the actress tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


-"She knows Neri is not Brad's type, or at least not his ex girlfriend."
"Why?"
"However," the source revealed, "Angelina also denied Brad's possible new relationship a little bit."
"With Brad's love life taking over the news, Angie can't help being a witness to all this."
"She heard that people thought she looked like Neri, and the whole thing was strange and uncomfortable for Angie," the person familiar with the matter admitted
Instead, "Angie might feel more comfortable if her ex boyfriend dates another Hollywood actress." Another thing that worries Angie is that many people are comparing her to Oxman's looks
"It's Neri's incredible intelligence that makes Angie lose her balance," the source admitted, explaining. "The MIT professor is Angie's last choice for Brad."
"Angie was a little jealous when she saw Neri's picture."
"She doesn't like to hear any dating rumors about her ex girlfriend She can't stand it. " For the first time, or at least for a while, Angie found herself a little scared, which, according to people familiar with the matter, didn't happen very often with the actress
A source close to Angelina told reporters: "in fact, Angelina is full of emotion and jealousy." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  910
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The staff were reportedly asked to sign non-disclosure agreements but a photo of the couple leaked; Markle wore a floral Erdem dress and was spotted cuddling close to Harry.”
“The swanky bash saw the Prince's friend, Tom "Skippy" Inskip, tied the knot with literary agent Lara Hughes-Young, according to The Daily Mail.”
“But not for Pippa Middleton according to the latest reports - as royal wedding fever builds ahead of this Saturday (May 19).”
“Despite practically being family, the Duchess of Cambridge's little sister has reportedly been left off the invite list for Harry and Meghan's wedding reception next Saturday.”
“Speculation is rife over why Pippa didn't make the final guest list.”
“There have been reports of rows and jealous bust-ups over Kate, but it could be much more straightforward: could they be trying to avoid one another?”
“For one thing, Meghan did not make an appearance at Pippa's wedding ceremony to James Matthews in May 2017, as was expected.”
“Prince Harry arrived with his brother the Duke of Cambridge and, despite claims Meghan went to the reception, no images of the couple there have since emerged.”
“(Image: Getty Images Europe)In the build up to the wedding speculation was rife that Meghan was told she couldn't wear anything similar to Pippa or Kate.”
“The Telegraph reported that she waited to pick her outfit until Kate had picked hers, so they wouldn't clash.”


"It was reported that staff were asked to sign a confidentiality agreement, but a picture of the couple was leaked; markel was wearing a printed eldham dress and was found cuddling Harry."
Tom skipy Inskip, the prince's friend, tied up with literary agent Laura Hughes young during the carnival, the Daily Mail reported
"But according to the latest report, this is not the case for Pippa Middleton - because the Royal Wedding fever will heat up before this Saturday (May 19),"
Although the Duchess of Cambridge's sister is actually a family, she has been excluded from the invitation list for Harry and Megan's wedding reception next Saturday, according to reports
"There's a lot of speculation about why Pippa didn't make the final guest list."
"There are reports that Kate has provoked bickering and jealousy, but it may be more straightforward: will they try to avoid each other?"
"On the one hand, Megan didn't appear as expected at Pippa's wedding to James Matthews in May 2017."
"Prince Harry came with his brother, the Duke of Cambridge, and although it was said Megan went to the reception, there was no picture of the couple since."
(information pictures: Getty Images Europe) during the wedding preparation process, Megan was told that she could not wear clothes similar to Pippa or Kate. Speculation was rampant
The Daily Telegraph reported that she waited for Kate to pick her clothes so they wouldn't clash



Number  911
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, it was previously reported that Kardashian feels North should not be banned from attending high profile events just "because she's a baby".”
“The tiny tot burst into tears at father Kanye West's show with Adidas and the toddler also cried at the Alexander Wang runway show.”
“This comes after North threw tantrums twice during the New York Fashion Week.”
“He hates it and doesn't want her to be exploited the way she is," the source added.”
“"He doesn't appreciate how every time he turns around he sees his granddaughter's face plastered on magazines and websites.”
“"She has no business being at a fashion show and he's appalled that Kim sometimes drags her around like some sort of an accessory."”
“To go to kid things," an insider said.”
“"He wants North to be a kid.”
“According to Hollywood Life, the 65-year-old former Olympian is against the 34-year-old Keeping Up With The Kardashians star taking the 19-month-old toddler around the world, including in the front row at fashion shows.”
“Bruce Jenner is reportedly upset that American reality television star Kim Kardashian is treating her daughter North West like an "accessory."”


At the same time, Kardashian is reported to believe that North should not be banned from some high-profile activities just because "she is still a baby."
"On father Kanye West's show with Adidas, this little guy burst into tears, and this toddler also cried on Alexander Wang's runway show."
"Prior to that, North lost his temper twice at New York Fashion week."
"He hates it and doesn't want her to be used like this," the source added
"He doesn't understand how he can see his granddaughter's face posted on magazines and websites every time he turns around."
"She doesn't have to go to fashion shows. He's shocked. Kim sometimes drags her around like some kind of accessory."
"Go do something for children," said one person familiar with the matter
"He wanted the north to be a child."
"According to Hollywood life, the 65 year old former Olympia is opposed to 34 year old Kardashian star taking 19 month old children around the world, including in the front row of fashion shows."
Bruce Jenner is reported to be upset that American reality TV star Kim Kardashian treats her daughter as an "accomplice."



Number  912
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“So we're not quite at the full 'after' look yet.”
“"She likely has some residual filler, which will slowly metabolize naturally," Shafer said.”
“The filler likely isn't all gone now though, New York City plastic surgeon and RealSelf contributor Dr. David Shafer told the outlet, as the injections last 6-12 months.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Kylie is a master of branding, and she plays with the concept of mother—the more natural look—and her Kylie Cosmetics look, full glam."”
“...a mother first and that is a big reason she has been sporting the more natural look...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"So we haven't done a good job of worrying about the future."
"She may have some residual fillers that will slowly metabolize naturally," Schafer said
Dr. David Schaeffer, a New York City plastic surgeon and true self contributor, told the media that because the injection lasted 6-12 months, the fillings may not have completely disappeared by now
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Kelly is a brand master, she is playing with the concept of mother, more natural appearance and the appearance of her Kelly cosmetics, full Glam."
“…… First of all, it's her mother, which is an important reason why she always keeps a more natural appearance... "



Number  913
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It has to be.”Reps for Garner and Affleck did not immediately return requests for comment.”
“You have no choice.”
““It has to be [children first].”
“We’re doing really well,” Garner said previously.”
““We are definitely a modern family.”
“The exes have an amicable relationship and are focused on co-parenting their daughters, Violet, 12, and Seraphina, 9, and son Samuel, 6.”
“Shortly after, it was revealed that Affleck had moved on with “Saturday Night Live” producer Lindsay Shookus in July 2017.”
“Last year, following reports that Garner had called off their divorce, Affleck finally moved out of the property the couple shared.”
“Garner, 46, and Affleck, 45, were married for nearly 10 years before separating in 2015.”
“It’s unclear what the holdup is.”


Representatives from Ghana and Affleck did not immediately respond to requests for comment
"You have no choice."
"It has to be [children first]."
"We did a good job," Ghana said earlier
"We are definitely a modern family."
"The relationship between the two ex girlfriends is very friendly, and their focus is to raise their daughter, violet, 12, Serafina, 9, and their son, Samuel, 6."
"Soon after, it was reported that Affleck continued to work with Saturday night live producer Lindsay shokus in July 2017."
Last year, it was reported that Ghana canceled their divorce and Affleck finally moved out of the couple's shared property
"Ghana, 46, and Affleck, 45, have been married for nearly 10 years and separated in 2015."
"It's not clear what robbery is at the moment."



Number  914
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Love you””
“At the time of the incident, Bieber was on holiday with his father Jeremy.”
“The unnamed woman, 40, was reportedly apprehended by the Los Angeles Police Department at the singer’s Beverly Hills home after she visited with the intention of going looking for him.”
“According to TMZ, Bieber’s security team detained the woman until police arrived and booked her for trespassing.”
“AdvertisementBieber is believed to have been at home during the incident but he did not meet the woman.”
“The latest break-in attempt comes after fans were caught trespassing on two separate occasions previously.”
“In 2015, two fans were seen attempting to gain access as one celebrated her 12th birthday, filming their efforts on their mobile phones.”
“Only a year previously, a fan had gained access to his rented mansion in Atlanta, Georgia, and was found sleeping in one of the bedrooms within the home.”
“AdvertisementMore recently, Bieber risked the ire of his fans after unveiling an extensive new tattoo that covers the majority of his torso.”
“Thats too much.”


"Love you"
"At the time of the incident, Bieber was on holiday with his father Jeremy."
According to reports, the 40 year old unnamed woman was arrested by the Los Angeles police department after she went to Beverly Hills to look for Jackson
"According to TMZ, Bieber's security team detained the woman until police arrived and registered her for trespass."
"It is believed that Bieber was at home at the time of the incident, but he did not see the woman."
"The latest attempt to break in came after fans were found to have broken in illegally twice before."
"In 2015, two fans tried to get in, and one of them celebrated his 12th birthday and photographed their efforts on his mobile phone."
Just a year ago, a fan entered his rented mansion in Atlanta, Georgia and was found sleeping in a bedroom at home
Recently, Bieber, at the risk of being infuriated by fans, announced a new tattoo covering most of his torso
"That's too much."



Number  915
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off below.”
“Do you think that Kim Kardashian was wrong for launching her KKW line after collaborating with her younger sister?”
““Kylie doesn’t understand why Kim just can’t do her own thing,” the source told Radar.”
“Ultimately, she ventured off on her own and has since made a fortune off of her KKW highlighting kit.”
“...baby shower for the couple s daughter on the way collaborated with Jenner for Kylie Cosmetics months ago...”
“The beauty industry was Kylie s gig and Kim had enough on her plate already Kim is not giving her credit for coming up with these things and Kylie is just sick of it As fans know the 36 year old wife of Kanye West who just threw a lavish...”
“And according to a source close to the Keeping Up With the Kardashians clan, the star’s 20-year-old makeup mogul sister Kylie Jenner is “fuming!”“Kylie thinks Kim can’t stop copying her ideas!” a family insider told Radar.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Listen to the voice below."
"Do you think it's wrong for Kim Kardashian to launch the kkw series after working with her sister?"
"Kelly doesn't understand why Kim just can't do her own thing," the source told radar
"In the end, she ventured away from herself and has highlighted the wealth of the kit from her kkw."
“… For the couple's daughter's baby shower on the road, I worked with Jenna a few months ago to make Kelly cosmetics
"The beauty industry is Kelly's job, Kim has had enough of her plate, Kim doesn't give her credit to put forward these things, Kelly is just tired of it fans know 36 year old wife Kanye West who just threw out a generous..."
According to a source close to the Kardashian family, the star's 20-year-old make-up tycoon sister, Kelly Jenner, "is very angry! "Kelly thinks Kim can't stop copying her ideas! "A family insider told radar."



Number  916
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...make the Batman star s sobriety go smoothly A source tells X17 The Boston hunk is taking everything in stride...”
“We know he s got a busy life he needs to get back to but we hope he doesn t backslide without the structure of a program His girlfriend Lindsay Shookus is prepared to make some lifestyle changes herself to...”
“You'd think having three kids would cover those bases, but we guess not!Typically, people seeking recovery get treatment for at least 28 days, but the Oscar winner has barely been going to this place for a month.”
“We have a feeling the pooch is meant to be an emotional support dog, and a responsibility that keeps the actor sober and on the right track.”
“This is some unconventional therapy!Ben Affleck left his buddhist rehab center this afternoon on what a source tells us is his last day, and the actor was gifted a brand new husky puppy!”
“She wants to be known as a good influence on him."”
“She doesn't want him to be tempted, and she doesn't want to be blamed if he relapses.”
“It's not worth it to her.”
“She's not going to be completely sober necessarily, but she's not going to drink when they're spending time together.”
“"Lindsay realizes that drinking around Ben is not a good idea.”


“… To make Batman's soberness go smoothly, a source told x17 Boston is taking all the big steps... "
"We know he has a busy life and he needs to go back, but we hope he won't go back. Without a planned structure, his girlfriend Lindsay saucus is ready to make some lifestyle changes of his own..."
"You may think three children is enough, but we guess not! Normally, people seeking rehabilitation need at least 28 days of treatment, but the Oscar winner has not been to this place for almost a month
"We have a sense that this puppy is destined to be an emotional support dog, a responsibility to keep the actors awake and on the right track."
"It's some non-traditional therapy! Ben Affleck left his Buddhist rehabilitation center this afternoon. A source told us that this is the last day of his life. The actor has got a brand new husky dog
"She wants people to know that she has a great influence on him."
"She didn't want to tempt him, and she didn't want to be blamed if he relapsed."
"It's not worth it for her."
"She doesn't have to be fully awake, but she doesn't drink when they're together."
"Lindsay realized that drinking around Ben was not a good idea."



Number  917
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The ceremony airs live on ABC at 8pm ET from the T-Mobile Arena in Las Vegas.”
“The Feeling WINNER Top Streaming Song Audio The Chainsmokers Featuring Halsey Closer Drake Featuring WizKid Kyla One Dance WINNER D R A M”
“Pilots WINNER Top Male Artist Justin Bieber Drake WINNER Future Shawn Mendes The Weeknd Top Female Artist Adele Beyonce WINNER Ariana Grande Rihanna Sia Top Duo Group The Chainsmokers Coldplay Florida Georgia Line Guns N Roses Twenty One Pilots WINNER Top Billboard 200 Artist Beyonce Drake WINNER Prince Twenty One...”
“Pilots The Weeknd Top Hot 100 Artist The Chainsmokers Drake WINNER Rihanna Twenty One Pilots The Weeknd Top Song Sales Artist The Chainsmokers Drake WINNER Prince Justin Timberlake Twenty One Pilots Top Radio Songs Artist Justin Bieber The Chainsmokers Drake Rihanna Twenty One Pilots WINNER Top Streaming Songs Artist The...”
“Chainsmokers Desiigner Drake WINNER Rihanna Twenty One Pilots Top Social Artist Justin Bieber BTS WINNER Selena Gomez Ariana Grande Shawn Mendes Top Touring Artist Justin Bieber Beyonce WINNER Coldplay Guns N Roses Bruce Springsteen The E Street Band Top R B Artist Beyonce WINNER Bruno Mars Frank Ocean Rihanna The...”
“Weeknd Top R B Tour Beyonce WINNER Lionel Richie Rihanna Top Rap Artist J Cole Desiigner Drake WINNER Future Rae Sremmurd Top Rap Tour Drake WINNER Future Kanye West Top Country Artist Florida Georgia Line Blake Shelton WINNER Keith Urban Chris Stapleton Jason Aldean Top Country Tour Luke Bryan Kenny...”
“Chesney WINNER Dixie Chicks Top Rock Artist Coldplay The Lumineers Metallica Twenty One Pilots WINNER X Ambassadors Top Rock Tour Coldplay WINNER Guns N Roses Bruce Springsteen The E Street Band Top Latin Artist J Balvin Juan Gabriel WINNER Los Plebes Del Rancho De Ariel Camacho Maluma Nicky Jam Top...”
“Dance Electronic Artist The Chainsmokers WINNER Calvin Harris Major Lazer DJ Snake Lindsey Stirling Top Christian Artist Lauren Daigle WINNER Hillsong Worship Hillary Scott the Family Skillet Chris Tomlin Top Gospel Artist Jekalyn Carr Kirk Franklin WINNER Travis Greene Tamela Mann Hezekiah Walker Top Billboard 200 Album Beyonce Lemonade Drake...”
“Views WINNER Rihanna Anti Twenty One Pilots Blurryface The Weeknd Starboy Top Soundtrack Cast Album Hamilton An American Musical WINNER Moana Purple Rain Suicide Squad The Album Trolls Top R B Album Beyonce Lemonade WINNER Bruno Mars 24K Magic Frank Ocean Blonde Rihanna Anti The Weeknd Starboy Top Rap Album...”
“J Cole 4 Your Eyez Only Drake Views WINNER Kevin Gates Isla DJ Khaled Major Key A Tribe Called Quest We Got It From Here Thank You For Your Service Top Country Album Jason Aldean They Don t Know Florida Georgia Line Dig Your Roots Blake Shelton If I m...”


"The awards ceremony was broadcast live from the T-Mobile arena in Las Vegas at 8pm EDT."
"The feeling winner top streaming song audio the chainmokers featuring Halsey closer Drake featuring wizkid Kyla one dance winner d r a m"
"Pilot champion best male artist Justin Bieber Drake champion future Sean Mendes week 2 best female artist Adele Beyonce champion Arianna grand Rihanna SIA best combination chain smoker Coldplay Florida Georgia line gun n rose 21 pilot champion best billboard 200 artist Beyonce Drake champion Prince 21 ……”
"Pilot's week top 100 popular artists chain smoker Drake champion Rihanna 21 pilot's week ago first song sales artist chain smoker Drake champion Justin Black Prince 21 pilot top radio song artist Justin Bieber chain smoker Drake champion Rihanna 21 pilot top streaming song artist …”
"Designer Drake award winner Rihanna 21 pilot best social artist Justin Bieber BTS award winner Selena Gomez Ariana grand Sean Mendes best touring artist Justin Bieber Beyonce award winner Coldplay gun n Rose Bruce Springsteen E Street Band best R B Artist Beyonce award winner Bruno Frank ocean Rihanna's
"Best R of the week" B tour Beyonce award winner Lionel Ritchie Rihanna best rapper J Cole desina Drake award winner future ray slymoud best rapper tour Drake award winner future Kanye West best country singer Georgia route black Sheldon award winner Keith Urban Chris Stapleton Jason o "The best country tour of Erden, Luke Bryan Kenny..."
"Chesney champion Dixie Chicks top rock artist Coldplay the lumineers Metallica 21 pilots champion x ambassadors top rock tour Coldplay champion gun n roses Bruce Springsteen E Street top Latin artist J balvin Juan Gabriel champion Los plebes del Rancho de Ariel Camacho maluma Nicky jam top..."
Dance electronic artist champion Calvin Harris major Lazer DJ sneckling sesterlin top Christian artist Lauren dagger champion hillsson worship Hilary Scott family frying pan Chris Tomlin top evangelical artist Jacqueline karkork Franklin champion Travis greentame Raman Heather Walker top billboard 200 album Beyonce lemonade Drake ……”
"Watch champion Rihanna anti 21 pilot fuzzy face Zhouxing boy's best soundtrack album Hamilton American musical champion Mona purple rain suicide team album Troll top R B album Beyonce lemonade champion Bruno Mars 24K magic Frank ocean golden hair Rihanna anti Zhouxing boy's best rap album..."
"J Cole 4 your eyez only Drake views laureate Kevin gates Isla DJ Khalid major Kay, a tribe called discovery, we got it from here. Thank you for your service. Top country album Jason Alden. They don't know the Florida Georgia line digging your roots. Black Sheldon, if I were..."



Number  918
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was known to be charming, and even found a wife in the midst of his killings.”
“Now, in case you aren’t aware of who Ted Bundy was (and count yourself lucky if you don’t), then you might want to sit down.”
“You can argue that he’s too pretty or too muscular or too talented, but I don’t really see the flaws in those complaints.”
“So, let’s just all agree that Efron is gorgeous, and if he asked you to help him cover up a murder…okay, okay, obviously that isn’t the best argument.”
“But, the first look at Zac Efron as a serial killer is here, and even though his character was obviously an awful man, Efron still manages to look totally charming.”
“Which, considering the fact that he’s playing Ted Bundy, makes perfect sense.”
“Efron is set to star as Bundy in the film, Extremely Wicked, Shockingly Evil and Vile, alongside Lily Collins who will play Bundy’s girlfriend, Elizabeth Kloepfer.”
“The biopic is already so highly anticipated that fans have been commenting and talking about Efron’s role as Bundy, even though they just started filming this week.”
“Not only was he a serial killer, Bundy was also a rapist and necrophile who admitted to killing 36 women.”
“Bundy raped and killed women, and also managed to evade arrest and conviction for years.”


"Everyone knows that he is charming and even found his wife in the process of killing people."
"Now, if you don't know who Ted Bundy is (if you don't know, you're lucky), then you might want to sit down."
"You can say he's too beautiful, too muscular, too talented, but I really don't see the flaws in these complaints."
"So let's all agree that evron is beautiful, if he asks you to cover up the murder Well, well, obviously that's not the best argument. "
"But, at first sight, Zac Efron is a serial killer, and although his character is obviously a terrible person, Efron still manages to look completely charming."
"Considering that he's playing Ted Bundy, that makes a lot of sense."
"Efron will play Bondi in the movie, extremely evil, shocking evil and mean, with lily Collins who will play Bondi's girlfriend, Elizabeth clopffer."
"The biography has been highly anticipated, and fans have been commenting and talking about Efron's role as Bondi, even though they only started shooting this week."
"He is not only a serial killer, Bondi is also a rapist and corpse addict, confessing to killing 36 women."
Bondi raped and killed women and managed to escape arrest and conviction for years



Number  919
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“When I got to be single I said I just need to figure myself out I genuinely need to know why I did what I did and like regroup myself as a human being She didn t say exactly what happened but she did say that she was a d...”
“On an episode of the WTF With Marc Maron podcast, she said they aren't really friends anymore.”
““[We’re] probably not as friendly as we could be, no,” she said.”
““There are too many aspects of it that just prevented us from ever moving forward [from the] past.”
“We dated from when I was, like, 18, 19 until 25ish.”This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Last week, during an episode of Dax Shepherd's podcast, she implied that her breakup with Macaulay was mostly her fault.”
“Ethan Miller Getty Images“And it’s f*cked up what I did," she said.”
“"It’s f*cked up what I did and it’s f*cked up how I did it.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"When I'm going to be single, I say I just need to figure out myself. I really need to know why I do it. I like to regroup myself into a person. She doesn't say what happened, but she says she's a d..."
"In a podcast between WTF and mark Malone, she said they were no longer real friends."
"(we) may not be as friendly as we can be, no," she said
"There are so many aspects of it that hinder us [from the past]."
"We went from 18, 19 to 25." This content is imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Last week, in a podcast by DAX shepherd, she hinted that the breakup with Macaulay was mainly her fault."
"Ethan Miller Getty imaging," she said, "everything I did was ruined."
"It messed up what I did and how I did it."



Number  920
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kylie Jenner can be seen when the new season of Keeping Up With the Kardashians begins airing next month.”
“Meanwhile, the insider adds that if Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott are engaged, they may keep the news a secret like they did with the pregnancy, as Travis values his privacy very much.”
“According to a July 24 report by Hollywood Life, Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott’s close friends and family members believe that the couple, who share one daughter together, Stormi Webster, may be hiding a secret engagement.”
“Sources tell the outlet that Jenner and Scott have not made any sort of announcement or dished about wedding plans to their closest friends and family members, but that they are very much in love and committed to their relationship.”
“Insiders even revealed that Travis calls Kylie “wifey” and that they have been in a really good place in their relationship since the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star gave birth to their baby girl, Stormi, 6 months, back in February.”
““As far as everyone knows, Kylie and Travis aren’t engaged, but that doesn’t mean they couldn’t have gotten secretly engaged!”
“He calls her wifey and she likes to call him daddy.”
“They are majorly in love and committed to each other,” the sourced revealed about the couple’s relationship.”
““Travis is extremely private – he already struggles with the level of attention that comes with being a part of Kylie’s life.”
“It’s not marrying Travis that scares Kylie, it’s all the attention that goes with it,” an insider said of Jenner and Scott.”


"Kelly Jenner can see it when the new season of keep up with Kardashian starts next month."
"At the same time, people familiar with the matter added that if Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott were engaged, they might keep the news as secret as they were when they were pregnant, because Travis attached great importance to his privacy."
"According to Hollywood Life on July 24, close friends and family members of Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott believe the couple, who share a daughter, Tommy Webster, may be hiding a secret engagement."
"The source told the media that Jenna and Scott did not announce or disclose their wedding plans to their closest friends and family, but they were very much in love and committed to their relationship."
"Insiders even revealed that Travis called Kelly" the wife "and that they have had a good relationship since the birth of six month old baby girl Tommy in February in" keep up with "starring in" Kardashian. "
"As far as you know, Kelly and Travis are not engaged, but that doesn't mean they can't be engaged secretly!"
"He called her wife, and she liked to call him Dad."
"They are mainly in love and commitment to each other," the source said of the couple's relationship
"Travis is a very private person - he's already struggling to get the attention of being part of Kelly's life."
"What scares Kelly is not marrying Travis, but all the attention that comes with it," an insider said of Jenna and Scott



Number  921
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Until then, Drake’s not forcing anything.” Unfortunately for Drake, it looks like J.Lo doesn’t want any cheaters in her life.”
““Drake does want to settle down and have kids one day, and he’s confident that the right woman will come along at the right time,” a source told Hollywood Life.”
“...stay closed It s no surprise that the 31 year old Canadian is trying to reunite with his ex since those close to him revealed that he s now ready to start a family...”
“In one of his latest songs Diplomatic Immunity he raps 2010 was when I lost my halo 2017 I lost a J Lo A Rotterdam trip had me on the front page though I had to lay low Hot Topic like your everyday clothes Closed off but I could never...”
“When she learned of the hookup, which allegedly happened on a trip to Amsterdam, “She dropped him.”Of course Drake, being Drake, hasn’t exactly recovered from the breakup.”
““Drake was sleeping with [former porn star] Sophie Brussaux behind Jennifer’s back,” a source exclusively told Life & Style.”
“The source added, “She’s just not interested in him anymore.”The singers were hot and heavy during their short-lived romance but called it quits after the 48-year-old star discovered Drake had been cheating.”
“And though he has reached out to tell her so, she isn’t up for a rekindled romance, despite her current heartache.”
““He’s been telling pals that it was his biggest mistake and that she’s ‘the one that got away,’” a source told In Touch.”
“And now that A-Rod cheated on J.Lo, the rapper wants another chance with the star!”


"Drake won't force anything until then." Unfortunately, for Drake, it seems that J. Lo doesn't want to have any cheats in her life
"Drake really wants to settle down and have children one day, and he believes that the right woman will show up at the right time," a source told Hollywood life
“… Shut up. It's not surprising that the 31 year old Canadian is trying to reunite with his ex girlfriend because those close to him have revealed that he is now ready to start a family... "
"In his latest song" diplomatic immunity ", his raps 2010 is" when I lost my aura 2017, I lost a j Lo Rotterdam trip ", which makes me on the front page. Although I have to put low hot topics on the front page, such as your daily clothes are closed, I can never..."
"When she learned about the relationship, it was said to have happened on a trip to Amsterdam," she abandoned him. "Of course, Drake, as Drake, has not fully recovered from the breakup."
"Drake went to bed with (ex porn star) Sophie brusoe behind her back," an exclusive source told life and fashion
"She's just not interested in Drake anymore," the source added The two singers were fiery and heavy in their brief relationship, but they broke up after the 48 year old star found out that Drake had been having an affair
"Although he has told her, but although she is now unbearable heartache, but she did not rekindle romantic hope."
"He kept telling his friends that this was his biggest mistake, and she was the 'one who escaped'," a source said in contact magazine
"Now A-Rod has cheated J.Lo. Rapper wants to talk to the star again!"



Number  922
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott has remained quiet on reports claiming that he’s considering the idea of penning a book about Kourtney and her family.”
“Whether Scott Disick will end up pulling through with the tell-all book has yet to be determined, but with the way things are looking, there’s a possibility it could happen.”
“The statement itself heavily contradicts itself seeing that Scott is dating a 19-year-old, but for the self-proclaimed sex addict, he’s not fond of having another man around his kids, which has resulted to many arguments between the two.”
“Though Scott Disick claims he has moved on with his life, he has not settled well with the idea of having his children around another man, particularly one who is much younger than Kourtney.”
“In recent weeks, it has been said that Kourtney and Scott Disick have not been on good terms because the father of three is still furious over the supposed fact that the TV personality continues to flaunt her romance with boyfriend, Younes Bendjima.”
“Everything forms his strained relationship with his ex-girlfriend to Kim’s alleged strained marriage with Kanye West will be talked about in the book.”
“But, as previously mentioned, Scott doesn’t have any reason why he shouldn’t pull through with the idea since he’s no longer as close with the family as he once was, and the money he’s being offered is astoundingly high.”
“The amount of money that Scott Disick would pocket is definitely tempting for the socialite, who is famously known for being paid to party and appearing on Keeping Up With the Kardashians from time to time.”
“Now that Scott Disick has completely ended his relationship with Kourtney Kardashian and is happily seeing 19-year-old Sofia Richie, he feels as if nothing is holding him back from going ahead with the idea of writing a book about the famous family.”
“According to Life & Style, Scott has been approached by multiple publishers, who have shown great interest in the concept of the book, considering that it would contain nothing but Kardashian scandals that fans would want to know about.”


"Scott was silent about reports that he was considering writing a book about Courtney and his family."
"It's not certain whether Scott Disick will finally finish tell everyone, but it's possible from the current situation."
"The statement itself is quite different from Scott's statement that he is dating a 19-year-old girl, but for the self proclaimed sex addict, he doesn't like to have another man with his child, which has led to a lot of arguments between the two."
Although Scott Disick claimed that he had started his own life, he did not quite accept the idea of having his child with another man, especially a man much younger than Courtney
"In recent weeks, it has been said that Courtney has had a bad relationship with Scott Disick because the father of three is still angry that the TV celebrity continues to show off her love affair with her boyfriend, yones benjima."
"From Kim Jong Un's strained relationship with his ex girlfriend to the so-called strained marriage between Kim Jong Un and Kanye West, all these will be discussed in the book."
"But, as I said, there's no reason why Scott doesn't stick to this idea, because he's not as close to his family as he used to be, and the money he's given is staggering."
"The money Scott disc can make is absolutely attractive to the socialite because he is known for going to parties and keeping in touch with the kardashians from time to time."
"Now Scott Disick has completely ended his relationship with Courtney Kardashian and is happy to meet Sophia Ritchie, 19, who feels that nothing can stop him from writing a book about this famous family."
"According to life and fashion magazine, a number of publishers have approached Scott and expressed great interest in the concept of the book. They think the book has nothing but a Kardashian style scandal and fans want to know about it."



Number  923
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementBrad Pitt and Angelina Jolie have not commented on their ongoing divorce settlement.”
“I wanna grab it so bad!!”
“It’s almost been two years since the power couple called it quits but they still haven’t finalized the divorce.”
“Things looked like they improved last year, but a new snag might put their divorce settlement on hold once again.”
“Pitt and Jolie announced their split back in the summer of 2016.”
“At the time, Jolie took their six kids and struck out on her own.”
“Pitt, meanwhile, was forced to confront several different scandals, including accusations of child abuse.”
“After the mudslinging stopped and the two started communicating again, it seemed as though Pitt and Jolie were on the verge of finalizing the divorce and moving on.”
“While they have been close to signing the divorce papers, two big issues keep preventing them from coming to an agreement.”
“?”


"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie didn't comment on their ongoing divorce settlement."
"I really want to catch it!"
"It's almost two years since the powerful couple broke up, but they haven't finalized the divorce agreement yet."
"Things seem to be getting better last year, but new obstacles may put their divorce agreements on hold again."
"Pete and Julie broke up in the summer of 2016."
"At that time, Julie went out on her own with their six children."
Meanwhile, Pitt was forced to face several different scandals, including child abuse charges
"When the quarrel stops and they start to communicate again, it seems that Pete and Julie are going to divorce and move on."
"Although they are close to signing a divorce agreement, there are two big problems that have been preventing them from reaching an agreement."
“?”



Number  924
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below.”
“Fans love the show SO MUCH that they’re already asking about season 2, or if there’s even going to be one.”
“Calm down everyone, Perrie Edward‘s, 23, review of Selena Gomez‘s, 24, 13 Reasons Why isn’t nearly as harsh as it sounds.”
“In fact, it’s SUPER NICE.”
“Yes the Little Mix singer thought the Netflix series was “massively disturbing,” but she meant it in a positive, empowering way.”
“And besides, aren’t the greatest works of art the ones that make us feel and think?”
““The way they got the message across was amazing, and although I found it massively disturbing, I feel like every person going to school should watch it.” See — Perrie totally loved it!”
“It’s a good thing too, since 13 Reasons Why is basically Selena’s baby.”
“The “Hands To Myself” hitmaker took time away from her singing career to produce the series, which probably was a little frightening at least, but the results totally paid off.”
““We don’t know what is going to go beyond it, but we know there are so many stories that lie beneath each character,” Selena explained to The Hollywood Reporter.”


"Tell us below."
"Fans love the show very much. They're already asking if there's a second season, or if there's going to be a second season."
"Calm down, Perry Edwards, 23, on Selena Gomez, 24, 13, why isn't that harsh as it sounds."
"In fact, that's great."
"Yes, the little Remix singer thinks the Netflix series is" very disturbing, "but she expresses it in a positive and convincing way."
"Besides, isn't the greatest work of art something we feel and think about?"
"The way they deliver their message is amazing, and although I find it very disturbing, I think everyone who goes to school should see it." Look - Perry loves it very much
"It's also a good thing, because 13 reasons are basically Serena's children."
"The producer of" reach out to me "took time out of her singing career to make the series, which may be at least a little scary, but it turned out to be totally rewarding."
"We don't know what's going to happen next, but we know there's a lot of stories behind each character," Selena explained to Hollywood reporters



Number  925
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementInstead, the actress is focusing on her family and adjusting to life as a single mom.”
“Despite multiple reports, an insider close to the actress says that she is not dating Josh Duhamel.”
“The Love, Simon star is reportedly dating Josh Duhamel, who split with Fergie a few months ago.”
“How does Affleck feel about his ex-wife dating again?”
“According to Café Mom, an inside source revealed that Garner has been secretly dating Duhamel for a few months.”
“The source explained that Garner was having trouble finding a man she could trust and that Duhamel is pretty much the perfect guy.”
“Although the actress is still keeping things tightly under wraps, her relationship with Duhamel couldn’t be going any better.”
““Anyone in Jen’s shoes, after all she went through with Ben, would doubt whether they could ever trust a man again,” the insider stated.”
““But Josh is truly a good guy, and spending time with him opened her up emotionally.”
“She’s still playing her cards close to the vest, but she’s excited about where this could go.”Duhamel parted with Fergie back in September.”


Instead, the actress is focusing on her family and adapting to the life of a single mother
"Despite multiple reports, an insider close to the actress said she was not dating Josh Duhamel."
"Simon Starr is reported to be dating Josh Duhamel, who broke up with Ferguson a few months ago
"How does Affleck feel about his ex-wife dating again?"
"According to CAF é mom, an insider said Ghana had been secretly dating duhamer for several months."
"The source explained that it's hard for Ghana to find a man she can trust, and Duhamel is a perfect person."
"Although the actress is still secretive, her relationship with Duhamel can't be better."
"After Jane and Ben have gone through so much, anyone in Jane's position will doubt whether they can trust another man," the person familiar with the matter said
"But Josh is really a good person. The time with him makes her emotionally cheerful."
"She's still trying to play cards, but she's excited about what's going on." In September, Duhamel broke up with Ferguson



Number  926
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It played a role in her wanting to marry Justin.”For more on Aniston and Theroux’s split, pick up the new issue of Us Weekly, on stands now!”
““Jen has struggled with the perception that she is this pathetic woman after the divorce from Brad,” the insider tells Us.”
“Pitt and Jolie, who share Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11 and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivienne, called it quits in September 2016 after two years of marriage and 12 years together.”
“He infamously moved on from the Friends alum with his Mr. and Mrs. Smith costar, Angelina Jolie.”
“While it was Theroux’s first marriage, Aniston was married to Pitt, 54, from 2000 to 2005.”
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”The duo, who started dating in May 2011, tied the knot in August 2015.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“...decided to announce our separation...”
“Jen assured him they weren t a big deal but Justin wasn t thrilled Justin had moments of insecurity like that As previously reported Aniston 49 and Theroux 46 announced their separation on Thursday February 15 via a joint statement In an effort to reduce any further speculation we have...”
““Sweet little Post-its like, ‘You looked nice tonight’ or ‘Miss you already.’”The source explains that impact of those little notes was huge.”


"It played a role in her attempt to marry Justin." To learn more about Aniston's breakup with Cyrus, check out the new issue of American weekly and start now
"After her divorce from Brad, Jennifer has been struggling to think of herself as this poor woman," people familiar with the matter told us
"Pitt and Julie have 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11 year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian. They announced their separation in September 2016 after two years of marriage and 12 years of cohabitation."
"He left his friends' Alumni Club in disgrace and left with his Smiths' partner, Angelina Jolie."
When it was seru's first marriage, Aniston married Pitt, 54, from 2000 to 2005
"We are two best friends and have decided to break up, but we are looking forward to continuing our cherished friendship." The two started dating in May 2011 and married in August 2015
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
“… Decided to announce our separation... "
"Jane assured him that they were not a big deal, but Justin was not excited that Justin had such unsafe moments. As previously reported, Aniston 49 and Cyrus 46 announced that they had adopted a joint statement on Thursday, February 15, to reduce any further speculation, we have..."
"Cute little posts, such as' you look good tonight 'or' I miss you so much '" The source explained that the impact of these little notes is huge



Number  927
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Pitt is beginning work on a new film and will juggle filming and going back forth to London to see his kids, multiple sources tell PEOPLE.”
“The court also outlined a detailed summer visitation schedule for the couple.”
“Angelina Jolie is in danger of losing primary custody of her six children to estranged husband Brad Pitt.”
“According to court documents obtained by The Blast, this could occur if she doesn’t take steps to improve their relationship with their father.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A judge in the couple s ongoing divorce case said the six children not having a relationship with their father is harmful to them adding that it is critical that each of them have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother Furthermore the judge said in court...”
“...documents If the minor children remain closed down to their father and depending on the circumstances surrounding this condition it may result in a reduction of the time they spend with Jolie and may result in the Court ordering primary physical custody to Pitt Reps for both Jolie 43 and...”
“Pitt 54 have not yet responded to a request for comment...”
“Jolie filed for divorce from Pitt on September 19, 2016.”
“The have six children: Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 12, and 9-year old twins Vivienne and Knox.”


"At the same time, Pete is working on a new film, which will take care of both shooting and going back to London to see the children," a number of sources told people
"The court also set out a detailed schedule for the couple's summer visits."
"Angelina Jolie is in danger of losing primary custody of her six children to her separated husband, Brad Pitt."
"According to the court documents obtained from the explosion, this could happen if she did not take measures to improve her relationship with her father."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A judge in the divorce case being heard by the couple said it was harmful for them that the six children had no relationship with their father, adding that each of them had to have a healthy and strong relationship with their father and mother, and the judge said in court..."
“… If the minor children are still not open to their father, and as the case may be, this may reduce their time with Julie and may lead to the court ordering Pitt to represent Julie 43 and... "
"Pete 54 hasn't responded to a request for comment..."
"Julie filed for divorce with Pete on September 19, 2016."
They have six children: 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 12-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox



Number  928
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Even saying it gets me a little tight in my throat.’For the full story, and to see more exclusive pictures of Jen's baby bump, see this weeks issue of New Idea - out now!”
“‘While Jen is hopeful that she and Brad will work things out, she’s also preparing herself for the fact that she may have to raise this baby alone.”
“It’s believed Brad and Jen – who rekindled their fairytale romance after Jen’s marriage to Justin Theroux ended earlier this year – have been on the rocks in recent weeks because of Brad’s controversial relationship with Neri Oxman.”
“Last month reports surfaced that Brad had been caught getting cosy with the beautiful young architect, leaving Jen feeling insecure and concerned about their relationship.”
“Added to this is the fact Jen’s also under immense pressure during her bitter divorce from Justin Theroux, from whom she split in February, and it’s a difficult time for the actress.”
“‘She’s under a lot of stress at the moment, so... all these questions about a surprise pregnancy are the last thing she wants,’ adds the source.”
“‘Not only is she going through a messy divorce, she’s having problems with Brad.”
“Ever since his friendship with Neri went public, she’s been doubting their relationship and wondering whether he is serious about building a new life with her.”
“‘Brad is desperately trying to convince Jen that they’re just friends and that he’s committed but Jen just isn’t buying it.”
“‘She’s very wary of him – after all, it feels like only yesterday that he cheated on her with Angelina and destroyed their marriage.”


"Even that makes me feel a little nervous." For a complete story and more exclusive photos of Jennifer, check out this week's new idea out now
"While Jane hopes that she and Brad can solve the problem, she is also preparing for the possibility that she will have to raise the child on her own."
"Brad and Jen are believed to have rekindled a fairy tale romance after Jen's marriage to Justin Cyrus ended earlier this year. In recent weeks, Brad's controversial relationship with Neri Oxman has put the couple in a dilemma
"It was reported last month that Brad was found to be on good terms with this beautiful young architect, which made Jane uneasy and worried about their relationship."
In addition, Jennifer was under a lot of pressure during her painful divorce from Justin Theroux, who broke up in February, a tough time for the actress
"She's under a lot of pressure now, so... All these questions about unwanted pregnancies are the last thing she wants
"Not only did she have a messy divorce, but she also had problems with Brad."
"Ever since his friendship with Nelly was made public, she has always doubted their relationship and whether he really wants to build a new life with her."
"Brad tried to convince Jane that they were just friends. He was loyal, but Jane just didn't buy it."
"She's very wary of him - after all, it feels like he and Angelina cheated her and ruined their marriage, just yesterday."



Number  929
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Cheryl meanwhile, has been back in the recording studio with producers Team Salut and is keen to make a return to solo music.”
“Another tweeted: 'Why's @LiamPayne being all gangster it doesn't suit him, he was better when was sweet n innocent sort him out @CherylOfficial [sic]'.”
“Cheryl has been supported by her brother Gary and his partner, who she has moved into Liam's home in Woking.”
“'It is not real life and is not the life Cheryl and Liam are currently living as a couple.'”
“'There are the very real strains of trying to adapt to parenthood whilst being in the spotlight and having to appear as though everything is rosy all of the time.”
“A friend Cheryl said: 'The fact of the matter is, like most young couple's with busy work lives and the demands of an infant they have been struggling to spend time together.”
“Fans of the couple are concerned that they haven't been pictured together since AugustThe last time they were seen in public was at The X Factor last October.”
“Fans have recently questioned why the couple have not been pictured on social media together since August last year.”
“She doesn’t like going out much as she used to.'”
“A source told MailOnline: 'Cheryl basically went into hibernation when she got pregnant and has made the decision to be a stay at home mother with no nanny and is looking after bear herself.”


"At the same time, Cheryl has returned to the studio to pay tribute to the producer team and is eager to return to solo music."
Another tweeted: "why is @ liampayne a hooligan? It's not for him. He'll be fine when sweet is innocent, @ Cheryl official (SIC)."
"Cheryl had the support of her brother Gary and his partner, and she moved them to Liam's home in woking."
"It's not real life, it's not the life Cheryl and Liam are living as a couple now."
"In the spotlight, if you want to adapt to parenting, you have to always act as if everything is good. It's a very real pressure."
A friend Cheryl said: "in fact, like most young couples, they have a busy work life and a high demand for a baby. They have been trying to spend time together."
"Fans of the couple worry that they haven't taken a picture together since August. Their last public appearance was at x factor last October. "
"Fans recently questioned why the couple didn't take pictures on social media since last August."
"She doesn't like going out as much as she used to."
"A source told mailonline:" Cheryl basically went into hibernation after she became pregnant. She has decided to be a full-time mother without a nanny and take care of the cub herself. "



Number  930
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Blessings, Ted — Theodore Melfi (@theodoremelfi) January 9, 2017Later, Pharrell himself took to Twitter to tell Bush Hager that "everyone makes mistakes."”
“"We all get to the peak together or we don't get there at all."”
“"We've all been in live situations and you make a mistake," said Roker, adding how he forgot Braveheart when he was interviewing Mel Gibson and referred to Jessica Biel as Jessica Alba during his Sunday interviews.”
“Both Roker and Morales swooped in to defend Bush Hager, with Roker blasting the "culture of Twitter and waiting to pounce on people" for what he said is a common mistake for live TV broadcasters.”
“I apologize to both the cast, to Pharrell, but it was a mistake and I hope we can move on."”
“And what I didn't want to do is make anyone lesser than who they are.”
“"I am authentic, but a human.”
“"It was a mistake, because ya'll know I'm not perfect," continued Bush Hager, who at this point began to choke up and get teary-eyed.”
“While some users posted jokes and memes, others such as Gabrielle Union and Justin Simien noted their disappointment about the confusion and comedian-actress Robin Thede said, "All movies with black people don't sound alike."”
“Later in the night, Michael Keaton made the same notable error when presenting the best supporting actress award, sparking the term #HiddenFences to trend on Twitter.”


Blessing, Ted Theodore Melfi (@ theodoremelfi) after January 9, 2017, Farrell himself tweeted to Bush Hager: "everyone makes mistakes."
"We all got to the top of the mountain together, otherwise we couldn't get there at all."
"We're all at the scene and you made a mistake," said rock, adding that he forgot the brave heart when he interviewed Mel Gibson and called Jessica bell jessica alba in his Sunday interview
"Both rock and Morales rushed to defend Bush Hager. Rock attacked" Twitter culture, waiting to pounce on people "because he said it was a common mistake of live TV stations."
"I apologize to the actors and Farrell, but it's a mistake and I hope we can move on."
"What I don't want to do is make anyone worse than themselves."
"I'm human, but I'm human."
"It's a mistake because you'll know I'm not perfect," bushhager continued, who started choking and tearful at this point
When some users post jokes and memes, others, such as the Gabriel League and Justin Simien, are disappointed by their confusion. "All black movies sound different," says comedian Robin tide
"Later that evening, Michael Keaton made the same obvious mistake in presenting the best supporting actress award, triggering the popularity of the word" hidden fence "on twitter."



Number  931
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Take a look at some of the reactions on Twitter to Jolie's meeting with the archbishop below:SHAMELESS ANGELINA JOLIE GOES BRALESS ON A MEETING WITH ARCHBISHOP OFÂ CANTERBURY https://t.co/8WgEntSPsR pic.twitter.com/enJIwAX8Aq — BaronessJMedia&Event (@Baronessj) March 17, 2017”
“Another user mockingly asked the archbishop to maintain his focus, "Eyes up, Archbishop!"”
“On Thursday (16 March), the 41-year-old actress sat down with Justin Welby, the Archbishop of Canterbury, to discuss pressing issues; unfortunately, it was her alleged braless look that grabbed eyeballs sending Twitter into a meltdown.”
“Fans shocked by the actress' daring outfit began criticising her soon after her pictures from the meeting were tweeted by the Anglican leader.”
“"Privilege to welcome UNHCR Special Envoy Angelina Jolie.”
“Discussed refugee crisis, South Sudan and prevention of sexual violence in conflict," the archbishop had captioned the pictures.”
“"She needs a bra.”
“Looks like she could poke someone's eye out.”
“How embarrassing!"”
“...a shocked viewer wrote on Twitter.”


Take a look at some of the reactions on Twitter to Julie's meeting with the Archbishop below: the shameless Angelina Jolie was in no hurry during her meeting with the Archbishop of Canterbury https://t.co/8wgentsprpic.twitter.com/enJIwAX8Aq-Baronessj Media and events (@ baronessj) March 17, 2017 "
Another user sarcastically asked the Archbishop to stay focused, "raise your eyes, Archbishop!"
"On Thursday (March 16), the 41 year old actress sat down with the Archbishop of Canterbury, Justin Welby, to discuss pressing issues; unfortunately, it was her so-called listless expression that caught the eye and caused twitter to collapse."
"Shortly after the Anglican leader tweeted her picture at the conference, fans were shocked by the actress's bold dress and began to criticize her."
"It's a great honor to welcome Angelina Jolie, the special envoy of the United Nations High Commissioner for refugees."
"The refugee crisis, South Sudan and the prevention of sexual violence in conflict were discussed," the Archbishop wrote under the title of the picture
"She needs a bra."
"It looks like she can poke people's eyes out."
"How embarrassing!"
“… A shocked audience wrote on twitter



Number  932
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With such an important and private subject we can definitely understand why the “Let Me Love You” singer would feel the way he did.”
“...week when one of them asked him if Hailey was pregnant...”
“They really want to do things how they perceive to be the right way It s clear that Justin keeps his beliefs close to his heart and although he s usually very pleasant to photographers he was clearly annoyed last...”
“That’s very important to them both.”
“Because of their shared faith, neither Justin or Hailey would want her to get pregnant before they were married.”
““They’ve spoken about starting a family and it’s definitely something they want to do as soon as they are married.”
““Hailey loves kids too, and they both share the same morals and family values, it’s one of the many things Justin loves so much about Hailey,” the source continued.”
“...see how much he loves children In addition to Justin Hailey is a huge fan of children and seems to embody the qualities that would make her an excellent parent...”
“Justin would love to have a big family and he is going to be an awesome dad he s already an amazing big brother to Jaxon and when you see how he is with his young fans you can just...”
““Justin wants to be a dad more than pretty much anything else in the world, he absolutely loves and adores children, and cannot wait to have kids of his own,” a source close to Justin EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.”


"With such an important and private topic, we can fully understand why the singer of" let me love you "feels like this."
“… When one of them asked him if Haley was pregnant... "
"They really want to do things the way they think they are right, and it's clear that Justin takes his beliefs to heart, and although he's usually very friendly to photographers, he was obviously annoyed last month..."
"It's important for both of them."
"Because of their common beliefs, neither Justin nor Haley wants her to get pregnant before she gets married."
"They talked about starting a family. It must be something they want to do as soon as they get married."
"Haley also loves children, and they all share the same moral and family values, which is one of many things Justin likes Haley very much," the source continued
“… Look at how much he loves children except Justin Haley, who is a huge fan of children, seems to embody the quality that makes her an excellent parent... "
"Justin hopes to have a big family. He will become a great father. He is already a great brother of Jackson. When you see him with his young fans, you can..."
A source close to Justin said in an exclusive interview with Hollywood Life: "Justin most wants to be a father. He absolutely loves and adores children and can't wait to have his own children."



Number  933
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They were married in August 2015 after getting engaged in August 2012.”
“Justin and Jennifer Aniston, 49, released a statement in February announcing their decision to separate at the end of 2017.”
“It includes leather iPhone cases, silk tracksuits along with gold and silver bottle opener charms.”
“...misfit punk...”
“Good times Sienna and Justin beamed while at the launch party for the Bruv Club collection Fashion brand Katie Lyall and Charlotte Stockdale who founded Chaos were at the NYC party Their new Bruv Club collection was described as a celebration of the tomboy the modette the geezer ladette the...”
“Chaos was created by stylists Charlotte Stockdale and Katie Lyall.”
“He sported a thick dark beard and accessorized with a watch.”
“Together again: The 36-year-old actress and 46-year-old actor last week were vacationing together in the South of FranceJustin opted for the casual look in a plain blue untucked long-sleeved shirt and black trousers.”
“She had her long blonde hair down around her shoulders and accentuated her natural beauty with red lipstick.”
“Sienna shined in a short-sleeved yellow floral print dress.”


"They were engaged in August 2012 and married in August 2015."
"Justin and 49 year old Jennifer Aniston issued a statement in February, announcing their decision to separate at the end of 2017."
It includes leather iPhone case, silk sportswear and gold and silver bottle opener accessories
“… Out of place punk... "
"Good time Siena and Justin smile at the launch of the bluff Club series fashion brands Katie Lyle and Charlotte Stockdale. They created chaos. At the party in New York, their new bluff Club series is described as a celebration of tomboy modet gizel RADT..."
"Chaos was created by stylists Charlotte Stockdale and Katie Lyle."
"He has a thick black beard and a watch."
"Together again: the 36 year old actress and the 46 year old actress were on holiday in southern France last week, choosing a simple blue button less long sleeve shirt and black trousers for casual wear."
She has long golden hair on her shoulders, and uses red lipstick to emphasize her natural beauty.
"Sina is wearing a short sleeve yellow print skirt."



Number  934
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“5.17.19.”Waiting for your permission to load the Instagram Media.”
“The message said, “See you in a year, Mr. Wick,” and included the caption, “It's a date.”
“She posted a note scrawled on paper from The Continental in NYC.”
“Meanwhile, Berry recently teased the movie's opening date on Instagram.”
“The site also points out that Halle has only been on the NYC set for one day so far, which isn't much time to strike up a romance.”
“The Mega Agency Gossip Cop, however, reached out to a Berry source, who shut down the reports.”
“The two stars were photographed looking pretty chummy on the set of their new film “John Wick: Chapter 3,” sparking rumors they were seeing each other.”
“The Mega AgencyAre Halle Berry and Keanu Reeves dating?”


"5.17.19." waiting for your permission to load instagram media. "
The message said "see you in a year, Mr. wicker" with the title "this is a date."
"She put a piece of scribbled paper on Continental Airlines in New York."
Meanwhile, berry recently raised the release date of the movie on instagram
"The website also points out that Halley has only been on the set in New York for one day so far and has not had much time to fall in love."
"However, the scandal police of this large organization contacted a source from Bray, who closed the reports."
"The two stars were photographed on the set of their new film, John wicker: Chapter three, looking very close, which triggered rumors of their meeting."
Are Halle Berry and Keanu Reeves on a date? "



Number  935
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A source said: 'She loves Vegas and the schedule was perfect for her and her kids, so why not continue?'”
“The Womanizer singer likely return to Las Vegas in 2019 for another residency at the MGM Park Theater at the Monte Carlo Resort, and it was an easy decision for her to make.”
“'They were having fun and enjoying each other’s company, but then they fell in love,' the insider said.”
“...important to her at this point in her life seen on Instagram A source revealed that her year long relationship with the fitness model sort of just happened...”
“Disney day One quality Britney loves about her younger boyfriend is his ability to connect with her kids seen on Instagram Adorable While the performer may have babies on the brain she doesn t seem too quick to add another marriage under her belt as it just doesn t seem...”
“While the performer may have babies on the brain, she doesn't seem too quick to add another marriage under her belt as 'it just doesn’t seem important to her at this point in her life.'”
“'Sam will skateboard with them around the gated community, play sports and spend a lot of time in the pool,' the source said, adding that 'Squirt gun and water fights are a constant' in their household.”
“Love: An insider told the publication that the 36-year-old hitmaker and her 23-year-old boyfriend have 'talked about having babies together'; seen on InstagramOne quality Britney loves about her younger boyfriend is his ability to connect with her kids.”
“'She would love to have a baby girl,' the source said.”
“The Toxic singer shares her sons with ex-husband Kevin Federline, who she married in 2004 before divorcing three years later.”


"A source said: 'she likes Las Vegas and this schedule is perfect for her and her children. Why not continue?"
"The Playboy singer is likely to return to Las Vegas in 2019 and live again at the MGM Park theater at the Monte Carlo Resort, which is an easy decision for her."
"They had a good time together and enjoyed it, but then they fell in love," the person said
“… It's very important to her at this point in her life. A source I saw on instagram showed that her one-year relationship with fitness models happened like this... "
"One of Britney Spears' favorite young boyfriends on Disney day is that he can connect with the children he sees on instagram. He's cute, but the performer may have children in his mind. It seems that she won't have another marriage under her belt too soon, because it doesn't seem to be..."
"Although the performer may have children in her head, she doesn't seem to be in a hurry to add another marriage under her belt, because" at this point in her life, it doesn't seem to matter to her. "
"Sam will skate, do sports and spend a lot of time in the swimming pool with them in the community with a gate," the source said, adding that "water gun and water gun fighting are common in their homes."
"Love: an insider told the magazine that hitmaker, 36, and her 23-year-old boyfriend" talked about having a baby together "; Britney Spears' love for her young boyfriend, seen on instagram one, is his ability to connect with children."
"She would love to have a baby girl," the source said
"The toxic singer shares her son with her ex husband, Kevin Federline, who married in 2004 and divorced three years later."



Number  936
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementBut still, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie continue to try and work out a custody agreement and divorce settlement that they both can be happy with, but insiders say the two remain at odds.”
“...in L A with their children...”
“Is the couple ready to take the next step in their relationship?”
““Brad cannot get enough of her and he thinks the next step is having her meet his children,” claims an insider.”
“The source also said that Oxman – an MIT professor – “wears the pants in their relationship,” but Pitt doesn’t have a problem with that.”
“The 54 year old is telling friends that his is in love and his sexual chemistry with Oxman is off the hook Pitt split with Angelina Jolie back in September 2016 and the two are still trying to reach a settlement in their divorce and a custody agreement for Maddox...”
“16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 Knox 9 and Vivienne 9”
“Pitt wants to be certain that there are provisions in the custody agreement that will make sure he gets custodial time with all of his kids.”
“Brad Pitt & Angelina Jolie are still having custody issues.”
“...https t co SXSj5Mq8cH Perez Hilton PerezHilton May 25 2018 To make things easier on the kids Jolie bought a house near Pitt s but sources say that the actress has been hesitant to make a custody agreement with her ex because he has essentially forced her to settle down...”


Nevertheless, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are still trying to reach a custody agreement and divorce agreement that both sides are satisfied with, but insiders say there are still differences between them
“… In Los Angeles and their children... "
"Is the couple ready to take the next step in their relationship?"
"Brad can't be content with her, he thinks the next step is to let her see his children," a person familiar with the matter claimed
"The source also said MIT professor Oxman" wears pants in their relationship, "but Pitt has no opinion about it."
"Pitt, 54, told his friends that he was in love and that the chemical reaction between him and Oxman had disappeared. Pitt and Angelina Jolie broke up as early as September 2016. They are still trying to reach a divorce agreement and a custody agreement for Maddox..."
"16 people 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 Knox 9 and Vivian 9"
"Pete wants to make sure there are some provisions in the guardianship agreement that will ensure that he and all the children have guardianship time."
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie still have custody issues."
“… HTTPS t Co sxsj5mq8ch Perez Hilton on May 25, 2018, in order to facilitate the children, Julie bought a house near Pete, but it is reported that the actress has been hesitating whether to reach a custody agreement with her ex girlfriend, because he basically forced her to settle down... "



Number  937
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We love you.”
“Our daughters may be older and taller now, but they’ll always be your little girls.”
“I don't know how or why Luna, my family and I got so lucky in this life but I will stop questioning and just be grateful.”
“10 years ago, I didn't think he could get better, then I got to see him as a father.”
“To see him go from big goals to big ideas to big wins and the love of so many makes me so so happy.”
“I cannot believe how much he has grown as a man and a husband.”
“'In all our time together (11ish years!!?!?)”
“'I took this photo right after John won his Tony a couple weeks ago,' wrote Teigan, alongside a cheerful image of John Legend.”
“Chrissy Teigan:As per usual, Chrissy Teigan graces social media with the ultimate admiration for her husband, John Legend.”
“2.”


"We love you."
"Our daughters may be bigger and taller now, but they will always be your little ones."
"I don't know how Luna, my family and I were so lucky or why, but I'll stop questioning and be grateful."
"Ten years ago, I didn't expect him to get better. Then I saw him as a father."
"I'm happy to see him go from big goal to big idea to big win with so many people's love."
"I can't believe how much he's grown up as a man and a husband."
"'All the time we've been together (11 years old!?)"
"I took this picture a few weeks ago after John won the Tony Award," tegan wrote, alongside the cheerful image of John's legend
"Chrissy teigan: normally, Chrissy teigan has the ultimate admiration for her husband, John Legend, on social media
“2.”



Number  938
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, what were your thoughts on Kristen and Robert hanging out?”
“Stop it!)”
“Does that mean he wants to get back together with her?”
“Get the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“People LOVE when couples rekindle their romances, but is a reunion in the cards for Kristen Stewart, 27, and Robert Pattinson, 31?”
“The Twilight alums were spotted “hanging out” together on Feb. 11, and we’re hearing that the former couple are on good terms now!”
““It’s taken a long time to get there, but Rob and Kristen are finally friends again,” a source close to Rob told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Their break-up was so painful for Rob, and he felt so angry and humiliated by Kristen cheating, that at one point he doubted he would ever be able to fully forgive her.”
“But, time heals and Rob’s now managed to put the past behind him and let bygones be bygones.”But even though the pair have a past with each other, don’t expect them them to be getting together in the future.”
““Rob and Kristen have so much shared history, they were together during the craziest time in their lives, they pretty much grew up together during the whole Twilight madness, and they really understand each other better than anyone else could.”


"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Christine and Robert together?"
"Stop it!"
"Does that mean he wants to make up with her?"
"Get exclusive details!"
"People love it when couples rekindle their romance, but is reunion a greeting card for Kristen Stewart, 27, and Robert Pattinson, 31?"
Twilight alumni were found hanging out together on February 11. We heard that the old couple have a good relationship now
A source close to rob told reporters: "although it took a long time, rob and Christine finally became friends again." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Their breakup was too painful for rob. He was angry and humiliated at Christine's deception and once doubted whether he could completely forgive her."
"But with the passage of time, rob finally forgot the past and let it go." But even if they have a past, don't expect them to be together in the future
"Rob and Christine have a lot in common. They spent the craziest time of their lives together. In the craziness of twilight, they almost grew up together. They really know each other better than anyone else."



Number  939
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jeter made more than $265 million in salary during his storied tenure with the Yankees, according to Baseball Reference.”
“...pic.twitter.com/EjQpoNgiqT — New York Yankees (@Yankees) August 18, 2017Jeter founded The Players' Tribune in 2014 as a platform for athletes to connect directly with fans.”
“File photo by John Angelillo/UPI | License PhotoDerek Jeter unveils the Monument Park Plaque with Hannah Jeter at a ceremony retiring his number on May 14 at Yankee Stadium in New York City.”
“File photo by John Angelillo/UPI | License PhotoDerek Jeter stands with Hannah Jeter in Monument Park at a ceremony retiring his number on May 14 at Yankee Stadium in New York City.”
“File photo by Elsa/UPI | License PhotoAug. 18 (UPI) -- Future baseball Hall of Famer Derek Jeter entered the hallowed halls of fatherhood Thursday with the birth of daughter Bella Raine Jeter.”
“The Players' Tribune confirmed the report.”
“Jeter's former team, the New York Yankees, also offered congratulations.”
“AdvertisementJeter and wife Hannah Davis were engaged in 2015.”
“They were married in July of 2016 in Napa, Calif.”
“The 20-year baseball veteran is currently part of an ownership group that has an agreement in place to buy the Miami Marlins for $1.2 billion.”


"According to baseball reference, Jeter earned more than $265 million during his legendary term with the Yankees."
“... pic.twitter.com/EjQpoNgiqT -New York Yankees (@ Yankees) on August 18, 2017, Jeter founded the players forum in 2014 as a platform for athletes to connect directly with fans. "
"On May 14, at Yankee Stadium in New York City, the information photo of John angelillo / UPI | license photographers Drake Jett and Hannah Jett unveiled the plaque of memorial park at the retirement ceremony."
"On May 14, at Yankee Stadium in New York City, John angelillo / UPI took the information photo | license photo Drake Jett and Hannah Jett at a retirement ceremony in Memorial Park."
"Photos of Elsa / UPI | license photos August. Derek Jeter of the future Baseball Hall of fame entered the hallowed father's Palace on the 18th with the birth of her daughter Bella Raine Jeter
"Player Tribune confirmed the report
"Congratulations to Jeter's former team, the New York Yankees."
"Jeter and his wife Hannah Davis got engaged in 2015."
"They got married in Napa, California, in July 2016."
"The 20-year baseball veteran is currently a member of an ownership group that has reached an agreement to buy Miami Marlin for $1.2 billion."



Number  940
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A photo posted by Taylor Swift (@taylorswift) on Jul 17, 2016 at 9:14pm PDTWhy People Love Bass...”
“That moment when Kanye West secretly records your phone call, then Kim posts it on the Internet.”
“(The line in question: "For all my Southside niggas that know me best / I feel like me and Taylor might still have sex / I made that bitch famous.")”
“Kardashian teased the reveal on Twitter earlier in the evening, and West's feud with Swift was the basis for one of the major plotlines on tonight's episode of Keeping Up with the Kardashians.”
“In the footage posted on Snapchat, West asks Swift for permission to use a version of the line over the phone from his studio.”
“She gives her consent and thanks him for bringing the line to her before recording and releasing it.”
“It's still unclear just how much Swift knew about the ultimate phrasing of the line, but it's obvious she agrees its sentiment is acceptable.”
“(If you'd rather read than watch, The Fader has transcribed the footage.”
“You'll miss legendary producer Rick Rubin hanging out on a couch in the background, though.)”
“Here is the entire conversation Taylor & Kanye had, judge for yourself.”


"Taylor Swift (@ Taylor Swift) released a photo at 9:14 pm on July 17, 2016. Why do people like bath..."
"At that moment, Kanye West secretly recorded your phone, and Kim sent it to the Internet."
"To get to know my southern nigger best / I think Tyler and I might have sex again / I made that bitch famous.")
"Kardashian tweeted the news earlier that night, and the feud between West and swift is the basis of one of the main plots of tonight's" follow Kardashian. "
"In the video released on snapchat, West asked swift for permission to use the phone line version of his studio."
"She agreed and thanks him for bringing the call to her before the recording and release."
"It's not clear how much swift knows about the final wording of the line, but it's clear that she agrees that the line is acceptable."
"(if you'd rather read than watch, the volume controller has transcribed the video."
"But you'll miss legendary producer Rick Rubin hanging out on the sofa."
"This is the whole conversation between Tyler and Kanye. Judge for yourself."



Number  941
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Thanks for signing up to the Independent Culture newsletter verifyErrors message verifyErrors verifyErrors message verifyErrors The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here...”
“The Independent would like to keep you informed about offers events and updates by email please tick the box if you would like to be contacted Read our full mailing list consent terms here Independent Culture Newsletter The best in film music TV radio straight to your inbox every week...”
“Last weekend, Parker was branded “cruel” by Sex and the City co-star Cattrall in a scathing Instagram post which saw her publicly criticise her co-star for a message she sent following the untimely death of her brother, Chris.”
“Molly Shannon, who plays Parker's friend on HBO series Divorce, has deemed the actor “Hollywood royalty.”“I didn't read about that but I know, for me, Sarah is just so supportive and so wonderful and we just get along so well,” Shannon told Entertainment Tonight.”
“Referencing Divorce which was created by Catastrophe s Sharon Horgan Shannon continued It doesn t really feel like work because we have so much in common and she loves funny women and is just so genuinely supportive and kind and like a girls girl Following the sudden death of Cattrall...”
“...s brother Parker posted on social media Dearest Kim my love and condolences to you and yours and Godspeed to your beloved brother...”
“Xx TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Show all 16 1 16 TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Jessica Jones Starring Krysten Ritter Rachael Taylor Carrie Anne Moss David Tennant Start date 8 March Netflix Netflix TV preview...”
“2018 Everything to look out for The OA Starring Brit Marling Emory Cohen Phyllis Smith Patrick Gibson Jason Isaacs Start date 15 March Netflix TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Trust Starring Hilary Swank Brendan Fraser Donald Sutherland Harris Dickinson Anna Chancellor Start date 25 March 2018 AMC”
“Sky Atlantic air date TBA FX Productions TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for A Series of Unfortunate Events Starring Neil Patrick Harris Malina Weissman Patrick Warburton Lucy Punch Tony Hale Nathan Fillion Start date 30 March Netflix TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Atlanta Robbin Starring...”
“Neil Patrick Harris Malina Weissman Patrick Warburton Lucy Punch Tony Hale Nathan Fillion Start date 30 March FOX UK air date TBA Matthias Clamer FX TV preview 2018 Everything to look out for Legion Starring Dan Stevens Rachel Keller Aubrey Plaza Jean Smart Jemaine Clement Start date 17 April FOX”


"Thank you for registering for the independent cultural communication verifyerrors message verifyerrors message verifyerrors the independent would like to inform you of the offer and update information by e-mail. Please check the box. If you wish to contact, please read our complete mailing list and agree terms here..."
"The independent would like to inform you of the offer and updates by email. Please check the box. If you would like to contact, please read our complete mailing list. Agree terms here independent culture newsletters best movie music TV broadcast will be sent directly to your in box every week..."
Last weekend, Parker posted a stern post on instagram, labeled "cruel" by sex and the city co star katlar, who publicly criticized her co star's message after her brother Chris died young
"Molly Shannon, who plays Parker's friend in the HBO series divorce, thinks the actor is a" Hollywood royalty. ". "I didn't read about it, but I know that for me, Sarah was so supportive, so great, and we got along so well," Shannon told entertainment tonight
"Referring to the divorce created by Sharon Horgan Shannon in catastrophes, she goes on to say that it's not a real job, because we have so much in common. She likes interesting women, but she is very sincere, supportive and kind, just like a girl after Katra's sudden death..."
“… My brother Parker expressed my love and sympathy for you and your family to dear Kim on social media, and wish your dear brother good luck... "
"XX TV preview 2018 all attention programs all 16 1 16 TV preview 2018 all attention TV preview 2018 all attention Jessica Jones starring krysten Ritter Rachael Taylor carrier Anne Moss David Tennant start date March 8 Netflix Netflix TV preview..."
"2018 high profile OA Starring: Brit Marling Emory Cohen Phyllis Smith Patrick Jason ISACS start date: March 15 Netflix TV preview 2018 high profile trust Starring: Hilary Swan Brendan Fraser Donald Sutherland Harris Dickinson Anna start date: March 25, 2018 AMC"
"Sky Atlantic Air date TBA FX productions TV preview 2018 everything to look for a series happy events"
"Neil Patrick Harris Malina Weissman Patrick Warburton Lucy punch Tony Hale Nathan filion on March 30 fox BBC on TBA Matthias claper FX TV preview 2018 Legion starring Dan Stevens Rachel Keller Aubrey Plaza Jean smart jemaine Clement on April 17 Fox"



Number  942
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He loved celebrating with Gwen and her kids, but it is not the same for him, there’s is still a big piece missing in his life.” Perhaps not for long!”
““He loves being close to Gwen and the bond he shares with her kids, but the day is a sad reminder to him that he never had kids of his own,” a source close to Blake told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“As we previously reported, Blake had a hard time on Mother’s Day because he hasn’t had any children.”
“At 48, her friends feel it would be a miracle baby but they can only guess what’s really going on and hope for her to break the news soon!” So do we!”
“She has been also wearing baggier clothing lately and friends feel like she must be keeping a secret.”
““She has always wanted a girl and it’s clear to everyone Gwen really loves Blake a lot and they have always talked about having their own family together.”
““Those that see her daily are convinced she might finally be pregnant with Blake’s baby,” they added.”
“The source added that her clothes have also gotten baggier in recent days as well, leading to more heated speculation.”
“So exciting!”
““Her friends have not seen her touch a glass of wine or any alcohol in weeks and they think Gwen has been glowing lately.” OMG!”


"He likes to celebrate with Gwen and her children, but it's different for him. He's still missing a big part of his life." Maybe not for long! "
A source close to Blake told reporters: "he likes to be close to Gwen and share his feelings with Gwen's children, but this day is a sad reminder for him that he has never had his own children." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"As we reported earlier, Blake had a hard time on Mother's day because he had no children."
"At the age of 48, her friends thought it would be a miracle baby, but they could only guess what happened and hope that she would announce it soon! "So are we!"
"She's also wearing loose clothes recently, and friends think she must be keeping a secret."
"She's always wanted a girl, and everyone knows that Gwen really loves Blake. They've been talking about having a family together."
"Those who see her every day are convinced that she may eventually have black's baby," they added
"The source added that her clothes have also become more and more loose in recent days, which has led to more intense speculation."
"It's exciting!"
"Her friends haven't seen her touch a glass of wine or any alcohol for weeks, and they think Gwen has been shining lately." My God



Number  943
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scott has remained quiet on reports claiming that he’s considering the idea of penning a book about Kourtney and her family.”
“Whether Scott Disick will end up pulling through with the tell-all book has yet to be determined, but with the way things are looking, there’s a possibility it could happen.”
“The statement itself heavily contradicts itself seeing that Scott is dating a 19-year-old, but for the self-proclaimed sex addict, he’s not fond of having another man around his kids, which has resulted to many arguments between the two.”
“Though Scott Disick claims he has moved on with his life, he has not settled well with the idea of having his children around another man, particularly one who is much younger than Kourtney.”
“In recent weeks, it has been said that Kourtney and Scott Disick have not been on good terms because the father of three is still furious over the supposed fact that the TV personality continues to flaunt her romance with boyfriend, Younes Bendjima.”
“Everything forms his strained relationship with his ex-girlfriend to Kim’s alleged strained marriage with Kanye West will be talked about in the book.”
“But, as previously mentioned, Scott doesn’t have any reason why he shouldn’t pull through with the idea since he’s no longer as close with the family as he once was, and the money he’s being offered is astoundingly high.”
“The amount of money that Scott Disick would pocket is definitely tempting for the socialite, who is famously known for being paid to party and appearing on Keeping Up With the Kardashians from time to time.”
“Now that Scott Disick has completely ended his relationship with Kourtney Kardashian and is happily seeing 19-year-old Sofia Richie, he feels as if nothing is holding him back from going ahead with the idea of writing a book about the famous family.”
“According to Life & Style, Scott has been approached by multiple publishers, who have shown great interest in the concept of the book, considering that it would contain nothing but Kardashian scandals that fans would want to know about.”


"Scott was silent about reports that he was considering writing a book about Courtney and his family."
"It's not certain whether Scott Disick will finally finish tell everyone, but it's possible from the current situation."
"The statement itself is quite different from Scott's statement that he is dating a 19-year-old girl, but for the self proclaimed sex addict, he doesn't like to have another man with his child, which has led to a lot of arguments between the two."
Although Scott Disick claimed that he had started his own life, he did not quite accept the idea of having his child with another man, especially a man much younger than Courtney
"In recent weeks, it has been said that Courtney has had a bad relationship with Scott Disick because the father of three is still angry that the TV celebrity continues to show off her love affair with her boyfriend, yones benjima."
"From Kim Jong Un's strained relationship with his ex girlfriend to the so-called strained marriage between Kim Jong Un and Kanye West, all these will be discussed in the book."
"But, as I said, there's no reason why Scott doesn't stick to this idea, because he's not as close to his family as he used to be, and the money he's given is staggering."
"The money Scott disc can make is absolutely attractive to the socialite because he is known for going to parties and keeping in touch with the kardashians from time to time."
"Now Scott Disick has completely ended his relationship with Courtney Kardashian and is happy to meet Sophia Ritchie, 19, who feels that nothing can stop him from writing a book about this famous family."
"According to life and fashion magazine, a number of publishers have approached Scott and expressed great interest in the concept of the book. They think the book has nothing but a Kardashian style scandal and fans want to know about it."



Number  944
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““She’s tried talking to her sisters but they aren’t that bothered.”“Kim was always Kris’ favorite until Jennifer crashed the scene.”We pay for juicy info!”
““Kim is fed up and doesn’t know what to do.”And not even her circle of loyal siblings will help.”
“...invite list for her annual holiday party so Kim s dreading Jennifer stealing the show The sunshine walks with Jennifer in Kris eyes adds the informant...”
“Kris says she s a hoot and treats her like the blonde daughter she never had To make matters worse sources reveal to Radar that Kris has invited the A lister over several times for breakfast lunch and dinner and always with cocktails flowing Jennifer s definitely on the VIP”
““She’s waltzing into the family’s world acting like a superstar and upsetting the order with her loud chaos.”
“The mother-of-two, 37, is said to be envious “as hell” over the hold Lawrence, 27, has on her infamous momager Kris Jenner.”
“Kardashian-obsessed Jennifer Lawrence is starting to overstep her boundaries on Kim‘s clan — so much so it’s sent the reality star into a “jealous rage,” RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!”
“Kim Kardashian In A 'Jealous Rage' Over Jennifer Lawrence Reality star hates the hold the actress has on her mom Kris Jenner.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"She tried to talk to her sisters, but they were not so upset." "Before Jennifer crashed the scene, Kim was Chris's favorite." We pay for interesting information! "
"Kim has had enough. He doesn't know what to do." Even her faithful brothers and sisters couldn't help
“… Invitation list for her annual holiday party, so Kim's afraid of Jennifer stealing the show sunshine walk with Jennifer in Chris's eyes added, "informant..."
"Chris said she was a playboy and treated her like a blonde daughter. She never made things worse. A source told radar that Chris had invited A-lister to breakfast, lunch and dinner many times, and always had cocktails on the VIP table. "
"She waltzes into the family world like a superstar, and her noise disturbs the order."
Lawrence, 37, a mother of two, is said to be envious of the 27 year old's control of her infamous mother, Chris Jenner
Kardashian's infatuated Jennifer Lawrence began to transcend her boundaries in the Kim family, so that the reality TV star fell into "jealous anger" RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
"Kim kardashan is jealous of the reality TV star, Jennifer Lawrence. She hates the actress's control over her mother, Chris Jenner."



Number  945
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Liv Tyler with husband and daughterPhoto: LEGION-MEDIA”
“A proposal of marriage, David made hisbeloved in the fall of 2015, after the actress gave birth to a son of a Sailor.”
“We recall that Tyler and Gardner started Datingin the summer of 2014, and introduced thema friend of model Kate moss.”
“Our family grows, I kind of feelthanks!” Now the team added another member and it is veryinspires and Liv, and her husband.”
“My stomach grows anotherlittle Gardner.”
“When was the last time the actress found thatpregnant, she wrote: “O God,it seems that soon the stork will visit us again.”
“After All, Tylerjust loves children.”
“But though Liv gave birth to her youngest — Lulujust 15 months ago, she was glad the new pregnancy.”
“Besides, David also has a child fromex-wife Davina Taylor — 8-year-old gray.”
“A 16-month-old Sailor, and eight month old Lulu rose children of Gardner.”


"Liv Taylor with her husband and daughter: Legion media"
"In a proposal, David proposed to his beloved in the fall of 2015, after the actress gave birth to a sailor's son."
"We remember Taylor and Gardner dating in the summer of 2014 and introducing them to friends of model Kate Moss."
"Our family is growing up, I have a little emotion!"! "Now the team has one more member, veryinspires and liv, and her husband."
"I have another little Gardner in my stomach."
When the actress last found out that she was pregnant, she wrote, "oh my God, it looks like the stork will visit us again soon."
"Tyler, after all, loves children."
"But even though liv gave birth to the youngest Lulu 15 months ago, she's still happy with her new pregnancy."
"In addition, David has the child of his ex-wife, Davina Taylor - gray, 8."
"A 16 month old sailor and eight month old Lulu are Gardner's children."



Number  946
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know, do you think Heather Locklear should be on reality TV?”
“Naturally anyone who brings the drama is prime housewives material in our book, but in the case of Heather Locklear we think that this is one rumor that should stay a fantasy.”
“The actress might be getting her own diamond!”
“Genny GlassmanIn a turn of events that would truly be shocking, is it possible that actress Heather Locklear will be joining the cast of The Real Housewives of Beverly Hills?”
“We’re not so sure that this story checks out.”
“The buzz started yesterday, April 9, when Lisa Rinna was a guest on Andy Cohen’s radio show, Radio Andy.”
“The two talked Housewives, Amelia’s history with mental health, and Andy even probed Lisa about her relationship her former Melrose Place co-star.”
““Did you have a friendship with [Heather Locklear]?” the Bravo host asked.”
““I did and I will say to you, I learned more from Heather […] I learned professionalism, coming in and owning a set, and being kind to everyone, and polite, and on time, knew their lines, funny,” Rinna tells him.”
““Heather Locklear was everything and she was one of the biggest starts of that time.”But things have not been smooth sailing for Locklear as of late.”


"Let's know, do you think Heather lockrier should be on the reality show?"
"Of course, in our book, anyone who brings drama is the main material for housewives, but in the case of heather lockrier, we think it's a rumor that should become a fantasy."
"The actress may get her own diamond!"
"Genny glassmanin is at a really shocking turning point. Is it possible for actress Heather Locklear to join the cast of the real housewife of Beverly Hills?"
"We're not sure the story is true."
"Yesterday, April 9, Lisa Lina made a sensation by visiting Andy Cohen's radio show Andy radio."
"They talked about housewife, Amelia's mental health history, and Andy even asked Lisa about her relationship with former Melrose square co stars."
"Do you have any friendship with [Heather rockill]? "Great," the host asked
"I did, and I want to tell you that I learned more from Heather ]I learned professionalism, came in with a set, was nice to everyone, polite, punctual, knew their lines, it was fun, "Lina told him
"Heather lockrier was everything. She was one of the greatest beginnings of that era." Recently, however, Locklear's career has not been smooth



Number  947
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Robin Marchant/Getty Images]”
“The gossip buster site Gossip Cop has reported that there was no truth in Life & Style‘s report.”
“The couple recently attended the wedding of Prince Harry’s best pal, Tom Inskip, in Jamaica, and according to a tabloid, the British prince came back all inspired by the feel and setting of the wedding location.”
“He and Meghan Markle reportedly told friends that they would be getting married before Christmas in the Caribbean.”
“Earlier this month, Prince Harry and Meghan Markle made their first public appearance as a couple at Tom Inskip and Lara Hughes-Young’s destination wedding in Jamaica.”
“There, the 32-year-old royal’s friends joked that he would be the next to tie the knot.”
“And according to Vanity Fair, Prince Harry had confided to his friends that he hoped to get married soon.”
“The report quoted a friend as telling Royal Watch that some of them “really” thought that he would propose to Meghan Markle by the end of the year.”
““Harry is head over heels about Meghan and some of us really think he’ll have popped the question by the end of the year.”Another report speculated that Prince Harry and Meghan Markle would get engaged this summer.”
“Life & Style, on the other hand, reported that the British royal was extremely impressed by the “romantic setting” of the Caribbean wedding, adding that he wanted his wedding to have a similar feel, according to Gossip Cop.”


"[Robin Marchant / Getty pictures]
"The gossip police report on the website gossip terminator says that there is no truth in lifestyle reporting."
"The couple recently attended the wedding of Prince Harry's best friend Tom Inskip in Jamaica. According to a tabloid, the inspiration for the British Prince's return came from the feeling and background of the wedding place."
"He and Megan Marcel are reported to have told friends that they will get married before Christmas in the Caribbean."
Earlier this month, Prince Harry and Megan markel made their public debut as a couple at the wedding of Tom Inskip and Laura Hughes young in Jamaica
"There, a friend of royal, 32, joked that he would be the next to get married."
According to vanity fair, Prince Harry has revealed to friends that he hopes to get married soon
A friend was quoted as telling Royal watch that some of them "really" thought he would propose to Megan markel before the end of the year
"Harry is crazy about Megan, and some of us really think he's going to ask this question before the end of the year." Another report speculates that Prince Harry and Megan markel will be engaged this summer
On the other hand, the British royal family was impressed by the "romantic background" of the wedding in the Caribbean, and expressed the hope that their wedding would have a similar feeling, gossip police reported



Number  948
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The generous act was apparently -- at least in part -- prompted by a public plea Kevin Hart made over the weekend and has been pushing since, asking his fellow celebrities to contribute what they can.”
“On Tuesday (Aug. 29), Kim Kardashian West, Kris Jenner and Khloe Kardashian announced they and the rest of the Keeping Up With the Kardashians clan would be donating $500,000 to the American Red Cross and Salvation Army USA.”
“...region...”
“As rain continues to pour down on southeast Texas and the devastation caused by Hurricane Harvey now a tropical storm becomes more clear the Kardashian family is stepping up to join the ranks of celebrities supporting flood relief in the...”
“"Houston we are praying for you!"”


"This generosity was obviously - at least in part - triggered by Kevin Hart's public confession last weekend, and he has been pushing ever since to ask his fellow celebrities to do their best."
On Tuesday, Kim Kardashian West, Chris Jenner and helo Kardashian announced that they and other members of the Kardashian family will donate $500000 to the American Red Cross and the salvation army
“… Region... "
"With the continuous rain in Southeast Texas and the damage caused by Hurricane Harvey, a tropical storm has become more obvious, and the kardashians are stepping up to join the ranks of celebrities supporting flood relief in the region..."
"We are praying for you!"



Number  949
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“This often means writing articles in which one star is […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“One of the ways HollywoodLies, as it’s known, likes to get traffic is by stirring up celebrity fandoms.”
“Gossip Cop can explain what’s going on and why it’s problematic.”
“HollywoodLife is pitting Selena Gomez against Bella Hadid in an exploitative story about their bikini bodies.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"It usually means that a star in an article is [...] ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"As we all know, one of the ways Hollywood people like to get traffic is to incite celebrity fans."
"Gossip police can explain what happened and why there was a problem."
"Hollywood Life's fight against Selena Gomez and Bella Hadid is an exploitative story about their bikini figure."



Number  950
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was just too much baggage.””
“Added a Bieber pal: “Their relationship was always very complex and complicated.”
“Image zoom Credit: PapCulture/SplashNews.com“It was never a healthy situation for Selena and Justin,” said the source.”
“The statement tee, available for $49 at online clothing retailer Storets, featured the slogan “Only the Strong Survive” written in white letters across the pocket, possibly a cryptic message about her feelings since her ex’s announcement.”
“...in a casual pair of gray sweatpants, a black T-shirt and white sneakers.”
“Three days after Bieber and Baldwin’s engagement, Gomez was photographed in N.Y.C.”
“Click here to subscribe to the PeopleStyle Newsletter for amazing shopping discounts, can’t-live-without beauty products and more.”
“Image zoom Credit: PumaLooking for more style content?”
“#DoYou.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Gomez shared a shot from her new campaign on Instagram writing, “Striking a pose in the new @puma Defy Mid.”


"It's just too much luggage."
A friend of Bieber's added: "their relationship is always very complicated and complicated."
"Image scaling credit: Culture"/ SplashNews.com Website "this has never been a healthy situation for Serena and Justin," the source said
At online clothing retailer storets, the statement T-shirt costs $49 and has a white slogan in her pocket saying "only the strong can survive." it may be a secret message after her ex-wife announced the news
“… Wearing a casual pair of grey sweatpants, a black T-shirt and white sneakers. "
Three days after Bieber and Baldwin were engaged, Gomez was photographed in New York
"Click here to subscribe to the peoplestyle newsletters for amazing discounts, beauty products and more."
Image scaling credit: Puma looking for more style content? "
#Doyou. "Get push notifications that contain news, features, etc."
"Gomez shared a photo of her new campaign on instagram," posing in the new @ puma defy mid



Number  951
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Her doctors decided to start this by slowly weaning her off of the hormones she was taking and reversing the breast augmentation they had performed.”
“Problems soon arose however and she made the decision to detransition.”
“She is not a lie.”
“Bruce lives a lie.”
“That's what my soul is.”
“She went on to say in that interview; 'My brain is much more female than it is male.”
“Jenner publicly revealed she was transitioning in a 20/20 interview with Diane Sawyer last year, telling the veteran newscaster; 'For all intents and purposes, I am a woman.'”
“'Of course it's not true.'”
“'Not worth commenting on such an idiotic report,' a rep for Jenner told the New York Daily News when asked about the report Thursday morning.”
“Halperin is also claiming that multiple sources have told him Jenner is also thinking about detransitioning because she is still attracted to woman.”


"Her doctors decided to let her give up the hormone slowly, and then reverse the breast augmentation they had done."
"However, the problem soon arose, and she made the decision to cancel the extradition."
"She's not a liar."
"Bruce lives in lies."
"This is my soul."
"In that interview, she went on to say: 'my brain is female, not male.'
"Jenner publicly revealed in a 20 / 20 interview with Diane Sawyer last year that she was in transition and told the veteran news announcer," I'm a woman for whatever purpose. "
"Of course not."
Asked about the report Thursday morning, a representative of Jenner told the New York Daily News that it was not worth commenting on such a stupid report
"Halperin also claimed that a number of sources told him that Jenna was also considering changing sex because she was still attracted to women."



Number  952
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gross: $60mAngelina Jolie's 5 Worst-Reviewed Movies Movie Year Netflix Metascore Users 1 Life or Something Like It 2002 31 5.7 "Beyond the curious miscasting of Jolie, who can't quite turn lazy flirtatiousness into existential longing, Life or Something Like It offers few diversions."”
“Budget: $85m U.S.”
“Budget: $16m U.S.”
“As Marianne Pearl's personal choice to play the part, Jolie delivers an emotionally heavy performance, losing herself so completely in the role that the audience forgets she's Angelina Jolie and instead sees a woman struggling to come to terms with the loss of her husband.”
“-- Peter Travers, Rolling Stone Nominated for multiple awards including a Golden Globe, Jolie's portrayal of Marianne Pearl -- the widow of murdered journalist Daniel Pearl -- has been praised by critics as one of her best performances.”
“She won an Oscar for 1999's 'Girl, Interrupted,' but this is by far her best performance."”
“Angelina Jolie's 5 Best-Reviewed Movies Movie Year Netflix Metascore Users 1 A Mighty Heart 2007 74 7.5 "The film belongs to Jolie.”
“Below, we look at the five best and five worst Angelina Jolie movies.”
“We'll see on Friday if Jolie's star power is enough to help Salt avoid the summer slump that seems to have plagued so many action vehicles this year; early reviews are mixed so far.”
“Hoping to duplicate the success of the Jason Bourne films, Jolie plays a government agent who may be a Russian spy.”


"Total income: $60 Angelina Jolie's five worst commented films Netflix metascore users 1 life or something it 2002 31 5.7" in addition to the strange miscalculation of Jolie, Jolie can't turn lazy flirting into a desire for survival. There is little entertainment in life or similar things. "
"Budget: 85 million dollars."
"Budget: 16 million dollars."
"As Marian Pearl's personal choice to play this role, Julie shows a heavy emotional performance. In this role, she completely loses herself, so that the audience forgets that she is Angelina Jolie and sees a woman trying to accept the fact of losing her husband."
Peter Travers, who has been nominated for the Golden Globe and many other awards in rolling stone, and Marian pearl, played by Julie, the widow of murdered journalist Daniel Pearl, have been praised by critics as one of her best performances
"She won an Oscar for 1999's" girl, interrupted, "but it's her best performance so far."
Angelina Jolie's 5 best reviewed movies year Netflix metascore user 1 strong heart 2007 74 7.5 "movies belong to Jolie."
"Next, let's take a look at Angelina Jolie's five best and five worst movies."
"We'll see on Friday whether Julie's star strength is enough to help Sartre avoid this summer's downturn, which seems to have plagued so many action cars; so far, early reviews have been mixed."
To replicate the success of Jason Bourne's film, Julie plays a government agent who may be a Russian spy



Number  953
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...https://t.co/bXZQ7enuEp — xoxo, Gaga (@ladygaga) October 2, 2017Emmy Rossum, best known for playing the character Fiona Gallagher on Shameless, also tweeted at Trump calling for action.”
“#GunControl act quickly.”
“There is no in between here.”
“Our greater moral identity doesn’t match our actions so far.9) If you’re not open minded to solving this, you’re morally surrendering us all to a very certain fate.”
“There’s two moralities: morality identity and morality-in-action.”
“He continue: “If you’re not at least trying to fix this, you’re effectively telling the country in your (in)actions that this somehow acceptable.”
“And if you can’t say that, if it’s just too cold and brutal a thought to bear, then isn’t that proof you haven’t solved the problem yet?”
“That daily life is a lottery system?”
“That it’s a fact of modern day life that from time to time we’ll lose dozens of people in seconds?”
“That these are the new terms?”


“... https://t.co/bXZQ7enuEpXOXO , Gaga (@ ladigaga) October 2, 2017, Amy Rosen, known for playing the shameless character Fiona Gallagher, also tweeted trump for action.
"Gun control is moving fast."
"There's no middleman here."
"So far, our greater moral identity has not been consistent with our actions. 9) If you don't want to solve this problem, you've morally committed us all to a very certain destiny. "
"There are two kinds of morality: moral identity and moral action."
"If you don't at least try to solve the problem, you're actually telling the country that your actions are acceptable to some extent," he continued
"If you can't say that, if it's an intolerable cold and cruel idea, isn't that evidence that you haven't solved the problem yet?"
"Everyday life is lottery system?"
"Is it a fact of modern life that we lose dozens of people every now and then in a few seconds?"
"Are these new terms?"



Number  954
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’ll have to wait and see!”
“Perhaps they’ll take the step at a chapel in Vegas?”
“Although there’s been speculation that Gwen and Blake are thinking about possibly getting married in the near future, there’s been no official word yet.”
“She’s set to kick off a series of concerts at Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino on June 27 and a source previously told us that Blake can’t wait to babysit her boys when she’s off doing her thing!”
“When she’s not spending time with Blake and her kids, Gwen’s been preparing for her upcoming residency in Las Vegas.”
“Seeing the happy couple married seems like it would only intensify the cuteness!”
“From going on adorable fishing trips in Blake’s home state of Oklahoma to spending holidays such as Easter together, Gwen and Blake’s clan always look cozy and comfortable together.”
“With how much time Gwen’s boys and Blake spend together it’s not entirely surprising that they would love him to make things official.”
“Their bond is strong with Blake and the older boys are confused as to why mom and Blake aren’t married already.” Aw!”
“The kids put pressure on Blake and make it known to him that they wish he was their stepdad.”


"We can only wait and see!"
"Maybe they'll take a step in a chapel in Vegas?"
"Although there is speculation that Gwen black is considering a possible marriage in the near future, there is no official information yet."
"She will start a series of concerts at Hollywood planet Resort and casinos on June 27. A source told us before that Blake can't wait to take care of her children when she does her thing!"
"When Gwen didn't have time for Blake and her children, she was preparing for the upcoming trip to Las Vegas."
"To see this happy couple get married only seems to aggravate loveliness!"
"From a lovely fishing trip in black's home state of Oklahoma to holidays like Easter together, Gwen and black's tribe always seem very comfortable and comfortable together."
"It's not surprising that Gwen's children spend so much time with black that they want him to make it public."
"They are so close to black that the older boys don't understand why mom and black are not married yet." Ah
"The children put pressure on Blake to let him know that they want him to be their stepfather."



Number  955
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“WATCH: Kevin Hart Apologizes to His Wife and Kids in Emotional Video After Alleged ExtortionIn December, Hart apologized to Parrish as he emotionally revealed that someone was using the tapes and images to allegedly extort money from him.”
“The music video ends with “Choose Wisely” written in the sky as Hart arrives home with his groceries.”
“Sign up for our daily newsletter to get our best stories of the day delivered straight to your inbox.”
“Learn from it.”Want to keep up with the latest from PEOPLE?”
“Learn from it, man.”
“Hart, who appears frustrated, escapes to the bathroom where a man uses the stall next to him, saying: “Nobody’s perfect and you’re only human.”
“Image zoom Credit: J. Cole/YouTubeLastly, during a dinner, Hart receives a note from a waitress, that reads, “Look at the bar,” where a woman is eager to invite him over.”
“Cut to another store, Hart is looking at strollers, as a fan instructs a young boy to take a picture of them and she gets uncomfortably handsy with Hart.”
“Then in the car, Hart hears radio hosts discussing his “situation” before a woman in the car next to him sends flirtatious vibes and an older woman judges him with disgust.”
“The J.Cole-directed visual accompaniment opens with men and women staring at and judging Hart in a supermarket as the star peruses the aisles.”


"Observation: Kevin Hart apologized to his wife and children in emotional videos after being charged with extortion. In December, Hart apologized to Parrish for emotionally revealing that someone was using the tapes and images to extort money from him."
The music video ends with "smart choice," and Hart comes home with his groceries
"Sign up for our daily newsletters and send our best stories of the day directly to your in box."
"Learn from it" want to keep up with people's latest news
"Learn from it, man."
Hart looks depressed. He escapes to the bathroom, and a man says in a nearby booth, "no one is perfect, you're just human."
Photo zooming credit: J. Cole / YouTube. During a dinner, Hart received a note from a waitress saying "look at the bar." a woman was eagerly inviting him to come
"Cutting to another store, Hart is looking at the pram. A fan instructs a little boy to take pictures of them. She shakes hands with HART uncomfortably."
Then in the car, Hart heard the radio host talk about his "situation." then a woman in the car next to him made a flirting voice, and an older woman commented on him in disgust
"At the beginning of J. Cole's visual accompaniment, men and women were staring at Hart in the supermarket to judge him, while the star was reading in the aisle."



Number  956
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN has reached out to reps for the actor for comment.”
“McConaughey’s wife, model Camila Alves, was born in Brazil and became a US citizen in 2015.”
“— ZERO PHUCKS LEFT TO GIVE  (@virtualgina) February 2, 2017It is unclear whether the interview was taped before or after Trump’s issued his controversial travel ban.”
“When someone shows who he is better believe him.”
“@McConaughey @realDonaldTrump is showing us he does not deserve a chance.”
“.”
“...you be because he s our President for the next four years at least The star s remarks were hailed and criticized on social media...”
“At the same time it s time for us to embrace and shake hands with this fact and be constructive with him over the next four years No matter how much people may have disagreed with candidate Trump McConaughey said it s now time to think about how constructive can...”
““It’s very dynamic and as divisive of an inauguration and time that we’ve ever had.”
““Well, they don’t have a choice now, he’s our President,” McConaughey said.”


"CNN has contacted the actor's representative for advice."
"McConnell's wife, model Camilla Alves, was born in Brazil and became an American citizen in 2015."
"- zero phucks left on February 2, 2017 for an interview (@ virtualgina), which is unclear whether the interview was recorded before or after Trump's controversial travel ban."
"When someone shows who he is, it's better to believe him."
“@ McConaughey@realddonaldtrump It shows us that he's not worth a chance. "
“.”
“…… Because he is our president in the next four years, at least the star's remarks have been praised and criticized on social media... "
"At the same time, we should also accept and shake hands with this fact, and maintain a constructive relationship with him in the next four years. No matter how different opinions people have about the candidate trump McConaughey, he said, it's time to think about constructive issues..."
"It's a dynamic process, and it's also the division of inauguration and time that we've experienced."
"Well, they have no choice now, he's our president," McConnell said



Number  957
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This man, who “isn’t a celebrity or high profile in any way,” gave her quite a boost, as having “another adult to spend time with” was just what the doctor ordered.”
“She supposedly started up a romance with an “older-looking man who is a real estate agent,” ET Online reported in March 2018.”
“Though, when it comes to her reportedly being “humiliated” at being “beaten to the punch,” there were reports that Angie actually found love first.”
“...level...”
“Brad has been ready for a new relationship for a while now the source tells Star and Neri is just the sort of woman he needs Angie may need a stiff drink and a moment to find her chill if Brad and Neri take this rumored relationship to the next...”
“...he reportedly wants to find a woman who challenges him and after seeing how happy George is after marrying a much smarter more powerful woman in Amal Clooney 40 dating a woman from the halls of academia doesn t seem that far fetched...”
“If it turns out that Brad beat her to the punch it could be humiliating Angie was taken off guard by the reports of Brad spending time with Neri as sources EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife com that a MIT professor is the last person Angie would have picked for Brad Well...”
“Angie is very jealous and competitive, and she wanted to be the first one to start a hot new relationship.”
“...for months...”
“She was ranting one minute and then the next she just sort of crumpled Angie can t stand anyone who s smarter and prettier than her Star s source claims before adding that Angie thinks it is absolutely galling that Brad has managed to keep his connection Neri hush hush...”


This "not a celebrity, not high-profile" man gave her a lot of encouragement, because "with another adult" is exactly what the doctor asked
According to the United States "et online" in March 2018, "it is speculated that she and an" older looking real estate agent "started a relationship."
"However, it is reported that when it comes to Angie's" humiliation "due to" being beaten ", it is reported that Angie actually found love first."
“… Level
"Brad has been preparing for a new relationship for some time. Now the source tells Starr and Nelly that they are the kind of women he needs. Angie may need a strong drink. If Brad and Nelly take this rumored relationship to the next stage, she may need a little time to find her indifference..."
“…… It is reported that he wants to find a woman who challenges him. After seeing how happy George is after marrying a smarter and more powerful woman, it seems not so far fetched to date a woman from the academic palace in Amar Clooney 40... "
"If it turns out that Brad beat her, Angie may feel ashamed, because it is reported that Brad spent time with Neri, because the exclusive source told Hollywood life that the MIT professor is the last person Angie would choose for Brad..."
"Angie is jealous and competitive. She wants to be the first to start a hot new relationship."
"Months."
"One minute she was growling, and then the next minute she was just a little bit collapsed. Angie couldn't stand anyone smarter and prettier than her Star source claimed, and then added that Angie thought it was absolutely irritating that Brad had managed to keep his connection quiet..."



Number  958
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But since I’ve met Ricky, I really haven’t looked back.””
““That journey was a big part of my life,” she says.”
““I hope that he meets someone, if he hasn’t already, just as great for him and Ricky is for me.”Now, Bischoff still watches The Bachelor, but says she’s moved on from her own reality show past.”
“I think one of the reasons I fell in love so quickly is that I could say everything and know I was not being judged.”Bischoff hasn’t spoken to Soules recently but says she wishes him well.”
“But from day one there was open communication with Ricky about what I had gone through.”
““I was still a little bit broken and trying to pick up the pieces.”
““It was easy and that’s the way it should be.”Still, Bischoff admits it was “nerve-wracking” to jump back into the dating scene after her painful split from Soules in 2015, nearly seven months after they were engaged.”
““On our first date, we just clicked,” she says.”
“The 31-year-old fertility nurse met sales manager Angel on the dating app Bumble (“Ladies pick — finally it was my choice,” jokes Bischoff) last September; the couple moved in together in May.”
“My cheeks hurt!”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"But since I met Ricky, I really haven't looked back."
"That trip was a big part of my life," she said
"I hope he can meet someone, if he hasn't, just as good to him and Ricky to me." Now, Bischoff is still watching bachelor, but she says she has stepped out of her reality show
"I think one of the reasons I fell in love so quickly was that I could say everything and know that I wasn't judged." Bischoff hasn't spoken to sules recently, but she says she wishes him all the best
"But from the first day, I had an open exchange of my experience with Ricky."
"I'm still a little broken and want to pick up the pieces."
"It's simple. It should be like this." Nevertheless, Bischoff admitted that after a painful breakup with sules in 2015, it was "stressful" for her to return to the dating scene nearly seven months after their engagement
"On our first date, we just clicked," she said
"The 31 year old fertility nurse met with sales manager ladies pick finally it was my choff on the dating app bumble last September, and Bischoff joked: 'it's my choice; the couple moved together in May this year.'
"My cheek hurts! Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  959
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Angelina will eventually find love again?”
“...who had downright painful breakups...”
“Brad feels that while he wishes her the best after several failed marriages for Angelina the right guy for her might not exist While you muse on whether true love exists or not check out pics of the celebrity couples...”
“Our source added, “Brad understands that the best, most healthy and lasting relationships need lots of compromise so whoever has a shot at marrying Angelina will need to give up a lot to fit into her challenging lifestyle.”
“...kids but that Brad wasn t having it with the prospect of any hangout with his ex...”
“Brad knows what a dedicated mother Angelina is and how hard that can be for even the strongest men to deal with in a relationship We reported earlier about how Angelina invited Brad to go trick or treating with their...”
“The source went on to say, “It is difficult dealing with the media, the fame, career, traveling and everything else that goes with being one of the most powerful women in Hollywood.”
“Brad is currently rumored to be dating actress Ella Purnell, 21, but he still has a lot of respect for his ex.”
“Brad gave it everything he had and is disappointed they could not stay together,” our source says.”
“Brad knows first hand how incredibly unique and challenging it is being in Angelina’s family.”


"Hollywood, do you think Angelina will finally find love again?"
“… They broke up in complete pain... "
"Brad thinks that after Angelina's several failed marriages, although he wishes her all the best, when you think about the existence of true love, maybe you can't find a man suitable for her to see the photos of the star couple..."
"Our source added," Brad understands that the best, healthiest and most lasting relationship requires a lot of compromise, so who has the chance to marry Angelina will need to give up a lot to adapt to her challenging lifestyle
"Kids, but Brad doesn't want to go out with his ex..."
"Brad knows what a dedicated mother Angelina is. How did Angelina invite Brad to give it to them as we reported before It's hard for even the strongest man to deal with mischievous or mischievous relationships. "
"As one of the most powerful women in Hollywood, it's hard to deal with the media, fame, career, travel and everything else," the source added
"Brad is rumored to be dating 21-year-old actress Ella Purnell, but he still has a lot of respect for his predecessor."
"Brad gave everything he had and was disappointed they couldn't be together," our source said
"Brad knew firsthand how unique and challenging Angelina's family is."



Number  960
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...or blog posts...”
“Gossip Cop can bust this report which calls the climate crusading actor a phony and full of gas According to the often inaccurate National Enquirer DiCaprio is all about saving the Earth until IMDb com Inc takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles Tweets...”
“Environmentalist Leonardo DiCaprio did not hire a private seaplane to “party hop around the Maldives,” despite an untrue and purposefully deceptive story.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
“… Or blog post... "
"Gossip police can break this report, saying that climate change actors are fake, and according to often inaccurate national inquiries DiCaprio is tweeting all news articles about saving the earth until IMDB does not assume any responsibility for the content or accuracy above..."
"Leonardo DiCaprio, an environmentalist, didn't rent a private seaplane to" revel in the Maldives ", although this is an untrue and deliberately deceptive story."



Number  961
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Britney and Sam are seriously married?”
“And, the rest is history!”
“The singer may allegedly be married with a baby on the way, according to a bombshell report, May 10.”
“You’ve got to hear the crazy details.”
“UPDATE: A rep for Britney EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.com that this report is “completely not true.”———–A wedding and a baby?”
“— That may be the case for Britney Spears, 35, and her model boyfriend, Sam Asghari, 23!”
“The singer and her beau may have had their happily ever after in secret ceremony, according to OK!”
“...magazine, May 10!”
““It might seem crazy after such a sort time, but everyone in her life says they’ve never seen her this happy,” a source close to Brit told the mag.”
““Getting married secretly is just the sort of stunt she’d pull.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Britney and Sam are really married?"
"The rest is history!"
"According to an explosive report on May 10, the singer may have had a baby on her way to marriage."
"You have to listen to the crazy details."
Update: a representative of Britney Spears told reporters exclusively that the report "is not true at all." ——A wedding and a child? "
"Britney Spears, 35, and model boyfriend Sam asgali, 23, may be like that!"
According to OK, the singer and her boyfriend may have had a happy time at a secret ceremony
“… Magazine, May 10! "
"It seems crazy after all this time, but everyone in her life says they've never seen her so happy," a source close to Britt told the magazine
"Secret marriage is just a gimmick for her."



Number  962
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here\u2019s what I wish I knew \u2014 and what I learned from my Things I Wish I Knew Before I Bought My First House”,”reading_time”:8}]};”
“That\u2019s the case with new Just Announced New Travel Card Perks \u2014 That Don’t Involve learned a lot throughout the process of buying my first home.”
“But that doesn\u2019t mean there isn\u2019t still plenty of value to be had from them \u2014 even from those that carry yearly membership fees.”
“...you u2019re not alone...”
“...const FP tips can help you turn an average skill into an above average side the Tips for Starting a Side Hustle From Experts Who u2019ve Done it your travel rewards credit cards have been sitting in the back of your sock drawer for the better part of last year...”


"That's what I want to know, and that's what I want to know before I buy my first home."
"In the whole process of buying my first home, I didn't learn a lot. That's the new travel card offer announced in 2014."
"But that doesn't mean that even companies that charge annual membership fees don't have much value."
“… You're not alone... "
“… Const FP tips can help you turn a common skill into a higher than average skill. Start a sidepush skill from experts in 2019. Your travel reward credit card was in the back of your sock drawer for most of last year... "



Number  963
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'The response has been 99% positive,' she exclaimed in the interview.”
“December 20 saw Khloe share an Instagram post of her baby daddy Tristan Thompson cradling her burgeoning baby bump.”
“...choice Kourtney was the only one with the Vogue model s back And the drama didn t end there with Kendall continuing to convince the family that no matter what had happened it was still the nice thing to do and the situation was no different to that of Scott...”
“Kris reasoning No one would know how to respond to her because of all the things she began to explain She got the last word As Kris Kim and Khloe continued to explain how the situations were different and at the end of the day it was the momager s...”
“'No-one would know how to respond to her because of all the things,' she began to explain.”
“And although Kendall continued to defend Cait and fight for her right to make the invite list, the Kardashian matriarch wasn't convinced.”
“They have both done f**ked up things in different ways'.”
“They have both done f**ked up things in different ways'Not having a bar of it, a livid and insulted Kendall replied: 'Is that actually a joke?”
“Not having a bar of it, a livid and insulted Kendall replied: 'Is that actually a joke?”
“...to listen to Kourtney s wishes of not inviting her ex boyfriend Scott Disick to the family party If Scott s invited why not Caitlyn...”


"99% of the answers are in the affirmative," she lamented in the interview
"On December 20, Khloe shared on instagram a picture of her little father Tristan Thompson holding her new lump."
“…… Choice Kourtney is the only one with the return of fashion models. The play is not over yet. Kendall continues to convince his family that no matter what happens, it's still a good thing. The situation is no different from that of Scott... "
"Chris reasoned that no one would know how to respond to her, because she started to explain everything, and she got the last word, because Christian and Khloe continued to explain how the situation was different, and at the end of the day, it was the mother's..."
"Because of all the things, no one will know how to respond to her," she began
"Although Kendall continues to defend Kate and fight for her right to be on the invitation list, Kardashian's matriarch is not convinced."
"They all screwed things up in different ways."
"They all mess things up in different ways," replied an angry, insulting Kendall, without a bar. "Is this really a joke?"
"Is this really a joke?" said Kendall, a pale, insulting man
“… Listen to Courtney's wish and don't invite her ex boyfriend Scott Disick to a family party. If Scott invites Caitlin, why not... "



Number  964
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us!”
“Eric later married Manuela Testolini in 2011, however JAY is now shining a new light on his past indiscretions.”
“JAY-Z shamelessly blasted Eric Benét on his sizzling new album ‘4:44,’ calling him out for cheating on Halle Berry.”
“We’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned that she ‘absolutely loves’ the track, especially since Eric dissed her shortly after its debut!”
“It looks like Halle Berry, 50, has found a hot new jam to rock out to.”
“The Oscar-winning actress is subtly addressed on the first track of JAY-Z‘s highly anticipated new album 4:44, which was released on June 30.”
“In one of his epic rhymes, Hov calls out Halle’s ex husband Eric Benét, 50, for screwing up a good thing and surprisingly, she was all for it.”
““Halle absolutely loves JAY’s track and thinks it’s hilarious he cracked on Eric about his cheating,” a source close to the starlet tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““JAY is totally right Eric’s cheating did ruin their marriage and it really hurt Halle.”Halley and Eric called it quits in 2005, shortly after he was caught cheating.”
“The R&B star reportedly confessed to having hooked up with several other women while married to Halle.”


"Tell us!"
Eric later married Manuela tasolini in 2011, but Jay now has a new understanding of his past indiscretions
"Jay-Z shamelessly attacked Eric Ben é t's new album '4:44' and accused him of cheating Halle Berry."
"We know exclusively that she absolutely loves this song, especially that Eric slandered her soon after her debut."
"It looks like 50 year old Halle Berry has found a new hot jam to rock."
"In the first track of the much anticipated new album" 4:44 "released on June 30, the Oscar winner was cleverly mentioned as her own position."
"In one of his historical poems, Hoff denounced Harley's 50 year old ex husband, Eric Ben é T, for screwing up the good thing. Surprisingly, she fully supported it."
"Harley likes Jay's music very much and finds it funny because he criticizes Eric's cheating," a source close to the little star told reporters
"Jay is absolutely right. Eric's cheating really ruined their marriage. It really hurt Harry." Harry and Eric broke up in 2005, shortly after he was found cheating
"It's reported that the R & B star admitted that he had collaborated with several other women when he married Harley."



Number  965
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We just have to wait and see what’s the truth behind these allegations, but it would be such a pity to see this beautiful couple destroyed by cheating.”
“AdvertisementGwen and Blake still have to address these cheating rumors because nothing has been officially confirmed.”
“Neither one of them wants another divorce.”
“The same insider stated that trust is an essential thing in a relationship and while this lacks from Gwen and Blake’s romance, there’s no point that these two get married.”
“Even if these two have such problems, it seems that their friends are still hoping that they will be able to solve them and get married just as planned.”
“After what happened in the past, Gwen could not handle something like that anymore, and she is becoming more and more insecure these days regarding her beau.”
“He had an affair with their kids’ nanny at the time.”
“The singer’s insecurity might be rooted in her past when she was also cheated by her ex-husband, Gavin Rossdale.”
“Gwen reportedly canceled their wedding plans.”
“Gwen does not like the fake student-teacher relationship between the two especially since Chloe won the title at the end of 2017.”


"We can only wait and see what the truth is behind these accusations, but it would be a pity to see this beautiful couple cheated and destroyed."
"Gawain black, the advertiser, still has to deal with these rumors of cheating because it has not been officially confirmed."
"Neither of them wants another divorce."
"The same insider said that trust is essential in a relationship. Although it's not in Gwen and black's romance, it's meaningless for them to get married."
"Even if these two people have such problems, it seems that their friends still hope that they can solve the problem and get married as scheduled."
"After what happened in the past, Gwen can't deal with it any more. She's less and less secure with her boyfriend now."
"He was having an affair with their baby sitter."
"The singer's insecurity may be due to her past, when she was cheated by her ex husband Gavin Rossdale."
"Gwen is reported to have cancelled their wedding plans."
"Gwen doesn't like the fake teacher-student relationship between the two, especially since Chloe won the championship at the end of 2017."



Number  966
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, when do you think, Jamie and Katie will attend their first big Hollywood event together?”
“Now THAT would be amazing.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she wishes he would be more open with their love.”
“At long last over Labor Day weekend in 2017, Katie Holmes, 38, and Jamie Foxx, 49, publicly confirmed their four-year romance with a romantic hand-in-hand stroll on the beach in Malibu.”
“Now that they finally gave the world the photo-op we’ve all been waiting for, the actress is ready to bring their romance even more out into the open.”
““Katie is ready to go more public with her relationship, but Jamie is trying to keep things quiet and that is disappointing to her.”
“Not only has she fallen in love with him, but (daughter) Suri has too which makes it more frustrating for Katie,” a source close to the Miss Meadows star tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Jamie has been a big part of their life for a while now and aside from the occasional walk on the beach, the pair have kept their private life private .”
“Katie has made it clear to Jamie that they have nothing to fear and no reason to keep things hush.”
“Katie is proud to be with Jamie and wants to feel free to go out to dinner, the theater, Disneyland with Suri or anywhere they want together,” our insider continues.”


"Hollywood stars, when do you think Jamie and Katie will join in their first Hollywood event?"
"That's great."
"We have exclusive details of how she wants him to be more open to their love."
"On the last weekend of Labor Day 2017, Katie Holmes, 38, and Jamie fox, 49, romantically strolled hand in hand on the beach of Malibu, confirming their four-year relationship."
"Now that they've finally given the world the photography we've all been waiting for, the actress is ready to make their romance more public."
"Katie is ready to make her relationship public, but Jamie tries to keep silent, which disappoints her."
"She's not only in love with him, but also (daughter) Suri, which makes Katie even more depressed," a source close to miss lawn star told reporters
"For some time, Jamie has been an important part of their lives. Apart from the occasional walk on the beach, they also maintain the privacy of their private lives."
"Katie has shown Jamie that they have nothing to fear and there is no reason to remain silent."
"Katie is proud to be with Jamie, and she wants to go out to dinner with Suri, to the theater, to Disneyland, or wherever they want to go," our insider continued



**Something goes wrong**
“Feel free to use them when you need to channel your inner smart-ass supermodel.”
“In that spirit, we rounded up some of Kendall’s wisest, most matter-of-fact moments.”
“What would the show be without her confessional reality checks and one-liners?”
“Kendall has a knack for hitting the nail on head when it comes to being real.”
“When she speaks, she’s to the point — dare we say she’s wise beyond her years?”
“While the Kardashian sisters are zany, outspoken, and uber-glam, Kendall’s always been a bit more grounded in real life.”
“We’ve watched her blossom from a little kid whose main function was to serve as comedic relief for sister’s onscreen exploits to the graceful, calm, and collected supermodel she is today.”
“She was just 11 when her family’s TV show hit the airwaves in 2007, which means that almost every awkward moment of her life is also featured in an episode on E!”
“Kendall Jenner has spent nearly half of her life on camera.”


"When you need to guide your inner smart supermodels, you can use them at will."
"In this spirit, we collected some of Kendall's wisest and most practical moments."
"What would the show have been like without the reality check of her confession and a line?"
"Kendall has an ability to hit the nail on the head when it comes to reality."
"When she spoke, she got to the point - dare we say she's smarter than her age?"
"Although the Kardashian sisters are funny, outspoken and dazzling, Kendall is always more grounded in real life."
"We've seen her grow from a child whose main function is to act as a comic relief for her sister's performance on screen to an elegant, calm and elegant supermodel today."
"In 2007, when her family's TV show hit, she was only 11 years old, which means that almost every embarrassing moment in her life will appear in E!"
"Kendall Jenner spent nearly half his life in front of the camera."



Number  968
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Adds the source: “The last thing Halle needs is to be in a long-term relationship with a man who doesn’t express himself well.”Yikes… Do you think he finished out the vacay or nah?”
“She said she needs someone who can think for themselves and is mature, smart and all-around adventurous,” the source explains to In Touch.”
““Halle decided he was too young and his communication skills were terrible.”
“...into the trip Halle realized her five month romance with the British music producer wasn t working and had her assistant book her a flight home...”
“According to In Touch reports Halle broke up with Alex during a romantic vacation to Bora Bora Halle broke up with Alex smack in the middle of their romantic getaway in Bora Bora says a source explaining that nearly halfway...”
“And the way she did it was SO COLD!”
“Well to put it more accurately, 51-year-old Halle has called it quits with 35-year-old producer Alex Da Kid.”
“Bossip VideoHalle Berry Dumps Producer Boyfriend During Romantic GetawayCan’t say we didn’t see this one coming… Another love affair has ended for Halle Berry!”


"The last thing Harley needs is a long-term relationship with a man who can't express himself well," the source added
"She said she needed someone who could think independently, mature, smart and take a full range of risks," the source explained to contact magazine
"Harley thinks he's too young and has poor communication skills."
“…… During the journey, Harley realized that her five month long romantic relationship with the British music producer didn't work, so she asked her assistant to book a ticket for her to go home... "
"According to in touch, Halley and Alex split up on Bora Bora's romantic holiday. Halley and Alex split up during Bora Bora's romantic vacation, and a source explained that nearly half of them... "
"It's too cold for her to do that!"
"To be precise, Halley, 51, has broken up with producer Alex dajid, 35."
"Boxip video Halle Berry dumped her producer boyfriend on a romantic outing can't say we didn't see this one come Another love is over, Halle Berry



Number  969
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I can run your campaign',” she told US magazine People.”
““I had people - wealthy, billionaires - calling me up and saying, ‘I can get you a billion dollars.”
““I went into prayer,” she said of the calls and speculation around a possible run for president.”
“Winfrey was first seen as a potential Democratic candidate after her rousing speech at the Golden Globes gained traction with viewers across the world.”
“The talk show host said she has been approached by billionaires offering to fund and run her campaign if she chose to run for the White House.”
“Oprah Winfrey has said she is waiting for a "sign from God" to tell her to run in the 2020 US presidential election.”


"I can run for you," she told us about magazine people
"I have a lot of people - rich people, billionaires - who call me and say," I can give you a billion dollars. "
"I started praying," she said of phone calls and speculation about the presidential campaign
"Winfrey's inspiring speech at the Golden Globes attracted audiences all over the world. For the first time, she was seen as a potential Democratic candidate."
"The talk show host said she had been approached by a billionaire who said she would fund and manage her campaign if she chose to run for the White House."
"Oprah Winfrey said she was waiting for a" signal from God "to run in the U.S. presidential election in 2020."



Number  970
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are very much attached to Blake and hope he is around for a long time,” our source adds.”
“Blake is always juggling the many things in his career and Gwen has with her kids and her own career.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on what the country superstar thinks about the breakup rumors.”
“Shelfani fans everywhere were shaken to the core when OK!”
“...magazine ran a report on Aug. 30 that Blake Shelton, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, had gone their separate ways after constant fights.”
“Have no fear though, because the split story is a load of total BS.”
““Blake finds the breakup rumors about he and Gwen ridiculous.”
“He has never been happier, more in love, or more secure in a relationship.”
“Blake is used to all the attention that comes with being in a high-profile relationship so he shakes it off,” a source close to the couple tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Blake and Gwen are both super busy, successful stars.”


"They like Blake very much and hope he will be around for a long time," our source added
"Blake has always dealt with a lot of things in his career. Gwen has something to do with her children and her own career."
"We have exclusive coverage of the country superstar's views on the break-up rumor."
"Shelfani fans are shocked to the core!"
“…… "Black Sheldon, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, parted after a constant row," the magazine reported on August 30
"But don't be afraid, because the story of division is a lot of rubbish."
"Blake thinks the rumor about his breaking up with Gwen is ridiculous."
"He has never been happier, more loving and safer than he is now."
A source close to Blake told reporters: "Blake has been used to all the attention brought by high-profile love, so he got rid of it." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Black and Gwen are super busy and successful stars."



Number  971
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Citing a rep for the stunning socialite, the site reveals the story made by National Enquirer is entirely "false."”
“Gossip Cop can confirm that Kim is neither considering a nude cookbook nor having any desire to become a "naked chef."”
“However, the report above turns out to be not true.”
“It further alleges Kim is certain her nude cookbook will "inspire her fans to watch their own bottom line and stick to the diet-friendly recipes, even if the pictures are of Kim's generous cupcakes."”
“Her mom Kris Jenner's cookbook allegedly wasn't well-received, but the publication claims, "Kim feels her concept will succeed."”
“...to do a cookbook and pose naked with all the recipes...”
“Citing a so called source the tabloid says that the mother of North and Saint West has came across a copy of David Thorpe s book Rude Food among some of her dad s old things and now she wants...”
“It goes on alleging that Kim is "pitching publishers on the idea of a cookbook in which she poses nude next to her favorite recipes."”
“The wife of Kanye West has "found a new way to line her pockets, even when she doesn't have any," claims the news outlet.”
“As claimed by National Enquirer, the 36-year-old "Keeping Up with the Kardashians" star is currently "doing a nude cookbook."”


Citing a representative of the amazing socialite, the website revealed that the national inquirer report was "fake"
"The scandal police can confirm that Kim has neither considered the naked diet nor any desire to become a" naked chef. "
"However, the above report is not true."
It further claims that Kim is convinced that her naked recipe will "inspire her fans to focus on their bottom line and stick to diet friendly recipes, even if the photo is Kim's generous cupcake."
Her mother Chris Jenner's recipe is said to be unpopular, but the publication claims that "Kim feels her idea will succeed."
“… Make a cookbook and put out all the recipes in the nude... "
"The tabloid quoted a so-called source as saying that the mother of North Saint West accidentally found a book" rude food "by David Thorpe in some of her father's old things, and now she wants to..."
Kim is "selling a cookbook to a publisher and making her naked next to her favorite cookbook," the report said
"Kanye West's wife has" found a new way to organize her pockets, even if she doesn't have them, "the news media claimed
The 36 year old "Kardashian family" star is currently "making a nude cookbook," the national inquirer reported



Number  972
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Manchester Arena Bombing Causes Singer To Suspend Tour Indefinitely19 Confirmed Dead, Manchester Police Say Ariana Grande Concert Explosion Likely Suicide Bomber With Nail Bomb[Featured Images by Frederick M. Brown, Mark Davis/Getty Images]”
“We’re not sure why The Daily Mail would include a mention of Taylor Swift in the story since it’s not at all relevant to anything else about the bombing at Ariana Grande’s concert.”
“In the aftermath of the bombing, British Prime Minister, Theresa May, increased the terrorist threat level in the UK from severe to critical.”
“ISIS has since taken credit for the carnage.”
“The bomb, which was packed with nuts and bolts, went off just moments after Ariana finished the last song in her set.”
“Dozens of concert goers were injured.”
“The attack killed 22 people, the youngest of whom was an eight-year-old girl.”
“According to The Telegraph, the suicide bombing at the Manchester Arena was carried out by a man named Salman Abedi.”
“Rapper Mac Miller, Ariana’s boyfriend, was there to greet the pop star and her mother when they landed.”
“Abedi was 22 years old and of Libya descent.”


"The explosion at the Manchester arena led to the suspension of singers' concerts. It is uncertain that 19 people have been confirmed dead. According to the machete police, the explosion at the Ariane Grande concert is likely to be a suicide bomber with a nail bomb [feature photo by Frederic M Brown, Mark Davis / Getty pictures]"
"We're not sure why the daily mail mentioned Taylor Swift in the report, because it has nothing to do with anything else about the Ariana grand concert bombing."
"After the explosion, British Prime Minister Theresa May raised the level of terrorist threat in Britain from serious to critical."
"The Islamic state has been responsible for this massacre ever since."
"The bomb was full of nuts and bolts and exploded just as Ariana finished her last song."
"Dozens of concert goers were injured."
"The attack killed 22 people, the youngest of whom was an 8-year-old girl."
According to the daily telegraph, the suicide bombing at the Manchester arena was carried out by a man named Salman Abedi
"Rapper mcmillar, Ariana's boyfriend, is there to greet the pop star and her mother when they land."
"Abedi is 22 years old, of Libyan origin."



Number  973
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I hope she does have someone like that.”
“Angelina knows how to keep her secrets locked down, so it wouldn’t surprise me if she did have someone she could meet up with every few months.”
“She’s taking all the necessary steps, pushing to finalize her divorce from Brad Pitt and moving their six kids to the UK a few months before the ceremony.”
“4 this summer in London.”
“Life & Style has exclusively learned that Angelina is planning to marry husband No.”
““Gradually, their romance blossomed into real love.” Now she’s ready to take the next step with her mystery man: down the aisle!”
““There’s a millionaire British philanthropist who she’s been quietly seeing for over a year now,” a close friend reveals.”
“Besides spending quality time with her six kids, the actress has been secretly dating — and she’s gotten intensely serious about one man in particular.”
“But she hasn’t been hiding out alone.”
“Angelina Jolie’s been keeping a low profile lately.”


"I wish she had such a person."
"Angelina knows how to keep a secret, so I wouldn't be surprised if she really had someone who could meet her every few months."
"She is taking all necessary steps to try to finalize her divorce from Brad Pitt and move their six children to the UK a few months before the wedding."
"In London this summer."
Life and fashion exclusive reports that Angelina plans to marry a woman without a husband
"Gradually, their romance became true love." Now she's ready to take the next step with her mysterious man: down the aisle
A close friend revealed: "there is a British millionaire philanthropist, she has been quietly with him for more than a year."
"In addition to having a good time with six children, the actress has been dating secretly - she's very serious about a man."
"But she didn't hide alone."
"Angelina Jolie has been keeping a low profile lately."



Number  974
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So if he is thinking of getting back with Kourtney she wants none of it.”HollywoodLife.com has reached out to Younes Bendjima’s and Scott Disick’s reps for a comment.”
“...in 2015 haven t publicly taken a family vacay with the kids in Mexico since 2016”
“Is it her ex, Younes Bendjima?”
“Here’s another plot twist in Kourtney Kardashian’s love life.”
“The KUWTK star is allegedly pregnant after publicly being seen with “what appeared to be a bump” in L.A. on July 30, a new report by OK!”
“...magazine claims!”
““It was strange to see because she’s usually so perfectly svelte,” a source told the outlet, and a friend to Kourt added, “Everyone is whispering that she’s pregnant with her fourth child.” If Kourtney is supposedly pregnant, then who on Earth is the father to baby number four?”
“And by that, we mean, is it once again baby daddy Scott Disick, 35, or ex-boyfriend Younes Bendjima, 25?”
“Naturally, one would assume it’s the younger model, who to the world was Kourtney’s boyfriend up until recently.”
“But Kourtney’s anonymous friend makes a shocking claim — it’s more than likely Scott!”


"So if he wants to go back with Courtney, she doesn't want it at all." Hollywood life has contacted representatives of younes bendjima and Scott disc for comments. "
“…… In 2015, since 2016, I have never had a family holiday with my children in Mexico in public. "
"Is it her ex boyfriend yones benjima?"
"This is another turning point in Courtney Kardashian's love life."
According to the latest report of OK, the Kuyt star is said to be pregnant after taking a photo with look like a lump in Los Angeles on July 30
“… The magazine claims
"It's strange, because she's usually very slim," a source told the media, adding that a friend of curt's "everyone is whispering that she's pregnant with a fourth child." If Courtney is thought to be pregnant, who is the father of baby number four? "
"We mean, another 35 year old father, Scott Disick, or 25-year-old ex boyfriend, yones bengima?"
"Naturally, people think it's a young model, and until recently, she was Courtney's boyfriend."
But Courtney's anonymous friend came up with a shocking statement - probably Scott! "



Number  975
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“She seemed relieved to be away from George."”
“Stars.”
“Add that to the stress of trying to get pregnant, and the couple have been bickering lately."”
“"She's living in his world now.”
“Okay, as any relationship expert will tell you, having your own identity is one of the keys to a thriving marriage, so if it's true, than we feel for her.”
“Amal, who has shared 15 months of holy matrimony with the world's former most notorious bachelor, evidently bemoaned that she "no longer has a life of her own."”
“IMHO that doesn't mean they're headed for divorce, as the tabloid suggests.”
“Sure, this may have conceivably happened, but what woman doesn't blow off steam occasionally with her gal pals?”
“It's pretty obvious that she's not very happy.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"She seemed relieved to leave George."
"Stars."
"Coupled with the pressure to get pregnant, the couple recently had a fight."
"She lives in his world now."
"Well, as any love expert will tell you, having your own identity is one of the keys to a successful marriage, so if it's true, we feel better about her than she does."
Amar, who spent 15 months in a holy marriage with the former world's most notorious bachelor, plainly laments that she "no longer has a life of her own."
"In my opinion, it doesn't mean that they are going to divorce as the tabloids say."
"Of course, it may be conceivable, but which woman doesn't vent with her girlfriend once in a while?"
"Obviously, she's not very happy."



Number  976
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
““She’d be beyond thrilled to win an Academy Award for Best Actress — something that’s evaded both her and Angelina.”“He still considers Jen the love of his life,” the source concluded.Have something to add to the story?”
““He wants Jen involved again as he produces and develops more and more high-quality film and cable TV products.”That kind of professional partnership could pay off for Jen, too, since the insider states she wants in on “prestige projects” under his production banner.”
“Machine star wants Jen to be his partner in other pursuits In Touch further reported They worked well together when they formed the production company Plan B in 2001 an insider close to Brad told In Touch...”
“Jennifer has been married to Wanderlust co star Justin Theroux for two years now And while Brad would never dream of ruining his ex s new marriage he would take a second chance at love with Jen in a heartbeat If they can t be romantic partners though the War...”
“Brad keeps telling friends that he’s seeing everything more clearly.”However, these realisations are obviously far too late.”
““And while he’s not in love with Jen, he realises how much he does love her.”
““He has come to realise that leaving Jen for Angelina was one of the biggest mistakes of his life,” the source adds.”
“And now, he’s “in touch with emotions and his true self like never before,” the source says.And it seems like this self-awareness comes with some great realisations.”
“Years later, Brad regrets leaving the Friends star for his now-ex Angelina Jolie, a source told In Touch exclusively.Following his 2016 separation from Angie, Brad sobered up and sought therapy.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"She's excited about winning the Best Actress Oscar - something neither she nor Angelina thought of." "He still thinks Jen is the love of his life," the source said, ending. Do you have anything to add? "
"He wants Jen to be involved again in the production and development of more and more high-quality movies and cable TV products." This professional partnership is also good for Zhan, because people familiar with the matter say she hopes to participate in the prestige project under his production banner
"Robo star wants Jan to be his partner in other fields. Contact further reports that they worked very well when they set up production company plan B in 2001, Brad informed contact..."
"Jennifer has been married to Justin Cyrus, CO star of roamer, for two years. Although Brad never dreamed of ruining his ex-wife's new marriage, if they can't be romantic partners in the war, he will fall in love with her again in a flash..."
"Brad kept telling his friends that he saw everything better." However, it is obviously too late to realize this
"Although he didn't love Jane, he realized how much he loved her."
"He has realized that leaving Jane for Angelina is one of the biggest mistakes of his life," the source added
Now, however, he has "unprecedented access to emotion and his true self," the source said, she said. And then it seems that this self-awareness is accompanied by some great understanding. "
"Years later, Brad regretted leaving friends star for his ex girlfriend Angelina Jolie," a source told touch. Following his separation from Angie in 2016, Brad woke up and sought treatment. "



Number  977
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kanye will step up as a dad?”
“You were made to be a mom!”Meanwhile, Khloe Kardashian is currently pregnant with her first child, and is due at the end of March/beginning of April — so there’ll be another little one added to the mix in just a couple of months!”
“I am so proud that you do what you want to do and live your life the way you want you will pass down all of those amazing qualities to your baby girl.”
““Our girls are two weeks apart and I can’t wait for them to be besties!”
““I’m so incredibly proud of the woman you have grown up to be and I know that you are going to be the best mom to your new baby girl!” she gushed.”
“That means Kim and Kylie’s daughters are less than one month apart, and Kim wrote the sweetest message to her little sis about it.”
“On Feb. 1, Kylie Jenner, 20, gave birth to her first child — a baby girl named Stormi Webster.”
“She made it clear that he petter start pulling his weight — or else.”Chicago was born via surrogate on Jan. 15, and is just one of the newest additions to the Kardashian family.”
““Kim was furious when Kanye told her to just hire another nanny.”
““Kim let it slide the first time, but she was counting on counting on Kanye to help out around the house because she already has her hands full,” the mag’s insider claims.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Kanye will become a father?"
"You were born to be a mother! "Meanwhile, Carol Kardashian is pregnant with her first child and is due to give birth in late March and early April - so in just a few months, another baby will join the group!"
"I'm very proud that you can do what you want to do, live the life you want to do, and you will pass on all these amazing qualities to your baby daughter."
"Our girls are two weeks apart. I can't wait for them to be friends!"
"I'm very proud of the woman you will be when you grow up. I know you will be the best mother for your new baby girl! "She gushed on and on."
"It means Kim and Kelly's daughter are less than a month apart, and Kim wrote the sweetest message to her little sister."
On February 1, 20-year-old Kelly Jenner gave birth to her first child, a baby girl named Tommy Webster
"She made it very clear that he had started to lose weight - otherwise," Chicago was born on January 15 through surrogacy, just one of the new members of the Kardashian family
"When Kanye told Kim to hire another nanny, Kim was angry."
"Kim let it slip away the first time, but she's counting on kenye to help because she's so busy," said an insider at the magazine



Number  978
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Markus Anderson a close friend of the divorcee to set up a meeting between the two in order to fulfil his Rachel Zane fantasies...”
“He was single at the time so she said Harry who s your ideal girl And he said Meghan Markle from Suits Prince Harry is said to have organised a meeting with his dream woman after having asked mutual friend...”
““She told me she’d been on a night out with Prince Harry.”
“She said: “He had a crush on Rachel Zane two years before he met Meghan and the reason I know is because I was having drinks with one of his friends.”
“In a documentary set to air tomorrow, royal expert Katie Nicholl reveals that the smitten prince described the Suits star as his “ideal girl” two years before they met last year.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"Marcus Anderson is a close friend of the divorcee. In order to realize Rachel Zane's fantasy, he arranged to meet them..."
"He was single at that time, so she said that Harry was your ideal girl. He said that Prince Harry's Megan markel is said to have organized a meeting with his dream lover after asking common friends..."
"She told me that she went out with Prince Harry all night."
"He had a crush on Rachel Zane two years before he met Megan, and I know that because I was drinking with a friend of his," she said
In a documentary to be aired tomorrow, Royal expert Katie Nicholl revealed that the beloved prince described the suit star as his "ideal girl" two years before they met last year
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  979
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check this out: Kylie Jenner and Selena Gomez Put Old Feud Rumors to Rest With a Cute Met Gala Selfie...”
“Selena is an adult and can make her own choices."”
“The singer is reportedly moving on from Justin Bieber, seemingly for real this time, and sources say she is "thrilled" about it.”
“"Selena started seeing the bigger picture when it came to their relationship," a source told Us Weekly of the most recent split/time apart in March.”
“"Like what was more important: her general happiness and her family and friends's approval, or her being together with Justin, where no one really supported their relationship."”
“When Justin and Selena rekindled their on-again, off-again romance last fall, her mom, Mandy Teefey, was openly unsupportive.”
“In an interview shortly after the pair got back together, she said she was "not happy" with the relationship.”
“But she then acknowledged that "Selena can live her life however she wants as long as she is happy, safe and healthy.”
“She is 25 years old and knows what is at stake with her health.”
“I do not control her the way it has been portrayed.”


"Look at this: Kelly Jenner and Selena Gomez used a lovely self portrait of a blind date party to quell the old rumors of feud..."
"Selena is an adult and can make her own choice."
"It's reported that the singer will switch from Justin Bieber, which seems to be true this time, and there are reports that she is" excited "about it
"When it comes to their relationship, Serena is starting to see a broader perspective," one source told weekly, which recently broke up in March
"More importantly, for example, her general happiness and the recognition of her family and friends, or she's with Justin, and no one really supports their relationship."
"Last fall, Justin and Serena started a broken relationship again, and her mother, Mandy Tiffany, publicly said she didn't support it."
"In an interview shortly after their reunion, she said she was" not satisfied "with the relationship
But she later admitted, "Selena can live as she likes, as long as she is happy, safe and healthy."
"She's 25 years old and knows what matters to her health."
"I can't control her as people portray her."



Number  980
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you wish he went to The Voice instead?”
“HollywoodLifers, are you excited to see Luke on American Idol?”
“He has some stiff competition this season, and his fellow coaches are ALL out to take him down, so things should get good as things continue!”
“Blake has a great track record as a coach on The Voice, and has won the show a total of FIVE times.”
“Now, it looks like the bros will be going head to head in the ratings when both shows air next spring!”
“So far on the show, there hasn’t been more than one country singer on the panel, so even though Blake was hoping for his pal to join, the possibility probably wasn’t very likely.”
“For season 14, Blake and Adam will return with Kelly Clarkson and a still-to-be-named fourth coach.”
“Luke actually helped Blake out as a team advisor on season 12 of The Voice, but at that time, the season 13 coaches’ panel of Blake, Adam Levine, Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson had already been set.”
“The trio started filming auditions on Oct. 3.”
“...at the last minute they roped in Luke and Lionel Richie...”


"Do you want him to change to that voice?"
"Hollywood stars, are you excited to see Luke on American Idol?"
"He has some fierce competition this season and his teammates want to bring him down, so things should get better as things go on!"
"Blake has a good record as a vocal coach. He has won five games in total."
"Now it seems that when the two programs are broadcast next spring, the ratings of the two brothers will catch up!"
"So far, there hasn't been more than one group of country singers on the show, so even if Blake wants his friends to join, it's unlikely."
"In Season 14, Blake and Adam will come back with Kelly Clarkson and a fourth coach who has not yet been appointed
"Luke actually helped Blake as a team consultant in the 12th season of the voice, but by that time, the 13th season coaching team of Blake, Adam Levin, Miley Cyrus and Jennifer Hudson had been formed."
"The trio began filming the audition on October 3."
“… At the last moment, they tied Luke up with Lionel Ritchie... "



Number  981
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They seem happy together,” he told Wendy Williams on her show, adding, “Good for them.” Let’s see how long these positive vibes last…HollywoodLifers, if you were in Khloe’s position, how would you feel about Lamar’s tell-all?”
“But after a few months, he actually warmed up to the Cleveland Cavaliers player and gave Khloe his blessing to marry him.”
“He thought James Harden was just another one of her “groupies” looking to ride the fame train and wasn’t thrilled about Tristan Thompson in the beginning either.”
“Lamar has not only dissed his ex-wife in the past, but also the men she’s dated.”
“Like any family, they have skeletons in their closet which could seriously hurt their brand if revealed.” Lamar told reporters that “everything” is up for discussion in the tell-all, so let that be a warning to Khloe and everyone in her inner circle.”
“While Khloe and the rest of the Kardashians try to live a good life, they are no saints.”
““Khloe fears what major secrets he could reveal.”
““Lamar has spoken recklessly about her family in the past,” the source continues.”
“Even though the basketballer has preached nothing but love over recent months, he’s gone of the rails before and it could happen again.”
““They’re all very concerned about this tell-all book and have reached out to ask him to be respectful,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"They seem to be happy together," he said on Wendy Williams. "It's good for them." Let's see how long this positive atmosphere can last Hollywood stars, if you were in Khloe's position, how would you feel about Lamar's talk? "
"But a few months later, he was really enthusiastic about the Cleveland Cavaliers players and wished helo a happy marriage to him."
"He thinks that James Harden is just another 'fan' of her. He hopes to get on the famous train, and he is not excited about Tristan Thompson at first."
"Lamar used to vilify not only his ex-wife, but the men she dated."
"Like any family, there are skeletons in their wardrobe. If exposed, it may seriously damage their brand." Lamar told reporters that "everything" has to be discussed in "tell everyone", so let this be a warning to Khloe and everyone in her circle
"Although Chloe and the rest of Kardashian try to live a good life, they are not saints."
"Khloe is afraid that he will reveal some important secrets."
"Lamar used to talk freely about her family," the source continued
"Although the basketball player has only been promoting love in recent months, he has been cheating before and this kind of thing may happen again."
A source told reporters: "they are very concerned about this easy to understand book, and take the initiative to ask him to respect others." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  982
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Eagle-eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping that they could “maybe start over again …but this time it means forever.” Sadly for these fans, the only way they can see Bella and Edward back together is in the pages of Stephenie Meyer’s books.”
“...where they can be friendly when they see each other in public...”
“Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson reunited and got ‘Twilight’ fans buzzing, but we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned if these two exes are getting back together or not.”
“For one moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan was once again a couple and all was right in the world for Twilight fans.”
“Ex-lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily-Rose Depp’s 19th birthday party on June 1.”
“However, don’t expect their love to rise from the grave.”
““There’s no chance of any kind of romantic reconciliation for Rob and Kristen,” a source close to Rob EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““That ship has well and truly sailed, and way too much has passed between them to ever reunite in that way.”
“Plus Kristen is really happy with Stella Maxwell they have an amazing relationship While there s no chance that RPatz and KStew will date again it s not all bad as the source tells HollywoodLife com that Rob thinks it s great that they ve finally got to a place...”
“Rob would love to see more of Kristen he still cares for her deep down and probably always will she was his first real love As for Kristen she feels a little awkward when she sees Rob because she still carries a lot of guilt from how their romance ended...”


Sharp eyed fans tweeted their excitement, hoping they could "start over But this time it means forever. " Sadly, for these fans, the only way to see Bella and Edward reunite is on Stephanie Meyer's page
“… They will be very friendly when they meet in public... "
"Kristen Stewart and Robert Pattinson are reunited and fans are cheering for twilight, but we've got exclusive information on whether the two ex girlfriends will get back together."
"For a moment, Edward Cullen and Bella Swan became a couple again, and for Twilight fans, everything was fine in the world."
On June 1, former lovers Robert Pattinson, 28, and Kristen Stewart, 32, attended Lily Rose Depp's 19th birthday party
"But don't expect their love to come back from the grave."
"For Rob and Christine, there is no possibility of any kind of romantic reconciliation," a source close to rob told Hollywood life
"The ship really sailed well. There was so much traffic between them that they could never reunite like this again."
"Plus Christine is really happy to have an amazing relationship with Stella Maxwell, and without the opportunity, rpatz and kstew will date again, which is not all bad news. The source told Hollywood website that rob thought it was great that they finally got to a place..."
"Rob wants to see more Christine. He still cares about her. Maybe she will always be his first love. As for Christine, when she sees rob, she feels a little embarrassed, because she is still full of guilt about their romantic ending..."



Number  983
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Leap Into a Serious Relationship Right Now Exclusive...”
“Embed Code Restart RELATED CONTENT Ryan Reynolds Explains Brad Pitt Asking for a Cup of Coffee in Exchange for Deadpool 2 Cameo Exclusive Leonardo DiCaprio Shares First Pic of Him and Brad Pitt in Quentin Tarantino s Once Upon a Time in Hollywood Why Brad Pitt Is Not Looking to...”
“The 54-year-old actor was snapped on the Los Angeles set of his new film with Leonardo DiCaprio, Once Upon a Time in Hollywood, on Monday, rocking a denim-on-denim outfit.”
“A source tells ET that Pitt has been busy filming the highly anticipated Quentin Tarantino crime drama set in 1969, but also spending time with his kids.”
“According to the source, Pitt's kids with estranged wife Angelina Jolie have been spending time with the actor at his Los Feliz, California, home, and that there's "a lot of laughter and skating" around the house.”
“BG010/Bauer-Griffin/GC ImagesBG010/Bauer-Griffin/GC ImagesBG010/Bauer-Griffin/GC ImagesLast month, Pitt and 43-year-old Jolie struck a new custody agreement when it comes to their six children.”
“According to court documents obtained by ET, Jolie was ordered by a judge to help repair her children's relationship with Pitt.”
“A judge determined that the kids not having a relationship with their father is harmful to them and the actor will now have more time with his minor children 14 year old Pax 13 year old Zahara 12 year old Shiloh and 9 year old twins Knox and Vivienne over...”
“...the summer while 16 year old Maddox because of his age and maturity can determine how much time he wants to spend with his father...”
“In keeping with the new custody agreement, Pitt has been with the children since July 21 and will have them through July 29, before he is responsible for getting the kids back to London to be with Jolie.”


"Start serious love now..."
"Embedded code restart related content: Ryan Reynolds explains that Brad Pitt asked for a cup of coffee in exchange for a guest exclusive of Deadpool 2. Leonardo DiCaprio shared his first picture with Brad Pitt in Quentin Tarantino's" once in Hollywood. "Why doesn't Brad Pitt want to..."
The 54 year old actor co filmed a new film with Leonardo DiCaprio in Los Angeles on Monday, a time in Hollywood, wearing jeans
"A source told et that Pete had been busy filming the much anticipated 1969 crime drama of Quentin Tarantino, but also spent time with his children."
"According to sources, Pitt's children and separated wife, Angelina Jolie, have been spending time with the actor at his home in Los Feliz, California, where laughter and skating are all over the house."
"Bg010 / Bauer Griffin / GC imagesbg010 / Bauer Griffin / GC imagesbg010 / Bauer Griffin / GC images last month, Pitt and Julie, 43, reached a new custody agreement for six children."
"According to court documents obtained by ET, the judge ordered Julie to help repair her child's relationship with Pete."
"A judge has determined that it is harmful for the children to have no relationship with their father, and the actor will now have more time with his minor children, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 12-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian..."
“… In summer, although 16-year-old Maddox's age and maturity can decide how long he wants to stay with his father... "
"Under the new custody agreement, Pete was with the children from July 21 until July 29, and then he was responsible for bringing them back to London with Julie."



Number  984
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’ll get to know about that as time progresses.”
“Is there even a chance that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie will get back together at any point in time?”
“Also read: Leaving Brad Pitt for Angelina Jolie was one of my biggest mistakes: Brad Pitt“Brangelina” have legally not separated since their divorce process is underway, a news that has sparked rumours that the two will not go through with their divorce.”
“News spread on the internet yesterday that Brad Pitt considered leaving Jennifer Aniston for Angelina Jolie as the ‘biggest mistake’ of his life.”
“In September 2016, Jolie announced their separation which had shocked the world.”
“Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie were romantically involved since the past 12 years and had gotten married in 2015.”
““Brad feels too much damage has been done and she’s tormented him for too long to consider taking her back,” said the source.”
“However, according to the same source, the feeling is not shared by Pitt who can’t seem to trust her and thinks she has tormented him for far too long.”
““She’s told friends, ‘I made the mistake of a lifetime,'” said the source to the magazine.”
““She’s been in tears over losing him.”


"Over time, we'll know."
"Is it possible for Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie to get back together at any time?"
"Read another: it's one of my biggest mistakes to leave Brad Pitt to Angelina Jolie: Brad Pitt" brengelina "hasn't been legally separated since the divorce proceedings, which has sparked rumors that they won't go through the divorce procedures."
"According to the news circulating on the Internet yesterday, Brad Pitt thought that leaving Jennifer Aniston to find Angelina Jolie was the" biggest mistake "in his life."
"In September 2016, Julie announced her separation, shocking the world."
"Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie have been in love for the past 12 years and married in 2015."
"Brad felt hurt too much, she tortured him too long and didn't think about taking her back," the source said
"However, according to the same source, Pete doesn't agree with this feeling. He doesn't seem to trust her and thinks she has tormented him for too long."
"She told her friends," I made the biggest mistake of my life, "the source told the magazine
"She wept for the loss of him."



Number  985
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'I feel sometimes that my body has taken a hit, but I try to laugh as much as possible.”
“So my health is something I have to monitor,' she relayed.”
“...been working on the script and this is going to be a really strong sequel Angelina and Brad separated in September 2016 and Angelina took a year off from acting to concentrate on her personal situation and to take care of her kids she told THR com during the festival...”
“Happy days Angelina pictured with daughter Vivienne at the Telluride Film Festival this past weekend has been separated from husband Brad for a year and has primary custody of the kids Back to wicked The actress said of returning to the Disney role she first played in 2014 We have...”
“'We have been working on the script and this is going to be a really strong sequel,' she said.”
“The actress confirmed she will star in a follow-up to Disney's Maleficent released in 2014.”
“The industry site caught up with Angelina at the Telluride Film Festival over the weekend where she was showing her directorial debut and passion project First They Killed My Father.”
“'I am now the breadwinner for the family so it’s time,' the mother-of-six laughed as she spoke about returning to acting after a hiatus.”
“She joked to Deadline.com that since splitting from Brad, it's up to her to step up.”
“Earlier this week, Angelina revealed she is going back in front of the camera because she needs to provide for her children.”


"Sometimes I feel like my body is hit, but I try to laugh."
"So my health is something I have to monitor," she says
“… Angelina and Brad separated in September 2016. Angelina took a year off from acting to focus on her personal situation and take care of her children. She told thr.com during the film festival... "
"Angelina and her daughter Vivian took a group photo at the telluride film festival last weekend. Happy time has been separated from her husband Brad for a year. The main custody of the child belongs to the villain. The actress said that she will return to her first Disney role in 2014. We have... "
"We've been writing scripts and it's going to be a great sequel," she said
"The actress confirmed that she will play in the sequel to the 2014 Disney film prank."
"The industry website caught up with Angelina at the weekend's telluride film festival, where she showed her directorial debut and passion project, killing my father for the first time."
"I'm the breadwinner of the family now, so it's time," the mother of six said with a smile, talking about her return to acting after a break
”She joked Deadline.com Since breaking up with Brad, the website has asked her to stand up. "
"Earlier this week, Angelina revealed that she was going back to the camera because she needed to support her children."



Number  986
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Charley Gallay/Getty Images for LACMA]”
“Celeb Dirty Laundry also did not provide actual quotes that could prove that Kris actually invited the British royalties.”
“The Jenner-Kardashian matriarch is reportedly inviting British royalties Kate Middleton and Prince Charles to her crazy Christmas party.”
“Kris Jenner has been known to host outlandish Christmas parties and this year won’t be an exception according to Celeb Dirty Laundry.”
“In the past, the great matriarch of the Jenners and Kardashians bought nine Christmas trees and live reindeers for this very reason.”
“On top of that, guests get to take home gift bags worth thousands of dollars.”
“So, who are the lucky souls that get invited to her crazy party?”
“The article claims that the invitation has been extended to the British royalties this year.”
“According to the website, the guest list is one for the books, which allegedly includes Prince William and Kate Middleton.”
“While the author of the article admits that this idea could be pure madness, it goes on to say that Kris Jenner wants the royal family to enjoy the Christmas celebrations with them too.”


"[Charlie geley / Getty pictures selected for lakma]"
"Celebrity dirty clothes didn't offer an actual offer, which proves that Chris actually invited British royalties."
"It's reported that Jenna Kardashian's parents invited British royal family members Kate Middleton and Prince Charles to her crazy Christmas party."
"It's well known that Kris Jenner has weird Christmas parties, and according to celebrity" dirty clothes, "this year is no exception."
"In the past, the great patriarch of the Janus and Kardashian families bought nine Christmas trees and live reindeer for this."
"In addition, guests can bring home gift bags worth thousands of dollars."
"So who's the lucky one to be invited to her crazy party?"
"The article claims that the invitation has been extended to UK royalties this year."
"According to the website, the guest list is one of the books, which is said to include Prince William and Kate Middleton."
"Although the author admits that the idea may be totally crazy, the article goes on to say that Chris Jenner wants the royal family to enjoy the Christmas celebrations with them."



Number  987
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So the rumors that Justin Theroux is writing a book about his time with Jennifer Aniston to simply make a quick profit are simply unfounded.”
“In fact, the two even released a statement that even though they’re separated, they still want to maintain their relationship as friends.”
“The ex-couple previously said that while they decided to end their relationship, they’re doing so with no resentment towards each other.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux are but the latest subjects that these tabloids are covering since their breakup is relatively new.”
“Both these magazines have published stories in the past that were questionable at best and obviously deceptively at worst.”
“Australia and Radar Online are overseen by American Media Incorporated.”
“For instance, OK!”
“What’s more, the origins of these outright lies are mostly written by magazines that are managed by the same company.”
“Tabloids have been quick to spew these stories after Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux’s breakup, creating claims that would make catchy headlines.”
“Friends and close acquaintances of the two also didn’t mention such an agreement, which would make these stories a complete fabrication.”


"So the rumor that Justin Cyrus is writing a book about his time with Jennifer Aniston just to make a quick profit is totally groundless."
"In fact, they even issued a statement saying that although they separated, they still wanted to maintain a friendly relationship."
"The former couple had previously said that although they decided to end their relationship, they did not have a grudge against each other."
"Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru are just the latest stories in these tabloids because their breakup is relatively new."
"Both magazines have published some questionable reports in the past, but at worst they are obviously deceptive."
"Australia and radar online are regulated by US media companies."
"Well, for example!"
"More importantly, most of these outright lies are written by magazines run by the same company."
"After the breakup of Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus, the tabloids are going to make a lot of headlines with these stories going on very quickly."
"Their friends and acquaintances did not mention such an agreement, which would make these stories completely fabricated."



Number  988
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Our sources at Kensington Palace and Buckingham Palace that the claims in this latest version are made up," Gossip Cop writes.”
“"In a startling twist, the Duke and Duchess will become the next king and queen, and with Prince Charles cast aside, they're ready to modernise the monarchy," the outlet writes.”
“She will either let her successor Prince Charles take over or Prince Williams will be given the crown.”
“There were reports suggesting that Prince of Wales is pursuing the Queen to step down to give him the charge.”
“There were also speculations that her highness wants Prince William and Kate Middleton to take over the throne.”
“Amidst these speculations, a tabloid claims that the Queen is dying and she has decided to let the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge take over.”
“Also Read: Kate Middleton's pregnancy spoiled Prince Harry Meghan Markle engagement and wedding plans?”
“The report published by Star suggests that William and Kate's reign will begin after baby number 3 while Charles and Camilla will be banished forever.”
“A palace insider told the magazine that the coronation will happen soon after Kate Middleton's delivery.”
“The Queen has made no such decision and Charles hasn't been "banished forever from the throne," as the report suggests.”


"Our sources at Kensington Palace and Buckingham Palace said the latest version of the statement was fabricated," the gossip police wrote
"Surprisingly, the Duke and Duchess will be the next king and queen, and they are ready to modernize the monarchy in the event of Prince Charles being abandoned," the media wrote
"She will either take over her successor, Prince Charles, or Prince William will take the throne."
"It has been reported that the prince of Wales is tracking down the queen to step down and make him accept the charges."
"There is also speculation that her royal highness wants Prince William and Kate Middleton to take over the throne."
Among these speculations, a tabloid claimed that the queen was dying and decided to let the Duchess of Cambridge take over
Another read: "Kate Middleton's pregnancy ruined Harry's engagement and wedding plans for Megan markel?"
According to a report published by the star, the rule of William and Kate will begin after baby 3, while Charles and Camilla will be banished forever
"A palace insider told the magazine that the coronation would take place shortly after Kate Middleton gave birth."
"The queen did not make such a decision, and Charles was not" banished from the throne forever "as reported."



Number  989
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.””
“...photo booth...”
““Since her split from Justin, Jen is doing fine,” a source tells PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The duo, who announced their separation in February, has “had some contact” after the breakup but “won’t get back together,” adds the source.”
““Justin has moved on with his life in N.Y.C.,” while “Jen still enjoys hers in L.A.,” the source continues.”
“Ultimately, Aniston’s “life now is not very different” than it was before the breakup, the source says.”
“She loves socializing with friends Earlier this month the actress 49 headed out for Molly McNearney s 40th birthday party where she posed with her pals including the birthday girl Tobey Maguire s estranged wife Jen Meyer Jason Bateman s wife Amanda Aanka and her manager Aleen Keshishian in a...”
“Image zoom Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux.”
““This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”


"We are two best friends, decided to break up, but looking forward to continue our cherished friendship."
“… Photo booth... "
"Since she broke up with Justin, Jennifer has had a great time," a source told people
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The source also said the two broke up in February and "had some contact" after the breakup, but "will not be together again."
"Justin continued his life in New York," while "Jane still likes her life in Los Angeles," the source continued
In the end, Aniston's "life is not much different now than it was before the break-up," the source said
Earlier this month, 49 year old actress Molly mcnearney and her friends took pictures at her 40th birthday party, including Amanda aanka, wife of the separated wife of Tobey Maguire, Jen Meyer Jason Bateman, and aleen, her agent Keshishian）
"Image zooming, Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru."
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."



Number  990
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...that he has no way of getting in touch with Meghan and that she changed her phone number...”
“He previously claimed that Meghan was faking her smile in public outings with the royal family and admitted to hanging up on Harry when the ginger prince reportedly warned him that the press would eat him alive Thomas then lamented...”
“Last week, Thomas compared the secrecy of Kensington Palace to that of the Church of Scientology.”
“...reported heart attack...”
“...re in ever starts getting to you you can call me Thomas claims he hasn t spoken to Meghan 37 since he was busted for staging paparazzi photos ahead of her wedding in May which he missed due to a...”
“It s going to be amazing and I m very happy for you but I want you to know that I m your friend and no matter where you are or what s going on if the fishbowl that you...”
“I said to her, ‘Your life is going to change.”
“We were alone.”
““I was sitting with Meghan in her wedding dress, as we waited for a set-up.”
““We had a moment I cherish,” said the 54-year-old, who played Robert Zane.”


“… He couldn't get in touch with Megan, and she changed her phone number... "
"He claimed that Megan pretended to smile when he was on a public trip with the royal family, and admitted that he hung up on Harry when Prince Jiang warned him that he would eat him alive. Thomas then exclaimed
"Last week, Thomas compared the secrets of Kensington Palace to the Church of Scientology."
“… Report a heart attack... "
“… If you start getting close to you, you can call me Thomas, who says Megan hasn't spoken to her since she was arrested at 37 for taking paparazzi photos before her wedding in May
"It's going to be amazing, I'm happy for you, but I want you to know that I'm your friend, no matter where you are or what happens, if the fish tank, you..."
"I told her your life would change."
"We are one person."
"I'm sitting with Megan in the wedding dress, waiting to be arranged."
"We have a moment that I cherish," said the 54 year old, who plays Robert Zane



Number  991
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“FOLLOW US ON TWITTER AND INSTAGRAM”
“This is not news.”how many times have i publicly referred to the community as “my fellow LGBTQ+”?”
“While answering fan inquiries recently via IG s new Question Sticker someone asked point blank Are you bi The daughter of Michael Jackson wrote in response That s what you guys call it so i guess but who needs labels The response was picked up by media outlets declaring that...”
“Jackson has revealed or confirmed that she is bisexual...”
““EVERYONE HAS KNOWN FOR YEARS I CAME OUT WHEN I WAS 14 WTF,” she tweeted early Monday amid all the hubbub.”
““How many times have I publicly referred to the community as “my fellow LGBTQ+”?”
“...like even on stage,” she added.”
““I’ve been a part of the community for years.”
“I even mentioned having crushes on girls when I was 8 in a magazine before.”
“I’ve been caught kissing girls in public.”


"Follow us on Twitter and instagram"
"It's not news." How many times have I publicly referred to this community as "my gay LGBTQ +"
"Recently, when answering fans' questions through Ig's new question stickers, someone directly asked if you were Bi. Michael Jackson's daughter wrote in her reply that this is what you said, so I guess, but who needs a label? This reply was reported by the media that..."
"Jackson has revealed or confirmed that she is bisexual..."
"It's been known for many years that I came out when I was 14," she tweeted Monday morning amid the uproar
"How many times have I referred to this community as' my gay LGBTQ + '"
"It's like being on stage," she added
"I have been a member of the community for many years."
"I even mentioned infatuation with girls in a magazine when I was 8 years old."
"I was caught kissing girls in public."



Number  992
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If it has, indeed, stopped.”
“It really wasn't until she started dating Younes that the speculation stopped.”
“But it took literally years before anyone, Kourtney included, knew what was really going on with her and Scott, since the two of them still went on cozy-looking trips and spent as much time with the kids together as possible.”
“...his relationships with Kris Khloe and Kim were slipping away...”
“The predictably unpredictable son of a moneyed New York family who became a reality TV star at 24 and is now invested in the luxury house flipping trade has had his raw moments with the family before especially when Kourtney finally let him go in 2015 and he felt that...”
“He's just not my biggest concern anymore," Kourtney mused after telling her mom to ask Scott herself if she was so worried about him.”
“"The situation is extremely hard and complicated, but I do have my own priorities and things that I need to focus on.”
“Kris Jenner, who has tirelessly embraced Scott as if he were one of her own kids, noticed right away that he was having issues with Kourtney's new relationship, especially after he put on a robe and got in bed during a trip to Williams Sonoma with her.”
“News—though, having started dating Richie last September, he doesn't have any more legs to stand on there.”
“And as recently as February he was "still insanely jealous," a source told E!”


"If it does stop."
"It wasn't until she started dating Eunice that the speculation stopped."
"But in fact, it took years for everyone, including Courtney, to figure out what happened to her and Scott, because they were still on a seemingly comfortable journey, spending as much time with the children as possible."
“… His relationship with Chris Crowe and Kim is disappearing... "
"The son of a rich family in New York, who became a reality TV star at the age of 24, now invests in the reversion transaction of luxury houses, which is predictable and unpredictable. He has had unpleasant moments with this family before, especially when Courtney finally let him go in 2015. He feels that..."
"He's no longer my biggest worry," Courtney told her mother to ask Scott if she was worried about him
"It's extremely difficult and complex, but I do have my own priorities and concerns."
"Chris Jenner hugged Scott tirelessly, as if he were her own child, and she immediately noticed that he had a problem with Courtney's new relationship, especially after he and she put on a robe and went to bed on a trip to Williams Sonoma."
"But since he started dating Ritchie last September, he's never been able to stand there on his legs anymore."
In February, a source told e



Number  993
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When it came time to find a ring, Justin asked Scooter and said, “I’m ready to pop the question” and he said, “There is only one place to go, ask Jack”.’Jack added that Justin ‘wanted something that would gracefully accentuate Hailey’s beautifully shaped hands’.”
“‘I know him through [his manager] Scooter Braun.”
“Here’s the low down.”
“...future with Hailey Need more on this tragic love triangle...”
“That was her dream too to raise a family in a big home by a lake with Justin and now that he is doing that with someone else it really stings The insider added Justin s new house is another clear sign to Selena that Justin is committed to his...”
“‘It was not long ago that Selena hoped it would be her settling down with Justin in the countryside somewhere, away from the noise of Hollywood.”
“‘Selena is heartbroken at the news that Justin bought a huge new love nest for him and Hailey,’ a source told the outlet.”
“She had dreams of leaving the limelight behind one day to raise a family somewhere quiet with Justin.”
“She reportedly viewed the major purchase as one final sign that she and the Sorry singer are done for good.”
“...get over him no matter how hard she tries Hollywood Life recently reported that Selena was heartbroken after learning that Justin and Hailey purchased a multi million dollar mansion in Canada together...”


"When it was time to look for the ring, Justin asked scooter," I'm ready to ask this question. "He said," there's only one place to go. Ask Jack. " "Jack added that Justin" wants something that gracefully accentuates Haley's beautiful hand. "
"I know him from his manager."
"This is the lowest point."
“… And the future of Haley needs more about this tragic love triangle... "
"It's also her dream to support her family in the big house by the lake with Justin. Now he is supporting his family with other people, which is really painful. The person familiar with the matter added that Justin's new house is another clear signal to Selena that Justin is committed to his..."
"Not long ago, Serena also hoped that she and Justin would settle down somewhere in the countryside away from the hustle and bustle of Hollywood."
"Serena is sad to hear that Justin has bought a huge new love nest for him and Haley," a source told the media
"She dreams of leaving the spotlight one day and supporting her family in a quiet place with Justin."
"It's reported that she sees this big acquisition as the last signal that she and the poor singer are finished."
“…… No matter how hard she tries, she has to forget his Hollywood life. Recently, it was reported that Selena was very sad when she learned that Justin and Haley had bought a multi million dollar mansion in Canada together.... "



Number  994
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Deadpool 2 releases on June 1, 2018.”
“However, Gossip Cop has taken a step to clarify the doubt and confirm that the actor is indeed clean.”
“The actor, who will be playing Cable alongside Ryan Reynolds in the Deadpool sequel, began his preparation for the role some months ago.”
“Posting pictures from his workout sessions, the actor has been actively showing off his body transformation on social media platforms.”
“However, the stunning transformation has raised a few eyebrows.”
“Is Brolin taking the help of steroids for his Deadpool role?”
“A new article by Star claims that the actor is on steroids to beef up for his role in the X-Men movie.”
“Shocked?”
“The report speculates that he is on "steroids or some type of supplements" that is helping him build up so quickly.”
“"It's almost unbelievable that someone could build that kind of muscle so quickly," the report suggested.”


"Deadpool 2 will be released on June 1, 2018."
"However, the scandal police have taken measures to clarify the doubts and confirm the actor's innocence."
"The actor will play cable TV with Ryan Reynolds in the sequel to the dead pool, and he started preparing for that role a few months ago."
"The actor posted photos of himself during the exercise on the social media platform, actively showing his physical changes."
"However, this amazing change has attracted some people's attention."
"Is Brolin replacing his dead end role with steroids?"
"A new article in the star says the actor is taking steroids to strengthen his role in X-Men movies."
"Shocked?"
The report speculated that he was taking "steroids or some kind of supplement," which helped him recover quickly
"It's almost unbelievable that someone can develop this muscle so quickly," the report recommends



Number  995
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More From In TouchBeyoncé's Twins Experienced the Ultimate Diva Delivery, Obviously (EXCLUSIVE)Beyoncé Had a “Harder Time” With This Pregnancy, Source ClaimsBeyoncé's Security Team Conducted Trial Runs for Twins' Birth (EXCLUSIVE)”
““She is fearful that he’ll show up uninvited like he did with [their five-year-old daughter] Blue.”
“Beyoncé gave birth to twins — a boy and a girl — on Monday, June 12, but the delivery didn't go as smoothly as she and husband JAY-Z had planned.”
“Despite conducting trial runs with her security team, the day was chaotic — In Touch exclusively learned.”
“"There was a lot of drama, specifically with the Knowles family,” says a source.”
“"Beyoncé made it clear that she wanted this day to run smoothly, but her family just did not listen."”
“MORE: Beyoncé and JAY-Z's Twins Are Still in the Hospital After Suffering "Minor" Medical IssueThe superstar, who stayed at UCLA Medical Center with her twins following an unspecified health issue, was reportedly furious.”
“"This was supposed to be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," adds the source.”
“"But Beyoncé was so stressed out because of all the fighting."”
“Bey's estranged father, Mathew Knowles, was one of the day's biggest stressors.”


"More twins from touchbeyonc é experienced the final Diva delivery, and it is clear that (exclusive) Beyonc é had a" hard time "in this pregnancy. The safety team from claims Beyonc é conducted a trial run (exclusive) for the birth of twins."
"She was worried that he would come uninvited, just like he did to (their five-year-old daughter) blue."
"Beyonce gave birth to twins, a man and a woman, on Monday, June 12, but the delivery was not as smooth as she and her husband Jay-Z planned."
"Despite the trial run with her security team, the day was still a mess - totally in contact."
"There's a lot of drama, especially with the Knowles family," one source said
"Beyonce made it clear that she wanted the day to go well, but her family just didn't listen."
More information: Beyonce and Jay's twins are still in hospital after experiencing "minor" medical problems. The superstar was at UCLA Medical Center with her twins because of an unknown health problem, and she was reported to be very angry
"It should be one of the most touching and beautiful days of her life," the source added
"But Beyonce was under a lot of pressure because of the fight."
"Beth's estranged father, Matthew Knowles, was one of the biggest stressors of the day."



Number  996
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...in a Motion Picture Baby Driver Dunkirk Logan War For The Planet Of The Apes Wonder Woman...”
“Performance by an Ensemble in a Comedy Series Black ish Curb Your Enthusiasm GLOW Orange is the New Black Veep Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble in a Comedy or Drama Series Game of Thrones GLOW Homeland Stranger Things The Walking Dead Outstanding Action Performance by a Stunt Ensemble...”
“Olivia Munn and Niecy Nash revealed the nominees from the Pacific Design Center in West Hollywood.”
“TNT, TBS, and truTV aired the announcement, which was also available to stream online, starting at 7 a.m. PT/10 a.m ET.”
“Presenters were joined by SAG-AFTRA president Gabrielle Carteris, SAG Awards committee chair JoBeth Williams, and SAG Awards committee member Elizabeth McLaughlin.”
““Big Little Lies,” “Stranger Things,” and “GLOW” each scored four nods on the TV side, while “Three Billboards Outside Ebbing, Missouri” landed four nominations and “Lady Bird” received three for film.”
“Kristen Bell will host the SAG Awards on Jan. 21.”
“The ceremony, recognizing top performances in television and film, will air live on both TNT and TBS at 8 p.m.”
“ET.”
“Here is the full list of nominations Outstanding Performance by a Male Actor in a Leading Role Timothee Chalamet Call Me by Your Name James Franco The Disaster Artist Daniel Kaluuya Get Out Gary Oldman Darkest Hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel Esq Outstanding Performance by a Female Actor in...”


“… In a movie, baby driver Dunkirk Logan fights for Wonder Woman on ape planet... "
"Ensemble performance in comedy series black suppresses your enthusiasm and glows orange is the new black veep outstanding action performance of stunt ensemble in comedy or drama series game of Thrones shining home stranger's thing stunt ensemble walking dead outstanding action performance..."
"Olivia Munn and nice Nash revealed the nominees for the Pacific Design Center in West Hollywood."
TNT, TBS and truTV broadcast the announcement at 7:00 a.m. / 10:00 a.m. EST, which can also be broadcast online
Gabrielle carteris, chairman of the sag awards committee, and Elizabeth McLaughlin, member of the sag awards committee.
"Lies big and small", "strange things" and "glory" each received four nominations for television, "three billboards out of Missouri" received four nominations, and "Lady Bird" received three nominations for film
"Christine bell will host the sag awards ceremony on January 21."
The awards ceremony will be broadcast live on TNT and TBS at 8 pm in recognition of top TV and film performances
"Wait a minute."
"The following is the list of nominations for the outstanding performance of timothee chalamet. Please call me James Franco disaster artist Daniel Kaluuya get out Gary Oldman darkest hour Denzel Washington Roman J Israel ESQ's outstanding performance..."



Number  997
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So you’ll see in the season how it plays out.””
“...with them everyday and I couldn t take it anymore said Kardashian...”
“...of her family...”
“After nine years together, the Keeping Up with the Kardashians star and Disick split in July 2015.”
“Since their breakup, both have found love with someone new: Kardashian, 39, with boyfriend Younes Bendjima and Disick, 35, with girlfriend Sofia Richie.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Though Kardashian and Disick are no longer romantically linked, they continue to co-parent their three children: sons Mason Dash, 8½, and Reign Aston, 3½, and daughter Penelope, 6.”
““I think Scott will always be family, and so we really try to have a good relationship for the kids,” Kardashian told PEOPLE about Disick while promoting the new season of Keeping Up with the Kardashians.”
“Image zoom Credit: Kourtney Kardashian/InstagramShe also revealed that KUWTK audiences will catch a glimpse of how their relationships with their significant others has impacted their co-parenting rhythm.”
““I think you’ll see that on the season a bit, but you know we really do our best to make the kids the priority,” she said.”


"So you'll see the results this season."
"I can't stand being with them every day," Kardashian said
“… Her family... "
"After nine years together, chasing Kardashian and dirick broke up in July 2015."
"After the break-up, they both found new lovers: Kardashian, 39, and her boyfriend, yones bengima; Disick, 35, and her girlfriend, Sophia Ritchie."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Although Kardashian and disik are no longer romantically connected, they continue to raise their three children together: 8-and-a-half-year-old son Mason dash, 3-and-a-half-year-old Rafe Aston and 6-year-old daughter Penelope."
"I think Scott will always be a family, so we're really trying to build a good relationship for the kids," Kardashian told people as she promoted the new season of keep up with Kardashian
"Image scaling credit: kurtni Kardashian / instagram she also revealed that kutke's audience will see how their relationships with important people affect the rhythm of their parenting together."
"I think you'll see that this season, but you know we did our best to make the kids number one," she said



Number  998
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Ellen DeGeneres Treats Her Talk Show Staff Like ‘Peasants!’ TV talker's a 'terror' & nothing like her public image, say insiders.”
“Forget that wide smile and friendly demeanor.”
“RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively Ellen DeGeneres’ reputation as the “Queen of Nice” is total sham!”
““Ellen’s public image is that of a sweetie who’s nice to everyone and is a real pussycat,” a source spilled.”
““But when the cameras aren’t rolling, she treats staffers as if they are her peasants!”The talk show host, 59, allows only a few people to even speak to her, and staffers are expected to turn their backs when she walks by, dished an on-set spy.”
““No one is allowed to engage Ellen in conversation or even look her in the eye!” the insider revealed.”
““She doesn’t even brief the staff about the show anymore!”Insiders claim DeGeneres’ ego is so out of control that when one of her producers was recently asked if she’d support a charity, he said, “Ellen doesn’t work with charities.”
“She IS a big charity!”The Finding Dory star — whose estimated net worth is a staggering $360 million — is also very manipulative, according to on-set insiders.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Alan DeGeneres treats her talk show staff like 'farmers! The television speaker is a "terrorist" & not at all like her public image, people familiar with the matter say
"Forget the bright smile and friendly manners."
“ RadarOnline.com The website exclusively learned that Ellen DeGeneres's reputation as "Queen nice" is totally fake
"Allen's public image is a sweetheart who is good for everyone, a real cat," a source said
"But when the camera doesn't turn, she treats her employees like her farmers! "The 59 year old talk show host even allowed only a few people to talk to her, and when she passed, the staff would turn around and throw a live spy at her."
"No one is allowed to talk to Ellen or even look her in the eye! "The insider revealed."
"She doesn't even introduce the show to the staff anymore! "Insiders say that DeGeneres' self-esteem is out of control, and when one of her producers was recently asked if he would support charities, he said," Allen doesn't work with charities. "
"She's a big charity! "According to people familiar with the scene, it was found that Dory star's process was also very manipulative, with an estimated net worth of $360 million."



Number  999
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Her mother, Kris, suggested she get voice lessons — but Kourt told her to butt out!””
“She sees it as no different from a boob job or any of the other cosmetic makeovers she’s had in the past,” the source said.”
““She hopes surgery will give her voice a makeover.”
““She hates watching her scenes and hearing how nasal she sounds.”The mother of three admires women with strong voices, like Ashley Judd and Emma Stone, and believes going under the knife will help her achieve a similar result, added the snitch.”
““Kourt knows she has the most annoying voice out of all of her sisters,” a buddy exposed.”
“A pal close to the reality star confided that Kourtney, 38, has been researching doctors who perform laryngoplasty, a procedure that transforms the voice box.”
“Kourtney Kardashian’s getting vocal about how much she dislikes her voice —And pals said she’s looking into surgery to give herself a more refined sound!”
“‘She hates hearing how nasal she sounds on TV,’ a pal reveals.”
“Kourtney Kardashian Going Under The Knife To Transform Voice!”


"Her mother, Chris, suggested that she go to vocal class - but Kurt told her to get out of here!"
"She doesn't think it's different from breast augmentation or other cosmetic surgery she's done before," the source said
"She hopes the surgery will transform her voice."
"She hates looking at her own lens and listening to her own nasal voice." The mother of three admires loud sounding women like Ashley Judd and Emma stone and believes she can help herself achieve the same effect with a knife, the informant added
"Kurt knew her voice was the most annoying of all the sisters," a friend said
A friend close to the reality TV star revealed that Courtney, 38, has been studying doctors for laryngoplasty, which can change vocal cords
"Courtney Kardashian began to complain loudly about how much she didn't like her voice - her friends said she was considering surgery to make her voice more beautiful!"
"She hates hearing her nose on TV," a friend revealed
"Kurtany Kardashian's voice changed under the knife!"



Number  1000
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Either way though, Brad is happy that he continues to have his children in his life!”
“While it’s been a year and a half [after their split], it still feels too soon to him,” the source explained.”
“Get the inside details here.”
“Nearly a year & a half after his split from Angelina Jolie, 42, went public, not much has changed priority-wise for Brad Pitt, 54.”
“The star is still very focused on his shared children with Angie and, apparently, things have never been better between the actor and his youngsters!”
“While Brad reportedly doesn’t see the kids every single day, he has been spending time with them regularly, which has apparently brought him tons of happiness!”
“Angie and Brad share six kids together: 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old Pax, 13-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivienne and Knox.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of the Jolie-Pitt kids then and now.”
““Dating hasn’t been a priority because Brad wants to spend more time with the children,” a source for ET told the publication.”
““He has been working on himself.”


"Anyway, Brad is happy that he can continue to have his own children!"
"Although it's been a year and a half [after their breakup], it's still too early for him," the source explained
"Get the inside details here."
"Nearly a year and a half after he broke up with Angelina Jolie, 42, the priority of Brad Pitt, 54, has not changed much."
"The star is still very focused on the children he and Angie share. Obviously, the relationship between the actor and his children has never been better!"
"It's reported that Brad doesn't see the children every day, but he's always with them, which obviously brings him a lot of happiness!"
Angie and Brad have six children: 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox
"Click here to see lovely pictures of Julie Pitt's children from time to time."
"Dating is not a priority because Brad wants to spend more time with the kids," an ET source told the magazine
"He's been training himself."



Number  1001
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s no longer a death sentence,” Boswell said of HIV.”
“Huizenga backed up his comment, saying that Sheen was undergoing lab tests every three to four months that showed the virus was at low levels.”
““Charlie does not have AIDS,” Huizenga said.”
“...he had AIDS”
“Asked if he would continue to pay the people he d been paying he said Not after today I m not Charlie does not have AIDS Sheen was joined on the show by his doctor Robert Huizenga an assistant professor of clinical medicine at UCLA and was asked directly if...”
““I’ve paid those people.”One of those people, he said, was a prostitute who entered his bathroom, took a cellphone picture of his medication and threatened to sell the image.”
““We’re talking about shakedowns,” Sheen said.”
“Later in the show, Lauer said that Sheen told him it was more than $10 million.”
“He paid those people “in the millions,” he said.”
““It’s a turning point in one’s life.”He said he revealed the diagnosis to people he thought he trusted, but some of them demanded money to keep the information to themselves.”


"This is no longer the death penalty," Boswell said of AIDS
"Huizenga supported his comments, saying that sheen carried out laboratory tests every three to four months and the results showed very low levels of the virus."
"Charlie doesn't have AIDS," huizenga said
"He has AIDS"
"When asked if he would continue to pay the people he has been paying, he said, after today I am not Charlie, no AIDS. Shane appeared on the show with his doctor, Robert wisengar, assistant professor of clinical medicine at UCLA, and was directly asked if... "
"I've already paid those people." He said one of them was a prostitute who went into his bathroom, took pictures of his drugs with her mobile phone and threatened to sell them
"We're talking about a big adjustment," sheen said
"Later on the show, Raul said sin told him it was more than $10 million."
"He paid those people millions of dollars," he said
"It's a turning point in life." He said he disclosed the diagnosis to people he believed trusted, but some people asked for money to keep the information confidential



Number  1002
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Of course I’m open to finding love again.”For more on Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx, pick up the new issue of PEOPLE, on newsstands Friday• With reporting by PERNILLA CEDENHEIMAre Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx Dating?”
“In her November cover story, she told PEOPLE she “absolutely” still believes in love, adding: “I’m a very loving person.”
“While sources don’t expect Holmes to take things to the next level with Foxx, she’s open to another serious relationship one day.”
“An insider tells PEOPLE Holmes, 36, has been spotted visiting Foxx, 47, “often” at his nearby home and that “they spend hours together” at a time.”
“...an L A area home in August and moved there with daughter Suri 8”
“They are two adults who are attractive and single and so apparently conclusions will be drawn Adds the source But contrary to those conclusions they re not about to run off and make some serious commitment The actress whose new drama Mania Days premiered at SXSW over the weekend bought...”
““Jamie and Katie are friends and have been for a long time.”
““This is not some intense romance,” a source with knowledge of the situation tells PEOPLE.”
“In this week’s issue of PEOPLE, multiple sources confirm the pair have been spending time together for well over a year – but it’s nothing serious.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"Of course, I'd like to find love again." For more information about Katie Holmes and Jamie fox, listen to the new issue of People magazine, on Friday at the newsstand
In the November cover story, she told people that she still believed in love "absolutely," adding: "I'm a very loving person."
"Although the source does not expect Holmes to take Fox's relationship to a new level, she is willing to talk about a serious relationship one day."
A person familiar with the matter told people that Sherlock Holmes, 36, was found to visit fox, 47, often at his nearby home, and they were "together" for hours at a time
“… In August, my family in Los Angeles and daughter Suri 8 moved there
"They are two attractive adults, single, so it's clear that they will come to conclusions," the source added, but contrary to these conclusions, they won't run away and make some serious promises that the actress who premiered the new drama mania day at Sxsw weekend bought... "
"Jamie and Katie have been friends for a long time."
"It's not an intense romance," one person familiar with the matter told people
"In this week's People magazine, multiple sources confirmed that they have been together for more than a year, but it's not serious."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1003
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See photos of celebrities who have admitted to getting plastic surgery:PHOTO GALLERY Yeah, We've Had Some Work Done...”
“You put a different color on your lips and, uh, rumors fly.”
““I read that I’d spent about $30,000 or something," she tells the magazine.”
“"It’s just ridiculous.”
“We had a laugh about it.”
“So many rumours have been spread over the years and you have to learn, especially in this business, to just laugh it off.”
“If you stress about it, you’ll drive yourself crazy.”The speculation over the Black Eyed Peas singer's face grew so feverish after her March performance that her husband, Josh Duhamel, spoke out in her defense.”
“"I thought she looked amazing," he told Ryan Seacrest.”
“"It's amazing.”
“But she's the same, she's the same Fergie...”


"Take a look at the photos of celebrities who have admitted to having plastic surgery. Surgery: Photo Gallery yes, we've done some work..."
"You put different colors on your lips, and then, er, rumors go around."
"I read that I spent about $30000," she told the magazine
"That's ridiculous."
"We laughed about it."
"There have been so many rumors circulating over the years that you have to learn to laugh them off, especially in this industry."
"If you're nervous about it, you'll drive yourself crazy." Speculation about the black eyed singer's face became so frenzied after her March performance that her husband, Josh Duhamel, defended her
"I think she looks great," he told Ryan Seacrest
"It's amazing."
"But she's the same, she's the same Fergie..."



Number  1004
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you think about Kendall feeling insecure about Kaia?”
“She's already nabbed her first Vogue cover, appearing on Vogue Paris in February 2018.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDDespite what Kendall thinks, Kaia's career won't come to an end any time soon.”
“"That's shaking Kendall's confidence, too."”
“Source: BACKGRID"Kaia is getting super chummy with Kendall's friends Gigi and Bella Hadid," the insider said.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDNot only does Kendall see Kaia as competition professionally, but the young model has also become close with Bella and Gigi Hadid, Kendall's BFFs.”
“Of course she's the next big thing."”
“Source: BACKGRID"Kendall needs to chill out," the source continued, "and understand that Kaia is Cindy Crawford's daughter so she's basically supermodel royalty.”
“"She views Kaia as her competition, so she doesn't really like her anymore."”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Source: background what do you think of Kendall's insecurity about Kaya?"
"She has got her first cover of vogue, which was on vogue Paris in February 2018."
No matter what Kendall thinks, Kaya's career won't end soon
"It also shakes Kendall's confidence."
"Source: backgrid" Kaia and Kendall's friends Gigi and Bella Hadid are getting closer
"The article continues with the following advertising sources: not only does Kendall see Kaya as a professional competitor, but the young model also has close ties with Kendall's friends Bella and Gigi Hadid."
"She's the next big thing, of course."
"Source: backgrid" Kendall needs to calm down, "the source continued," and understands that Kaya is Cindy Crawford's daughter, so she's basically a supermodel Royal. "
"She thinks Kaya is her competitor, so she doesn't really like her anymore."



Number  1005
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she and George will end up having another kid?”
““I already had them quite late.”Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do YOU think Amal is pregnant again?”
“Apparently Amal’s showing pregnancy signs, & it may even be twins again!”
“A third child already?”
“George, 56, and Amal Clooney‘s, 39, friends reportedly believe the star couple are expecting once again, according to Life & Style magazine.”
“And although Amal gave birth to baby twins Ella and Alexander back in June, the two would reportedly be “thrilled” if they were to expand their family once again.”
““[Amal] has the same symptoms she had when she learned she was pregnant the first time,” an alleged close friend told the magazine.”
““She’s eating like crazy and is more emotional than normal.” Click here to see pics of Amal’s stunning maternity style.”
“Her friends apparently believe the human rights lawyer is still in the very early stages of pregnancy, but even weeks from now, there may still be no sign of a bump.”
““During her first pregnancy, Amal barely showed for the first several months, and was active and working right up until a few weeks before the birth,” the source said.”


"Do you think she and George will eventually have another child?"
"I've been eating late." Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you think Amar is pregnant again? "
"Obviously, Amar has signs of pregnancy, maybe even twins!"
"A third child already?"
Friends of George, 56, and Amar Clooney, 39, said the celebrity couple had new expectations, lifestyle magazine reported
"Although Amar gave birth to twins Ella and Alexander as early as June this year, it is reported that if they expand their family size again, they will feel" excited. "
"(Amar) has the same symptoms as when she was pregnant for the first time," a so-called close friend told the magazine
"She's eating like she's crazy, and she's more emotional than normal people." Click here to see Amar's amazing maternal style photos
"Her friends clearly believe that the human rights lawyer is still in the early stages of pregnancy, but even after a few weeks, there may still be no sign of any uplift."
"When she was pregnant for the first time, Amar barely showed up for the first few months and remained active until a few weeks before delivery," the source said



Number  1006
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When Pratt approached the podium, he said he was "humbled" by the honor.”
“I love you so much."”
“Thank you for being my husband.”
“"Thank you for letting me speak here.”
“So, I thank you," she said.”
“And then you grabbed my face and you said, 'But the best is yet to come.'”
“And I said, 'Yeah, it is its going to bean amazing moment.'”
“That's the sexiest thing about you to me, is how talented you are...A while back we were talking about today and you said, 'This is going to be a great moment.'”
“That's going to be another five minutes, so I won't get into that.”
“YouTube"Honey, I want to thank you for being the most incredible person and an unbelievable talent.”


"When Pratt approached the podium, he said he felt 'humble' about the honor."
"I love you so much."
"Thank you for being my husband."
"Thank you for letting me speak here."
"So, thank you," she said
"Then you grab my face and say," but the best is still behind. "
"I said," yes, it's going to be a wonderful moment. "
"For me, this is the sexiest part of you, how talented you are Not long ago when we talked about today, you said, "this is going to be a great moment."
"That's five minutes away, so I don't want to talk about it."
"YouTube" honey, I want to thank you for being the most incredible person and incredible genius



Number  1007
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Foxx has two daughters, Corinne, 22, and Annalise, eight, from previous relationships.”
“Holmes shares 10-year-old daughter, Suri, with Tom Cruise who she was married to from 2006 to 2012.”
“MORE: Katie Holmes Sets Herself A Motherhood Curfew On Nights OutBut this comment was quickly retracted and she claimed that she had "misspoke".”
“I love that she seems very happy."”
“However, a friend of Foxx, Claudia Jordan - a former Real Housewives of Atlanta star - let slip about the couple in June and said: "He is very happy with her.”
“The surprise couple began quietly dating in 2013 and neither party has ever confirmed the romance.”
“MORE: Katie Holmes Reportedly Keeping Jamie Foxx Relationship Secret Because Of "Clause" In Tom Cruise Divorce"They wanted to be very discreet and had everything delivered to their room and taken care of by a personal butler."”
“A source said of their trip: "They stayed in one of the most private suites at the hotel, separate from other guests and entered by a small path.”
“Katie Holmes reportedly flew to Mexico with her beau, Jamie Foxx, for a birthday getawayUS Weekly reported that Foxx, 49, and Holmes flew to Cabo, San Lucas in a private jet on Friday (16 December) morning with just the two of them and two pilots.”
“The pair travelled together without Katie’s young daughter, Suri before the ex-wife of Tom Cruise turned 38 last weekend.”


Fox has two daughters, Colleen, 22, and annalis, 8, both former lovers
Sherlock Holmes and Tom Cruise share a 10-year-old daughter, Suri, whom Tom Cruise married from 2006 to 2012
"More information: Katie Holmes set a mother's curfew for herself, which was quickly retracted, claiming she was" wrong "
"I like that she looks happy."
However, a friend of fox's, Claudia Jordan, who was a real Atlanta star housewife, revealed the couple in June and said: "he's very happy with her."
"This unexpected couple has been dating quietly since 2013, and neither of them has ever confirmed the relationship."
"More: Katie Holmes is reported to have kept Jamie Fox's relationship secret because of the" clause "in Tom Cruise's divorce case:" they want to be very careful and send everything to their room for personal care. "
"They stay in one of the hotel's most private suites, separate from other guests, and enter by a path," a source said of their trip
"It is reported that Katie Holmes and her boyfriend Jamie fox flew to Mexico for their birthday. According to global weekly, Fox and Holmes, 49, flew to San Lucas cabo in a private plane on Friday morning (December 16), with only two of them and two pilots."
"Before Tom Cruise's ex-wife turned 38 last weekend, they didn't travel with Katie's little daughter, Suri."



Number  1008
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...adorable puppies at a dog shelter in Texas...”
“Despite their split a source told People magazine that Justin and Jen still talk all the time The insider added She s in an okay place as she was in control of the situation Theroux recently returned to social media after the split posting pics of himself cuddling up to...”
“They were at a corner table.”Cox was also on hand to celebrate Aniston's birthday a few days earlier, while Theroux was on the East Coast.”
“A source told Us Weekly, “From the way they were sitting, it seemed like everyone was kind of shielding Jen from the rest of the dining room.”
“Splash News Just a day before the split news broke, Aniston and Cox were seen dining together at the Sunset Tower Hotel.”
“The 49-year-old, who went without her wedding ring, was escorted out by her bodyguard.”
“On Tuesday night, Aniston appeared to be in good spirits while leaving Courteney's house in Beverly Hills.”
“SplashNewsAfter her surprising split from Justin Theroux, Jennifer Aniston seems to be getting some love and support from one of her close friends — Courteney Cox!”


“… A cute little dog in a dog shelter in Texas
"Despite their breakup, a source told people that Justin and Jennifer were still talking. The person added that as she had the situation under control, Jennifer recently returned to social media and after the breakup, he posted his arms around "This is my picture."
"They're sitting at a table in the corner." A few days ago, Cox was on the east coast celebrating Aniston's birthday
A source told weekly that "from the way they sit, it seems that everyone is protecting Jane from the rest of the restaurant."
"Splash news, the day before the break-up, saw Aniston and Cox eating together at Sunset Tower."
"At 49, she left without a wedding ring, escorted by bodyguards."
"On Tuesday night, when Aniston left Courtney's home in Beverly Hills, she seemed in good spirits."
After her unexpected breakup with Justin seru, Jennifer Aniston seems to have some love and support from one of her close friends, Courtney Cox



Number  1009
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Kimye’s decision to splurge on security for their surrogate?”
“The couple are reportedly splurging on $1.5 million in security for their surrogate.”
“Kim Kardashian, 36, and Kanye West, 40, are taking no chances when it comes to the safety of their unborn baby.”
“As HollywoodLife.com previously reported, the power couple have hired round-the-clock security for their surrogate and according to The Sun, it’s coming with a hefty price tag.”
“Kimye is reportedly dropping close to a whopping $1.5 million to make sure that the woman carrying their third child (another daughter) is tucked away safe and sound, according to the outlet’s source.”
“No seriously, they have rented her a secret place and are making sure she’s looked after at all hours!”
““Kim and Kanye have rented a place about an hour outside LA in a very nondescript suburb in a middle-class neighborhood for their surrogate,” an insider told the Sun.”
“I mean this is the last place you would think to find the surrogate for one of the richest families in Hollywood It s a nice house actually split level and Kanye has cameras put in everywhere in the house and outside too for safety and security these are state...”
“...of the art the source continued...”


"Tell us next!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of kimye's decision to spend a lot of money on their surrogate mother?"
"The couple are reported to be squandering $1.5 million in security for their surrogate mother."
"Neither Kim Kardashian, 36, nor Kanye West, 40, has any hope when it comes to the safety of unborn babies."
"As a Hollywood Life website, it has been reported that the Bauer couple have hired 24-hour security guards for their surrogate mother. According to the sun, the couple are very valuable."
"It is reported that kimye will invest nearly $1.5 million to ensure that women with a third child (another daughter) are safely hidden away."
"No, seriously, they've rented her a secret place and made sure she's taken care of all the time!"
"Kim and kenye rented a place to their agent in a very humble suburb outside Los Angeles," a person familiar with the matter told the sun
"I mean, it's the place you're least likely to think of as a surrogate for one of Hollywood's richest families. It's a good house, it's actually layered, Kanye has cameras in the house and everywhere outside to make sure it's safe, these are national... "
“… The source of art continues... "



Number  1010
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The setting was awe-inspiring.”
“The music was stately and beautiful.”
“The entire royal family was here, along with a complement of English aristocrats and important personages.”
“It somehow looked charming and just right.”
“Oprah was here, and so was Meghan’s mother, an African-American social worker who wore a conventional mother-of-the-bride outfit and also a nose stud.”
“It was an extraordinary mix of tradition and modernity, of centuries of history and up-to-the moment flourishes.”
“(This is always an exciting moment in a ceremony.)”
“They were beaming as they said their vows, and luckily, no one came forward to provide any reason that they might not be married.”
“They both looked so happy, and so relaxed.”
“Ms. Markle, who in a span of an hour was transformed from a Ms. to Duchess, successfully made her way down the aisle to meet her very-soon-to-be husband, Prince Harry.”


"The scene is awe inspiring."
"The music is solemn and beautiful."
"The whole royal family is here, with a group of British nobles and important figures."
"It looks charming and just right."
"Oprah is here, and Megan's mother is here. She's an African American social worker, wearing traditional bridal mother's clothes and a nose nail."
"It's an extraordinary combination of tradition and modernity, a combination of hundreds of years of history, and it's still thriving."
"(it's always an exciting moment in a ceremony.)
"They are very happy, and fortunately, no one has come forward to offer any reason why they may not get married."
"They all look happy and relaxed."
"In an hour, Ms. markel went from a lady to a duchess. She successfully walked on the aisle of the wedding and met Prince Harry, who is going to be her husband."



Number  1011
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To see all the tour dates for OTR II, click here.”
“As you’ll recall, she cancelled last year’s performance due to her unexpected pregnancy with the twins.”
“And the tour will kick off after Beyonce’s highly-publicized performance at Coachella in April.”
“We must note, this will be Beyonce and JAY-Z’s first tour since welcoming Rumi and Sir into the world on June 13, 2017, so it’ll be really special to share this moment in their careers with their children.”
“Get more info on how to sign up for the pre-sale here.”
“The ticket pre-sale will go live on Wednesday, March 14 at 9:00 AM North American local time, and 10:00 AM European local time.”
“As we revealed earlier today, the massive staidum tour starts in the UK on June 6, while the North American leg begins a few weeks later, on July 25.”
“Beyonce, 36, and JAY-Z, 48, are planning on bringing Blue Ivy, 6, as well as twins Rumi and Sir, both 9 months, along for the ride when their tour kicks off on June 6, and we couldn’t be more thrilled for them.”
“This time around, their work schedules won’t take them away from each other, nor their kids.”
“Isn’t that so sweet?”


To view all tour dates for OTR II, click here
"You remember, she canceled last year's show because of an unexpected pregnancy."
"The tour will kick off after Beyonce's high-profile performance in Coachella in April."
"We have to note that this will be Beyonce and Jay-Z's first tour since they welcomed Rumi and Sir to the world on June 13, 2017, so it's really special to share this moment of their career with the kids."
"Get more information about how to register for pre-sale here."
Ticket pre-sale will start at 9:00 a.m. North American local time and 10:00 a.m. European local time on Wednesday, March 14
"As we revealed earlier today, the staidum grand tour will start in the UK on June 6, while the North American tour will start in a few weeks on July 25."
"Beyonce, 36, and Jay-Z, 48, are planning to take 6-year-old blue ivy and 9-month-old twin rummy to the tour on June 6, and we are very excited for them."
"This time, their work arrangements won't let them lose each other or take their children away."
"Isn't that sweet?"



Number  1012
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In fact, it’s quite hilarious because we simply danced at a charity event along with a lot of other people,” he told Entertainment Tonight at the time.”
““[The rumors] are one hundred percent not true.”
“Holmes met up at a hotel with Foxx, who had been in the City of Lights to shoot his film Robin Hood, sources confirmed at the time.”
“...in May 2017, Foxx and Holmes were spotted spending time together in Paris.”
“And that wasn’t the first time Foxx and Holmes were caught on a romantic outing.”
“Holmes and Jamie Foxx at the 2019 Met Gala Credit Kevin Tachman MG19 Getty The pair even wrapped up the year with a December yacht outing in Miami followed by a jet ski trip the next day...”
“However Davis called out the move saying This lady left the room right when I was going to introduce her she was sitting at that table right with Jamie Foxx and everyone else Davis added If you re going to sit together what better night than tonight Image zoom Katie...”
“But it appeared the actress tried to avoid drawing attention to herself by leaving the room and moving to a different seat just moments before Davis announced the singer’s presence.”
“Though the two arrived separately, they sat together at the same table once inside the star-studded event.”
“In January 2018, Foxx and Holmes looked every bit the happy couple at Clive Davis‘ annual Pre-Grammy Awards Gala.”


"In fact, it's funny because we're just dancing with a lot of other people at a charity event," he told entertainment tonight
It's 100 percent untrue
Sources confirmed at the time that Holmes and fox met at a hotel where fox had filmed his film Robin Hood in the city of light
“…… In May 2017, Fox and Holmes were found spending time together in Paris. "
"It wasn't the first time Fox and Holmes were found out on a romantic outing."
"At the 2019 blind date ceremony between Holmes and Jamie fox, Kevin tahman MG19 Getty put an end to the new year. They even ended the year with a yacht trip to Miami in December and a motorboat trip the next day..."
"However, Davis yelled out the move to say that the lady left the room right when I was going to introduce her, she sat at that table right with Jamie Fox and others Davis added that if you're going to sit together, what better night image zooming Katie..."
"But just before Davis announced the singer's appearance, the actress left the room and moved to another seat, as if to avoid being noticed."
"Although the two arrived separately, they were once at the same table during a starry event."
"In January 2018, Fox and Sherlock Holmes looked happy at Clive Davis's annual Grammy Awards party."



Number  1013
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“– See more at…”
“You may like to read Couple Billie Lourd and Taylor Lautner again headed to Stagecoach Festival 2017 But the source investigated into the Enquirer s questionable report and a rep for Lourd assures us the entire article is not true Kate is not in talks to play Hawn in a...”
“Also rumored Kate Hudson to play the Part!”
“Find out Share thisLot’s of Rumor going on!”
“Find out the truth.”
“Although we would want it to be true, the rumor is a movie based on Goldie Hawn’s experiences on “Laugh-In” is in development, and Billie Lourd is in talks to play her.”
“But turns out- not real news.”
“Billie Lourd rumorAccording to the sources, rumors of actress Billie to be cast in the TV series, Laugh-In.”
“However, the rumors are not true news as they were all made up by their unspecified source and Gossip cop have exclusively looked through the news and found out it to be false.”
“So here we go.”


"– for more information, please visit..."
"You may like to read that Billie Lourd and Taylor Lautner went to stagecoach Festival again in 2017, but the source investigated the suspicious report of the inquirer, and a representative of Lourd assured us that the whole article was not true, and Kate did not play the role of Hawn in the negotiation..."
"It's also rumored that Kate Hudson is going to play the part!"
"Find out all these rumors!"
"Find out the truth."
"While we hope it's true, it's rumored that a film based on Goldie horn's experience in the big smile is under development, and Billie Lauder is negotiating to play her."
"But it turns out - not really news."
"According to the source, there are rumors that actress Billie will play in a TV series and smile."
"However, these rumors are not true news, because they are made up by people from unknown sources. The gossip police specially read the news and found that they are false."
"Let's start."



Number  1014
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Lawrence, alongside Amy Adams and Natalie Portman, was among those who discovered their pay had been significantly lower than their male counterparts’ in Oscar-nominated films.”
“Photo: FREDERIC J. BROWN/AFP/Getty ImagesJennifer Lawrence, October 2015: The Lenny LetterIn November 2014, the Sony hack leaks made international news as confidential emails, company secrets, and, yes, individual salaries were publicly disclosed.”
““Women are uncomfortable talking about money.”
“I can remind myself to try that too.”Nicki Minaj, May 2015: “Do your research.”In an intimate interview with Cosmo, the rapper discussed all things sex, power, and, of course, money, stressing how she’s never held back in any category.”
“I can encourage her to negotiate, ask questions, and stand up for herself.”
“I may not be able to single-handedly fix the pay gap, but I can open my stepdaughter’s eyes to it.”
“I am terrified to be deemed ‘difficult,’ and I don’t think I’m the only woman with that fear.”
““I was raised to never talk about money, so I never ask for more.”
“Judy Greer, May 2015: “I am terrified to be deemed ‘difficult.’”Emboldened by Arquette’s Oscars speech and the ensuing media attention on the wage gap in Hollywood, Greer published her own op-ed in Glamour, motivating other women in the industry to speak up.”
“...and end the gender wage gap...”


Lawrence, together with Amy Adams and Natalie Portman, found that in Oscar nominated films, their pay was significantly lower than that of men
"Photo: Frederic j.brown/afp/getty imagesjennifer Lawrence, October 2015: Lenny letter, November 2014, Sony hackers leaked international news as confidential e-mail, company secrets, and yes, personal salary."
"Women don't feel comfortable talking about money."
"I can also remind myself to try." Nicki Minaj, may 2015: "do your research." In a close interview with Cosmo, the rapper discussed everything - sex, power, and, of course, money, stressing that she never flinched in any field
"I can encourage her to negotiate, ask questions and stand up for herself."
"I may not be able to solve the wage gap on my own, but I can keep my stepdaughter's eyes open."
"I'm afraid of being considered 'difficult'. I don't think I'm the only woman with this fear."
"I haven't talked about money since I was a child, so I never ask for more."
Judy Greer, may 2015: "I'm afraid of being considered 'difficult.' Inspired by Arquette's Oscar speech and the subsequent media attention to Hollywood's wage gap, Greer published his review article, glamour, to inspire other women in the industry to be outspoken
“… End the gender wage gap... "



Number  1015
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image Credit: FameFly...”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below and don’t forget to check CDL for more Kardashians news and updates right here.”
“What do you guys think?”
“However, it might be doing the exact opposite… but hey, desperation makes people do crazy things sometimes.”
“Knowing that their ratings are crashing and that nobody cares about them anymore should really force the family to be more humble, especially Kim Kardashian and Kourtney Kardashian (being that they have children and all).”
“Of course, there’s also the chance that this report is pure ‘fake news’, driven by anti-Kardashian sentiment.”
“The store owner who agreed to kick out the other children might have been all aflutter from being in the presence of ‘celebrities’, but that will no longer be an asset for the Kardashians once their fame drifts away.”
“Eventually, they won’t be able to demand separate spaces for themselves or their children, because no one will listen to their requests.”
“However, they’ll soon find out what it’s like to be plebeians themselves, especially if their show continues deteriorating in ratings the way it has the last few weeks.”
“Since they consider themselves on the level of Beyonce, they probably didn’t want their children to associate with the ‘plebeians’.”


"Image source: famefly..."
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below. Don't forget to check CDL here to learn more about Kardashian's news and updates."
"What do you think?"
"However, it may be the opposite But despair sometimes makes people do crazy things
"Knowing that their ratings are collapsing and that no one cares about them anymore should really force the family to be more humble, especially Kim Kardashian and kurtany Kardashian (because they have children, etc.)."
"Of course, driven by anti Kardashian sentiment, this report may also be pure" fake news. "
"Shopkeepers who agree to kick other children out may be furious because of the presence of celebrities, but once the Kardashian family's reputation goes away, it will no longer be their wealth."
"In the end, they won't be able to ask for a separate space for themselves or their children because no one will listen to them."
"However, they will soon find themselves feeling like civilians, especially if their ratings continue to deteriorate as they have in the past few weeks."
"Since they think they are the same as Beyonce, they may not want their children to associate with 'civilians'," he said



Number  1016
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six.”
“Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise.”
“A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date.”
“ABC News, which produces the program, declined to make executives available for comment.”
“Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension...”
“...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m...”
“The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays.”
“One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show.”
“ABC said earlier this year it would replace “The Chew” with the new “GMA” hour.”
““Good Morning America” enjoyed an afternoon presence in the not-too-distant past.”


"Details of the hosts for the third" GMA "hour have been reported before page 6."
"Josh Elliott and Laura Spencer co hosted a good afternoon America skit between July and September 2012 to test franchise expansion."
"A person familiar with the show confirmed the details of the host and revealed the start date of the show."
ABC News, which produced the show, declined to let executives comment
"The launch of the show will expand GMA's program from its morning schedule to the station's daily schedule, and allow ABC to make bigger packages for advertisers, just as NBC did in four hours today. This idea will also promote the development of LianBo company, because ABC can promote this expansion... "
“… In the GMA main broadcast between 7am and 9am... "
"The new hour is expected to be recorded, not live. It starts at 1 p.m. on weekdays."
"One of the scenes discussed in the new hour is to use the studio audience who live broadcast the flagship show at 8 a.m. every day."
ABC said earlier this year that it would replace "the chew" with a new "GMA" program
Good Morning America enjoyed an afternoon's existence in the near past



Number  1017
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The women recently attended the Erasing the Stigma Leadership Awards together on April 26, as well as the GLAAD Media Awards earlier that month.”
“It is rumored that Sophia is living with Caitlyn in Malibu, with those reports fueled by several photos taken in Caitlyn’s home on Sophia’s Instagram page.”
“She came out with her decision to transition in a 2016 article in her school newspaper at Pepperdine University.”
“Like Caitlyn, Sophia is a transgender woman.”
“Recently, they’ve been photographed out and about together quite a bit, although they’ve never confirmed any reports of a romance.”
“Romance rumors first began in 2017, when the women were seen together in Mexico.”
“However, an insider tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY that reports of an engagement and upcoming wedding for Caitlyn and Sophia are “not true.”It’s no secret that Caitlyn and Sophia have a very close relationship, though.”
“Sophia has changed all that.” The ladies are reportedly planning their nuptials for this summer in Malibu.”
““Cait has a wedding planner to handle all the details,” Radar’s source claims.”This is a dream come true for Cait because her rejection by the Kardashians had left her feeling isolated.”
“The site also reports that Caitlyn and Sophia are making “secret plans to tie the knot” and that Caitlyn is actually in a rush to get married again after her fallout with the Kardashian sisters.”


"The two women recently took part in the disgrace elimination Leadership Award on April 26 and the grad Media Award earlier that month
"It is said that Sophia and Caitlin live in Malibu, and several photos of Caitlin's family on Sophia's instagram home page support these reports."
"She made the decision to transform in a 2016 article in the University of Pepperdine newspaper."
"Like Caitlin, Sophia is transgender."
"Recently, they are often photographed walking around together, although they have never confirmed any romantic reports."
"Romantic rumors started in 2017 when two women were seen together in Mexico."
However, an insider told Hollywood life exclusively that the reports about Caitlin and Sophia's engagement and upcoming wedding were "untrue". However, it is no secret that Caitlin and Sophia are very close
"Sophia changed all this." It is reported that the ladies are planning a wedding in Malibu this summer
"Katie has a wedding planner to deal with all the details," radar's source said. "It's a dream come true for Katie because she's isolated by the rejection of the Kardashian family."
"The website also reports that Caitlin and Sophia are working out a 'secret marriage plan'. Caitlin is actually eager to get married again after breaking up with the Kardashian sisters."



Number  1018
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“With all eyes on Washington, many reacted on Twitter as Comey was questioned by the 15-member group about his private conversations with the president earlier this year regarding the F.B.I.‘s investigation into possible collusion between the Trump campaign and Russian forces during the 2016 election.”
“...director will speak publicly since he was fired by President Donald Trump last month.”
“The public portion of Comey’s highly anticipated testimony is being broadcast on a number of TV networks and online platforms, and marks the first time the former F.B.I.”
“...director James Comey arrived on Capitol Hill Thursday to testify before the Senate Intelligence Committee on Thursday.”
“A day after releasing an advance copy of his opening statement, former F.B.I.”


"Everyone's eyes are focused on Washington, and a lot of people respond on twitter, because Komi had a private conversation with the president earlier this year about the FBI investigation into the possible collusion between the trump camp and the Russian army during the 2016 election, and was questioned by a group of 15 people."
“…… Since he was fired by President Donald Trump last month, he will speak in public. "
"The public part of COMEY's much anticipated testimony is being broadcast on multiple television networks and online platforms, marking the first time the former FBI has made it public."
“…… Director General James COMEY arrived on Capitol Hill on Thursday to testify before the Senate Intelligence Committee
"One day after the release of a pre release of his opening speech, the former FBI."



Number  1019
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but have been known to escape to their second home in Ireland and another house they own in The Hamptons.”
“She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and they welcomed a set of twins, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge, via a surrogate seven years later.”
“The couple married in a synagogue in Manhattan in 1997 after they were set up by one of Parker’s brothers.”
“Husband Matthew Broderick is the winner of two Tony Awards and is well-known for playing the lead character in the 1986 success “Ferris Bueller’s Day Off” and for voicing Simba in the Disney classic “The Lion King” (1994).”
“She is a four-time Golden Globe winner and two-time Emmy Award winner for her work on the show.”
“Parker is best known for her portrayal of Carrie Bradshaw on the HBO hit series “Sex and the City”.”
“Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick Net Worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick.”


Parker and Broderick live in New York City, but they are known to have fled to their second home in Ireland and another house in Hampton
"She gave birth to their first son, James Wilkie, in 2002, and seven years later they had twins through surrogate mothers, Marion Loretta Elwell and Tabitha Hodge."
"In 1997, a brother of Parker founded the couple and they got married in a synagogue in Manhattan."
Husband Matthew Brodrick, two Tony Award winners, is famous for his leading role in the 1986 success film "the holiday of Ferris Buller" and his voice dubbing for Simba in the Disney classic "the lion king" (1994)
"She's a four time Golden Globe winner and two time Emmy winner because of her performance on the show."
Parker is best known for her role as Kelly Bradshaw in the HBO hit sex and the city
"Sarah Jessica Parker and Matthew Broderick net worth: Sarah Jessica Parker is an American actress and the wife of actor Matthew Broderick."



Number  1020
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They haven’t spent any quality time together in months.” Photo credit: Getty Images...”
““Emma is a younger version of Jen, and she’s got a dark sense of humor that Justin likes.”
““Their relationship isn’t picture perfect, and they knew that going in,” a friend tattled.”
“Jen and Justin tried their best to make it work but it was just too hard Now they re both ready to move on Photo credit Getty Images The two haven t been photographed together since early October and late November The ENQUIRER spotted Justin carrying moving boxes outside their...”
“New York City apartment...”
“Although their reps denied marital problems, insiders warned it could be a nasty split.”
“They added that it could get ugly if the “Leftovers” hunk targets his wife's fortune — estimated at a whopping $200 million compared to Justin’s $25 million!”
“Photo credit: Getty ImagesOne spy snitched that the “Friends” star could air their dirty laundry in divorce papers to protect her assets!”
““Jennifer wants to end this quickly and quietly,” added the pal.”
““But if Justin puts up a fight — like asking for spousal support — she’s going to hit him hard.” Photo credit: Getty Images“Jennifer has always suspected Justin of having a wandering eye,” the source continued.”


"They haven't been together for months." Photo source: Getty Images
"Emma is a young version of Jane. She has the black sense of humor Justin likes."
A friend said, "their relationship is not perfect, and they know it."
"Jen and Justin did their best, but now it's too hard. They're ready to take a picture together. From the beginning of October to the end of November, the two never took a group photo again. "Inquirer" found Justin carrying a moving box at their door... "
"New York apartment..."
"Although their representatives denied the marriage problem, insiders warned that it could be a serious split."
They also said that if the "leftover woman" targets her wife's property, it may become ugly - estimated at $200 million, while Justin has only $25 million! "
Photo source: Getty Images one spy informs that the "friend" star can protect her property by disclosing their dirty clothes in divorce documents
"Jennifer wants to end it quietly as soon as possible," the friend added
"But if Justin makes a fight - like asking for a spouse's support - she'll hit him seriously." Photo source: Getty Images "Jennifer has always suspected Justin has a wandering eye," the source continued



Number  1021
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Totally," Barrymore recently admitted.”
“They first started dating in 2004 and four years later, married.”
“As Radar has reported, the couple is in deep trouble as sources say Drew Barrymore has come between them.”
“Click on Radar's gallery for more about their night out to heal their relationship.”
“The talk show host and her actress wife were a study in contrasts as DeGeneres stuck to her plaid shirt tomboy style while De Rossi wore a ladylike top and skirt.”
“DeGeneres, 59, and De Rossi, 44 shared an early dinner at Crossroads Kitchens restaurant in West Hollywood on Friday.”
“The upscale place is known for its vegan cuisine.”
“While De Rossi mugged for the cameras as they walked to the restaurant, DeGeneres stayed stoic.”
“As Radar has reported, there is trouble in the marriage of the couple who wed in August 2008.”
“DeGeneres and De Rossi, who met at an awards show, have been together for years.”


"Absolutely right," Barrymore admitted recently
"They started dating in 2004 and got married four years later."
"According to radar, the couple are in deep trouble because of news that Drew Barrymore is involved in their relationship."
"Click radar gallery to learn more about their relationship when they go out for treatment at night."
"The talk show host and her actress wife are a comparative study, because DeGeneres insists on her checked shirt tomboy style, while De Rossi is wearing a lady's top and skirt."
On Friday, denilles, 59, and de Rossi, 44, had dinner at crossroads kitchens in West Hollywood
"This upscale place is famous for its vegetarianism."
"When de Rossi went to the restaurant and grabbed the camera, DeGeneres kept his patience."
"As reported by radar, there are problems in the marriage of the couple who got married in August 2008."
"DeGeneres and de Rossi met at an award ceremony and have been together for many years."



Number  1022
Source test case:  ['Journalism']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow us:”
“Get our Free Daily Newsletters Here!”
“...https://t.co/bu3cDBGkMm — Primadonna (@primadonnamagph) December 12, 2017Star cover story of ‘Kim-Kanye $1 billion divorce’ busted by Gossip Cop was last modified: by>> Want to read more stories like this?”
“Primadonna primadonnamagph December 14 2017 Kanye West Kim Kardashian Divorce Rihanna Main Reason of the Split...”
“...predictions Unknownislandz December 12 2017 Kim Kardashian and Kanye West face divorce rumors before three year anniversary https t co X3FORPYKgu beautiful girls in the world mirza95815616 December 19 2017 Kim Kardashian Kanye West Divorce Gold Digger Rapper Reportedly Confirms Split By Ditching Kardashian Jenner C https t co pF49f27193”
“Divorce rumors will circulate again.”
“...opportunities to divorce Kanye she is trying extremely hard to make her marriage work...”
“She s struggled since Kanye s terrifying November 2016 breakdown and she reportedly can t see a light at the end of the tunnel according to an insider who spoke to Star Magazine Predicting a Kim Kanye divorce is a cottage industry as previous stories show Kim kardasian had many...”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, is reportedly at her wits end when it comes to dealing with husband Kanye West, 40.”
“The Hollywood Life story by Samantha Wilson begins: “This is so sad!”


Follow us:
"Get our free daily newsletter here!"
“... https://t.co/bu3cDBGkMm-Primadonna (@ primadonnamagph) on December 12, 2017, the cover story "Kim Kanye's $1 billion divorce" revealed by the scandal police was finally revised: by > > do you want to see more such stories? "
"Primadonna primadonna magph December 14, 2017 Kanye West Kim Kardashian divorced the main reason for Rihanna's breakup..."
“… The prediction is not known. On December 12, 2017, Kim Kardashian and Kanye West face divorce rumors before their third anniversary. The beautiful girl in the world mirza95815616 on December 19, 2017, Kim Kardashian Kanye West divorces. The Nuggets said that the singer is reported to have broken up by abandoning Kardashian Jenner C. HTTPS t Co pf49f27193
"Divorce rumors will spread again."
“… Chance for divorce Kanye, she's trying to make her marriage a success... "
"Since Kanye's terrible collapse in November 2016, she has been struggling. It is reported that she can't see a glimmer of light at the end of the tunnel. According to an insider, she predicted that Kim Kanye's divorce is a cottage industry, because previous reports showed that Kim kardasian has a lot of..."
"Kim Kardashian, 37, is reported to be at a loss when dealing with her husband Kanye West, 40."
Samantha Wilson's Hollywood life story begins: "this is so sad!"



Number  1023
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They weren't being overly romantic but definitely showed some PDA throughout the night.”
“He exclusively told E!,Rihanna was sitting with her boyfriend Hassan at 1 OAK owner Richie Akiva's table.”
“This relationship is definitely rooted in good ol' fashioned chemistry.”
“With her own net worth at $36 million, according to Forbes, she can take care of her own damn self.”
“Money is great, but I don't think it matters to Rihanna one bit.”
“According to Daily Mail, this is one of the biggest companies in the entire world.”
“In addition, the 29-year-old also serves as the deputy president and vice chairman of his family's company, Abdul Latif Jameel.”
“This results in his net worth sitting at a hefty $1.5 billion.”
“For 80 years, Jameel's family has been, "the sole owners of the right to sell Toyota cars in Saudi Arabia," according to COED.”
“As the Toyota heir, he's wealthy — like, really wealthy.”


"They're not too romantic, but they must be watching the PDA all night."
"He only told me! Rihanna and her boyfriend Hassan are sitting at the table of rich Akiva, owner of Oak House No.1
"This relationship is absolutely rooted in good old-fashioned chemistry."
"According to Forbes, her own net worth is $36 million, and she can take care of herself."
"Money is good, but I don't think it's important to Rihanna at all."
According to the daily mail, it is one of the largest companies in the world
"In addition, the 29 year old is Abdel Latif Jamil, vice president and vice chairman of his family company."
"This led to a net worth of $1.5 billion."
"For 80 years, the jammiers have been 'the only owners of Toyota sales rights in Saudi Arabia'," he said
"As Toyota's successor, he's very rich - like, very rich."



Number  1024
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...they don t like...”
“Perhaps the most important legal precedent set by this decision is the affirmation of a sitcom staff s ability to fire assistants over their inadequate typing transcribing skills the standard industry excuse used by confrontation averse writers to terminate someone...”
“She was fired after four months on the job, allegedly because she could not transcribe meetings fast enough or capture the flavor of the meetings.”
“Lyle said she was offended by repeated references to the actors' sex lives and to the writers' own sexual exploits as they penned the successful NBC sitcom rife with bawdy banter about six New York City friends.”
“[...]Amaani Lyle, 32, alleged six years ago that raw sexual remarks peppering work sessions and conversations added up to harassment against women.”
“"The record discloses that most of the sexually coarse and vulgar language at issue did not involve and was not aimed at plaintiff or other women in the workplace," Justice Marvin Baxter wrote.”
“The court added that no jury would believe the writers' assistant was the target of harassment during profanity-laced meetings.”
“...the creative process and therefore the studio and its writers could not be sued for raunchy writers meetings...”
“Courteney Cox s uterus discussed their personal views on the necessity of foreplay or pitched out unorthodox ideas for Joey s day job The justices ruling 7 0 agreed with Warner Bros Television Productions that trash talk was part of...”
“Sitcom producers all over town will be relieved to discover that the California Supreme Court upheld the sanctity of the writers room today ruling that the Friends staff was merely performing their duties when they speculated about the contents of...”


“… They don't like... "
"Perhaps the most important legal precedent created by this decision is that sitcom staff must be able to fire assistants because they lack typing and copying skills, which is the standard industry excuse used by writers who hate confrontation to terminate someone..."
"She was fired after four months of work, it's said that it was because she couldn't copy meetings fast enough or capture the taste of them."
"Lyle said she was annoyed by the repeated references to actors' sexual lives and writers' own sexual behavior, because they made obscene jokes on six New York City Friends in the successful NBC sitcom."
“[… ]Amani Lyle, 32, claimed six years ago that vulgar sexual remarks add up to harassment of women in work meetings and conversations. "
Judge Marvin Baxter wrote: "the record shows that most of the vulgar and vulgar language involved in sex is not involved or directed at the plaintiff or other working women."
"The court added that no jury would believe that the assistant writer was the target of harassment during the blasphemy session."
“…… As a result, the studio and its authors can't be sued for vulgar writers' meetings... "
"Courtney Cox's womb discussed their personal views on the need for foreplay, or put forward unorthodox ideas for Joey's day-to-day work. The judges ruled that 70 agreed with Warner Bros. television production, and rubbish was part of it..."
"When the California Supreme Court ruled today that the staff of friends were only performing their duties when they speculated on the content of friends, and that the playroom of friends safeguarded the sanctity of friends, the sitcom producers in the whole town would be relieved."



Number  1025
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think she’s prepping for a wedding?”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think of Angelina’s new house?”
“Either way, the house is insane — check it out in the gallery above.”
“Perhaps staying in Los Angeles is her way of making sure Pax, Maddox, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox continue to have a relationship with their father?”
“However, we also know that Brad and Angie’s divorce has been much more amicable recently, and she’s been letting him spend more and more time with the kids.”
“The actress is reportedly already serious with this mystery man, and a family friend told InTouch that she’s even planning on marrying him!”
“The possibility of that big move happening seemed even more likely after reports surfaced on April 12 that Angie had met and fallen in love with a British philanthropist and businessman, whose identity has not been revealed.”
“This huge purchase comes following rumors that Angie planned on moving her kids to London so she could work there after her September 2016 split from Brad Pitt, 53.”
“There’s tons of space for the six kids, too — the house boasts 6 bedrooms and 10 bathrooms, plus a spacious backyard.”
“Cecil’s home, which he lived in until his death in 1959, is considered one of the greatest properties in L.A., and Angie will have some famous neighbors, including Casey Affleck, Natalie Portman and Ellen Pompeo.”


"Do you think she's preparing for the wedding?"
"Miss Hollywood, what do you think of Angelina's new house?"
"Anyway, the house is crazy - go to the gallery above."
"Maybe staying in Los Angeles is her way of ensuring that parks, Maddox, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivian and Knox continue to have a relationship with her father?"
"However, we also know that Brad and Angie's divorce has been getting along much better recently, and she has let him spend more and more time with his children."
According to reports, the actress has taken the mysterious man seriously. A family friend told touch that she even planned to marry him
"After it was reported on April 12 that Angie met and fell in love with a British philanthropist and businessman, it seems that this major move is more likely to happen, but his identity has not been revealed."
"The huge acquisition comes after rumors that Angie plans to move her children to London so that she can work there after breaking up with Brad Pitt, 53, in September 2016."
"There's a lot of space for six kids - the house has six bedrooms and 10 bathrooms, and a spacious backyard."
Cecil's family lived until her death in 1959 and is considered one of the best properties in Los Angeles. Angie will have some famous neighbors, including Kathy Affleck, Natalie Portman and Ellen Pompeo



Number  1026
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“James Brolin and Barbra Streisand are nearing their 20th wedding anniversary this year.”
“ET’s Katie Krause spoke with Brolin at the Hallmark Channel and Hallmark Movies & Mysteries winter Television Critics Association red carpet on Saturday, where he revealed that despite his decades-long romance, he still doesn't have all the answers.”
““I don’t know, because nobody trains you,” he said of the secret to his and Streisand's marriage.”
““This is my third time -- third marriage.”
“I picked difficult situations the first two times, but I think you learn with each one.”
“I’m a person that believes that if I’m wrong, that’s when I learn, and when I’m right, I haven’t learned a thing.”Noting that he takes his relationship “day to day,” Brolin revealed that he’s an advocate of marriage counseling.”
““I do believe in counseling if anybody ever has a problem in their marriage.”
“Bring in a referee, talk it over, and I swear to you, it will dispel by the end of the session, each time!” he said.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"James bullring and Barbara Streisand are getting married on their anniversary this year."
Katie Krause of ET, who spoke with Brolin on the hallmark channel and the hallmark movies & mysteries winter television criticism Association red carpet on Saturday, revealed that despite his decades of love, he still hasn't found all the answers
"I don't know, because no one trains you," he said of the secret of his marriage to Streisand
"This is my third - third marriage."
"The first two times I've chosen difficult situations, but I think you'll learn from them."
"I'm a person who believes that if I'm wrong, it's when I learn, and when I'm right, I don't learn anything." Brolling pointed out that he dealt with his relationship "every day" and revealed that he was an advocate of marriage counseling
"If someone has problems in their marriage, I believe counseling is OK."
"Please come to a referee and talk about it. I swear to you that every time the game ends, it will be dispersed! "He said



Number  1027
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Foxx emphatically denied the allegation.”
“Foxx was recently accused of slapping a woman in the face with his penis in 2002 after she refused to give him oral sex, triggering PTSD, but that case has now been closed without charge.”
“Holmes and Foxx kept their relationship secret for several years, prompting speculation that Tom Cruise had ‘banned’ Holmes from dating for five years after the split as part of their divorce settlement.”
“Holmes was also spotted in the nearby town of Kilkenny.”
“Holmes is believed to have flown to Ireland from Paris where she was spotted last week, and stayed the night in one of the house’s opulent bedrooms with stunning views over the Irish countryside.”
“Bob Geldof...”
“Borris is also the location of one of Ireland s most successful arts festivals the Borris House Festival of Writing and Ideas which this year included speakers such as Margaret Atwood Cillian Murphy Led Zeppelin s John Paul Jones and...”
“Holmes is believed to have been visiting the Bare in The Woods festival there this weekend.”
“The home is a regular venue for some of Ireland’s most glamorous and high profile weddings, as well as a number of festivals and events.”
“She was said to have asked about the house’s history and its use as a wedding venue, but no booking has been made as yet, our sources say.”


"Fox strongly denies the charge."
"Fox was recently accused of slapping a woman in the face with his penis in 2002 because she refused to give him oral sex, causing post-traumatic stress disorder, but the case is now over without charge."
"Holmes and fox kept their relationship secret for several years, which led to speculation that Tom Cruise 'banned' Holmes' dating as part of their divorce agreement for five years after the breakup."
"Sherlock Holmes was also found in the nearby town of Kilkenny."
Sherlock Holmes is believed to have flown to Ireland last week from where she was found in Paris, where she spent the night in a luxury bedroom overlooking the Irish countryside
"Bob geldorf..."
"Boris is also one of the most successful arts festivals in Ireland. It is the venue of the Boris house writing and creativity Festival. This year's speakers include John Paul Jones of Zeppelin, led by Margaret Atwood Cillian Murphy, and..."
"Sherlock Holmes is believed to have been visiting the naked Forest Festival there this weekend."
"This home is a fixture for some of Ireland's most glamorous and eye-catching weddings, as well as festivals and events."
"She is said to have asked about the history of the house and its use as a wedding venue, but our source said that so far there is no reservation."



Number  1028
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We Did Absolutely Nothing For Our Anniversary The couple celebrated their rocky relationship at IHOP amid West s drug scandal...”
“In a tell-all interview with Allure, Kim Kardashian admitted she and husband Kanye West did “absolutely nothing” for their anniversary, RadarOnline.com has learned!”
“The news comes amid the couple’s intense backlash over their allegedly plummeting relationship.”
““We don’t do gifts,” she said in her interview.”
““We just did absolutely nothing [for our anniversary].”
“We spent two days in Santa Barbara, and we slept.”“You know what?”
“I think we went to IHOP.”
“That’s what we did,” Kardashian, 36, added.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We didn't do anything on our anniversary. In the west drug scandal, the couple celebrated their unstable relationship at IHop... "
In an interview with temptation, Kim Kardashian admitted that she and her husband Kanye West "did nothing" on their anniversary, RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
"The news came at a time when the couple rebounded strongly because of the alleged plummeting relationship."
"We don't give gifts," she said in an interview
"We didn't do anything."
"We stayed in Santa Barbara for two days, and then we fell asleep." "Do you know?"
"I think we went to IHop."
"That's what we do," added Kardashian, 36



Number  1029
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s clear she’s ready for motherhood, and we know she’ll be fantastic!”
“Because of Tristan’s busy basketball schedule, Khloe decided to relocate to Cleveland, but that isn’t stopping her famous family and friends from joining her on the special day.”
“Her due date is quickly approaching, and we’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on who will be in the delivery room!”
“They say “time flies when you’re having fun,” and if you’re a fan of Khloe Kardashian, 33, you know she’s enjoyed every moment of her pregnancy!”
“But, this good thing is coming to an end because Koko is ready to pop!”
“The mother-to-be, who’s currently in Cleveland where her baby daddy Tristan Thompson is based, is expected to give birth any day now, and we’ve just learned who’s going to be in the delivery room.”
““Khloe is loving her pregnancy, but she’s even more excited to become a mom, which will happen sooner than you think.”
“She’s only days away from birth, maybe a week or two at the most, at least that is what she is hoping.”
“She plans on giving birth in Ohio, rather than Beverly Hills like her sisters, to make it easier for Tristan to be with her for the birth,” a source close to the KUWTK star tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“So exciting, right?”


"Obviously she's ready to be a mom, and we know she's going to be great!"
"Because of Tristan's busy basketball schedule, Chloe decided to move to Cleveland, but that didn't stop her famous family and friends from joining her on this special day."
"Her due date is coming soon. We've got exclusive details about who will be in the delivery room!"
They say "time flies when you're happy." if you're a fan of 33 year old Kardashian, you know she's enjoying every moment of pregnancy
"But this good thing is coming to an end, because Koko is ready!"
"The mother to be is in Cleveland, where her father, Tristan Thompson, is. She can have a baby at any time now. We just know who will be in the delivery room."
"Khloe loves her pregnancy, but she's more excited about being a mother, which will be faster than you think."
"She's only a few days from birth, maybe a week or two at most, at least that's what she wants."
"She plans to produce in Ohio, rather than like her sister Beverly Hills, to make it easier for Tristan to be born with her," a source close to the kutke star told the Hollywood exclusive
"It's exciting, isn't it?"



Number  1030
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's just hard."”
“There's nothing nice about it.”
“First They Killed My Father sparking concern she s still struggling with health issues...”
“The 42-year-old actress, who was hospitalised as a result of her anorexia as a teen, has had a tough few months since splitting from Brad Pitt.”
“She's previously spoken about how her weight is affected by stress, having lost a worrying amount back in 2007 after her mother died.”
“At the time, she put it down to depression and grief.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America) (Image: WENN.com) (Image: WENN.com)Angelina was surrounded by her six children and co-stars as she walked the red carpet for the premiere of her new Netflix film First They Killed My Father - but there was no sign of estranged husband Brad.”
“The movie - co-written and directed by Angelina - tells the story of a survivor of the Khmer Rouge regime in the 1970s, when two million Cambodians were killed through forced labour, starvation and executions.”
“It has a personal connection to Angelina as Cambodia is where she adopted eldest son Maddox, 16, after visiting the country as a UN Goodwill Ambassador in 2001.”
“(Image: WireImage)But while the rest of her brood came to support her, Brad steered clear of the premiere at the Toronto International Film Festival on Monday 11 September.”


"It's hard."
"Nothing good."
"First of all, they killed my father, causing people to worry that she is still struggling with health problems..."
The 42 year old actress, who was hospitalized as a teenager with anorexia, has been through tough months since breaking up with Brad Pitt
"She has said before how her weight is affected by stress. As early as 2007, after her mother died, her weight dropped by a worrying number."
"At the time, she attributed it to depression and sadness."
"When Angelina stepped onto the red carpet at the premiere of Netflix's new film, the first time they killed my father, she was surrounded by her six children and co stars - but there was no sign of estrangement from her husband, Brad."
The film, CO written and directed by Angelina, tells the story of a survivor of the Khmer Rouge regime in the 1970s, when two million Cambodians died of forced labor, hunger and execution
She adopted her 16-year-old eldest son Maddox in Cambodia and visited Cambodia in 2001 as a UN goodwill ambassador
(image source: WireImage) but Brad avoided the premiere of the Toronto International Film Festival on Monday, September 11, when other children came to support her



Number  1031
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In an open letter he claimed Megan, 36, was a “jaded, shallow, conceited woman that will make a joke of you and the royal family heritage.””
“But the happy day has been clouded in controversy after Megan’s estranged half-brother Thomas Markle Jr warned the Prince not to marry his sister.”
“Sign up today for the best stories straight to your inbox Sign up today!”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email Image WIREIMAGE But there s no need for Meghan Markle to worry because the popular Prince Harry isn t having second thoughts he has undergone cryotherapy in the weeks leading up to the Royal...”
“Wedding...”
“The procedure plunges users into drastic temperatures of -85C for three minutes.”
“Cryotherapy is widely used to relieve muscle pain, sprains and swelling either via soft tissue damage or post-operative swelling.”
“It is also claimed to make you feel happier and rejuvenated while helping you to feel stronger and leaving your skin glowing.”
“The treatment, popular amongst A-listers and sports stars including James Bond actor Daniel Craig and football ace Cristiano Ronaldo, can also reduce white fat cells, reduce stress and help users sleep.”
“All useful for a nervous Harry, 33, as pressure mounts ahead of his big wedding day.”


He said in an open letter that Megan, 36, was "a tired, shallow, conceited woman who would make fun of you and the Royal estate."
"But after Megan's separated half brother Thomas Markle Jr. warned the prince not to marry his sister, this happy day was shrouded in controversy."
"Sign up today, send the best stories to your in box, and sign up today!"
"Thank you for subscribing. We have more newsletters to show me the email image of our invalid privacy statement, but Megan markel doesn't have to worry because the popular Prince Harry won't think about it any more. He received cryotherapy a few weeks before he took office in the royal family..."
"Wedding..."
"This process will allow users to stay at - 85 ℃ for three minutes."
Cryotherapy is widely used to reduce muscle pain, sprain and swelling through soft tissue injury or postoperative swelling
"It's also said to make you feel happier and younger, and help you feel stronger and shine on your skin."
"This therapy is popular among first-line stars and sports stars, including James Bond actor Daniel Craig and football superstar Cristiano Ronaldo. It can also reduce white fat cells, relieve stress and help users sleep."
"It's very useful for the nervous 33 year old Harry because he's under more and more pressure before the wedding."



Number  1032
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think this fabulous foursome will paint the town red together one day?”
“While you wonder if Justin is up to the task, check out these other celebrity couples who surprised us all by managing to rekindle their romances despite their differences.”
“A source told us that Selena is hoping that Justin can prove to her family that he’s matured since the last time they split.”
““She’s hoping that one day that will happen.”Taylor isn’t the only person Justin will have to reconcile with.”
““In a perfect world she and Justin could double date with Taylor and Joe,” the source went on to say.”
“Even so, Selena is hoping that a time may come when Justin and Taylor are on good enough terms and they can all go out together, with Taylor’s beau Joe Alwyn, 26, included, of course.”
“...for rekindling a friendship with Justin but there s no insight yet as to how she would react to the return of Jelena...”
“Our source admitted It s no secret that Taylor and Justin aren t friends but there was a time when they actually did get along and Selena would love to see them get back to that good place As we reported earlier an insider said Taylor won t judge Selena...”
“Now that Selena Gomez, 25, is back together with her on-again, off-again ex, a source EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com that she’s hoping he and Taylor can mend those bridges.”
“Taylor Swift, 27, may not have approved of Justin Bieber, 23, in the past, but things could soon be different.”


"Holly worms, do you think these four people's walks will one day dye the whole city red?"
"When you want to know if Justin is up to the task, look at other celebrity couples who, despite their differences, managed to rekindle their romance, which surprised us all."
"A source told us that Selena wanted Justin to prove to her family that he had matured since their last breakup."
"She hopes it will happen one day." Taylor is not the only one Justin needs to reconcile
"In a perfect world, she and Justin can double date Taylor and Joe," the source added
"Even so, Selena hopes that one day Justin and Taylor will have a good relationship and they can go out together, including Taylor's boyfriend Joe Alvin (26)
“… In order to rekindle the friendship with Justin, she has no insight into her reaction to jelina's return... "
"It's no secret that our sources admit that Taylor and Justin are not friends, but they have been together for some time. Selena would like to see them return to that good place. As we reported earlier, an insider said that Taylor would not judge Selena..."
"Now, 25-year-old Serena Gomez is with her again, an ex, and an exclusive tells us that she hopes he and Taylor can fix those bridges."
"Taylor Swift, 27, may have disagreed with Justin Bieber, 23, in the past, but things will soon be different."



Number  1033
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
“Or will he play her all over again?”
“Now, a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that the former co-stars used to be ‘friends with benefits’ but Jared wouldn’t commit.”
“Here’s what we know!”
“It’s hard to imagine a better looking couple than Brangelina, but since Angelina Jolie, 41, and Brad Pitt, 53, are officially over we have to open our minds to seeing her with someone else.”
“And if that someone else is Jared Leto, 45, we’re not mad at it.”
“We absolutely loved them in Alexander and who could forget Girl, Interrupted.”
“But it tuns out these two shared more than just the screen.”
““Jared and Angelina had a very casual relationship years and years ago, it was a friends with benefits situation,” a source tells HollywoodLife.comSo, why didn’t they ever get serious?”
“According to our source Jared was just too much of a player.”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Or will he play her again?"
"Now, a source told us that Hollywood Life exclusive reported that the former co star used to be a 'friend with interests', but Jared would not promise
"We know that!"
"It's hard to imagine a more beautiful couple than brengelina, but since Angelina Jolie, 41, officially broke up with Brad Pitt, 53, we have to open up to see her with other people."
"If it's Jared Leto, 45, we won't be angry."
"We absolutely love them in Alexandria and who can forget the girl, interrupted."
"But it turns out that these two people share more than just the screen."
A source told reporters: "many years ago, Jared and Angelina had a very casual relationship. It was a friendly relationship with interests." Why haven't they ever been serious? "
"According to our sources, Jared is too many players."



Number  1034
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When you're looking to add the relaxed and easy-to-wear style offered by Sheryl Crow, be sure to shop at HSN for all the latest looks.”
“They're also stylish enough to go with everything from laid-back jeans to a professional skirt.”
“The insides are spacious enough to hold all your essentials, and they come with pockets to corral those small items.”
“On the outside, these handbags have eye-catching details like studs and woven fabric.”
“Sheryl Crow also offers a nice selection of leather handbags.”
“For accessories, layer some chain necklaces and slide on a few bangle bracelets.”
“Match this shirt with a pair of relaxed jeans, and keep the laid-back vibe going by choosing a pair of sandals to complete the look.”
“Start with one of her comfortable tops with unique details, such as lace trim, fringe, or embroidery.”
“Whether you're simply running errands or you're heading out for an afternoon with friends, Sheryl Crow makes it easy to create the ideal outfit.”
“If you're looking for everyday pieces with a touch of the unexpected, turn to the Sheryl Crow line.”


"If you want to add the easy-to-wear styles offered by Sheryl Crow, be sure to buy all the latest styles at HSN."
"They are also fashionable, from casual jeans to professional skirts."
"It's spacious enough to hold all your necessities, and there's a pocket inside to seal up the little things."
"In terms of appearance, these handbags have eye-catching details, such as studs and braids."
"Cheryl Crowe also offers a good choice of leather handbags."
"Accessories can put a few necklaces, and then put on a few bracelets."
"Match this shirt with a pair of baggy jeans and choose a pair of sandals to complete the look, so as to maintain a relaxed atmosphere."
Start with a comfortable top with unique details, such as lace trim, tassels or embroidery
"Whether you're simply running errands or going out with a friend for an afternoon, Sheryl Crow can easily create the ideal costume."
"If you're looking for something unexpected, check out the Cheryl Crowe collection."



Number  1035
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...fiancée Mika Brzezinski...”
“You re Joe Scarborough right That s when Matt finally got it it s not the first time he s been mis recognized as the famed journalist who fronts TV s Morning Joe news show with co host and pixie...”
“Then you sang a ‘punky’ song with your rock band on Stephen Colbert’s late night TV show!”
“Matthew Perry: Friends-Less And Talking To Himself!”
“Chuckled My Friendly Spy: “Baffled, Matt protested he isn’t engaged — but the lass persisted, saying, ‘You even talked about it, and she was right there — that cute blonde with the pixie!”
“...chugged on about his terrific recent TV guest shot with his fiancée...”
“Mike Walker reports Hunky Matthew Perry looked dumbstruck when a young female fan rushed to gush how hot and hip he d looked on TV figuring she must be talking about his days playing Chandler on Friends but the chick...”


“… Fiance Mika Brzezinski... "
"You're Joe Scarborough, right? That's when Matt finally realized that it's not the first time he's been mistaken for a famous journalist. He's hosting Joe's morning news on TV with co host and Pixie..."
"Then you and your rock band sang a punk song on Stephen Colbert's late night TV show!"
"Matthew Perry: make fewer friends, talk to yourself!"
My friendly spy giggled and said, "Matt was confused. He protested that he wasn't engaged, but the girl insisted," you even said that she was there - that lovely blonde and elf! "
“…… He kept on saying that he recently took a great guest photo with his fiancee on TV.... "
"Mike Walker reported that when a young female fan rushed to talk about his sexuality and fashion on TV, the handsome guy Matthew Perry looked stunned. She thought she must be talking about the days when he played Chandler in friends, but that chick..."



Number  1036
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And as speculation grows that the world’s most eligible bachelor could be about to pop the question, Meghan Markle is the name that will soon be known in every corner of the globe.”
“The find suggests it was during her college years that she switched her names.”
““Meghan was the recruitment chair of the sorority during her time here.”
“The thing we all have in common is that we’re all very driven, ambitious and passionate.”
“(Image: Coleman-Rayner)She said: “We’re intelligent hot messes.”
“Current KKG member Melania Hidalgo told the Sunday Mirror that Meghan had been a popular member of the student body.”
“Hers was an all-female society, called the Kappa Kappa Gamma sorority, with a reputation for hard partying and social climbing.”
“Prince Harry even set up a nightclub for his posh friends in the basement of Highgrove, calling it Club H.And while the prince partied with his exclusive group of pals, Meghan was at college mixing with members of her own posh pack.”
“One pub in particular, the Rattlebone Inn, which has since changed hands, was infamous for its boozy lock-ins.”
“In his late teens, the young prince was making headlines for his wild nights out in Gloucestershire pubs around Highgrove – Prince Charles’s country home.”


"With more and more speculation that the world's most eligible bachelor may ask this question, the name Meghan Markle will soon be known around the world."
"This finding suggests that she changed her name when she was in college."
"Megan was the recruiting chairman of the fraternity when she was here."
"One thing we have in common is that we are all motivated, ambitious and passionate."
(photo: Coleman Reiner) she said, "we're smart spice girls."
"Melania Hidalgo, a current kkg member, told the Sunday Mirror that Megan has always been a popular member of the student community."
She's an all women's club called kappa kappa gamma, known for hard parties and social climbs
Harry even opened a nightclub in the basement of Highgrove for his fashionable friends, which he called "H club". While Prince Harry was gathering with a group of his friends, Megan was still hanging out with her own fashionable buddies in college
"A bar in particular, the rattlesnake Hotel, which later changed hands, was notorious for being drunk."
"As a teenager, the young prince made headlines by spending a crazy night in a Gloucestershire bar near heygrove, the hometown of Prince Charles."



Number  1037
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Schnabel was previously linked to Demi Moore, Elle Macpherson and Liv Tyler.”
“Klum was spotted spending time with British race car driver Lewis Hamilton, 32, at the Harper’s Bazaar Icons event at New York Fashion Week on September 8, but a source told Us at the time that they weren’t dating.”
“Love you @jlo …❤️Your show was absolutely AMAZING #vegas #allihave A post shared by Heidi Klum (@heidiklum) on Sep 24, 2017 at 12:55am PDTThe supermodel and Seal finalized their divorce in 2014 and she went on to date her bodyguard Martin Kirsten.”
“She also attended the Emmy Awards in L.A. on September 17 solo.”
“Klum was in Vegas over the weekend and caught Jennifer Lopez’s show, sharing a backstage photo with the singer and actress on Instagram.”
“The Project Runway host is also the mom of daughter Leni, 13, from a previous relationship.”
“She and the British singer share three children, Henry, 12, Johan, 10, and daughter Lou, 7.”
“Julian Schnabel 31 began dating in 2014 two years after Klum split with husband Seal...”
“Oh Honey by Delegation with the lyrics When I feel low I ve nowhere to go She ll be my inspiration Yeah when my poor heart is breakin apart She ll put it back together The America s Got Talent judge 44 and the art dealer and son of director...”
“In one post he shared the song Just One of Those Days by Sizzla which features the lyrics Oh girl and you know I care Why does it have to be this way Can t tell you go can t tell you to stay In another he shared the song...”


"Schnabel was previously associated with Demi Moore, Al McPherson and liv Taylor."
"At the Harper's Bazaar icon event of New York Fashion Week on September 8, Klum was found with Lewis Hamilton, a 32 year old British racing driver, but a source told us that they didn't have a date."
"Love you @ JLO ❤️ Your show is amazing # Vegas # Ellie has a post shared by heidiklum (@ heidiklum) at 12:55 a.m. on September 24, 2017. Supermodel and seal completed their divorce in 2014, and she continues to date her bodyguard Martin Kirsten. "
"She also attended the Emmy Awards ceremony in Los Angeles on September 17."
"Krum watched Jennifer Lopez in Vegas over the weekend and shared a backstage photo with the singer and actress on instagram."
"The host is also the mother of her 13-year-old daughter, Lenny, who came from a previous relationship."
She and the British singer have three children: 12-year-old Henry, 10-year-old John and 7-year-old daughter Lou
"Julian Schnabel, 31, has been dating since 2014, two years after Kram and her husband, the seal, broke up..."
"Oh, dear, delegation, lyrics, when I'm down, I have nowhere to go, she will be my inspiration, yes, when my poor heart is broken, she will put it together again, American talent judge 44, son of art businessman and director..."
"In one post, he shared the song" just one day in those days "by sizzla. The lyrics are: Oh girl, you know why I have to do this. I can't tell you to leave. I can't tell you to stay in another post. He shared this song..."



Number  1038
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Based on true events.”
“Fed up with her own success, she gets swept up in her lover’s daydreams about Mexico and finds herself on a wild road trip towards the border.”
“And she’s looking for a way out.”
“As seen in this exclusive first trailer, the result is an often zany, satirical, and feminist musical comedy led by a radiant Anna Margaret Hollyman Here’s the official synopsis: “In 1926 America’s most famous evangelist is a woman.”
“For their narrative feature debut, queer filmmakers Samantha Buck and Marie Schlingmann zero in on the five weeks that Semple McPherson (at one point the second most popular religious figure in the world behind the Pope) went missing in Mexico.”
“While the story of the 1926 disappearance of evangelist Aimee Semple McPherson may not be known by many, there’s more than enough in the life story of this cult figure to fill many movies.”


"Based on real events."
Fed up with her own success, she indulged in her lover's daydream of Mexico and found herself on a wild journey to the border
"She's looking for a way out."
As you can see in this exclusive trailer, the ending is a funny, ironic, feminist musical comedy starring Anna Margaret hollyman. Here's the official profile: "in 1926, the most famous evangelist in the United States was a woman."
"In their first narrative, queer filmmakers Samantha Barker and Marie schlingmann focus on the five weeks of Semple McPherson's disappearance in Mexico."
"Although the story of the disappearance of evangelist Amy Semple McPherson in 1926 may not be known to many people, the life story of this cult figure is enough to fill many films."



Number  1039
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
““The movie is a hugely important project for her but she’s finding it hard to focus,” said the source.”
“2 in the country...”
“...and hoped Brad would abide by her terms instead of pushing for a greater custody share so aggressively the insider said adding Ultimately Angie can t deprive Brad of seeing the kids Pitt is now spending time in England so he can be near his kids while Jolie films Maleficent...”
“It s deplorable that someone for their own selfish reasons leaked selective portions of the confidential and sealed court record to create an inaccurate and unfair picture of what is really happening Still She knew this day would come eventually but she got so used to the way things were...”
““From the start, Angelina has been focused only on [the kids’] health and needs, which is why it was so important that this last court hearing be conducted privately,” read a statement released on behalf of the actress.”
“A spokesperson for Jolie blasted the information about the decision leaking.”
“...twins Knox and Vivienne 9”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"The film is a very important project for her, but she finds it hard to focus," the source said
"Two in the country..."
“… And hopefully Brad will abide by her terms instead of pushing for a bigger share of custody. So active insiders say that in the end Angie can't deprive Brad of seeing the child Pete is now spending time in the UK so he can get close to his child while Julie's film is vicious... "
"It's a pity that someone leaked part of the confidential and sealed court records for selfish reasons in order to create an inaccurate and unfair truth. She knew that day would come, but she was used to the way things were done..."
"From the beginning, Angelina focused only on health and needs, which is why the last trial had to be held in private," a statement on behalf of Angelina said
"Julie's spokesman lashed out at the information about the decision."
“… Twins Knox and Vivian 9 "



Number  1040
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s getting ugly,” said the source.”
“Zoe’s got her own attorney.”
“David’s talking to his lawyer about preventing Zoe from taking his daughter to England.”
““There’s no compromise here.”
“But the storybook romance turned into a nightmare.”
“The couple married in 2010, and daughter Cleo was born the following year.”
““David’s not about to give up without one hell of a fight and said, ‘Not with my daughter.’Longtime bachelor David met Zoe in 2007 and fell fast for the artist and photographer.”
““Zoe told David she’ll pack up and move back to England and take Cleo with her,” said an insider.”
“Newly split from wife Zoe Buckman, David fears his wife will taketheir 5-year-old daughter, Cleo, to live in England, sources told RadarNow British-born Zoe and all-American David are drawing battle lines, Radar has learned.”
“Nothing friendly about this — “Friends” star David Schwimmer is bracing for an international custody fight from hell!”


"It's getting ugly," the source said
"Zoe has his own lawyer."
"David is talking to his lawyer about preventing Zoe from taking his daughter to England."
"There is no compromise here."
"But the romance in the storybook turned into a nightmare."
"They married in 2010 and their daughter Cleo was born the following year."
"David won't give up. He said," I can't be with my daughter. " Long single David met Zoe in 2007 and soon fell in love with the artist and photographer
"Zoe told David that she would pack up, move back to England and take Cleo with her," said one person familiar with the matter
Radar learned that British born Zoe and all American David are drawing a line. Sources told ladano that David has just separated from his wife Zoe barkman, and he is worried that his wife will take his 5-year-old daughter Cleo to live in Britain
Friends star David schweimer is preparing for an international custody fight from hell



Number  1041
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
““Jen realized a long time ago that she cannot fix Ben and that his problems are not hers to solve,” a Garner confidant reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly.”
“At Malibu’s upscale Nobu restaurant August 16, the Justice League actor was rapt in conversation with his table mate: a bombshell blonde clad in a nude bodycon dress.”
“Three days later, the lovebirds emerged once again at Santa Monica’s decidedly more-low key Jack in the Box drive-thru.”
“With fries and a cheeseburger in hand, the all-smiles duo sped off in his Range Rover.”
“According to a witness, “They looked so happy together.”Something was off, however.”
“The passenger was not his love of more than a year, Lindsay Shookus — but 22-year-old Playboy model Shauna Sexton.”
“Not only had Affleck, 46, and the Saturday Night Live producer, 38, quietly split — “it’s amicable,” says a source — in just two weeks, the actor had also reverted back to his womanizing ways.”
“It’s a behavior his estranged wife, Jennifer Garner, knows all too well.”
“While still with Garner, Affleck began secretly dating Shookus.”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"Jennifer realized long ago that she couldn't solve Ben's problem, and his problem wasn't hers," a close friend of Ghana said in a new issue of us weekly
On August 16, at Malibu's high-end Nobu restaurant, the Justice League actor was chatting with his deskmate: a blonde woman in a nude tight skirt, who was stunningly sexy
Three days later, the couple reappeared in Santa Monica's more low-key "Jack in the box" restaurant
"With French fries and cheeseburgers in their hands, the two men with smiling faces sped away in his range rover."
"According to one witness," they look happy together. "However, something happened."
"This passenger is not his favorite for more than a year, Lindsay schokus - it's 22-year-old Playboy model Shauna sexton."
"Alfred, 46, and the 38 year old producer of" Saturday night live "not only quietly split up -" a source said, "it's very friendly - in just two weeks, the actor also returned to her feminine way."
"It's a very clear behavior of his separated wife, Jennifer Garner."
"When Alfred and garner were still together, they started dating shawkes secretly."



Number  1042
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He was given 20 days of community labor and agreed to pay $4,400, CBS News reported.”
“However, now I realize I was wrong, that I shouldn't have done it.'”
“James Otis later told reporters: 'Upon reflection after my arrest, I had said I was proud and felt very good about destroying Mr. Trump's star.”
“Angeles Police arrested a man who pleaded no contest to destroying Trump s star with a sledgehammer and pickax...”
“Lopez left in Hollywood on Wednesday is well known for his jibes against the President right after a NATO summit in Belgium on Thursday and was last year booed off stage at a charity gala in Denver after his anti Trump jokes fell flat with the crowd In 2016 Los...”
“Trump's Hollywood star has been the focus of several protests since he was elected President.”
“'George was asked nicely to stop making Trump jokes by a man in front row [Maffei] who just donated $250K,' a commentator on YouTube who was at the event said.”
“One of the event's largest donors, Liberty Media CEO Greg Maffei, was sitting in the front row and asked Lopez to stop with the anti-Trump jokes.”
“...in Denver after his anti Trump jokes fell flat with the crowd who had paid 5 000 to 100 000 for tables...”
“The comedian was seen crouching next to the brass plaque on Hollywood Boulevard as a stream of water flowed from between his legs in the video published on Wednesday Lopez is well known for his jibes against the President and was last year booed off stage at a charity gala...”


He was given 20 days of community work and agreed to pay $4400, CBS reported
"Now, however, I realize that I was wrong and I shouldn't have done it."
"James Otis later told reporters:" in my reflection after my arrest, I said I was proud and very happy to destroy Mr. Trump's star. "
"The Los Angeles police arrested a man who didn't make any defense on the ground of destroying Trump's star with sledgehammer and pick..."
"Lopez left Hollywood on Wednesday because he was famous for his ridicule of the president after the NATO summit in Belgium on Thursday. At the charity party in Denver last year, his jokes against trump were hissed off the stage after being on an equal footing with the audience in Los Angeles in 2016..."
"Hollywood stars have been the focus of several protests since trump was elected president."
"A man in the front row (Muffy) has just donated $250000 and kindly asked George not to make fun of trump any more," a YouTube commentator said
"Greg Muffy, one of the biggest donors to the event, the chief executive of free media, sat in the front row and asked Lopez to stop telling anti trump jokes."
“… In Denver, after his anti trump joke was knocked down by people who spent 5000 to 100000 dollars on tables
"In the video released on Wednesday, the comedian was seen squatting beside the bronze medal on Hollywood Avenue, with a stream of water flowing between his legs. Lopez, known for laughing at the president, was booed out of office at a charity party last year..."



Number  1043
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Avery ThompsonMore Jennifer Lawrence News:”
“Let us know!”
“That someone was Jennifer Lawrence!”
“The ‘Hunger Games’ co-stars became best friends as he dealt with his sad breakup.”
“Liam Hemsworth, 24, needed to find his happiness after his relationship with Miley Cyrus, 21, ended in 2013, and Jennifer Lawrence, 24, was just the person to help!”
“Liam revealed that hanging out with Jennifer on set helped him become much “happier” after his split.”
“Could their close friendship have been an underlying cause of why Miley dissed JLaw and lashed out at Liam?”
“Liam Hemsworth & Jennifer Lawrence’s FriendshipJennifer continues to be America’s sweetheart and has proven she is the best friend anyone could have.”
“The Oscar-winner helped her co-star Liam during a particularly tough time in his life and he is forever grateful to her.”
““Being around someone like Jen, who is so honest and laughs all day long, I am forced to be in the right now,” Liam told the Associated Press, according to Us Weekly.”


"- Avery Thompson more, Jennifer Lawrence news":
"Let us know!"
"That's Jennifer Lawrence!"
"The co stars of hunger game became best friends when he dealt with a sad breakup."
"Liam Hemsworth, 24, needs to find his own happiness after his relationship with Miley Cyrus, 21, ends in 2013, and Jennifer Lawrence, 24, is the one who needs help!"
Liam revealed that getting along with Jennifer on set made him more "happy" after the breakup
"Is their close friendship the fundamental reason why Miley slandered jlaw and attacked Liam?"
"Liam Hemsworth's friendship with Jennifer Lawrence, who continues to be America's sweetheart and proves that she is the best friend anyone can have."
"The Oscar winner helped Liam's partner at a particularly difficult time in his life, and he will always be grateful to her."
"With people like Jen, he's honest and laughs all day, and I'm forced to stay at home now," Liam told the associated press, US Weekly reported



Number  1044
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“According to our source, the 54-year-old actor sees his kids with estranged wife Angelina Jolie a few times a week, and strives to make his home a safe environment to visit.”
“Pitt and Jolie are parents to 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old Pax, 13-year-old Zahara, 11-year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivienne.”
““Brad tries to maintain a safe environment for the children, so that when they visit they stay home,” the source says.”
“"When the children are visiting, they are usually accompanied by bodyguards and nannies.”
“The house is basically on lockdown.”
“He wants his time with his children to be private.”“Brad really enjoys time with his kids,” the source adds.”
““It’s a really important time for him.”
“The kids are his life.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"According to our sources, the 54 year old actor meets her children several times a week with her estranged wife, Angelina Jolie, and tries to make her home a safe place to visit."
"Peter and Julie are the parents of 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11 year old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian."
"Brad is trying to keep the children in a safe environment so that when they visit, they stay at home," the source said
"When children visit, they are usually accompanied by bodyguards and nannies."
"The house is basically locked down."
"He wants his time with the children to be private." "Brad really enjoyed his time with the kids," the source added
"It's really important to him."
"The child is his life."



Number  1045
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Emirates 24|7 on Google News.”
“Above all, we are determined to maintain the deep respect and love that we have for one another."”
“The 'Horrible Bosses' star is moving on from husband Justin Theroux and is enjoying "seeing where things go".”
“A source told Entertainment Tonight: "Jennifer really relied on her friends to get her through the tough times.”
“During that time, she was able to heal and be comfortable with dating again.”
“Jennifer has never felt she needed a man, but she loves love.”
“Jennifer is casually dating, but right now nothing serious.”
“She is just having fun, seeing where things go.”
“She won't fall in love anytime soon.”
“All her friends are around her.”


"Follow the Google News of Emirates 24 | 7."
"Above all, we are determined to maintain a deep respect and love for each other."
"The star of the 'terrible boss' is coming out of his husband Justin Theroux, who likes to see things happen."
"Jennifer really relies on her friends to get through this," a source told entertainment tonight
"During that time, she was able to recover and date again with ease."
"Jennifer never felt like she needed a man, but she loved love."
"Jennifer's on a casual date, but it's nothing serious right now."
"She's just having fun and seeing how things go."
"She won't fall in love soon."
"All her friends are by her side."



Number  1046
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We need love, unity, peace, gun control & for people to look at this & call this what it is = terrorism.”For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to Us Weekly’s YouTube Page.”
“RIP to those lost.”Grande, 24, also reacted to the Las Vegas shooting, tweeting, “My heart is breaking for Las Vegas.”
“Keep fighting.”
“For those in the hospital recovering we are with you.”
““Nothing we do can bring back your loved ones and I am so sorry.”
““So first let me say my heart breaks for all those affected in Las Vegas,” Braun continued.”
“The attack is now the deadliest mass shooting in modern U.S. history and came just four months after a suicide bomber killed 22 people and injured 250 others at Grande’s concert in Manchester, England.”
“They are all attacks on our way of life and our way of love.”As previously reported, at least 58 people were killed and 515 injured when a gunman opened fire on a crowd of country music festivalgoers from the 32nd floor of the Mandala Bay Resort and Casino.”
“They all make us question taking our children, our friends, our loved ones… to public events that are supposed to bring us joy… in fear of devastation.”
“They strike fear in our ability to live our lives.”


"We need love, unity, peace, gun control, so that people can see it and call it terrorism." For the latest celebrity entertainment, news and lifestyle videos, subscribe to us weekly's YouTube page
"My heart is broken for Las Vegas," 24-year-old Grande tweeted in response to the Las Vegas shooting
"Keep fighting."
"For those who recover in the hospital, we support you."
"Nothing we've done can bring your family back. I'm sorry."
Braun went on: "first of all, let me say that I feel heartbroken for all the people affected in Las Vegas."
"The attack is the deadliest large-scale shooting in the modern history of the United States. Just 4 months ago, there was a suicide bomb attack at the grand concert in Manchester, UK, which killed 22 people and injured 250 people."
"They are all attacks on our way of life and love." As mentioned earlier, at least 58 people were killed and 515 injured when a shooter opened fire on a group of country music festival celebrators on the 32nd floor of the mandala Bay Resort and Casino
"They all make us wonder, with our children, friends, relatives Go to public activities that should bring us joy Fear of disaster. "
"They threaten our ability to live."



Number  1047
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She is repped by UTA, Carrie Byalick at B Company and Maverick Management.”
“Schumer can be seen next in the action-comedy “Snatched,” which opens on May 12, 2017, and also has “Thank You for Your Service” opening in October.”
“Parkes and MacDonald initiated the original deal with Mattel in 2014.”
“Walter F. Parkes, Laurie MacDonald and Amy Pascal are producing the film.”
“It’s unknown whether the same tone will be kept with the comedian no longer attached.”
“Schumer recently did a polish of the script.”
“The “Barbie” movie is said to be in the vein of “Splash”, “Enchanted” and “Big.” In it, the main character gets kicked out of Barbieland for not being perfect enough and lands in a real-world adventure.”
““We look forward to bringing Barbie to the world and sharing updates on casting and filmmakers soon.”Sony is still trying to find a director for the comedy.”
““We respect and support Amy’s decision,” a spokesperson for Sony said in a statement.”
“Sony needed to stick to its June 29, 2018 release date since Mattel already has merchandise and product cycles in motion–shifting the production to accommodate Schumer would have put on a strain on other partners on the film, according to insiders.”


"She was replaced by carrier byalick of UTA, B company and independent management."
"Schumer will appear next in the action comedy snatch, which will be released on May 12, 2017, and thank you for your service, which will also be released in October."
"Parks and McDonald started the original deal with Mattel in 2014."
Walter parks, Laurie McDonald and Amy Pascal are making the film
"It's not known whether the comedian will keep the same tone."
"Schumer has recently polished the script."
It is said that the "Barbie" film is based on "splash", "charming" and "big". In this movie, the protagonist is driven out of Barbie park because he is not perfect, and lands in the real world adventure
"We're looking forward to bringing Barbie around the world and sharing the latest information on actors and filmmakers soon." Sony is still trying to find a director for the comedy. "
"We respect and support Amy's decision," a Sony spokesman said in a statement
"Sony needs to hold on until June 29, 2018, because Mattel has started the commodity and product cycle - according to insiders, shifting production to Schumer will put pressure on other partners of the film."



Number  1048
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prior to that relationship, she was married to Ryan Reynolds from 2008 to 2011.”
“The actress and Dauriac share daughter Rose, 2.”
“Colin Jost was not too shy to let the world know that he’s taken while appearing on live television.”
“The comedian, 35, who has been dating Scarlett Johansson, revealed that he has a girlfriend during his “Weekend Update” segment of Saturday Night Live on Saturday, May 5.”
“Leslie Jones stopped by to talk about Facebook’s new dating feature and went through a list of the “terrible men” she’s dated and shared why the relationships didn’t work.”
“At the end of the clip, she showed a photo of Jost, saying: “Colin, he was so cute and sweet and kind but it would never work because he’s gay.”“I’m not gay!” Jost responded with a laugh.”
““I told you I have a girlfriend!”“And I have told you that I am not acknowledging that bitch!”
“You either prove that you are not gay or I’m going to keep telling everybody that you are,” Jones responded.”
“Johansson, 33, also made a surprise appearance at the beginning of the show on Saturday, starring as Ivanka Trump during the cold open.”
“The actress and the funnyman have not openly discussed their relationship, but they made their red carpet debut as a couple at the premiere of her movie Avengers: Infinity War in L.A. on April 23.”


"Before that, she married Ryan Reynolds from 2008 to 2011."
"The actress and dauriac share a two-year-old daughter, rose."
"Colin Jost told the world live that he had been kidnapped without shyness."
The 35 year old comedian, who has been dating Scarlett Johnson, revealed that he has a girlfriend in "weekend update" on Saturday night live
"By the way, Leslie Jones talked about Facebook's new dating feature, scanned a list of" scary men "she dated, and shared why their relationship wasn't successful."
At the end of the video, she shows a picture of JOST. She says, "Colin, he's cute, he's cute, he's kind, but because he's gay, he'll never succeed." "I'm not gay! "Answered Jost with a smile."
"I told you I had a girlfriend! "I told you I didn't admit that bitch!"
"You either prove you're not gay, or I'll keep telling people you're gay," Jones replied
"Johnson, 33, also made a surprise appearance at the start of Saturday's show, playing Ivanka trump in the cold open."
The actress and funny man have yet to discuss their relationship publicly, but they made their debut on the red carpet as a couple at the premiere of the Los Angeles Film Avengers: Infinite War on April 23



Number  1049
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The girls really wanted it and felt they owed it to the fans.””
“The insider said the added surprise is “to make up for the fact she was unable to perform last year,” when pregnant.”
“But it’s happening.”Beyoncé’s scheduled to perform solo on Saturday.”
“.”
““It was teased, rumored, squashed, so nothing much else was said .”
“It s on Beyoncé and Destiny s Child are reuniting claims the source...”
“Click to email this to a friend Opens in new window Click to share on Twitter Opens in new window Click to share on Facebook Opens in new window Buzz that Beyoncé will reunite with Destiny s Child at Coachella has come and gone but a music insider tells us...”


"Girls really want it. They feel they owe it to fans."
The insider said that what surprised her even more was "to make up for the fact that she couldn't perform when she was pregnant last year."
"But it has happened." Beyonce plans to perform alone on Saturday
“.”
"I was teased, rumored and crushed, so I didn't say anything else."
"It's the source of Beyonce's reunion with destiny's children..."
"Click to send this email to a friend, open it in a new window, click to share it on twitter, open it in a new window, click to share it on Facebook, open it in a new window, and the news that Beyonce will be reunited with her fated child in cochella comes and goes, but a music insider tells us..."



Number  1050
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““We’re very excited about this exhibit and helping to share a fascinating story about a hometown hero who’s gone on to remarkable achievements,” the museum say in a press release.”
“It features various Bieber memorabilia on display, including stage outfits, running shoes, a personal letter from Michelle Obama and the aforementioned underwear.”
“Titled Steps to Stardom, the exhibit launched at the Stratford Perth Museum on Sunday (February 18) and runs until December 31.”
“2018 I M CONVINCED WE ARE BACK IN 2011 I M NOT OKAY pic twitter com zBqKIuiqGe Megan marvelstaylena February 20 2018 Meanwhile an exhibition dedicated to Justin Bieber has opened in the singer s hometown of Stratford Ontario and it features a pair of his underwear...”
“...pic twitter com gBpr9fTUZB mags JANUARY 10 selmilasnature February 20 2018 Advertisement Justin and Selena will get married Selena isn t using Justin for promo Jelena forever Jelena isn t toxic anymore If Justin s happy with Selena then I m happy pic twitter com sLchIqh0zd Britt jdbpurposes February 20”
“...melinazrr February 20 2018 Jelena s back so I can listen to Love Will Remember and Nothing Like Us now without spiraling into depression bi sinceritiescary February 21 2018 My whole timeline is jelena and I m not complaining leslie brunosIovely February 20 2018 the eye contact is killing me...”
“@justinbieber @selenagomez #JustinBieber pic.twitter.com/SIUS4GRaqc — belieber?”
“?❣❣❣❣ just look at them ….”
“...im going to cry right now ?????”
“Ooooooohhhh myyyyyyyy goo000od i am dreaming????????????????????”


"We are very excited about the exhibition and help share a fascinating story about the extraordinary achievements of heroes in our hometown," the museum said in a press release
"There are various Bieber souvenirs on display, including stage costumes, running shoes, Michelle Obama's personal letters and the underwear."
"The exhibition, steps to the stars, was launched at the Perth Museum in Stratford on Sunday (February 18) and will last until December 31."
"In 2018, I'm sure we're back to 2011. I'm not good at pictures. On twitter website zbqkiuiqge Megan marvelstaylena on February 20, 2018, meanwhile, Justin Bieber's hometown Stratford Ontario held an exhibition with one of his underwear on display..."
“… Pic twitter com gbpr9ftuzb mags January 10 selminassnature February 20, 2018 advertisement Justin and Selena will get married Selena doesn't use Justin to promote Jelena forever, Jelena is no longer toxic if Justin s is satisfied with Selena, then I'm very happy pic twitter com slchiqh0zd Britt jdbpurposes February 20 "
“… Melinazir, February 20, 2018, jelina came back, so I can hear love will remember, nothing like us now, not into depression, my whole timeline is jelina, I don't complain about Leslie brunosi, February 20, 2018, eye contact is killing me... "
“@ justinbieber@selenagomez#justinbieber ” pic.twitter.com/SIUS4GRaqc -Bellebo
“? ❣❣❣❣  Look at them... "
“… I'm going to cry now
"Oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh, oh



Number  1051
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...changed Recall the British tabloids were incredibly tough on Princess Diana but if Meghan is anything like her she ll continue to handle herself with impeccable class...”
“Harry is so protective of Meghan and he hates how some of the newspapers write about her it reminds him of his mother and the way she was treated by the press and sometimes Harry worries that nothing has really...”
““The British press is constantly jumping on each and every little faux pas though, and publicly reprimanding Meghan, it’s horrible really, and some days she ends up in tears,” the insider revealed.”
“Her few faux pas, while understandable to the royal family, are reportedly devastating to her.”
“At Meghan and Harry’s royal nuptials on May 18, the duchess seemed ready to commit to her role as a royal — singing God Save The Queen flawlessly, and crossing her legs at her ankles.”
“Listen, if the Queen doesn’t have a problem, we don’t have a problem.”
“Meghan how amazing she s doing and how quickly she s learning and she is Aww...”
“The funny thing is that the Queen is actually incredibly gracious to Meghan she doesn t put any pressure on her at all it s actually quite the opposite and Harry is so loving and supportive he s constantly telling...”
“HollywoodLife com exclusively...”
“But there is so much to remember so many minuscule little details it s kind of mind blowing really and all incredibly high pressured too as it s all under a microscope at the same time a palace insider told...”


“…… Looking back, the British tabloids are very tough on Princess Diana, but if Megan has anything in common with her, she will continue to treat herself impeccably... "
"Harry is very protective of Megan. He hates how some newspapers report on Megan, which reminds him of the way his mother and the media treat her. Sometimes Harry worries that there is nothing really..."
"It's really terrible that the British media keep jumping up and down every little mistake and publicly scolding Megan. Some days she will finally cry," the person familiar with the matter said
"Although the royal family can understand her impoliteness, it is reported that it was devastating for her."
On May 18, at the royal wedding of Megan and Harry, the Duchess seemed ready to play the Royal role - singing "God save the queen," flawless, with her legs crossed at her ankles
"Listen, if the queen has no problem, we have no problem."
"Megan, how wonderful she is. How fast she learns. She is..."
"Interestingly, the queen is actually very kind to Megan. She doesn't give her any pressure at all. On the contrary, Harry is so kind and supportive that he keeps telling her..."
"Exclusive to Hollywood Life com..."
"But there are too many things to remember, too many tiny details. It's really exciting and stressful, because it's all going on under a microscope. At the same time, a palace insider told me..."



Number  1052
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I never did it to my mother, and she's not doing it to me."”
“Because of this, she had absolutely no idea what her award winning father did for a living.”
“I was confused.”
“I was like, six.”
“"They [paparazzi] would jump on the subway and sit right in front of me.”
“"I used to get really upset," she said.”
“These early experiences, she recalled, would make her "really upset."”
“However, years later, when the family moved to Manhattan, Carys came face-to-face with paparazzi.”
“She explained that she "honestly" thought he was a "pancake maker."”
“Town & CountryCarys, who is a straight lookalike to her mother, spent her early years as a child in Bermuda.”


"I never did it to my mother, and she never did it to me."
"Because of this, she had no idea what her father earned his living on."
"I'm confused."
"I was about six years old."
"They (paparazzi) would jump on the subway and sit right in front of me."
"I used to be very sad," she said
She recalled that these early experiences would make her "very sad."
"However, a few years later, when the family moved to Manhattan, carris was face-to-face with the paparazzi."
She explained that she "honestly" thought he was a "pancakemaker"
The town and country as like as two peas, who lived in Bermuda, were the same towns and villages.



Number  1053
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...the allegations on behalf of the photographer were completely false calling the lawsuit baseless...”
“We sincerely apologize to the artists their families and estates and anyone who may have been offended RELATED VIDEO Kendall and Kylie Jenner s Apology Is Not Enough for Notorious B I G s Estate This Matter Has Yet to Be Resolved The representative for the brand also added that...”
“...dropped by the photographer who was suing the stars...”
“According to a document filed in federal court Wednesday, both parties are requesting to dismiss the suit brought forward by photographer Michael Miller last summer.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Miller was suing the Jenners for using his photos of Tupac Shakur without his permission, TMZ first reported.”
“The shirts were part of a limited-edition Kendall + Kylie capsule collection that were on sale for $125 a piece, but immediately pulled from the site following the controversy.”
“Image zoom Credit: Shutterstock; courtesy Kendall + KylieThe sisters faced quite the backlash after the shirt’s design — which featured the sisters’ faces superimposed over images of famous deceased musicians including Tupac Shakur, Notorious B.I.G.”
“...and Jim Morrison of The Doors — first hit the internet.”
“The sisters issued an apology for their designs on Twitter soon after.”


“…… The accusation on behalf of the photographer is totally false, claiming that the lawsuit is groundless.... "
"We sincerely apologize to the artists, their families and heritage as well as anyone who might be offended. Kendall and Kylie Jenner's apologies are not enough for the infamous BGS heritage. This problem has not been solved, and the brand representative added..."
“… The photographer of the accused star left behind... "
"According to a document filed with the Federal Court on Wednesday, both sides demanded that the lawsuit filed by photographer Michael Miller last summer be dismissed."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
TMZ first reported that Miller is suing the Janus for using his photo of Tupac Shakur without permission
"The shirts were part of the limited edition Kendall + Kylie capsule line, which at the time cost $125 each, but were removed from the website immediately after the dispute."
"Image zooming credit: shutterstock; after the shirt design provided by Kendall + Kylie, the faces of the two sisters were superimposed with photos of famous late musicians (including the infamous B.I.G. Tupac Shakur), which was strongly opposed."
“…… Jim Morrison of the door - first time online. "
"The sisters soon apologized for their design on twitter."



Number  1054
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Prince William has addressed the rumour, but did not confirm or deny whether this was in fact the case.”
“The 36-year-old is already a mother to two, Prince George, four, and Princess Charlotte, two.”
“What would happen if Kate Middleton’s baby turns out to be twins?”
“Sign up fornow for the biggest moments from morning TVKate Middleton, Duchess of Cambridge and wife of Prince William, is due to give birth in April, and some suspect she is having twins.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"Prince William has responded to the rumor, but has not confirmed or denied whether this is the case."
"At the age of 36, she is a mother of two children, a 4-year-old Prince George and a 2-year-old Princess Charlotte."
"What if Kate Middleton's children were twins?"
Kate Middleton, the Duchess of Cambridge and Prince William's wife, is due to give birth in April and some suspect she is pregnant with twins
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  1055
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please give an overall site rating:”
“How can we improve?”
“العربية المملكة العربية السعودية العربية مصر العربية ไทย ไทย 한국 한국어 中华人民共和国 简体中文 台灣 繁體中文 日本 日本語 香港特别行政區 繁體中文 Feedback Today Entertainment News Sport Lifestyle See All Videos Send MSN Feedback We appreciate your input...”
“Polska polski Portugal Português Schweiz Deutsch Singapore English South Africa English Suisse français Suomi suomi Sverige svenska Türkiye Türkçe United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States español Venezuela español Viê t Nam Tiê ng Viê t Ελλάδα ελληνικά Россия Pусский ישראל עברית الإمارات العربية المتحدة”
“Deutsch España español France français India English India मर ठ India ह द India ব ল India త ల గ Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italia italiano Magyarország magyar Malaysia English México español Nederland Nederlands New Zealand English Norge norsk bokmål Österreich Deutsch Perú español Philippines English...”
“...msn video powered by Microsoft News web search Skip to Navigation Skip to Content Sign in Change language and content Afrique francophone français América Latina español Argentina español Australia English België Nederlands Belgique français Brasil português Canada English Canada français Česká republika čeština Chile español Colombia español Danmark Dansk Deutschland...”


Please give the overall rating of the website:
"How can we improve?"
From 1575; Every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every every Respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective respective Days of feedback entertainment news sports lifestyle view all videos send MSN feedback we thank you for your feedback "input..."
"Polska Polski Portugal Schweiz Germany Singapore English South Africa English Swiss French somisomiswirlich Svenska t ü rkiye t ü rkiye t ü rk ι e United Arab Emirates English United Kingdom English United States English United States Spanish Venezuelan Spanish VI è t Nam Ti è ng VI è t Ε λ λ δ α ε λ η ν ν ι κ p о C è me" "stage II"
“Deutsch España Español France français India English Indiaम2352; 2336; Indiaह2342; Indiaব2482; Indiaత3122; "Indonesia Bahasa Indonesia International Edition English Ireland English Italiano Magyarorsz á g Magyar Malaysia English Mexico Espa NIA ol Nederlands New Zealand English Norge Norsk bokm å L Ö sterreich Deutsch" Philippine English
“… MSN video by Microsoft News supports web search jump to navigation jump to content login change language and content Africa French French French Latin America Spanish Argentina Spanish Australia English Belgium Netherlands Belgium French Brazil Portuguese Canadian English Canada French Cesc Republic Chile Spanish Colombia Spain Denmark Denmark- Germany... "



Number  1056
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s how I feel.”
“She tells The Breakfast Club: “[He] should be ashamed of himself.”
“Days later, Tyga ends his engagement to baby mama Blac Chyna two years after welcoming their son, King Cairo.”
“August 2014: Tyga celebrates Kylie’s 17th birthday and even offers her a shot of tequila while she’s dancing on some platform.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Kendall and Chris Brown are there for the hang too.”
“July 2014: Tyga makes what many Kyga fans believe is his first appearance on Kylie’s Instagram feed.”
“This content is imported from YouTube.”


"That's how I feel."
"He should be ashamed of himself," she told the breakfast club
A few days later, two years after welcoming his son, the king of Cairo, TEGA ended his engagement to his little mother, Blake chener
"August 2014: TEGA celebrates Kelly's 17th birthday and even gives her a glass of tequila while she's dancing on a platform."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Kendall and Chris Brown are also there waiting to be hanged."
"July 2014: tyga convinced many kyga fans that this is his first appearance on Kylie's instagram feed."
"This content was imported from YouTube."



Number  1057
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It will be fabulous when she takes everything she learns and ‘Meghan-izes’ it.”Read more from Yahoo Lifestyle:Follow us on Instagram, Facebook, and Twitter for nonstop inspiration delivered fresh to your feed, every day.”
“...for the monarchy grassy fields aren t forgiving of stilettos and Meghan was probably mimicking sister in law Kate Middleton who regularly swaps tailored dresses for summery and affordable sundresses jeans and flats...”
“On Sunday Meghan supported Prince Harry at the Audi Polo Challenge at Ascot s Coworth Park Polo Club on what would have been Diana Princess of Wales s 57th birthday looking relaxed in a white button down shirt from J Crew black cropped Everlane pants with matching Chanel flats and...”
“...a 58 Panama hat reportedly by Madewell x Biltmore...”
“Photo: Stephen Lock/i-imagesThe 36-year-old also brought her cross-body bag back to life, an accessory she retired in favor of dainty clutches, which royals typically carry to avoid shaking hands with the public.”
“Royal watchers loved seeing Meghan going back to her casual roots.”
“I love seeing her casual, laid back vibe again!”
“— Teri Wilson (@TeriWilsonauthr) July 1, 2018Meghan looks lovely and more importantly happy.”
“Erikk_the_Dane Erikk_the_Dane2 July 1 2018 Meghan Markle Looks Chic In A White Shirt And Black Capri Pants At The Polo With Prince Harryhttps t co bCch5jF5cm pic twitter com VCUMZqIj6w Hayhar jumm zarah HayharJumm July 2 2018 Although the royal dress code is specific and polo matches are significant events...”
“Meghan’s look was consistent with her weekend vibe: On Saturday, to attend the same event, along with pal Serena Williams, she wore a $400 cotton gingham shirt dress by American designer Shoshanna Gruss — formerly sold on Amazon for $280 — flat sandals from Sarah Flint, and the same hat.”


"It will be a wonderful thing when she takes away everything she has learned and 'meganizes' Lifestyle: follow us on instagram, Facebook and Twitter to provide fresh inspiration for your feed every day. "
“…… As far as monarchy is concerned, meadows will not forgive stilettos. Megan may be imitating her sister-in-law Kate Middleton. She often changes customized skirts into summer clothes, affordable sun skirts, jeans and flat shoes... "
"On Sunday, Megan supported Prince Harry at the Audi Polo challenge at the Ascot cowers Park Polo Club, which will be Princess Diana's 57th birthday, wearing a white button shirt of J Crew, black Capris, Chanel flats and..."
“… It's reported to be a 58 Panama hat from Madewell x Biltmore... "
"Photo: Stephen Locke / I-images, 36, also revives her straddle bag, a delicate handbag she likes after retirement, which members of the royal family usually carry with them to avoid shaking hands with the public."
"Royal observers like to see Megan return to her leisure roots."
"I like to see her casual and leisurely again!"
"Terry Wilson (@ Teri Wilson authr) July 1, 2018 Megan looks cute and, more importantly, happy."
"Erikk ï the ï u Dane erikk ï the ï u dane2 on July 1, 2018, Megan markel looks very fashionable in a white shirt and black Capris on polo. Prince Harry t Co bcch5jf5cm pic twitter com vcumzqij6w hayhar jumm Zarah hayhar jumm on July 2, 2018, although the Royal dress code is very specific, polo competition is also an important event..."
"Megan's look is consistent with the atmosphere of her weekend: on Saturday, she and her friend Serena Williams wore an American designer Shoshanna for the same event Gruss's $400 checkered cotton shirt skirt, which used to be sold on Amazon for $280, is Sarah Flint's flat sandals and the same hat. "



Number  1058
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Ann Curry Says She Once Reported Matt Lauer for Sexual Harassment on Behalf of Another WomanSavannah Guthrie and Hoda Kotb Express Their 'Hopes' for Matt Lauer (Exclusive)Matt Lauer in 'Bad Shape' As Divorce From Annette Roque Moves Forward (Exclusive)”
“...he added.”
“ET spoke to the 63 year old Today show co anchor at the 45th Chaplin Award Gala honoring Helen Mirren at Alice Tully Hall in New York City on Monday where he talked about his former co worker Matt Lauer recently sending out his first statement in five months since...”
“...being abruptly fired from the Today show last November due to sexual misconduct in the workplace...”
“Lauer released a statement to The Washington Post last Wednesday, denying any allegations of coercion and abuse on his part.”
“"Well, look, I can't speak to what Matt is doing or why he chose to do it, but I think we're all evolving and changing and we all have to find our place in this world," Roker told ET about Lauer choosing to speak out.”
“Roker also didn't appear to be ruffled when asked how his work life has been affected.”
“"My deal is I just do my job and just be thrilled that I'm working with, you know...”
“I like being with the people I work with," he said.”
“Lauer's statement came after The Post reached out for comment in regard to their report examining how NBC has handled multiple sexual misconduct scandals that have surfaced against several of the network's biggest news personalities.”


"Embedded code restart" content: Ann curry said she once reported Matt Raul's sexual harassment on behalf of another woman. As the divorce from Annette rock progressed, Warner Guthrie and Hoda Kotb expressed their "Hope" to Matt Raul (exclusive) and Matt Raul (exclusive)
“…… He added
"Et interviewed Helen Mirren, 63, CO anchor of today's show, at the 45th annual Chaplin awards in Alice Tully Hall in New York City on Monday, and talked about his former colleague Matt Raul's recent first statement in five months..."
“…… Last November, he was fired by today show for sexual misconduct in the workplace... "
Raul issued a statement to the Washington Post on Wednesday denying any charges of coercion and abuse
"Well, listen, I don't know what Matt is doing or why he chose to do it, but I think we are all evolving and changing, and we all have to find our place in the world," roker told et about Raul's choice to speak
"When asked how his work life has been affected, rock doesn't seem to be angry either."
"My agreement is that I only do my work and feel excited to work with me, you know..."
"I like to be with my colleagues," he said
"Prior to Raul's statement, the post asked for comments on their investigation into NBC's handling of multiple reports of sexual misconduct scandals against several of the network's top news figures."



Number  1059
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Rumors will continue coming out about her, but until she confirms, rumors they will remain.”
““She is doing just fine and will be ok. She has a lot of great people in her life who are very supportive and who she considers family.”Aniston is not currently dating anyone, or at least there is no concrete proof that she is.”
“Jennifer Aniston has been mentioned in hundreds of rumors since her split from Justin Theroux.”
“Whether those rumors have included Brad Pitt or other men, they don’t seem to be true.”
“The latest rumors surrounding Aniston were that she was dating Jake Gyllenhaal and that Reese Witherspoon had set the two up.”
“That report came from Woman’s Day, but it has since been debunked by Gossip Cop.”
“There is a good reason for the debunking of the latest rumor surrounding Aniston, and Gossip Cop was happy to release it.”
““There was one major problem with the tabloid’s article.”
“Gyllenhaal was in Los Angeles shooting his upcoming movie Velvet Buzzsaw at the time the date was said to have taken place.”
“The actor’s own spokesperson confirmed to Gossip Cop that he wasn’t in New York in late April and never met Aniston for dinner.”Well, count that rumor as just another attempt to connect Aniston to another man following her latest split.”


"Rumors about her will continue to spread, but they will remain until she confirms it."
"She's fine now. She'll be fine.". There are many people in her life who are very supportive of her, and she thinks they are family members. "Aniston has not dated anyone at present, or at least there is no concrete evidence to prove that she is
"Since Jennifer Aniston broke up with Justin Cyrus, there have been hundreds of rumors about her."
"Whether those rumors include Brad Pitt or other men, they don't seem to be true."
"The latest rumor around Aniston is that she's dating Jack Gyllenhaal and Reese Witherspoon has arranged for them."
"That report came from women's day, but it was later exposed by the gossip police."
"The latest rumor about Aniston has been exposed for good reason, and the gossip police are happy to announce it."
"There's a big problem with the tabloid article."
"Gyllenhaal filmed his upcoming film" velvet buzzsaw "in Los Angeles, which is said to have happened that day."
A spokesman for the actor himself confirmed to gossip police that he was not in New York at the end of April and had never had dinner with Aniston. "Well, consider this rumor as another attempt to connect Aniston with another man after her recent breakup."



Number  1060
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Given that dish was the one that inspired Prince Harry to propose, one can assume they live in a secret pro-garlic household.”
“Hopefully, she still sneaks it into her favorite roast-chicken recipe.”
“In multiple interviews before she officially became a royal, the Duchess of Sussex waxed poetic about her love of Filipino chicken adobo, which calls for more than a few cloves of the good stuff.”
““The Queen would never have garlic on the menu.”While giving up garlic might be easy for a very small part of the population, it certainly isn’t for Markle, whose favorite dish is a total garlic bomb.”
““We can never serve anything with garlic or too much onions,” Darren McGrady, the royal chef at Buckingham Palace, told Express.”
“In fact, the 92-year-old isn’t crazy about alliums in general, so she would never dare serve anything like French onion soup or tarte à l’oignon.”
“According to Express, Queen Elizabeth simply cannot stand pungent garlic breath, so she has banned the other royals from consuming it in any way while abroad for state banquets and events.”
“And Meghan Markle’s, who just so happens to be a queen or whatever, has forced the new royal to give up one harmless activity that brings her great joy in life: eating garlic.”
“Photo: Yui Mok/Getty ImagesSucking up to difficult mothers-in-law is one thing, but doing the same to grandmothers-in-law is a whole other story.”
“Meghan Markle.”


"Given that this dish is the inspiration for Prince Harry's proposal, one can assume that they live in a secret Pro garlic family."
"I hope she sneaks it into her favorite roast chicken recipe."
"In many interviews before she officially became a member of the royal family, the Duchess of Sussex's love of Philippine chicken Adobo is full of poetry, which needs more good things."
"Garlic will never be on the Queen's menu." Although it may be easy for a small number of people to give up garlic, it's definitely not for Marcel. His favorite dish is garlic bomb
"We must not make anything out of garlic or too many onions," Darren McGrady, Buckingham Palace's Royal chef, told the express
"In fact, this 92 year old lady generally doesn't like garlic, so she never dares to serve French onion soup or tarta spaghetti."
Queen Elizabeth simply can't stand the pungent smell of garlic, so she banned other members of the royal family from eating garlic in any way at state dinners and events abroad, the Express reported
"And Meghan Markle's happens to be a queen or something, which forces the new royal to give up a harmless activity that brings her great joy in life: eating garlic."
"Photo: dealing with a difficult mother-in-law is one thing, but doing the same thing to her is quite another."
"Megan Marcel."



Number  1061
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Unfortunately, this agreement appears to have wreaked havoc on Suri’s relationship with her father, as the two are rarely seen together.”
“...the Church of Scientology...”
“In Going Clear Scientology and the Prison of Belief Alex Gibney s 2015 documentary Marty Rathbun a former high ranking Scientologist confesses that he was assigned to sabotage Cruise s second marriage I was to facilitate the breakup with Nicole Kidman According to the film Scientology head David Miscavige a...”
“One of the main celebrity faces of Scientology, Cruise appeared to have, at some point, handed over the reins of his personal life to the church.”
“Long before Holmes and Cruise started dating, the leading man had a reputation for strange behavior—the alleged result of his close relationship with the Church of Scientology.”
“That’s because Foxx and Holmes’ intense secrecy is rumored to be a condition of Holmes’ 2012 divorce from Tom Cruise, which was itself the ending of one of the most widely discussed and analyzed marriages in celebrity history.”
“While any secret celebrity dating scenario is fodder for a People cover or a clickbait headline, JamKat is a particularly elusive and fascinating pairing.”
“Anonymous sources insisted on Jamie and Katie’s relationship status and tabloids, sensing a story even bigger and more factually accurate than Jennifer Aniston’s phantom pregnancy, never gave up.”
“He’s never told me he’s dating her.”Still, as months and years passed, rumors of this celebrity coupling persisted.”
“...telling ET that I have no knowledge of Jamie with Katie at all adding I ve never seen them together...”


"Unfortunately, this agreement seems to have seriously damaged Suri's relationship with her father, because they are rarely together."
Church of Scientology
"In innocent Scientology and the prison of faith, in Alex Gibney's 2015 documentary Marty Rathbun, a former high Scientology official admitted that he was assigned to destroy Cruise's second marriage in order to facilitate my marriage with Nicole Kidman Kidman, according to David Miscavige a, director of the film Scientology
"As one of Scientology's leading celebrities, cruise seems to have given his private life to the church to some extent."
Long before Holmes and cruise started dating, the hero was known for his strange behavior, which is said to be the result of his close relationship with the Church of Scientology
"This is because it is said that the high confidentiality of Fox and Holmes is a condition for Holmes' divorce from Tom Cruise in 2012, and the divorce itself is the end of one of the most discussed and analyzed marriages in celebrity history."
"While any secret celebrity dating scene is the material for a person's cover or a click on a bait headline, jamkat is a particularly elusive and fascinating combination."
"Anonymous sources insist on Jamie and Katie's relationship and tabloids, feel a bigger and more real story than Jennifer Aniston's ghost pregnancy, and never give up."
"He never told me he was dating her." However, months and years later, rumors about the celebrity couple still exist
“… Tell et that I didn't know Jamie and Katie were together, and that I've never seen them together... "



Number  1062
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am truly sorry for anyone offended, that was never my intention."”
“I was not trying to make light of Harvey’s inexcusable behavior, but to shame him, the abuser, not his victims.”
“The Brit took to Twitter on Sunday to apologize, writing, "To be clear, sexual assault is no laughing matter.”
“But many people of the Internet didn't think his words were so funny and the entertainer faced some serious online backlash for his remarks.”
“...and rape...”
“On Friday night The Late Late Show star hosted a glittering star studded amfAR Los Angeles Gala honoring Julia Roberts and while captaining the charity event the funnyman couldn t help but to throw a few jabs at disgraced movie mogul Harvey Weinstein who has been accused of both assault...”
“America's most lovable James Corden learned the hard way that not everything is a laughing matter.”


"I'm really sorry that someone has offended me. It's not my intention."
"I don't want to belittle Harvey's unforgivable behavior, but to humiliate Harvey, the abuser, not his victim."
The Briton apologized on twitter on Sunday, writing: "to be clear, sexual assault is not a joke."
"But many netizens think his words are not so funny, and the artist's comments have been seriously rebounded on the Internet."
“… And rape... "
"Last Friday night, the late show star held a starry amfAR awards party in Los Angeles to pay tribute to Julia Roberts. While hosting a charity event, the comedian couldn't help punching the infamous movie mogul Harvey Weinstein, who was accused of two attacks... "
"James Corden, America's loveliest man, knows that not everything is a joke."



Number  1063
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...eBay did not immediately respond to a request for comment.”
“If that’s out of your budget for royal swag, some gift bags put up on eBay more recently are still going for as low as $260.”
“While the cash Oliver made from the free goodies is quite a haul, other gift bag auctions had reached close to $70,000 on Wednesday.”
“The canvas bag, embroidered with the couple’s initials, contains a welcome letter from the couple, a bottle of Windsor Castle water, a giant chocolate coin, a fridge magnet, a tin of shortbread and a 20 percent off coupon at the castle gift shop.”
“Hours after Harry, 33, and Meghan Markle, 36, exchanged “I wills,” Oliver posted her free goody bag on the online auction site — and sold it for $28,557, after 83 people bid on it.”
“She scored the coveted invite because she works for Troup Bywaters — an engineering firm whose work offering young people apprenticeships is a cause close to Prince Harry’s heart.”
“Such an amazing day #Goldenticket #RoyalConnections,” she posted on Twitter the day of the wedding, according to the Daily Mail.”
“...outside Windsor Castle in this amazing setting...”
“The 31 year old human resources manager was one of the 1 200 people invited to spend Saturday outside St George s Chapel to get a peek at the royal couple on their big day for demonstrating strong leadership in their communities I get to watch the royal wedding right...”
“A British woman named Claire Oliver hawked her free royal wedding gift bag on eBay — for close to $30,000.”


“… EBay did not immediately respond to requests for comment. "
"If that's out of your royal gift budget, some of the gift bags you've recently put on eBay are still as low as $260."
"While Oliver's cash from these free items is considerable, other gift bag auctions were close to $70000 on Wednesday."
"The canvas bag is embroidered with the couple's initials. It contains the couple's welcome letter, a bottle of Windsor Castle water, a huge chocolate coin, a refrigerator magnet, a can of buns and 20% discount coupons from the castle gift shop."
Hours after Harry, 33, exchanged "my will" with Megan markel, 36, Oliver posted her free candy bag on an online auction website - sold for $28557 after 83 people bid
"She won the coveted invitation because she works for trouble Bywaters, an engineering company that offers apprenticeship services to young people, which is what Harry wanted."
According to the daily mail, on the wedding day, she tweeted a message: "it's an amazing day, golden ticket, royal connections."
“… Outside Windsor Castle, in this amazing environment... "
"The 31 year old human resources manager was one of 1200 people who were invited to spend Saturday outside St. George's church and showed the royal couple their strong leadership in the community on their big day. I can watch the Royal Wedding right.... "
"A British woman named Claire Oliver peddled her free royal wedding gift bag on eBay for nearly $30000."



Number  1064
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sundays at 10 p.m. E.T.”
“While contemplating the choice she revealed to the camera, “I believe that I’m definitely getting into heaven.”Keeping Up With the Kardashians airs on E!”
“After debating the idea with several of her children, she decided against the complicated and morbid jewelry plan.”
“Kris Says She’s ‘Definitely Getting Into Heaven’The episode also followed Kris exploring the option of having your cremated ashes pressed into a memorial diamond.”
“After putting an entire carton of milk in his backpack, the father of three left, saying, “Love you, partner” to Kourtney on his way out.”
“The duo clearly patched things up by the end of the episode as Scott arrived at Kourtney’s to pick up son Mason, 8, for a sleepover.”
“After recapping a heated interaction with Scott, Kourtney told Khloé that she asked him what he was “on” and told her sister that he said “f–king everything.” She then said he behaved aggressively toward her after she visited his house to see if he was all right.”
“Kourtney shrugged, “I just thought he knew.”Kourtney Says Scott Is ‘On’ SomethingScott seemed to fly off the handle a bit after Kourtney’s relationship status update.”
“He’s 24 years old.” Kourtney, who met beau Younes Bendjima in late 2016, said that Scott immediately hung up on her.”
“After he called her at 2 a.m., Kourtney revealed she told Scott, “I have a boyfriend.”


"Ten o'clock Sunday evening, E.T."
As she pondered over her choice, she said to the camera, "I believe I will go to heaven." Keep up with the kardashians on e! "
"After discussing the idea with several children, she decided to oppose this complex and morbid jewelry project."
"Chris says she's going to heaven for sure." This episode also tells how Chris explores how to cremate your ashes and press them into a commemorative diamond
"After putting a whole box of milk into his backpack, the father of three left and said to Courtney 'love you, partner' on the way out."
"When Scott went to the Courtney's house to pick up his 8-year-old son Mason for the night, it was clear that they had settled the matter."
After reviewing a heated interaction with Scott, kurtney told Heroe that she asked him "what's going on" and told her sister that he said "everything is f-king." Then she said that after she went to his house to see if he was ok, he was very cruel to her
"Courtney shrugged," I thought he knew. "Courtney said that Scott is doing something. After Courtney's relationship status is updated, Scott seems to be a little out of control."
"He's 24 years old." Courtney said Scott immediately hung up on her. Courtney met Bo younes benjima at the end of 2016
After he called her at 2 a.m., Courtney revealed that she told Scott, "I have a boyfriend."



Number  1065
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Another year of growth will make her the youngest self-made billionaire ever, male or female, trumping Mark Zuckerberg, who became a billionaire at age 23," Robehmed reported.”
“However, the magazine says it would take more than a slow year of sales to stop Jenner from reaching billionaire status and making history.”
“Kylie Cosmetics is dealing with slowing growth — Forbes reports that revenue grew just 7% last year, with lip-kit revenue dropping an estimated 35%.”
“There are only five full-time employees, with Jenner's mother, Kris Jenner, handling finances and public relations in exchange for a 10% management cut, the report says.”
“Forbes' Natalie Robehmed detailed how Kylie Cosmetics has found success by harnessing Jenner's immense social-media following and slashing costs by outsourcing labor.”
“Jenner is both the face of the company and the sole owner.”
“Forbes conservatively values the company at $800 million, with an estimated $330 million in sales last year.”
“The 20-year-old's net worth has skyrocketed thanks to the success of Kylie Cosmetics.”
“For comparison, Forbes estimates that Jenner's older sister Kim Kardashian West is worth roughly $350 million.”
“According to Forbes' calculations, that makes her not only the Jenner or Kardashian with the highest net worth, but the 27th-richest self-made woman in the United States.”


"Another year's growth will make her the youngest self-made billionaire ever, both male and female, surpassing Mark Zuckerberg, who became a billionaire at the age of 23," robertmead reported
"However, the magazine said it would take more than a year of slow sales to stop Jenner from becoming a billionaire and making history."
Kylie cosmetics company is dealing with the problem of slowing growth. According to Forbes, revenue increased by only 7% last year, and lipstick revenue decreased by 35%.
"There are only five full-time employees, and Jenner's mother, Chris Jenner, is in charge of Finance and public relations in exchange for a 10% management cut," the report said
Natalie robertmead of Forbes magazine described in detail how Kelly cosmetics company used Jenner's huge social media to reduce costs by outsourcing labor to achieve success
"Jenner is both the spokesman and the sole owner of the company."
Forbes conservatively valued the company at $800 million, with sales estimated at $330 million last year
"The 20-year-old's net worth has soared due to the success of Kelly cosmetics."
"By contrast, Forbes estimates that Jenner's sister, Kim Kardashian West, is worth about $350 million."
"According to Forbes, this makes her not only the highest net worth Jenna or Kardashian, but also the 27th richest woman to start from scratch in the United States."



Number  1066
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(Keri Hilson’s Twitter)Check out Teyana Taylor & Kanye West down below:”
“I love & respect Missy & her work, but we’ve never worked & I’ve prolly seen her 5 times in my life!,” she tweeted Thursday (March 17).”
“Calling out gossip site Media Take Out, Taylor denied the allegations.”
““ok…WOW @ MTO.”
“...and then WOW @ the ppl who really believed MTO,” she tweeted Monday (March 28).”
““lmfaooooooooo this site got me die’n over here with the stories they tell!!!”
“...smh lol” (Teyana Taylor’s Twitter)Reports of the two artists becoming more than friends hit the Internet early Monday.”
“Kanye West is now hooking up with Teyana Taylor reports MediaTakeOut.”
“The site claims the rapper is head over heels for Taylor and her smoking bod.”
“Kanye was intrigued by her innocence and her body an insider tells the site adding Teyana must have put it on him all Kanye talks about is her he even signed her to a deal and is featuring her on his new album with Jay Z We thought this rumor...”


(Keri Hilson's Twitter) take a look at Teyana Taylor & Kanye West below:
"I love and respect Missy and her work, but we've never worked. I've seen her about five times in my life! "She tweeted on Thursday (March 17)," she said
Taylor, speaking out on the gossip website media takeout, denied the charge
"Well Wow @ MTO. "
She tweeted on Monday (March 28), "then wow @ really believes in MTO's ppl."
"The story of lmfaooo, the website that made me die here, is what they said!"
“… SMH lol "(Teyana Taylor's Twitter) reports that the two artists are no longer friends appeared on the Internet earlier Monday
"Kanye West is now in contact with Teyana Taylor."
"The website claims that the rapper is a complete hit for Taylor and her smoking boyfriend."
"Kanye is very interested in her innocence and her body. An insider told the website that Teyana must have put the blame on him. Kanye even signed a contract with her and showed her in his new album with Jay Z. we think it's a rumor..."



Number  1067
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s all in on falling in love and hopes she finds the right guy to have a great life together,” our insider adds.”
“She has a new lease on life after her surgery and she wants to live it with someone and go through all the great things a relationship brings.”
““She wants to be a mom, she wants the wedding and she wants the white picket fence someday.”
“Whether it is Justin, Zedd or The Weeknd she hasn’t really been alone the last few years and she is interested in finding someone that will eventually be her husband and be the father of her children,” a source close to the singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She knows that it is very hard to date with the celebrity she brings to the situation but she is also all about dating and definitely wants to fall in love.”
“The “Wolves” songstress is ready to find her future husband but is aware it will be challenging.”
“Selena Gomez, 25, has found that out, as she’s dated other singers like Justin Bieber, 24, and The Weeknd, 28, and hasn’t been able to meet a guy who is marriage material.”
“Right can be hard if you’re super famous.”
“Finding Mr.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s ready to fall in love again after splitting from Justin Bieber.”


"She wants to fall in love and find the right man to live a good life together," our insider added
"After the operation, she has a new life. She wants to live with someone and experience all the wonderful things that a relationship brings."
"She wants to be a mother, she wants to go to the wedding, she wants to have a white fence one day."
"Whether it's Justin, Zeder or the weekend, she's not alone in the past few years. She's eager to find someone who will eventually become her husband and father," a source close to the singer told reporters
"She knows it's hard to date the celebrities she brings, but she also loves dating and definitely wants to fall in love."
Wolf's female singer is ready to find her future husband, but she realizes it will be a challenge
"Serena Gomez, 25, found out because she's dated other singers, such as Justin Bieber, 24, and weekend, 28, and hasn't met a man related to marriage yet."
"If you're very famous, it can be hard to make the right choice."
"Looking for sir."
"We have exclusive details of how she plans to fall in love again after breaking up with Justin Bieber."



Number  1068
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Mirror Celebs has contacted reps for Angelina and Johnny for comment.”
“Her friends are now speculating about what could happen between them if she and Brad are not reconciled and their divorce goes through Meanwhile Hollywood star Brad who is said to be wrecked by the fact he hasn t been able to see his kids is at the centre of...”
“...her split from Brad Pitt it s been claimed...”
“The mum-of-six, 41, and Johnny starred together in romantic thriller Tourist back in 2009 and are said to have remained friends ever since.”
“The pair also share the same divorce lawyer, Laura Wasser, who represented Johnny through his divorce from estranged wife Amber Heard.”
“Johnny, 53, reportedly recommended Laura, who has worked with a string of high-profile celebrity clients in the past, to Angelina after the actress was there to support him during his bitter break up.”
“"Angelina idolised Johnny for years before she worked with him on The Tourist, and then the pair of them really hit it off on set," a source claimed to The Sun.”
“They continued: “But the two of them have stayed in touch ever since then, and spoke regularly during the storm that surrounded Johnny’s break up with Amber.”
“(Image: Justin Tallis/PA)Video Loading Video Unavailable Click to play Tap to play The video will auto-play soon 8 Cancel Play now“There’s no suggestion that their closeness played any part in Angelina and Brad’s split.”
“But they have been speaking about the situation, and Angelina hired Johnny’s lawyer to represent her based on the advice that he has given her.”


"Mirror celebrity has contacted representatives of Angelina and Johnny for advice."
"Her friends are now speculating about what will happen to their divorce if she and Brad don't reconcile. Meanwhile, Hollywood star Brad is said to be heartbroken for not being able to see his children. He is in the middle of... "
“… She broke up with Brad Pitt. It's said that... "
"The mother of six, 41, and Johnny starred in the 2009 romantic thriller tourist, and they are said to have been friends ever since."
"They also share the same divorce lawyer, Laura Wasser, who divorced his separated wife, amber Hurd, on behalf of Johnny."
According to reports, Johnny, 53, has recommended Laura to Angelina, who has worked with a series of well-known clients in the past, and Angelina has supported him in the painful breakup with Laura
"Angelina adored Johnny for several years, and then she and he filmed tourist together. They really hit it off on the set," a source told the sun
They went on: "but the two of them have been in touch ever since and talked a lot in the storm when Johnny and amber broke up."
(photo: Justin Tallis / PA) video loading video not available click play click play video will play automatically soon 8 cancel now "there is no sign that their intimate relationship played any role in Angelina and Brad's breakup."
"But they've been talking about it, and Angelina hired his lawyer to defend her on the advice Johnny gave her."



Number  1069
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“From Kristen to Rupert and the wife he cheated on, let's see how all the key players have fared since those fateful photos surfaced...”
“...as Robsten...”
“Despite the media massacre the fall out the real life romantic saga that was more dramatic than the Twilight Saga both K Stew and R Patz have moved on romantically and professionally from their days as Bella and Edward and...”
“But no so fast...”
“Almost.”
“The explosive scandal broke Twi-Hards hearts and almost ruined careers.”
“In another head-line making move, five years ago today, Kristen, who had always been media shy, issued a direct public apology to her jilted boyfriend of three years—and their picture-perfect love officially came crashing down.”
“It's been five years (and one day) since the shocking photos emerged of Kristen Stewart cheating on Twilight co-star and real-life boyfriend Robert Pattinson with her married Snow White and the Huntsman director Rupert Sanders.”


"From Christine to Rupert and his cheating wife, let's look at the performance of all the key people since those fateful photos surfaced..."
"As Robsten..."
"Although the media has been slaughtered, the romance in real life is more dramatic than the legend of twilight. K. Stuart and r. Patz both started their romantic and professional development from the era of Bella and Edward, and..."
"But not so fast..."
"Almost."
"The explosive scandal broke the hearts of both men and almost ruined their careers."
"Five years ago today, another headache is that Christine, who has always been shy to the media, apologized directly to her boyfriend who has been lovelorn for three years. The perfect love between them is officially over."
"It's been five years (and one day) since the shocking pictures of Kristen Stewart cheating with twilight co star Robert Pattinson and married snow white and Huntsman director Rupert Sanders came to light."



Number  1070
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The Oscars also will be televised live in more than 225 countries and territories worldwide.”
“The 90th Oscars will be held at the Dolby Theatre® at Hollywood & Highland Center® in Hollywood, and will be televised live by the ABC Television Network.”
“...for the 90th Oscars was previously announced...”
“Oscar Nominees Luncheon Saturday February 10 2018 Scientific and Technical Awards Tuesday February 20 2018 Finals voting opens Tuesday February 27 2018 Finals voting closes Wednesday February 28 2018 The Oscar Concert Sunday March 4 2018 90th Oscars The date...”
“Academy key dates for the 2017 Awards season are Saturday November 11 2017 Governors Awards Friday January 5 2018 Nominations voting opens Friday January 12 2018 Nominations voting closes Tuesday January 23 2018 Oscar Nominations Announcement Monday February 5 2018”
“Dates for the 91st, 92nd and 93rd Oscars presentations are set for February 24, 2019, February 23, 2020, and February 28, 2021, respectively.”
“The Academy Awards® presentation will air live on ABC on Oscar® Sunday, March 4, 2018.”
“THE OSCARS AIRS LIVE SUNDAY, MARCH 4, 2018 ON THE ABC TELEVISION NETWORKOSCARS DATES SELECTED FOR 2019, 2020 AND 2021The Academy and the ABC Television Network today announced key dates for the 90th Oscars®.”


"The Oscars will also be broadcast live on television in more than 225 countries and regions around the world."
"The 90th Academy Awards ceremony will be held at the Dolby theatre and Highland Center in Hollywood and will be broadcast live on ABC TV network."
“…… It has been announced before the 90th Academy Awards ceremony.... "
"Oscar nominees luncheon Saturday, February 10, 2018 science and technology awards Tuesday, February 20, 2018 final voting begins Tuesday, February 27, 2018 final voting ends Wednesday, February 28, 2018 Oscar concert Sunday, March 4, 2018 90th Academy Awards ceremony date..."
"The key date for the 2017 academy awards season is Saturday, November 11, 2017. The governor's awards nominations start on Friday, January 5, 2018. The nominations end on Friday, January 12, 2018. The Academy Awards nominations are announced on Tuesday, January 23, 2018. Monday, February 5, 2018"
"The 91st, 92nd and 93rd Oscars will be held on February 24, 2019, February 23, 2020 and February 28, 2021, respectively."
"The Oscars will be broadcast live on ABC TV on Sunday, March 4, 2018."
"The Oscars will be broadcast live on ABC TV network on Sunday, March 4, 2018. The dates of the Oscars are selected for the Oscars in 2019, 2020 and 2021. ABC TV network today announced the key dates of the 90th Oscars."



Number  1071
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Bobby Finger thinks it’s spelled Tirsha, but has never heard this name before and it has not yet been put onscreen.”
“Apparently the husband, Michael, cheated on his wife whose name I keep missing.”
“), who then said, “I want her to come on... and we can have an honest discussion about how she feels.”Megyn Kelly welcomed Katy Tur to the stage to talk about Ivana Trump’s statement about being the real First Lady.”
“And speaking of fashion choices, here’s one for you: I’m done with Donna Karan.”The audience applauded Megyn’s apparent boycott (how brave!”
“...which is hard enough without rich powerful well connected fashion moguls lecturing them on their clothing choices...”
“Like they are animals who can t contain themselves if a woman shows part of her thigh How about we not pile on Donna Megyn Kelly said How about we use this moment to encourage women to find their own voices despite the risks and to stand up for themselves...”
“It has to do with power and control... How insulting to men!”
“That’s it.”There was still more after “that’s it.”Megyn Kelly said, “The truth is, sexual harassment has nothing to do with wardrobe.”
“It makes it OK for her boss to say go home and change.”
“I don’t give a damn if a woman shows up in a bikini to the office, that doesn’t make it all right... for her superior to harass her.”


"Bobbie finger thinks it's spelled tilsa, but he's never heard of the name before, and it's not on the screen yet."
"It's obvious that husband Michael betrayed his wife. I never knew his name."
”She went on, "I want her to come over... We can discuss her feelings frankly. "Megan Kelly welcomes Katie tour to the stage and talks about Ivana Trump's statement to be the real first lady."
"When it comes to fashion choices, here's one for you: I'm done with Donna callan." The audience applauded Megan's apparent boycott
“…… If there are no rich, powerful and well connected fashion tycoons preaching about their clothing choices, it's hard enough... "
"It's like they're animals that can't control themselves. If a woman shows part of her thigh, why don't we pile them on Donna Megan Kelly? She said, "why not use this moment to encourage women to find their own voice regardless of risks and stand up for themselves..."
"It's about power and control... What an insult to a man
"In fact, sexual harassment has nothing to do with clothing," Megan Kelly said
"Her boss said just go home and change."
"If a woman shows up in the office in a bikini, I don't care at all, it doesn't matter... Let her superiors harass her. "



Number  1072
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“Brad Pitt and Sandra Bullock Dating Rumors: Is George Clooney Matchmaking the Pair?”
“Email Print Img No-img Menu Whatsapp Google Reddit Digg Stumbleupon Linkedin CommentRumors are rife that Hollywood superstars Brad Pitt and Sandra Bullock might be dating and that the budding relationship, if true, was nudged at by another big star and close friend to the two, George Clooney.”
“Months after the controversial separation that led to Angelina Jolie filing for divorce from Pitt, reports are swirling around that Pitt might just be on the road of moving on with the help of the "Ocean's Eight" actress.”
“Back in September 2016, fans of Pitt and Jolie were deeply shocked after both camps confirmed that their marriage is not working anymore, thus the need for divorce due to "irreconcilable differences."”
“Pitt and Jolie have been known as one of the most adored couples in Hollywood.”
“They have been married since 2014 and have six children.”
“This month, the Australian paper New Idea claims that Pitt and Bullock have been "discreetly" going out in "secret dates and private phone calls" and the report maintains that the two are "taking things 'to the next level.'"”
“"They've always moved in the same crowd but the timing has been wrong – either he's been with someone, or she has.”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
Brad Pitt and Sandra Bullock dating rumor: is George Clooney dating them? "
"Email print img no img menu WhatsApp Google reddit Digg stump LinkedIn comments rumors are flying, Hollywood superstars Brad Pitt and Sandra Bullock may be dating, this budding relationship, if true, is another superstar and their close friend George Clooney nudged."
A few months ago, Angelina Jolie and Pitt filed for divorce because of separation. After that, it was reported that with the help of the "ocean eight" actress, Pitt may be on the way to move on
"As early as September 2016, fans of Pitt and Julie were shocked when they confirmed that their marriage no longer existed in both camps, so they had to divorce because of" irreconcilable differences. "
"Pete and Julie are known as one of the most adored couples in Hollywood."
"They got married in 2014 and have six children."
"This month, new point, an Australian newspaper, said Pitt and Bullock had been dating" cautiously "in" secret dating and private phone calls "and that they were" taking things to new heights. "
"They're always moving in the same group, but at the wrong time - either he's with someone, or she's with him."



Number  1073
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Have your sayMore like this...”
“The couple kept things low-key, by taking their daughter North to Disneyland in Anaheim for the day.”
“In other news, the reality star recently celebrated her third wedding anniversary with Kanye.”
“Whatever happens, Kim seems determined to have baby number three, so we’ve no doubt she’ll keep exploring her options.”
“If Khloe’s not willing, then it seems the siblings’ mum would be, with Kris Jenner telling Kim “I would do it in two seconds” in a recent episode of Keeping Up With The Kardashians.”
“It’s a big ask for anyone, but considering that Khloe has no children of her own yet, we wonder how she’d feel about giving birth to her sister’s child.”
“On Watch What Happens Live with Andy Cohen, the reality star revealed that she’s been “begging” her younger sister Khloe to be her surrogate.”
“Even after a risky surgery to repair the damage, doctors were unable to mend the problem, so now the celebrity couple must look into other options.”
“However, the 36-year-old’s first two pregnancies caused significant damage to her uterus and now she’s unable to conceive naturally.”
“Kim Kardashian recently revealed that she and hubby, Kanye West, would like to have more children so that daughter North and son Saint will grow up with lots of siblings.”


"Make your words more like this..."
"The couple kept a low profile and took their daughter north to Disneyland in Anaheim for a day."
Another news is that the reality star and Kanye recently celebrated their third wedding anniversary
"No matter what happens, Kim seems determined to have a third child, so we have no doubt that she will continue to explore her options."
"If Khloe doesn't want to, then the siblings' moms seem to want to, and in the latest episode," follow Kardashian, "Kris Jenner tells Kim," I'll do it in two seconds. "
"It's a big demand for anyone, but considering that Khloe doesn't have children of her own, we want to know how she will feel when she gives birth to her sister's children."
"Watching live with Andy Cohen, the reality star revealed that she had been" begging "her sister Chloe to be her surrogate mother."
"Even after a dangerous repair operation, doctors can't fix the problem, so now the celebrity couple have to consider other options."
"However, her first two pregnancies at 36 caused serious damage to her uterus, and now she can't conceive naturally."
"Kim Kardashian recently revealed that she and her husband Kanye West hope to have more children, so that their daughter north and son saint will have many brothers and sisters when they grow up."



Number  1074
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Remember: Abuse of the TV.com image system may result in you being banned from uploading images or from the entire site – so, play nice and respect the rules!”
“The images should not contain any sexually explicit content, race hatred material or other offensive symbols or images.”
“Please read the following before uploadingDo not upload anything which you do not own or are fully licensed to upload.”
“By clicking "Publish", you are confirming that the image fully complies with TV.com’s Terms of Use and that you own all rights to the image or have authorization to upload it.”
“You must only upload images which you have created yourself or that you are expressly authorised or licensed to upload.”


"Remember: abusing the power of the TV network picture system may cause you to be banned from uploading pictures or from the entire website - so have a good time and respect the rules!"
"Images should not contain any pornographic content, racial hatred materials or other offensive symbols or images."
"Please read the following before uploading. Please do not upload any content that you do not own or have full right to upload."
"By clicking publish, you confirm that the image is in full compliance with the network's terms of use and that you have all rights to the image or the right to upload it
"You can only upload images that you create, or that you are explicitly authorized or licensed to upload."



Number  1075
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here, a deep dive into the history of this supposed feud, which rages on in 2021.”
“Nixon and Charlotte Kristin Davis...”
“Even since the early days of SATC there have been rumors of infighting between the pair and speculation has only strengthened with Cattrall s absence from And Just Like That an HBO Max limited series revival about Carrie Miranda Cynthia...”
“But even more controversial than some of the episodes is the enduring offscreen drama between stars Sarah Jessica Parker (who played Carrie Bradshaw) and Kim Cattrall (who played Samantha Jones).”
“The very first episode of Sex and the City premiered over 20 years ago, and the series is remembered for its larger-than-life fashion and flings.”


"Here, we will explore in depth the history of this so-called feud that rages in 2021."
"Nixon and Charlotte Christine Davis..."
"Even in the early days of SATC, there were rumors of infighting between the two. With Katla's absence, speculation became more and more intense, just like a sequel of HBO Max limited about Carrie Miranda Cynthia..."
"But what's more controversial than some shows is the long-lasting off screen drama between stars Sarah Jessica Parker (as Kelly Bradshaw) and Kim katlar (as Samantha Jones)
The first episode of "sex and the city" premiered more than 20 years ago. The series is famous for its extraordinary fashion and passion



Number  1076
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Despite frequently being photographed together, both denied the rumours until January 2016, when Bieber posted a candid snap on Instagram of the couple kissing on New Year’s Eve, taken when they were on a trip in Anguilla with Bieber’s family.”
“Rumours began circulating that the two were romantically involved after pictures surfaced of them attending the same Church ceremony together in 2014 with Kendall Jenner.”
“She has also walked the runway for Elie Saab, Missoni, Dolce & Gabbana Tory Burch, Prabal and Jeremy Scott.”
“Baldwin's career has flourished ever since and the young model has appeared on a number of magazine covers such as Elle, Wonderland, Vogue Turkey and The Sunday Times Style.”
“In January 2015, Baldwin was photographed for American Vogue and went on to land a string of high profile campaigns, including ones with Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger, Carolina Herrera and Guess.”
“She made her first runway appearance later that year walking for Topshop Unique at London Fashion Week and appeared in fashion editorials for Tatler, LOVE and i-D amongst others.”
“Baldwin was signed to New York agency Ford Models as a teenager, making her commercial debut in late 2014 in a campaign for French Connection.”
“What does she do?”
“Alec Baldwin - of Beetlejuice, 30 Rock and Saturday Night Live - is her uncle.”
“...tied the knot to her longtime partner Andrew Aronow in September 2017 Hailey was the maid of honour...”


"Although they were often photographed together, they both denied the rumor until January 2016, when Bieber released a candid snapshot of the couple kissing on New Year's Eve on instagram, which was taken when they and Bieber's family were traveling in Anguilla."
"In 2014, after photos of the two people attending the same church ceremony with Kendall Jenner were exposed, rumors began to spread that they were in love."
"She also shows for Elie Saab, Missoni, Dolce & Gabbana tory burch, prabal and Jeremy Scott."
"Baldwin's career has been booming since then, and the young model has appeared on the covers of Elle, wonderland, vogue Turkey and Sunday Times style."
"In January 2015, Baldwin took a set of photos for American vogue and continued a series of high-profile promotional activities, including with Ralph Lauren, Tommy Hilfiger, Carolina Herrera and guess."
"Later that year, she made her debut on the catwalk at London Fashion week for Topshop unique and appeared in fashion editorials in magazines such as Tatler, love and I-D."
"Baldwin signed up with Ford models in New York when he was a teenager and made his debut at a French connect event at the end of 2014."
"What does she do?"
"Alec Baldwin is her uncle. She's from beetlejustice, 30 Rock and live on Saturday night."
“…… In September 2017, Haley married her long-term partner Andrew arono.... "



Number  1077
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You do you, boo!”
“Mentally, she is done with him," adding that "she isn't focused on dating as much as she's just really focusing on herself.”
“Many rooting for the on again off again couple to get back together once and for all are probably just a tad bit shattered now that it s been confirmed that Bieber and Hailey Baldwin are engaged to be married after Bieber s proposal on July 7 during a trip...”
“...to the Bahamas...”
“But, while we're all over here mourning the loss of the couple that we thought would be endgame, our girl Selena is literally the epitome of the shrugged-shoulders emoji, clearly not caring as much as we all thought she would.”
“And honestly, Selena Gomez's reaction to Justin Bieber's engagement confirmation will probably make you love her even more than you already do, if that's possible.”
“According to E!”
“News, a source told the publication that, although the news of Bieber and Baldwin's engagement was unexpected, Gomez "doesn't really care" about her ex-boyfriend's new romance.”
“The source said,Selena was surprised an engagement happened this quickly but not surprised Justin would do something like this knowing who he is.”
“At the end of the day though she doesn't really care.”


"You do it, cloth!"
"Mentally, she's broken up with him," she added, "and she's not focused on dating, she's focused on herself."
"A lot of people support this" go and go "couple to get back together once and for all, but now it has been confirmed that Bieber and Haley Baldwin proposed and got engaged during a trip on July 7..."
“… To the Bahamas... "
"But when we are here to mourn the loss of the couple we think will be the end, our girl Selena is the epitome of shrugging her shoulders, obviously not as concerned as we think."
"To be honest, Selena Gomez's reaction to Justin Bieber's engagement confirmation may make you love her more if possible."
"According to e!"
"News, a source told the media that although the news of Bieber and Baldwin's engagement was unexpected, Gomez" didn't really care "about his ex boyfriend's new relationship
"The source said that Selena was surprised that the engagement happened so soon, but it's not surprising that Justin knew who he was and would do it."
"In the end, though she didn't care."



Number  1078
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us do our jobs.”The report that Clooney may withdaw from Italy comes just days after another high-profile star, Madonna, said she may look to move there: according to Italian media, the Material Girl has been eyeing property in Rome.”
“What’s wrong with that?”
“Now there’s a way to lure those rich people to the valley.”
“He has committed to raising $500,000-plus for the president’s re-election.”
““I'm disillusioned by the people who are disillusioned by Obama,” Clooney recently told ABC News.”
“UPDATED: More reporting has determined that the actor is not selling his lakeside Lake Como property.”
“ROME – The Hollywood Reporter updated this report with confirmation from George Clooney that the actor is not selling his Lake Como property.”
“Previously:It looks like actor and Italy regular George Clooney may be severing his ties with the Bel Paese, at least according to a report from Italian news program TG 24.”
“The report said that Clooney is looking to sell Villa Oleandra, the mansion he bought on the shores of Lake Como 10 years ago, in order to distance himself from the attention of the corps of paparazzi who follow his every move while there.”
“If the reports prove to be true, it would be part of a dramatic withdrawal from Italy for the 51-year-old Clooney, who has established deep roots in the country.”


"Let's do our job well." According to the report, Clooney may came from Italy. Just a few days ago, another well-known movie star Madonna said she might consider moving there: according to Italian media reports, the material girl has been staring at the real estate in Rome
"What's the matter?"
"Now there is a way to lead the rich into the valley."
"He promised to raise more than half a million dollars for the re-election of the president."
"I'm disappointed with those who are disappointed with Obama," Clooney said in a recent ABC interview
"Update: more reports have confirmed that the actor did not sell his lakeside property in Lake Como."
"Rome - Hollywood reporters updated this story, and George Clooney confirmed that the actor did not sell his Lake Como property."
"Prev: it looks like actor and Italian regulars George Clooney may break up with beperth, at least according to the Italian news program tg24
"It's reported that Clooney plans to sell the Orlando villa he bought 10 years ago on the Bank of Lake Como in order to stay away from the attention of the paparazzi who follow his every move."
"If these reports prove to be true, it will be part of the dramatic withdrawal of 51 year old Clooney from Italy, where he has built a deep foundation."



Number  1079
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Mike Coppola/Getty Images]”
““He’s still young and just decided he wasn’t ready to settle down.”Robert was recently under media radar when there were rumors that the reason why he is not marrying Tahliah is because he is gay.”
“Recent rumors suggest that Twilight alum and FKA Twigs are expecting their first child.”
“Gamenguide reported earlier that the Remember Me star is currently suffering from depression and that’s why he has canceled his wedding with Twigs.”
“Now the publication has reported about their pregnancy.”
“According to Gamenguide, there are reports that Robert Pattinson and Tahliah Debrett Barnett are planning to have a baby so they could save their failing relationship.”
“According to the reports, the couple is now very desperate to fix their relationship and that’s why they have decided to have a babyIf these speculations about Kristen’s ex-boyfriend were not enough, other sources previously claimed that the engaged couple might be headed for an end.”
“Hollywood Life reported that Twigs and Pattinson were spotted fighting at Los Angeles Airport.”
“The publication further noted that the couple seemed visibly upset with each other.”
“At the same time, iTechPost explained that the fall between the couple is because of Kristen Stewart.”


"[close up of Mike Coppola / Getty pictures]"
"He's young, but he doesn't feel ready to settle down." Robert recently received media attention, when there were rumors that he did not marry Talia because he was gay
"It's been rumored recently that alum of twilight and twigs of FKA are looking forward to their first child."
"Gamenguide earlier reported that the" remember me "star is currently suffering from depression, which is why he cancelled his wedding with twigs."
"Now the publication has reported that they are pregnant."
"According to gamenguid, there are reports that Robert Pattinson and Talia Debrett Barnett are planning to have a child so they can save the failed relationship."
"It is reported that the couple are now very eager to repair their relationship, which is why they have decided to have a child. If the speculation about Christine's ex boyfriend is not enough, the couple previously claimed by other sources to be engaged may come to an end."
"Hollywood life reported that Tevez and Pattinson were found fighting at the Los Angeles Airport."
"The publication further points out that the couple apparently feel uneasy about each other."
"At the same time, itechpost explained that the couple lost love because of Kristen Stewart."



Number  1080
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...too far in the past and not relatable and that s what makes them safe...”
““These pills that they want me to take three of a day, I take one a week maybe, two a week.”
“I had so much of it that I didn’t know what it was like to be without it.” He added: “It was incredible because it was forced humility.”
“Previously I would ve looked at humility as more of a negative thing But that humility he said gave me time to grow On opioids medication and liposuction I was drugged out Mr West said on TMZ about the period...”
“...preceding his hospitalization...”
““I was on opioids.”
“Two days after I got off of opioids, I’m errrrrr — I’m in the hospital.” He said he had been prescribed the pills after undergoing a liposuction procedure.”
““I had plastic surgery because I was trying to look good for y’all,” he told the staff of the gossip outlet.”
““Didn’t want y’all to call me fat, so I got liposuction.”
“And they gave me opioids.”Mr. West said he went from taking two pills a day after the surgery to taking seven, but that he was no longer on as much medication.”


“… In the past, it was too far away and irrelevant. That's why they were safe... "
"They want me to take three tablets a day. I might take one tablet a week and two tablets a week."
"I have so much that I don't know what it would be like without it." He added: "it's incredible because it's forced humility."
"I used to think of humility as a more negative thing, but what he said about humility gave me time to grow up taking opioids and liposuction. I was anesthetized. Mr. West said about that period on TMZ..."
“… Before he was hospitalized... "
"I'm taking opioids."
"Two days after I gave up opioids, I was in the hospital." He said he was prescribed after liposuction
"I had plastic surgery because I wanted you to look better," he told gossip media staff
"I don't want you to say I'm fat, so I had liposuction."
"They gave me opioids." Mr. West said he went from taking two tablets a day after surgery to seven, but he no longer took so many drugs



Number  1081
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Do you think their eight-month relationship will last after this?”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhoa.”
“Source: BACKGRID“Rihanna ran after him with her bodyguards chasing her, but when she got there, Hassan had left without her,” said the source.”
“The billionaire then “stormed out the door, got in their car and drove off.”Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDYou know something’s wrong when you have the nerve to leave a global superstar without a second thought!”
“It’s embarrassing.”Source: BACKGRIDAnd that wasn’t the end of it.”
““He asked Rihanna, ‘Why do you always do this?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRID“Hassan went nuts,” said the witness.”
“It didn’t help matters that a staffer passed along a complaint.”
“When dining out with Hassan and some friends in California, Rih Rih chose to smoke around onlookers, and a source told Life & Style that Hassan wasn’t thrilled about it.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"Do you think their eight month relationship will last after that?"
"Source: backgridwhoa."
"Source: backstage" Rihanna ran after him, and the bodyguards ran after her, but when she got there, Hassan had left, no her source said
"Billionaire" rushed out of the house, got into the car and drove away. When you have the courage to leave a global superstar without hesitation, you know what's wrong
"It's embarrassing." Source: backgridand, that's not over yet
"He asked Rihanna," why do you always do this? "
The article continues in the following ad source: backgrid "Hassan is crazy," witnesses said
"A staff member conveyed a complaint, which didn't help in any way."
"While dining out with Hassan and some friends in California, Riley chose to smoke around the onlookers. A source told life and fashion magazine that Hassan was not excited about it."



Number  1082
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Whatever else is printed about us but is not directly from us, if someone else is fictional narrative.”
“Aniston is beside herself as ex hubby Justin Theroux could reveal his former A-List lover’s deep, dark secrets in a scathing tell-all!”
“Theroux 46 is said to be warning Aniston 49 to fight fair when it comes to spilling dirt on their nasty split or he ll have no hesitation whipping out the tell all card that would spell utter humiliation Although Theroux rep denies the claims a source tells Radar exclusively...”
“This isn t Justin s style but he figures he needs options if Jen fights dirty...”
“If he did go on TV or give an interview that delved into their failed marriage he d have so much to say about his own frustrations that otherwise won t be aired Jen s been a nightmare to live with and Justin s friends say it s a charade...”
“...that he s being painted as a bad guy given what she did to him As fans know the couple called it quits on February 15 2018 after only two years of marriage...”
“They released a joint statement: “In an effort to reduce any further speculation, we’ve decided to announce our separation.”
“This decision was mutual and lovingly made at the end of last year.”
“We are to have friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"If other people are fictional, then anything about us but not directly from us."
"Aniston has gone mad because her ex husband Justin Theroux may expose the profound and dark secrets of his ex A-class lover in a stern way!"
"It is said that Theroux 46 warned Aniston 49 to be fair when it comes to swearing on their dirty breakup, or he would not hesitate to play a" tell everyone "card, which would mean total humiliation, even though Theroux's representative denied a source specifically telling radar..."
"It's not Justin's style, but he thinks if Jen fights dirty people, he needs to choose..."
"If he does get on TV or an interview about their failed marriage, he will say a lot about his frustration, otherwise it won't be broadcast. Friends of Jennifer and Justin say it's a nightmare..."
“… He was portrayed as a villain because of what she did to him, because fans know that the couple announced their separation on February 15, 2018 after two years of marriage... "
They issued a joint statement: "in order to reduce further speculation, we have decided to announce separation."
"This decision was made by both sides at the end of last year and is full of love."
"We will have some friends who have decided to break up, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship."



Number  1083
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comment section.”
“Source: BACKGRIDDo you want Jennifer and Ben to get back together?”
“Source: BACKGRIDThe mom-of-three dressed casually for the outing, in a white sweater and black dress pants while her ex wore jeans, a red t-shirt and a blue letterman jacket.”
“She forgave him for so much, and still he couldn’t change," a source explained to Us Weekly.”
““She put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDBut that hasn't stopped Jen from wanting to fix things with her ex.”
“...readers know, since their split Ben has moved on with Saturday Night Live director, Lindsay Shookus.”
“Source: BACKGRIDAs OK!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAt one point, Ben even got so close to the actress their heads were touching!”
“Source: BACKGRIDThe couple, who divorced in 2015, were caught getting super flirty during the religious service.”


"Make a sound in the comments section."
Do you want to get Jennifer and Ben back together? "
Source: backgrid, the mother of three, went for an outing in casual clothes, wearing a white sweater and black trousers, while her predecessor wore jeans, a red T-shirt and a blue Letterman jacket
"She forgives him so much, but he still can't change," one source explained to us weekly
"She's committed to repairing the relationship, and she's very keen to turn things around for the sake of the children and their interests."
"This article continues under the source: backgrid, but it doesn't stop Jen from trying to solve problems with her ex boyfriend."
“…… Readers know that since their breakup, Ben has continued to work with Lindsay schokus, the director of "Saturday night live."
"Source: backgradas OK!"
The article continues in the following ad source: backgrid at one point, Ben even gets so close to the actresses that their heads touch! "
"Source: BACKGROUND: the couple, who divorced in 2015, were found to be super flirting during religious ceremonies."



Number  1084
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may have heard rumors, reports, and speculation that 25-year-old Selena Gomez is dating 46-year-old Justin Theroux.”
“Yep, the universal reaction seems to pretty much be:This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“What's up with Selena and Other Justin™'s relationship?”
“It's not 100% clear, so let's break down what we do know.”
“Justin Is Friends with Selena's BFF Petra CollinsThis content is imported from Instagram.”
“...Which could be how they've gotten to know each other.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"You've probably heard rumors, reports and speculation that Serena Gomez, 25, is dating Justin serux, 46."
Yes, the general reaction seems to be that this content is imported from {embed name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"What happened to Serena and the other Justins ™ 'her relationship
"It's not 100% clear, so let's break down what we know."
"Justin is a friend of Selina's best friend Petra Collins, and his content was imported from instagram."
“… It could be a way for them to get to know each other. "



Number  1085
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The actresses attended Tiff earlier this […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“One of the tabloids claims an incident on the red carpet of the Toronto International Film Festival has created tension between the Mary Shelley co-stars, but Gossip Cop looked into the story and we’ve exclusively learned the truth.”
“Is a feud really developing between Elle Fanning and Maisie Williams ?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"The actresses took part in TIFF earlier this year ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"One of the tabloids said that an incident on the red carpet of the Toronto International Film Festival caused tension between Mary Shelley and her two stars, but the gossip police investigated the story and we got the exclusive truth."
"Is there really a rift between Al fanning and Macy Williams?"



Number  1086
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Click here to upload yours.”
“We pay for videos too.”
“Actress Katie, 39, is said to have called off their marriage after with struggling trust issues.”
“3 Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx have split, according to reports Credit: Getty - ContributorThe couple only went public with their relationship in September last year but were first linked back in August 2013.”
“Radar Online reports Dawson's Creek star Katie called it quits with Jamie after reports he had been dating other women during their time together.”
“A source is said to have told Radar Online: "Katie just couldn’t get over her trust issues."”
“The pair had insisted they were just good friends following Katie's divorce from Tom Cruise.”
“Two years ago, Jamie was forced to deny dating Katie when a picture emerged of the two of them holding hands in a recording studio.”
“Jamie Foxx abandons live interview when asked about girlfriend Katie Holmes 3 The pair were first linked five years ago but only went public with their romance in 2017 Credit Getty Contributor 3 Katie was said to have been banned from having a public relationship under the terms of her...”
“...divorce from Tom Cruise Credit Getty Images Getty Katie Holmes and Jamie Foxx spotted dancing together MOST READ IN CELEBRITY house tour Inside Katie Price s son Harvey s home as he lives on his own for the first time IT S ALL RITA”


"Click here to upload your."
"We also pay for video."
Katie, a 39 year old actress, is said to have cancelled their marriage because of a trust problem
Katie Holmes and Jamie fox are reported to have broken up. The couple only made their relationship public last September, but first contacted in August 2013
"Radar Online reported that Dawson's Crick star Katie said that after breaking up with Jamie, he reported that he had been dating other women for the same time."
It is said that a source told radar online: "Katie just can't overcome her trust problem."
"After Katie and Tom Cruise divorced, they insisted that they were just good friends."
"Two years ago, Jamie was forced to deny dating Katie, when there was a picture of them holding hands in the studio."
"When asked about his girlfriend Katie Holmes 3, Jamie fox gave up the live interview. They first contacted each other five years ago, but only in 2017 did they disclose their relationship. It is said that according to Katie's terms, Katie is forbidden to make her love public... "
“… Divorce from Tom Cruise - photo - Katie Holmes and Jamie fox dance together at the home of Katie Price's son Harvey - this is his first time living alone - it's all Rita "



Number  1087
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sources told The Blast that they are steadfast in their belief that the "I Am a God" rapper has "never been better."”
“Kanye and Kim are notorious for keeping their private residence away from cameras, making shooting a reality show of Kim's life a smidge more difficult.”
“During today's tweet hurricane, that included digs at Nike and Michael Jordan and claims West would fly on "Yeezy force one" as president, Kanye apparently violated a long-held Kardashian/West family mandate: no showing their home on social media.”
“Twitter/@kanyewestIn three tweets posted by Ye, West shows off a long, stark hallway in their Hidden Hills mansion and part of an equally stark table and chairs in an adjoining room.”
“Twitter/@kanyewestThe captions in the tweets mention "the sunken place," [SPOILER ALERT] in reference to the brainwashing technique from "Get Out" where a white therapist mentally trapped black people in their own minds.”
“West had mentioned the sunken place in previous tweets this week, writing that he was producing music from there.”
“Twitter/@kanyewestKim Kardashian retweeted the initial post calling her hubby out on publishing pics of their home, which they've agreed was off limits.”
“The mogul made light of the photos and asked if this means her hit show, "Keeping Up with the Kardashians," could start filming there.”
“Twitter/@kimkardashianThis isn't the first time Kim has thrown herself into the recent flurry of tweets coming from Kanye.”
“The Kardashian side is singing a different tune, however.”


"Sources told the explosion that they were in their faith that I was a God" rapper "and never better
"Kanye and Kim are notorious for staying away from cameras in their private homes, which makes it more difficult to shoot reality shows about Kim's life."
"In today's Twitter hurricane, including the excavation of Nike and Michael Jordan, and the claim that west will fly in" yeezy force one "as president, Kanye clearly violated a long-standing rule of the Kardashian / West family: not to show his home on social media."
"Three tweets from twitter / @ kanyewestin and West show a long, rigid corridor in their Yinshan mansion and part of an equally rigid desk and chair in the next room."
"The title on twitter / @ kanyewest refers to" sunken place, "and" spoiler alert "refers to the brainwashing technique of" going out. "A white therapist mentally trapped a black man in his head."
"West mentioned the sunken place in his microblog earlier this week and wrote that he was making music there."
"Twitter / @ kanyewestkim Kardashian forwarded the original post, saying her husband was not allowed to post photos of their family, and they agreed that it was forbidden."
"The tycoon looked at the photos lightly and asked if it meant that her hit show" keep up with Kardashian "could start shooting there."
"Twitter / @ kimkardashianthis is not Kim's first time in the recent Kanye twitter boom."
"But Kardashian is singing a different tune."



Number  1088
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Are you hoping to see a picture of the twins soon?”
“They will be getting the attention over him celebrating for himself.” How sweet is that?”
“HL learned EXCLUSIVELY that the actor wants a ‘relaxing’ day with his infants & wife, and even cuter, he STILL can’t believe he’s a parent!”
“George Clooney, 56, is in for one memorable Father’s Day!”
“After all, a dad never forgets his first one.”
“And although the actor doesn’t want some big celebration on June 18, he’s still apparently super psyched to just spend the whole day bonding with his and Amal Clooney‘s, 39, newborn twins Ella and Alexander.”
“For him, quality time is the only gift he needs — is anyone else’s heart melting?”
“George is still in awe that he is a father and it really hasn t fully hit him yet that he is going to be celebrating Father s Day this year as a father himself a George insider revealed to...”
“HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY”
““The current plans are to stay at home and relax.”


"Do you want to see a picture of the twins soon?"
"They'll notice that he's celebrating for himself." How sweet is that? "
"HL learned exclusively that the actor wanted to have a" relaxed "life with his wife and children, even more lovely. He still couldn't believe he was a parent!"
George Clooney, 56, will have an unforgettable father's Day
"After all, a father will never forget his first child."
"Although the actor doesn't want to have a big celebration on June 18, he's obviously very excited and willing to spend the whole day with him and 39 year old Amal Clooney, as well as newborn twins Ella and Alexander."
"For him, good time is the only gift he needs - will other people's hearts melt?"
"George is still in awe of being a father, but he has not fully realized that he will celebrate father's day as a father this year. A George insider revealed to him that..."
"Exclusive to Hollywood Life com"
"The plan now is to stay at home and relax."



Number  1089
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“About 45 minutes after his tweet about the hearing, Trump sent another message praising Fox News’ “Fox and Friends” morning show, which is known to be among his favorite news programs.”
“Donald J Trump realDonaldTrump June 9 2017 Thursday s hearing transfixed much of the nation as Comey answered questions from members of the Senate Intelligence Committee about his dealings with Trump and his assertion that Trump pressured him to drop his investigation into former National Security Adviser Michael Flynn and...”
“Trump sent a tweet at 6:10 a.m.”
“ET that also criticized Comey for his admission that he leaked information to the media via an intermediary in an effort to force the appointment of a special prosecutor to investigate allegations of collusion during the 2016 election cycle between Trump campaign officials and Russian officials.”
“Comey’s gambit worked as another former FBI director, Robert Mueller, was named last month as a special counsel to the Justice Department to lead an independent probe.”
“There had been speculation that President Trump would offer his commentary on Comey’s testimony in real time on Twitter, but he waited until early Friday morning to weigh in.”
““Despite so many false statements and lies, total and complete vindication…and WOW, Comey is a leaker!” the President wrote.”
“Despite so many false statements and lies, total and complete vindication…and WOW, Comey is a leaker!”
“...his ties to Russian officials...”
“The Comey has hearing generated a tidal wave of media coverage and analysis that will undoubtedly continue for many days.”


"About 45 minutes after trump tweeted about the hearing, he sent another message praising Fox News's" Fox and friends "morning show, which is one of his favorite news shows."
"The hearing of Donald J Trump Real Donald Trump on Thursday, June 9, 2017 shocked the whole country. COMEY answered questions from members of the Senate Intelligence Committee about his association with trump, claiming that trump pressed him to give up the investigation of former national security adviser Michael Flynn, and..."
"Trump distributed a tweet at 6:10 in the morning."
"Et also criticized Komi for admitting that he leaked information to the media through an intermediary in order to force the appointment of a special prosecutor to investigate allegations of collusion between trump campaign officials and Russian officials in the 2016 election cycle."
COMEY's strategy is that another former FBI Director, Robert Mueller, was appointed special adviser to the Justice Department last month to lead an independent investigation
"There was speculation that President trump would comment on his testimony in real time on twitter, but he didn't comment until early Friday morning."
"Despite so many false statements and lies, complete and complete defense Wow, COMEY is a leaker! "The president wrote
"Despite so many false statements and lies, complete and complete defense Wow, COMEY is a leaker
“… His relationship with Russian officials... "
"The wave of media coverage and analysis triggered by the Komi hearing will undoubtedly last for many days."



Number  1090
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This category now features familiar face Gordon Ramsay for MasterChef Junior as well as a number of wild cards duo Martha Stewart and Snoop Dogg for Martha Snoop s Potluck Dinner Party Alec Baldwin for Match Game and W Kamau Bell for United Shades of America with W Kamau Bell...”
“...s winner in the category RuPaul Charles for RuPaul s Drag Race...”
“Now she is back to represent “Better Things,” the FX series she co-created and which is loosely based on her own life.”
“The last time she was on the ballot, though, was in 2015, for the former comedy series.”
“SURPRISE: Pamela AdlonAdlon was an Academy favorite for her role on “Louie,” for which she received nominations for writing and guest actress, as well as for “King of the Hill,” for which she received a nom for her voice talent.”
“Though series stars Keri Russell and Matthew Rhys both got noms for their leading roles, the series as a whole was shut out in its penultimate year.”
“SNUB: “The Americans”It may have taken the Academy a few years to recognize the FX period spy drama, but once it finally did, there was great hope it would become a ballot staple for drama series.”
“There was not a lot of buzz about this when it aired, but the star power seems to have proved too great to ignore.”
“...on an Emmy ballot may inspire some voters to automatically select it, it is more of a surprise that the National Geographic anthology series saw so much love across other categories like directing and overall limited series.”
“Bee and Real Time With Bill Maher SURPRISE Genius While seeing Geoffrey Rush s name and as Albert Einstein to boot...”


"This class is now characterized by the familiar faces of Gordon Ramsay, chef small as well as some wild card combinations of Martha Stewart and snoop dog, Martha snoop's dinner party, Alec Baldwin game and w carmobel for the United States shadow with W carmobel..."
“… Won the championship in rupaul Charles's rupaul drag contest... "
"Now she's back representing" better things, "the FX series she co created, which is loosely based on her own life."
"But the last time she voted was in 2015 because of the former comedy series."
"Surprise: Pamela aderon was nominated for Best Actress Oscar for her role in" Louis "and best dubbing for" king of the mountains. "
Although the stars of the series, Kerry Russell and Matthew Reese, were named for their roles, the series as a whole was rejected in the penultimate year
It may have taken years for the "cold: American" academy to recognize FX era spy dramas, but once it does, it is likely to become the main content of the series
"The broadcast did not cause much discussion, but the fact has proved that the power of stars is too great to be ignored."
“…… In the Emmy vote, it may inspire some voters to choose it automatically. What's more surprising is that the National Geographic Anthology Series has gained so much popularity in other categories such as directors and overall limited series. "
"Bee and real time surprise genius with Bill mach, while seeing Geoffrey rush's name and Albert Einstein boot up..."



Number  1091
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The singer recently revealed a shorter new hairdo on Instagram, and captioned the image with the Coco Chanel quote, “A woman who cuts her hair is about to change […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop, however, can exclusively debunk this absurd theory.”
“A report speculates that LeAnn Rimes ’ short new haircut signifies she’s preparing to dump husband Eddie Cibrian .”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
The singer recently showed off a shorter new haircut on instagram and added a caption to the picture with Coco Chanel's famous quote: "a woman with haircut is about to change [...] ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"However, the gossip police can completely expose this absurd theory."
"One report speculates that Ryan rimes's new short hair means she's ready to dump her husband Eddie seabryan."



Number  1092
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“But um, before we go....”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“Great minds think alike, Kim and JVN are the best and most self-aware celebs on your Insta feed, etc!”
“GiphyFun fact: Queer Eye's Jonathan Van Ness used a similar caption on a post yesterday, which was shared right around the same time as Kim's.”
“Which, clap-clap-clap.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
This content was imported from {embedded name}
"But before we go..."
"This content was imported from instagram."
"Great people have the same idea, Kim and JVN are the best and most self-conscious celebrities on insta feed, and so on!"
"Giphyfun fact: Cool eyed Jonathan Van Ness used a similar title in a post yesterday, which was shared at about the same time as king's article."
"Well, pat pat pat."



Number  1093
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Fans wondered if he would pop the question soon, but a source revealed that it's "not going to happen anytime soon."”
“While it's unclear if the new couple did get involved in the said quarrel, they were recently rumored to be in the "honeymoon phase."”
“Reps for both Selena and The Weeknd have yet to respond to the report.”
“Citing the insider, the tabloid says, "People close to Bella wouldn't be surprised if she got back together with Abel one day."”
“The insider goes on alleging that it's no wonder if the "Kill Em with Kindness" hitmaker would feel intimidated by the 20-year-old model.”
“The source further claims, "He finds her neediness a major turnoff."”
“"Abel and Bella only speak occasionally," explains the alleged source, before adding, "But he's a very independent guy, and he won't be told what to do by Selena."”
“A source reveals that "Selena was so angry, she threatened to end the relationship unless Abel cuts off all contact with Bella."”
“The tabloid claims that the former Disney darling and the "Starboy" singer, whose real name is Abel Tesfaye, have got into a huge fight because he still texts his model ex-girlfriend.”
“According to a Life & Style report, the "Hands to Myself" singer has even threatened to dump her new beau upon catching him texting the Victoria's Secret model.”


Fans want to know if he will raise the issue soon, but a source said it "won't happen soon."
"Although it is not clear whether the couple are really involved in the above quarrel, there are recent rumors that they are in a" honeymoon period. "
"Neither Selena nor this week's representative has responded to the report."
"If Bella reunites with Abel one day, people around her will not be surprised," the tabloid quoted people familiar with the matter as saying
"The insider continues to claim that it's no wonder the 20-year-old model scared the killer of" killing them with kindness. "
"The source further claimed," he found her need to be a great antipathy
"Abe and Bella only talk occasionally," the alleged source explained, then added, "but he's a very independent person, and Selena won't tell him what to do."
"Selena is very angry and threatens to end the relationship unless Abel cuts off all contact with Bella," a source said
The tabloid claimed that the former Disney darling and the star boy singer, whose real name is Abel tesfield, had a big fight because they were still texting his model's ex girlfriend
According to life and fashion, the "kiss me" singer even threatened to dump her new boyfriend once he found out he was texting Victoria's Secret model



Number  1094
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It had a solid 10.3 million viewers when it debuted on March 11 so we will see what kind of ratings threat it will be to The Voice in the weeks to come.”
“She loves her man and gets turned on by his continued success.”
“It’s a reality competition singing war as NBC’s The Voice and ABC’s newly revived American Idol starring superstar Katy Perry, 33, go head to head on Monday nights.”
“Only one show can come out on top in the ratings and Gwen Stefani, 48, has two big reasons to be cheering on The Voice.”
“Her boyfriend Blake Shelton, 41, is still a star judge and she’s a coaching alum herself.”
“No offense to the “Roar” singer, but Gwen wants Blake’s show to slay her AI.”
““Gwen has been totally supporting Blake and really wants him to kick Katy Perry’s butt in the ratings war while The Voice goes against American Idol.”
“Gwen is on Team The Voice all the way and is doing everything she can to help her man Blake come out on top while dueling Idol,” a source close to Gwen tells HollywoodLife.com.”
““Gwen has been in his trailer watching tapings, giving Blake notes while sharing words of encouragement during the latest season of The Voice.”
“She loves that The Voice has been the best show on TV every season for years and thinks it’s all because of Blake,” our insider continues.”


"It had 10.3 million viewers when it premiered on March 11, so we'll see the ratings threat in the coming weeks."
"She loves her man and is attracted by his continued success."
"It's a reality show, and NBC's" the voice "and ABC's newly revived American Idol star Katy Perry, 33, will catch up on Monday night."
"There's only one show that's top rated, and Gwen Stephanie, 48, has two reasons to cheer for it."
"Her boyfriend Blake Sheldon, 41, is still a star judge, and she is also a coach alumnus herself."
"I don't mean to offend the growling singer, but Gwen wants Blake's show to kill her AI."
"Gwen has always been totally supportive of Blake and really wants him to kick Katie Perry's ass in the ratings war, but his voice is against American Idol."
A source close to Gwen told reporters: "Gwen has always been a member of the" voice team "and she is making every effort to help her man black stand out in the duel with her idol." Hollywood life. "
"Gwen has been watching videos in his trailer, leaving a message to Blake in the latest season of sound, and sharing words of encouragement."
"She loves the sound and has been the best show on TV for years and thinks it's all because of black," our insider continued



Number  1095
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It was a complete victory for Swift’s camp, and a total loss for Mueller.”
“In addition, the jurors found that Swift’s mom and Bell both did not do anything improper to interfere with Mueller’s employment.”
“In the end, they unanimously determined Mueller groped Swift and awarded her the $1.”
“Baldridge stated, “[Mueller] can’t take responsibility for what he is doing,” before calling the former DJ’s lawsuit “shameful and cowardly.”Following the closing statements, the eight-person jury consisting of two men and six women exited the court and began to deliberate for four hours.”
“Swift’s lawyer, Douglas Baldridge, shot back during his closing argument that there’s no logical reason his client would make up a story about Mueller grabbing her butt.”
“Mueller’s attorney, Gabriel McFarland, reportedly held up the photo of Swift and his client during his closing statements and asked the jury if the smiling singer looked like she’d just been assaulted.”
“Swift reportedly broke down into tears as lawyers on both sides presented their closing arguments earlier today, the sixth day of the trial.”
“As Gossip Cop noted, Swift countersued for just one dollar as her lawsuit was filed to raise awareness about sexual assault, as opposed to financial gain.”
“The trial continued Monday to address those remaining claims, as well as the singer’s countersuit against Mueller for assault and battery.”
“The judge ultimately decided that Swift wasn’t legally responsible for Mueller losing his job, but the jury could still find her mom Andrea and radio liaison Frank Bell liable.”


"This is a complete victory for the swift camp and a complete defeat for mill."
"In addition, the jury found that neither swift's mother nor bell had done anything improper to interfere with mill's work."
"In the end, they unanimously decided to grant Muller swift a dollar."
Baudrillard said, "Mueller can't be held responsible for what he did," and then called the former DJ's lawsuit "shameful and cowardly.". At the end of the presentation, the eight member jury, composed of two men and six women, left the court and began its deliberation for four hours
At the end of the debate, Swift's lawyer, Douglas Baldridge, retorted that his client had no reasonable reason to make up the story of Muller grabbing her ass
According to reports, Mueller's lawyer Gabriel McFarland held up photos of swift and his client in his final statement and asked the jury if the smiling singer looked like he had just been attacked
"Swift was reported to have cried earlier today, the sixth day of the trial, when lawyers from both sides presented their closing statements."
"As gossip police said, swift filed a lawsuit to raise awareness of sexual assault, not to gain financial benefits, so she counterclaimed with a dollar."
The remaining charges, as well as the singer's counterclaim of Mueller's assault and assault, continued on Monday
"The judge finally found swift not responsible for Mueller's loss of work, but the jury can still hold her mother Andrea and radio liaison Frank bell responsible."



Number  1096
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She’s so ace.”In the following months, the couple denied both engagement rumors and split rumors, though the latter apparently turned out to be true.”
“After his audition, Cole said, “I like you, I think you’re really cute.”
“The former One Direction singer and the “X Factor UK” judge announced their split on Sunday after nearly two years together.”
“The two have a 1-year-old son together, Bear.”
“Venturelli via Getty Images Liam Payne and Cheryl Cole attend the Chopard Tropy Ceremony on May 12, 2016 in Cannes.”
““We are sad to announce that we are going our separate ways.”
“It’s been a tough decision for us to make,” the joint statement said, which appeared somewhat differently on the pair’s respective Twitter accounts.”
““We still have so much love for each other as a family.”
“Bear is our world and we ask that you respect his privacy as we navigate our way through this together.”We are sad to announce that we are going our separate ways.”
“It's been a tough decision for us to make.”


Over the next few months, the couple denied rumors of engagement and breakup, though the latter was clearly true
After the audition, Cole said, "I like you. I think you're cute."
The former one-way singer broke up with the judges of "x factor UK" on Sunday after nearly two years together
"Together they have a one year old son, bear."
"Liam Payne and Cheryl Cole attended the Chopard tropy awards ceremony in Cannes on May 12, 2016."
"We are sad to announce that we will go our separate ways."
"It's a tough decision for us," the joint statement said, adding that it's a bit different on their respective twitter accounts
"As a family, we still love each other so much."
"The bear is our world, and we ask you to respect his privacy, because we walked this road together." We are sad to announce that we will go our separate ways
"It was a difficult decision for us."



Number  1097
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article originally appeared in Page Six.”
“It was not immediately known when the love birds will go on their honeymoon.”
“The royal couple tied the knot at London’s St. George’s Chapel at Windsor Castle on May 19.”
““Supreme comfort is present in every detail of the sumptuously comfortable bedrooms, enclosed verandas and majestic stone fireplace that warms both the dining room and great room – the perfect place to entertain family & friends or celebrate a special occasion,” reads the website for the 700-acre resort.”
“Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip in 2005”
“According to the celebrity gossip website the former Suits actress 36 and her hubby 33 will stay at the mountain resort s 6 000 square foot Outlook Cabin aka The Royal Retreat The luxurious six bedroom cabin previously welcomed King George VI and Queen Elizabeth in 1939 as well as...”
“The newly anointed Duke and Duchess of Sussex are planning to spend their honeymoon at the Fairmont Jasper Park Lodge in Alberta, Canada, TMZ reported Monday.”
“Newlyweds Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are looking north for their honeymoon.”


"This article first appeared on page six."
"It's not known when the couple will go on their honeymoon yet."
"The royal couple married on May 19 at St. George's Church in Windsor Castle, London."
"Every detail of the luxurious and comfortable bedrooms, enclosed balconies and magnificent stone stoves reflects the ultimate comfort. They warm the dining room and large rooms, making them the best place to entertain family and friends or celebrate special occasions," the 700 acre resort website reads
"Queen Elizabeth II and Prince Philip 2005"
"According to celebrity gossip website, the former suit actress, 36, and her husband, 33, will live in a luxurious six bedroom cottage in the 6000 square foot observation cabin (also known as the Royal Retreat) of the mountain resort, which welcomed King George VI and Queen Elizabeth in 1939, as well as..."
The newly appointed Duke and Duchess of Sussex plan to spend their holidays at Fairmont Jasper Park in Alberta, Canada, TMZ reported on Monday
"The newlyweds, Prince Harry and Megan markel, are going north in search of their honeymoon."



Number  1098
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Obviously, Jennifer’s body is rocking and right now — so is her career.”
“Jen could also be seen getting food delivered to her chair and cooling down with a few icy beverages.”
“Jennifer Aniston could have some awkward run-ins in her near future.”
“While she and Justin Theroux split after two and a half years of marriage and seven years together, the couple seems to have done a pretty good job at avoiding each other at Hollywood events.”
“But, with Jen moving to the Big Apple this coming Fall, she and Justin may see each other at one point or another.”
“According to Radar Online, Aniston is packing her bags and moving to New York City this coming October to film her upcoming, unnamed TV show for Apple alongside Reese Witherspoon.”
“An insider close to Jen shares that since the actress has lived in New York two times before, she should be able to avoid awkward run-ins with Justin, but then again, you just never know.”
“Filming is expected to begin on October 1 and will continue through the end of the year.”
“And while it may possibly put her slightly out of her comfort zone to be living so close to her ex, the source says that there’s no way that Jen will back out now.”
““She’s actually been involved in the project for almost two years behind the scenes – before her divorce.”


"Obviously, Jennifer's body is rocking, and now her career is rocking as well."
"You can also see Jan taking food to a chair and drinking a few iced drinks to cool down."
"Jennifer Aniston may have some awkward running in in the near future."
"Although she and Justin Cyrus broke up after two and a half years of marriage and seven years together, the couple seems to have done quite well in avoiding each other at Hollywood events."
"But as Jane moves to big apple this fall, she and Justin may meet at some point."
"According to radar online, Aniston is packing up and moving to New York in October to film her upcoming unnamed TV show for apple with Reese Witherspoon."
"An insider close to Jennifer told us that since she had lived in New York twice before, she should be able to avoid an embarrassing encounter with Justin, but then again, you never know."
"Filming is expected to begin on October 1 and will continue until the end of the year."
"Although it may take her a little bit out of her comfort zone because she lives so close to her ex girlfriend, the source said Jen can't quit now."
"In fact, she had been behind the scenes for nearly two years before the divorce."



Number  1099
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Verdict: Plausible and likelyRumor: Idris Elba Handled the MusicAs if being an exceptionally handsome, talented, successful actor wasn't enough, Idris Elba is rumored to have added a new accolade to his resume on May 19th—royal DJ.”
“...s second meal as a married couple...”
“One early rumor that appears to have born itself out was word that wedding guests would be required to surrender their cell phones and cameras before the reception started.”
“There's a good reason.”
“Verdict: FalseRumor: Celebs Had to Hand Over Their Phones for the ReceptionFeeling deprived of photos of Meghan Markle's mom getting down on the dance floor with the royal family?”
“What can we say, it's good to be Queen.”
“The seat in front of the Queen is always left empty, I am told by BP #royalwedding," royal reporter Rebecca English shared, later clarifying, "She needs to be seen — and the seat she was sitting in today is her favourite seat in that chapel, apparently!"”
“It wasn’t empty for that reason.”
“The seat in front of the Queen is always left empty, I am told by BP #royalwedding — Rebecca English (@RE_DailyMail) May 19, 2018"Btw - I’ve seen some reports about the spare seat by Prince William in the chapel as having being left in memory of Princess Diana.”


Conclusion: specious and specious rumors: Idris Elba is in charge of music. If it is not enough to be a very handsome, talented and successful actor, it is said that Idris Elba has added a new honor to the resume of the Royal DJ on May 19
“… Second meal for a married couple... "
"An early rumor seems to have been born that wedding guests will be required to hand over their mobile phones and cameras before the wedding banquet begins."
"There's a good reason for that."
Verdict: Rumor: celebrities have to hand over their mobile phones to the reception, feeling deprived of photos of Megan markel's mother and royalty on the dance floor? "
"What can we say? It's good to be a queen."
"BP's royal wedding told me that the seat in front of the queen was always empty," said Rebecca English, a royal journalist, who later clarified, "she needs to be seen - and the seat she's sitting in today is obviously her favorite seat in that church!"
"That's not why it's empty."
"The seat in front of the queen is always empty, BP told me, royal wedding - Rebecca English May 19, 2018" by the way - I saw some reports that Prince William's vacant seat in church was left in memory of Princess Diana



Number  1100
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“We’re grown-ups, and we’re going to take our time and we’re going to do things at our own pace.””
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Lo and A Rod Attend Their Daughters Dance Recital and Pose with Her Ex Marc Anthony Jennifer Lopez is used to owning the stage but she was more than happy to be just another member of the audience while her kids took a turn in the spotlight at their dance...”
“...recital...”
“The entire family came together to support Lopez’s 10-year-old daughter Emme Maribel as well as her beau Alex Rodriguez‘s two children, 10-year-old Ella Alexander and Natasha Alexander, 13, at Wednesday night’s show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The night began with the pop star playing makeup artist for the three girls, which was documented on both her and Rodriguez’s Instagram stories.”
“Both proud parents showed off their completed looks for the recital in a group shot.”
““On call makeup artist!!”
“!” the singer captioned one snap.”


"We are adults. We need to take our time and do things at our own pace."
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Lo and a rod attended the girls' dance recital and took a picture with her ex boyfriend, Marc Anthony. Jennifer Lopez is used to having the stage, but when her children are in the spotlight in their dance, she is very happy to be another member of the audience... "
“… "Recitation..."
"On Wednesday night's show, the family supported Lopez's 10-year-old daughter, Amy maribell, and her boyfriend, Alex Rodriguez's two children, 10-year-old Ella Alexander and 13-year-old Natasha Alexander."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Starting that night, the pop star played makeup artist for three girls, which is recorded in her and Rodriguez's instagram story."
"Two proud parents in the group shooting showed their modeling for the recital."
"Make up artist on call!"
"!" the singer subtitled a snapshot. "



Number  1101
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez News:”
“She was so mad she was crying and just stormed out of the restaurant.”
“Not only did Selena and Justin have a fight during their dinner date on Nov. 16 as confirmed by an eyewitness to HollywoodLife.com exclusively, but she allegedly denied him entrance to her home afterwards.”
“Is this the end of Jelena?”
“Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez dined at Yamato Japanese restaurant in Encino, California on Nov. 16.”
“Unfortunately, Selena and Justin got into a fight on the dinner date before they were even served appetizers!”
““The ‘couple’ had an argument while inside the restaurant and Selena left less than 10 minutes into the meal.”
“Justin quickly followed with his head bowed,” a source inside the restaurant tells TMZ.”
“An eyewitness at Yamato restaurant tells HollywoodLife.com exclusively, “All of a sudden someone was yelling and I was like how embarrassing to have a fight in public.”
“Then I realized it was Selena Gomez and she was having a fight with Justin Bieber.”


"More Justin Bieber and Serena Gomez news:
"She cried in anger and rushed out of the restaurant."
Selena and Justin not only quarreled during the dinner date on November 16, but a witness also confirmed this, but she was said to have refused him to enter her home afterwards
"Is this the end of Jenna?"
Justin Bieber and Serena Gomez dine at the Daiwa Japanese restaurant in Encino, California, on November 16
"Unfortunately, Serena and Justin got into a fight before they could serve appetizers on their dinner date!"
"The couple had an argument in the restaurant and Selena left within 10 minutes of her meal."
"Justin soon followed with his head down," a source in the restaurant told TMZ
An eyewitness of Daiwa Hotel told the exclusive report of Hollywood life. Com that "suddenly someone yelled. I think it's embarrassing to fight in public."
"Then I realized it was Serena Gomez, who was fighting with Justin Bieber."



Number  1102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It’s not that it’s more exciting than any other births in the family — it’s different exciting, because she’s my baby sister who I grew up with,” explained the model and realitystar.”
“...again admitting that it was different seeing Kylie become a mom than it has been with her other siblings...”
“...it comes to her nieces and nephews but she does have an extra special bond with one of them...”
“The 22-year-old supermodel opened up to PEOPLE on Sunday about her rapidly growing family at the City of Hope “If Only” Texas hold ’em charity poker tournament in Los Angeles, revealing she and her 5-month-old niece Stormi have formed quite the close relationship.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“I love all of my nieces and nephews I like that I can give them back she said with a laugh adding of Kylie Jenner s daughter But I do feel a really special connection to Stormi I don t know if it s that Kylie is my little sister...”
“...but I was hanging out with her the other day at lunch and we were just sitting and Stormi was just so comfortable with me and it made me so happy added Kendall...”
“Want all the latest pregnancy and birth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?”
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“Image zoom Kendall Jenner at the If Only Texas hold em charity poker tournament Credit Rich Fury Getty RELATED VIDEO Kendall Jenner Says the Birth of Sister Kylie s Daughter Stormi Has Made Us Even Closer Image zoom Kendall Jenner and niece Stormi RELATED Kim Kardashian Says Son Saint Most...”


"It's not that it's more exciting than any other child in the family - it's different exciting because she's my little sister and I grew up with her," the model and reality star explained
“… Once again, the experience of seeing Kelly become a mother is different from that of her other brothers and sisters... "
“…… Her niece and nephew also have, but she does have a special connection with one of them... "
"The 22-year-old supermodel revealed on Sunday that she and her 5-month-old niece, Tommy, had formed a very close relationship by opening a charity poker tournament in Los Angeles for her fast-growing family in the city of hope."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I love all my nieces and nephews. I like this way. I can give them back," she said with a smile, referring to Kelly Jenner's daughter, but I do feel that I have a special connection with storm. I don't know if Kelly is my sister... "
"But that noon I was with her, and we sat together, and I was comfortable with her, which made me very happy." Kendall added
"Want all the latest pregnancy and childbirth announcements, plus celebrity mom blogs?"
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
"Picture zooming Kendall Jenner in if only Texas holds EM charity poker tournament credit rich angry Getty related video Kendall Jenner says that the birth of sister Kelly's daughter, Tommy, brings us closer to picture zooming Kendall Jenner and niece, Tommy related Kim Kardashian says son is the saint most..."



Number  1103
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Scott is hopeful that this as a major sign that it’s the beginning of the end for Kourt and Younes.””
“What about Sofia Richie?”
“Scott Disick hopes so, as we’ve heard he’ll gladly ‘ghost’ Sofia Richie if Kourt’s single again.”
“When Kourtney Kardashian, 38, deactivated her Instagram and her boyfriend, Younes Bendjima, 24, made his account private, many thought there was trouble in paradise between these two.”
“While everything seems to be back to normal Scott Disick 34 certainly hopes something is up as a source close to The Lord EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife com that he s praying that Kourtney unfollowing Younes on social media is the...”
“...beginning of the end for Kourtney and her boy toy...”
“Scott has never stopped loving Kourtney and he always will.” Uh-oh.”
“Well, bad news for Scott: Kourt’s back on the ‘gram and following Younes.”
“Looks like Scott’s ready to swoop in the second Kourt’s back on the market.”
“Wait.”


"Scott hopes this is a big sign that the end of Kurt and younes has begun."
"Where's Sophia Ritchie?"
"Scott Disick hopes so, because we've heard that if Kurt is single again, he'll be happy with" ghost "Sophia Ritchie."
"When Kourtney Kardashian, 38, stopped instagram and her boyfriend younes bendjima, 24, set up his account as a private account, many people thought there was trouble in heaven between them."
"Although everything seems to be back to normal, Scott Disick, 34, certainly wants things to get better, because a source close to God exclusively told Hollywood life that he prayed that Courtney would save younes on social media..."
“… Courtney and the beginning of the end of her boy toy
"Scott never stopped loving Courtney, and he will always be." Ah, oh
"Well, it's bad news for Scott: curt's back at Glenn, with yones."
"It seems that Scott is ready to make a surprise attack when the second Kurt returns to the market."
"Wait a minute."



Number  1104
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But the insider adds, “She isn’t planning on doing this again anytime soon!”For more exclusive stories, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!”
“She feels huge compared to her sisters Kim, Kourtney, Kendall — and even Khloé.”Unfortunately, the cosmetics mogul can’t count on her baby daddy and boyfriend of less than a year Travis Scott.”
“This should be the happiest time of her life, but the reality star has been absolutely miserable, sources tell Life & Style exclusively.”
““Pregnancy has been hell for Kylie,” an insider reveals.”
““She’s crying every day.”
“Kylie thought having a baby would be a dream come true, but instead it has been her biggest nightmare.”
“Some days she feels like her life is falling apart.”A different source explains, “Kylie feels fat and frumpy.”
“She’s gained 45 to 50 pounds, and although she knows this is natural for someone who is pregnant, she doesn’t want the world to see her looking bigger.”
““He really loves to party,” a friend tells Life & Style.”
““She already feels super connected to the baby because it’s a girl,” her friend says.”


But the person familiar with the matter added: "she's not going to do it again in the near future!"! "For more exclusive news, please buy the latest issue of life and fashion at the newsstand now!"
"Compared with her sisters, Kim, Courtney, Kendall and even heroy, she felt great." Unfortunately, the cosmetics tycoon can't count on her baby dad and her boyfriend Travis Scott, who has been dating for less than a year
"It should be the happiest time of her life, but reality TV stars are absolutely miserable, the source told life and style."
"Pregnancy is hell for Kelly," a source said
"She's crying every day."
"Kelly thought it was a dream come true to have a baby, but it became her biggest nightmare."
"Sometimes she felt her life was collapsing." Another source explained, "Kelly feels fat and poor."
"She's gained 45 to 50 pounds, and although she knows it's natural for pregnant people, she doesn't want the world to see her grow bigger."
"He really likes parties," a friend told life and fashion
"She already feels like she has a strong connection with her child because the child is a girl," her friend said



Number  1105
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s something that is really annoying to them.’”
“‘While [the operation] was inevitable, they think her plan to do the nude spread is over the top.”
“Nevertheless, the family have been publicly supportive of her decision to transition, which was completed in January according leaked extracts from her memoir.”
“The headline-making ‘I am Cait’ shoot was said to have taken the Kardashian clan by surprise at the time and led to tension between Jenner and Kim, 36, as a result.”
“Jenner first announced her transition in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015 and revealed her new look in a Vanity Fair spread the following July.”
“Jenner's rep knew nothing about it.”
“DailyMail.com has approached representatives for Jenner and the Kardashians for comment.”
“‘But she says she will do everything in her power to stop the shoot if she can.'”
“‘She knew the surgery was inevitable and it was bound to happen,’ said the source.”
“Kardashian momager Kris, who is said to have known about Jenner’s surgery in advance, has vowed to stop the shoot from going ahead, according to the insider.”


"It's really annoying to them."
"Although (surgery) is inevitable, they think her plans to spread nude are excessive."
"Nevertheless, her family publicly supported her decision, which was completed in January, according to leaked extracts from her memoirs."
"It's said that the headlines of" I'm Cain "surprised the Kardashian family at that time, resulting in tension between Jenner and Kim, 36."
"Jenna first announced her transformation in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015, and exposed her new look in Vanity Fair magazine in July the following year."
"Jenner's representative knew nothing about it."
"The daily mail has contacted representatives of Jenna and Kardashian for advice."
"But she said she would do her best to stop the shooting."
"She knew surgery was inevitable, it was inevitable," the source said
"According to people familiar with the matter, Kardashian's mother, Chris, said she knew Jenna's operation in advance and vowed to stop the filming from continuing."



Number  1106
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: Getty Images...”
“Among the many musicians who have declined the offer to perform at the inauguration include Elton John, The Beach Boys, Charlotte Church, Andrea Bocelli, and David Foster.”
“As of now, the only artists confirmed to be performing at the event later this month are “America’s Got Talent” contestant Jackie Evancho, the Mormon Tabernacle Choir, and the Rockettes.”
“But Gossip Cop checked in with a rep for Flo Rida, who exclusively assures us the rapper simply won’t be performing at Trump’s inauguration, and this is a non-story.”
“...problems...”
“Flo Rida however is the same rapper that pulled out of performing at the 2015 Miss USA pageant after Trump made comments about Mexicans being rapists The site notes this in its piece but then alleges that the rapper has accepted the supposed 1 million offer because he has tax...”


"Photo: Getty pictures..."
Many of the musicians who refused to perform at the inauguration included Elton John, beach boys, Charlotte chapel, Andrea Bocelli and David Foster
"So far, the only artists confirmed for the event later this month are Jackie evangio of America's got talent, the Mormon tent Choir and the rock band."
"But the gossip police report to a representative of Flo Rida, who exclusively assures us that rappers will not perform at Trump's Inauguration at all. It's not a story."
“… Question... "
"However, Florida is the same rapper who dropped out of the 2015 Miss America Pageant after trump commented that Mexicans were rapists. The website pointed out this in an article, but then claimed that the rapper had accepted a $1 million offer because he had taxes... "



Number  1107
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!”
““She’s signing up for modeling classes and getting consultation from agents and experts in the industry.”Do you think Caitlyn would be a good model?”
““Modeling is what Catilyn’s most intrigued by, especially after all the success her daughters have enjoyed,” the source said.”
“While she desperately angles for a new career, Jenner also continues to polish her new body off with little luxuries, like a cute butt lift, added the source.”
“Jenner recently went under the knife for a foot tuck, which is akin to having fat pads shoved underneath the toenails, in order to make wearing heels more bearable.”
“In preparation, Jenner, 67, has been upping her plastic surgeries in a quest to become as “feminine” as possible, claimed the source.”
““She’s seen the success other elder women have achieved and wants in on the action,” a source told Radar.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"She signed up for the model training class and got consulting from the industry's agents and experts. Do you think Caitlin will be a good model?"
"Models are what catilyn is most interested in, especially after her daughter enjoys so much success," the source said
"When Jenna is desperately looking for a new career, she will continue to decorate her new body with some small luxuries, such as cute buttocks," the source said
Jenner recently had a foot surgery under a knife, which is similar to putting a fat pad under her toenails to make it more bearable to wear high heels
Jenner, 67, has been stepping up plastic surgery to be as "feminine" as possible, the source said
"She saw the success of other older women and wanted to be involved," a source told radar



Number  1108
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Ben was been busy promoting his next Batman outing Justice League at Comic-Con International in San Diego over the weekend.”
“But Garner could have just had a big meal or a gust of wind could have gone up the dressThe camera man asked the question because on Sunday the mother-of-three looked to have a baby bump when walking in LA with a print dress.”
“InTouch Weekly claimed 'the divorce is off' as they two plan a second honeymoon in the Turks And Caicos.”
“...this week is devoted to a story on how Jennifer has taken Ben back after he begged on his knees to give him another chance.”
“The cover of OK!”
“But other outlets are claiming the longtime twosome have worked things out.”
“TMZ cautioned on Wednesday the two are not back together.”
“Either way, it does not seem likely that the siren is expecting a fourth child as she appears to not have reconciled with Affleck.”
“Garner could have just had a big meal or a gust of wind could have gone up the dress.”
“This is what started it all: On Sunday the Alias vet looked like she had a bit of a bump.”


Meanwhile, he was busy promoting his next Batman tour, the Justice League, at the international comic show in San Diego this weekend
"But Ghana may have just had a big meal, or a gust of wind may have blown to the wardrobe, and the cameraman asked this question, because the mother of three looked like she had a small lump when she was walking in Los Angeles in a printed skirt on Sunday."
The two plan to spend their second honeymoon in the Turks and Caicos Islands, and the divorce is over, according to touch weekly
“…… This week will tell the story of how Jennifer brought Ben back after she knelt down and begged for another chance
"Good cover!"
"But other media claim that some of these two problems have been solved for a long time."
"TMZ warned on Wednesday that the two did not get back together."
"In any case, it seems unlikely that this is the fourth child, because she doesn't seem to reconcile with Affleck."
"Ghana may have just had a big meal, or a gust of wind may have blown on her skirt."
"That's how it all started: on Sunday, the veterinarian, alias, looked a little bumpy."



Number  1109
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Richard Gere recently got married.”
“Uh huh.”Who could it be?”
“That someone is Anwar Hadid, the 18-year-old model brother of Jenner’s friends Gigi and Bella Hadid.”
“Kendall Jenner, who once comically referred to Richie as one of Disick’s children, kissed someone in public.”
“Please pray that all relevant parties see reason soon.”
“But Sofia seems committed: She referred to Disick as her “whole [heart emoji]” on Instagram yesterday.”
“Us Weekly reported last week that Lionel threatened to cut Sofia out of his will if she continued her relationship with Disick.”
““Lionel and her family encouraged the split and are very upset and disappointed that she decided to get back with him,” a source told the site.”
“The breakup, however, lasted just 48 hours, as Disick quickly won Richie back with promises to “change.”According to E!, Richie has been living at Disick’s house in L.A., but she stayed at her father Lionel Richie’s house during the short separation.”
“I think that shows the Kardashians still have a long way to go in terms of accepting the relationship.)”


"Richard Kiel got married recently."
"Aha." Who could it be? "
"That's Anwar Hadid, Jenna's friend Gigi and Bella Hadid's 18-year-old model brother."
Kendall Jenner once jokingly called rich one of desik's children, and he kissed a man in public
"Please pray that all parties concerned will understand the truth as soon as possible."
"But Sophia seems to be engaged: yesterday she called desik her" whole (heart) emoticon "on instagram
"US Weekly reported last week that Lionel threatened to remove Sophia from her will if she continued her relationship with desik."
"Lionel and her family encouraged the breakup and were very upset and disappointed at her decision to get back together with him," a source told the website
However, the break-up lasted only 48 hours, and desik soon won back rich with the promise of "change"! "Richie has always lived in desik's house in Los Angeles, but during her brief separation, she stayed with her father, Lionel Richie."
"I think it shows that the kardashians have a long way to go in terms of accepting the relationship."



Number  1110
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““The more time that goes by, I guess, the closer you’d be getting to that.””
“I don’t think it’s anytime soon or anything,” Shelton said when asked about walking down the aisle.”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani weren t always so sure their romance was built to stand the test of time Blake Shelton Says He and Gwen Stefani Thought Their Relationship Was a Rebound Deal at First Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani weren t always so sure their romance was built...”
“...to stand the test of time...”
“During a preview of the singer’s upcoming Sunday TODAY with Willie Geist interview, Shelton, 42, admitted that both he and Stefani, 48, initially thought their relationship was strictly a “rebound.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““When I was going through my divorce, I hit rock bottom, just like anybody does when they go through something that devastating,” Shelton told Geist.”
“It s a miracle that I met somebody that was going through the same exact thing that I was at the exact same moment in time Continuing he added If Gwen and I were being honest right now talking about this I think in the back of our minds we...”
“...both kind of thought This is a rebound deal Image zoom Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani Credit John Shearer ACMA2018 Getty Shelton went on to say that neither of them were sure things would become serious because they were both coming out of a pretty low spot in our lives...”
“...and were kind of clinging to each other to get through this But now here we are going on three years later and every day that goes by it just feels like a stronger bond between the two of us and it constantly feels like it s going to the...”


"I think the longer it takes, the closer you get to that goal."
"I don't think it's short-term or anything," Sheldon said when asked to walk down the aisle
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Black Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are not always so sure that their love will stand the test of time. Blake Sheldon said he and Gwen Stefani saw their relationship as a rebound deal in the first place. Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are not always so sure that their love is built together... "
"To stand the test of time"
Sheldon, 42, admitted in Sunday's preview of the interview with Willie geist that both he and Stefani, 48, initially thought their relationship was a "rebound.". Get news, feature, etc
"When I went through divorce, I fell to the bottom, just like anyone who went through something devastating," Shelton told gaster
"It's a miracle that I meet someone who experiences the same thing at the same time as me," he added, adding that if Gwen and I are honest about this now, I think deep down in our hearts, we... "
“… Both of them think it's a rebound trading picture zooming black Shelton and Gwen Stephanie credit John shearer ACMA 2018 Getty Shelton went on to say that they're not sure things will get serious because they're both out of a pretty low ebb in our lives... "
“…… We spent this time holding each other tightly, but now we are going to leave in three years. Every day feels like a stronger bond between us. It constantly makes people feel that it is going to... "



Number  1111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Well, we’re rooting for you Sel!”
““She is absolutely ready for love again and feels like her next boyfriend just might be another talented guy like many of her exes,” the source added.”
“She is quick to fall in love with artist and singers who inspire her and help her own creativity,” the source explained seemingly in reference to Selena’s other ex-boyfriend The Weeknd.”
““Other than that, she is trying to keep an open mind about her next boyfriend.”
““If she can’t communicate or believe her man, or a guy who gets mysterious text messages at odd hours– that would be a total deal breaker for her,” the source said.”
“She’s definitely not asking for too much!”
“If a guy’s Instagram is full of selfies, that is a no-go, and she wants a guy with integrity that she can trust completely,” our source added.”
““Selena also has a few qualities that she will not tolerate at all, total deal breakers.”
“Someone in the industry likely, who is successful and understanding of her busy schedule would be preferable, but he doesn’t have to be famous,” the insider continued Her packed scheduled was seemingly one of the reasons she and JB couldn’t make it work.”
““She wants someone smart, funny and obviously cute too.”


"Well, we support you!"
"She's completely ready to fall in love again, and she feels that her next boyfriend may be another talented man like many of her predecessors," the source added
"She soon fell in love with artists and singers, who inspired her and helped her develop her creativity," the source explained, seemingly referring to Selena's other ex boyfriend this week
"Besides, she's trying to be open to her next boyfriend."
"If she can't communicate or trust her man, or a man who receives mysterious text messages at odd times, it will be a complete deal breaker for her," the source said
"She's not asking too much!"
"If a man's instagram is full of selfies, it's impossible. She wants a man of integrity, and she can be trusted," our source added
"Serena has some other qualities that she can't stand. She's a deal breaker."
"It's possible that the industry person who is successful and understands her busy schedule will be better, but he doesn't have to be famous," the insider continued, adding that her schedule seems to be a reason why she and JB can't make it work
"She wanted someone who was smart, funny and obviously cute."



Number  1112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"Bear is our world and we ask that you respect his privacy as we navigate our way through this together."”
“Marie Claire also shared an article naming the tot as “Wayne ‘Window’ Payne”.”
“Bear...”
“Liam Payne reveals he didn t meet Cheryl s father until she was pregnant with their son Bear high steaks Liam Payne reveals mother in law Joan jokingly waved a knife at him when he ordered a 300 steak for dinner Why did Liam Payne and Cheryl call their baby...”
“Cheryl shows off her slim post baby body just five months after giving birth as she s spotted in public signing autographs for fans Exclusive LIAM PLOTS TOT TAT Liam Payne planning large chest tattoo to mark becoming a dad to son Bear with long term girlfriend Cheryl Dad date...”
“Bear BOUNCE BACK BODY Cheryl is back to a size six after daily workouts yoga during baby Bear s naps and a low carb diet BACK TO WORK Cheryl to fly to America to record fifth album following first public appearance after maternity leave mummy bear s back...”
“...son Bear to speak Spanish ONE S YOUR LOT Cheryl tells Liam Payne she s not ready for another baby after he admitted he wanted a second child COULDN T BEAR TO LEAVE Cheryl and Liam Payne deny they re quitting the UK for a life in Hollywood with baby...”
“2 Cheryl revealed her bump for the first time in a campaign for L Oreal and The Prince s Trust latest on cheryl HOT MAMA Pregnant Vogue Williams wows fans with her toned abs in tough workout session TOP OF THE TOTS Liam Payne and Cheryl teach 7 month old...”
“The baby name became the subject of an April Fool's prank, with Directioners making the name Lionel trend as the baby's name.”
“He made the confession during a radio interview in the US and admitted he’d had an “internal battle” about the moniker.”


"The bear is our world, and we ask you to respect his privacy, because we walked this road together."
Mary Claire also shared an article that named the child "Wayne window Payne."
"Bear..."
"Liam Penn revealed that he didn't meet Cheryl's father until she was pregnant with their son Xiong Gao steak. Liam Penn revealed that his mother-in-law Joan jokingly waved a knife when he ordered 300 steak for dinner. Why did Liam Penn and Cheryl call their children..."
"Cheryl showed off her slim baby figure five months after giving birth to her baby. She signed for her fans on public occasions and planned to have a tattoo on her big chest in memory of becoming a father to son bear and dating Cheryl's long-term girlfriend Dad..."
"Bear rebounds. After Cheryl recovered to the 6th, she took yoga every day. After her baby took a nap and ate a low carbohydrate diet, she returned to work. After Cheryl flew to the United States to record her fifth album and made her first public appearance, mother bear came back from maternity leave..."
“… The son bear speaks Spanish. One is your destiny. After Cheryl tells Liam Penn that she is not ready for another child, he admits that he wants a second child and can't bear to leave. Cheryl and Liam Penn deny that they want to leave the baby living in Hollywood in England... "
"2 Cheryl first exposed her lump in a promotional campaign of L'Oreal. Prince trust's latest Cheryl hot mama pregnant vogue Williams won fans' praise for her strong abdominal muscles in hard training, surpassing seven month old Liam Penn Payne and Cheryl teach... "
"The baby's name became the protagonist of April Fool's Day prank, and the directors took the name Lionel trend as the baby's name."
"In a radio interview in the United States, he confessed to this fact and admitted that he had had an" internal struggle "over the nickname."



Number  1113
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Right?”
“On a positive note, however, at least Kylie knows he wants more children with her in the future!”
“Less than 3 months after giving birth to baby Stormi, Kylie Jenner suffered a pregnancy scare.”
“Find out how Travis Scott reacted to the news, here!”
“Stormi Webster.”
“And she was totally “freaked” out over the news.”
““Kylie had a total pregnancy scare that really freaked her out.”
“Travis [Scott] was super excited to have another kid right away, but Kylie was totally upset over the idea of being pregnant again so quickly.”
“She has been so relieved to HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Believe it or not, Kylie Jenner , 20, thought she was pregnant again, only several weeks after giving birth to.”


"Is it?"
"But on the positive side, at least Kelly knows that he wants to have more children with her in the future!"
"Less than three months after giving birth to Tommy, Kelly Jenner developed a pregnancy phobia."
"Look at Travis Scott's reaction to the news, here it is!"
"Tommy Webster."
"She was completely terrified at the news."
"Kelly's fear of pregnancy really scares her."
"Travis (Scott) is happy to have another child right away, but Kelly is very upset about the idea of getting pregnant again so soon."
"She's very happy with Hollywood life."
"Believe it or not, 20-year-old Kelly Jenner thinks she's pregnant again, just a few weeks after the baby."



Number  1114
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan released an official statement on their split via social media and revealed they would make no further comments on the end of their marriage going forward.”
“Magazine claims that Jenna wanted to get back into acting and that caring for a newborn would derail those plans.”
“Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan officially announced their split on Monday night after months of speculation that the couple was heading for a divorce.”
“Fans were stunned to hear the news that the pair had decided to end their nine-year marriage and couldn’t help but wonder what caused the sad breakup.”
“According to an April 3 report by Radar Online, there were many factors that led to the end of Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan’s marriage.”
“The first is likely the fact that Tatum wanted to have more children.”
“The actor and his estranged wife are the parents of one daughter, Everly, but it seems that the Magic Mike star wanted a bigger family, which is something that Dewan didn’t seem to be on board with.”
“A past report by OK!”
“The baby battle allegedly continued for Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan when the actress got tired of being a housewife while her husband spent his time on movie sets.”
“Although many fans deemed the pair as the perfect couple, Dewan told the media earlier this year that they are far from perfect and “fight” just like any other couple would.”


"Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan issued an official statement on their breakup on social media and revealed that they would not comment further on the end of their future marriage."
"The magazine claims that Jenna wants to go back to the show business and that taking care of her newborn baby will undermine these plans."
"Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan officially broke up on Monday night after months of speculation that the couple were about to divorce."
"Fans were stunned to hear that they had decided to end their 9-year marriage. They couldn't help wondering what caused the sad breakup."
"According to radar online on April 3, there are many factors leading to the end of Channing Tatum's and Jenna Dewan's marriage."
"First, maybe Tatum wants more children."
"The actor and his separated wife are the parents of a daughter, Avery, but it seems that the magician Michael star wants a bigger family, which is something Devon doesn't seem to be involved in."
"A past report by OK!"
"It's said that the baby fight continues when Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan are tired of being housewives while their husbands spend their time on film sets."
"Although many fans think the couple is the perfect couple, Dewan told the media earlier this year that they are far from the perfect couple and" quarrel "like any other couple



Number  1115
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"I'm getting more and more anxious and excited with everyday."”
“Kris paid for everything and was happy to treat Khloe, who thanked her several times, the source said.”
“Khloe confirmed her pregnancy via a baby bump photo on Instagram in December and revealed on Keeping Up With the Kardashians earlier this year that she and Tristan Thompson are expecting a baby girl.”
“E!”
“News learned on Thursday she gave birth to their daughter.”
“The news comes amid an alleged cheating scandal involving Tristan.”
“The two have not commented.”
“Khloe's mother Kris Jenner has helped her a lot with her nursery, flying to Cleveland to lend a hand in person and also shipping decor and other baby products to the house, E!”
“News has learned.”
“In early March, the two spent two hours shopping for baby gear, toys, furniture and clothes at Petit Tresor and Couture Kids in Los Angeles.”


"I get more and more anxious and excited every day."
"Chris paid the price for everything and is happy to treat Khloe, who has repeatedly expressed thanks to her," the source said
"Khloe confirmed her pregnancy in December last year through a picture of a baby lump on instagram, and in contact with kardashians earlier this year revealed that she and Tristan Thompson were pregnant with a baby girl."
“E！”
"The news learned on Thursday that she had given birth to their daughter."
"The news came at a time when Tristan was suspected of cheating."
"They didn't comment."
"Khloe's mother, Kris Jenner, helped her a lot in the nursery. She flew to Cleveland to help with the decorations and other baby things, e!"
"The news already knows."
"In early March, they spent two hours shopping for baby products, toys, furniture and clothes at Petit tresor and couture kids in Los Angeles."



Number  1116
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She said she was blocked because she “hurt his feelings.” There’s no telling which of Kelb’s tweets was the final straw for Trump, but here are a number of guesses:8.”
“...and The New Yorker, Kelb found herself blocked by the president after a posting a number of tweets about him, as well as regular responses to many of his tweets.”
“Anne RiceThe president denied the Interview With the Vampire author one of her favorite pastimes — personally responding to Trump’s many tweets.”
“3.”
“She’s still tweeting about him, though — and has asked others to forward along her messages.”
“It was a tweet that mentioned the instantly infamous unsubstantiated Russian dossier, which alleged that Russian spies had explicit information about Trump, which finally prompted him to block the former talk show hostJust a few hours after sending the tweet, O’Donnell found herself blocked.”
“Rosie O’DonnellTrump and O’Donnell have been feuding for years, but it took until July 23, 2017, for him to finally block her on Twitter.”
“2.”
“Now, she has one request for Trump, she told ThinkProgress — and it isn’t that he’ll lift the block: “I just wish that he would listen.”But Packard addressed Wednesday’s ruling, helpfully explaining how Trump can unblock users en masse.”
“The morning of Sept. 20, she woke up and discovered that Trump had blocked her.”


She said she was stopped because she "hurt his feelings.". I don't know which of kelbu's tweets are Trump's last straw, but here's some speculation: 8. "
“…… And the new Yorker, kelb found herself blocked by the president because she posted a lot of tweets about him, as well as regular replies to a lot of his tweets. "
"President Annie Reeses denied that interviewing vampire writers was one of her favorite pastimes - responding personally to many of Trump's tweets."
“3.”
"However, she is still talking about him on Twitter and asking others to forward her message."
"This is a tweet referring to the immediately infamous unconfirmed Russian files, which allege that Russian spies have clear information about trump, which eventually prompted him to block the former talk show host. Just hours after tweeting, O'Donnell found himself blocked."
"Rosie O'Donnell trump and O'Donnell had been at loggerheads for years, but it wasn't until July 23, 2017 that he finally blocked her on twitter."
“2.”
"Now, she has a request for trump to tell thinkprogress - not that he will lift the blockade:" I just hope he will listen to me. " But Packard spoke in Wednesday's ruling to help explain how trump can lift the collective blockade on users. "
"On the morning of September 20, she woke up to find trump standing in her way."



Number  1117
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can tell they are genuinely enjoying themselves and are here to have a good time.””
“I take full responsibility for my absence.”
“...the building...”
“On Monday, the Dancing With the Stars pro — who missed last week’s show — put on his dancing shoes to compete with partner Vanessa Lachey in a routine commemorating her most memorable year.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“When the celebrity and pro dancer couples were introduced at the top of the show, audiences saw Chmerkovskiy return with Lachey.”
“Last week DWTS co host Erin Andrews informed viewers that Chmerkovskiy s absence was due to a personal issue but sources told PEOPLE that the DWTS pro 37 and Lachey 36 had been bickering since the beginning of the competition and that he chose to sit out from rehearsals and...”
“...the live show due to a clash between their big personalities But on Wednesday Chmerkovskiy apologized to Lachey for his absence which left his partner to perform with first time pro Alan Bersten...”
““As you are all aware, I had to leave the show last week to take care of some personal issues.”
“And want to apologize to my partner Vanessa.”


"You can see that they really enjoy it and have a good time here."
"I take full responsibility for my absence."
“… Building... "
"On Monday, the" dancing with the stars "professional, who missed last week's performance, put on her shoes and held a routine competition with her partner Vanessa Lachey to commemorate her most unforgettable year."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When the couple of stars and professional dancers were introduced to the top of the show, the audience saw the return of chmerkovskiy and Lachey."
"Last week, DWTS co host Irene Andrews informed the audience that chimmelkovsky's absence was due to personal problems, but the source told people that DWTS Pro 37 and Lachey 36 had been arguing since the start of the competition, and he chose to withdraw from the rehearsal, and then..."
“… The live show was due to a clash between their bigwigs, but on Wednesday, chimkovsky apologized to rachi for his absence, which allowed his partner to perform with the first pro Ellen Basten... "
"As you all know, I had to leave the show last week to deal with some personal issues."
"I want to apologize to my partner Vanessa."



Number  1118
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“| Credit: The Image Direct...”
“| Credit: Kevin Winter/GettyAnd while “it seems Justin gave up many months ago,” says the source, Aniston only “very recently started telling friends that they were over.”Image zoom Justin Theroux biking in New York City on Feb. 11, Aniston’s birthday.”
“Theroux didn t work out a source close to the actress tells PEOPLE in the magazine s new cover story...”
““She didn’t expect to be single again.”Still, while she’s not looking forward to dating again, the actress ultimately believes in love.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The 49-year-old and the Leftovers actor, 46, announced their split last Thursday after seven years together and two and a half years of marriage.”
“The two met to make the final decision on Valentine’s Day.”
“As for her future, “she isn’t a fan of dating, and she never was.”
“She always found dating awkward and unpleasant,” an Aniston source explains.”
““She hates all the media attention that she knows she will get now.”


"| credit: image direct..."
Source: Kevin winter / gettyan said that although "Justin seems to have given up a few months ago," Aniston only "recently started telling friends that they're over." On February 11, Aniston's birthday, Justin Theroux was cycling in New York
"Theroux didn't find a source close to what the actress told people in the magazine's new cover story..."
"She didn't expect to be single again." Nevertheless, although she is not looking forward to dating again, the actress finally believes in love
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
The 49 year old actor and the 46 year old actress, who have been together for seven years, broke up on Thursday after two and a half years of marriage
"The two meet on Valentine's day to make a final decision."
As for her future, "she doesn't like dating, and she never does."
"She always finds dating embarrassing and unpleasant," explained a source for Aniston
"She hates all the media attention, she knows she'll get it now."



Number  1119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And in the worst case scenario, they can always ask the Queen for some central air!”
“Wherever they end up living, they'll likely be very happy.”
“So now that they've made things official and are about to get married, it's fair to wonder if Prince Harry and Meghan Markle are living together now or if royal protocol has kept them under different roofs.”
“The answer is not all that surprising.”
“When the couple first met, Suits was still filming in Toronto, which is where Meghan was posted up.”
“To visit each other, the couple had to carry out an elaborate bait and switch plan to distract the paparazzi and keep their romance a secret, according to Us Weekly.”
“Meghan would travel to London for events and they took vacations together, but it wasn't until late 2016 that the The Sun reported they were "virtually inseparable" and that Markle had "practically moved in" with Harry.”
“By that time, the couple had made their relationship public.”
“An anonymous source also told the outlet, "They’ve taken things to the next level.”
“They’re practically living together.”


"In the worst case, they can always ask the queen to provide some central air conditioning!"
"No matter where they end up living, they will be very happy."
"So now that they've made it public and are about to get married, we can't help asking whether Prince Harry and Megan Marcel are living together or whether Royal etiquette puts them under different roof."
"The answer is not so surprising."
"When the couple met for the first time, the suit was still shooting in Toronto, where Megan posted his post."
In order to visit each other, the couple had to implement a well-designed bait diversion plan to distract the paparazzi and keep their relationship secret, US Weekly reported
"Megan will go to London to participate in the event and they will go on holiday together, but it was not until the end of 2016 that the Sun reported that they were" almost inseparable "and that markel" almost moved "into Harry's house."
"At that time, the couple had made their relationship public."
"They've taken things to a new level," an anonymous source told the media
"They actually live together."



Number  1120
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“George was last seen at the christening of his baby brother Prince Louis at the Chapel Royal at St James's Palace on July 9 and in official photos marking the royal baptism.”
“News in 2015: "With George they are trying to delay that moment of realisation and give him normality before they thrust this on him.”
“Sign up today for the best stories straight to your inbox Sign up today!”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid EmailKate Middleton and Prince William want Prince George, aged four, Princess Charlotte, aged three and Prince Louis, a few months old to have as "normal" an upbringing as possible.”
“And as Prince George turns five tomorrow, there is something about his future that he has not been told.”
“The little boy is third in line to the throne after his dad Prince William and grandad Prince Charles.”
“It's this nugget of information that his parents have decided to keep from him for the time being – with Wills explaining there's "a time and a place" for such a revelation.”
“(Image: PA)According to Catherine Mayer, who wrote the book Charles: The Heart of a King, Prince William really struggled with the magnitude of his future role when he was growing up.”
“She told E!”
“"But it will be, nevertheless, part of his upbringing both in terms of what he sees his parents and grandparents doing and probably quite soon a beginning of an understanding that he is in public life and what that means."”


"George's last appearance was on July 9, at the Royal Chapel at St James' palace, at the baptism of his brother Prince Louis, and in an official photo commemorating the Royal baptism."
2015 news: "in George, they're trying to postpone the moment of realization, get him back to normal, and then push it on to him."
"Sign up today, send the best stories to your in box, and sign up today!"
"Thank you for subscribing. We have more newsletters. Let me see our privacy statement. Kate Middleton and Prince William want four year old Prince George, three-year-old Princess Charlotte and a few months old prince Louis to have" normal "upbringing as much as possible."
"Prince George will be five years old tomorrow. There are some things about his future that he hasn't been told yet."
"This little boy is the third heir to the throne after his father Prince William and grandfather Prince Charles."
"It was this information that his parents decided not to let him know for the time being - the revelation, wells explained, was" time and place. "
"(photo: PA) according to Catherine Mayer, Prince William did struggle to grow up with the importance of his future role."
"She told me!"
"But anyway, it's going to be part of his growing up, whether it's from seeing what his parents and grandparents are doing, or from the fact that he's soon starting to realize that he's involved in public life and what it means."



Number  1121
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And she slept over again.”For more on this exclusive story, pick up the new issue of In Touch magazine, on newsstands now!”
““She said that the sex was good.” So good, the woman stayed the night and took a short video of Tristan — identifiable by his distinctive chest tattoos — asleep in bed afterward, which the source shared exclusively with In Touch.”
“As the mother-of-one reels from news of Tristan Thompson’s cheating scandal, In Touch has uncovered exclusive new details — and secret footage — of another betrayal.”
“In Touch has obtained a video showing that the devastating situation is even worse than Khloé knows.”
“An insider reveals the shocking details from Tristan’s hookups with a curvy stunner last November and again in February.”
“Tristan hit on the woman at an NYC club following a November game against the New York Knicks.”
“And while the woman — who the source says is a big fan of the Kardashians — “knew that he was with Khloé,” Tristan didn’t mention his pregnant girlfriend when he brought her back to the Four Seasons in an SUV.”
“He got out first and had her circle the block a few times before coming up to his room, where they had unprotected sex.”
““She slept with him because he’s an NBA star, but she thinks he’s hot, too,” the insider says.”
““He was definitely not careful at all about making sure that nobody knew who she was or that she didn’t have her phone,” adds the source.”


"She went to sleep again." To learn more about this exclusive story, check out the new issue of in touch magazine at the newsstand
"She said sex was good." Great. The woman stayed all night, took a short video of Tristan - which can be identified by his unique tattoo on his chest - and then fell asleep in bed. The source of this video is only shared with in touch
"When a child's mother learned about Tristan Thompson's cheating scandal, contact exclusively revealed new details and secret videos of another betrayal."
"In touch got a video that showed that the devastating situation was worse than Heroe knew."
"An insider revealed the shocking details of Tristan's hook up with a curve stuntman in November last year, and again in February this year."
"Tristan ran into the woman at a New York club after a game with the New York Knicks last November."
"Although this lady - who sources say is a big fan of Kardashian - knew he was with Heroe, Tristan didn't mention his pregnant girlfriend when he took her back to four seasons in her SUV."
"He got out of the car, made her walk around the block a few times, and then came to his room, where they had unprotected sex."
"She's sleeping with him because he's an NBA star, but she thinks he's sexy too," the person familiar with the matter said
"He must have been careless at all, no one knows who she is, no one knows she doesn't have a mobile phone," the source added



Number  1122
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Find out more about her new husband here:”
“And, pow, did she ever.”
“As rumors swirled that she married Tom Ackerley in a super secret wedding in her native Australia the Suicide Squad and The Wolf of Wall Street actress 26 took to the photo sharing site to post a photo of herself flashing a pear shaped diamond ring on that finger while...”
“...she kissed the director in the background...”
“It was a no caption provided, no caption needed kind of post.”
“A photo posted by @margotrobbie on Dec 19, 2016 at 7:56pm PSTWhile there is a lot of speculation, not much is really known about the nuptials.”
“It was was said that the Aussie actress landed at the Gold Coast Airport in Queensland wearing a “I Do Down Under” T-shirt.”
“The wedding reportedly took place in Byron Bay.”
“Her mother and three siblings, including her actor brother Cameron (who was snapped with a bunch of apparent wedding-goers), were in attendance.”
“The website news.com.au has photos from the wedding.”


"Learn more about her new husband here:
"And, Bob, she did."
"Rumors abound about her super secret wedding with Tom ackerley in Australia. The suicide team and the wolf of Wall Street actress posted a photo of herself flashing a pear shaped diamond ring on her finger on the photo sharing website on the 26th, while..."
“… She kisses the director backstage... "
"This is a post without a title, a post without a title."
"A photo released by @ margotrobbie at 7:56 p.m. on December 19, 2016, although there is a lot of speculation, I don't know much about the wedding."
The Australian actress is said to have landed at Queensland's gold coast airport wearing a "I'm down" T-shirt
"It's reported that the wedding took place in Byron Bay."
Her mother and three brothers and sisters, including her actor brother Cameron, who was photographed with a prominent wedding audience, attended the ceremony
"The website news has pictures of the wedding."



Number  1123
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...post...”
“Image zoom Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan have split.”
“The former couple announced the split in a joint statement exclusive to PEOPLE:Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Hey world!”
“So…We have something we would like to share.”
“First off, it feels odd that we have to share this kind of thing with everyone, but it’s a consequence of the lives we’ve chosen to lead, which we also happen to be deeply grateful for.”
“We’re living in an incredible moment in time, but it’s also a time where truth can easily get distorted into “alternative facts”  So we want to share the truth so you know that if you didn’t read it here then it’s most certainly fiction.”
“We have lovingly chosen to separate as a couple.”
“We fell deeply in love so many years ago and have had a magical journey together.”
“Absolutely nothing has changed about how much we love one another, but love is a beautiful adventure that is taking us on different paths for now.”


“… Publish
"Image zooming Channing Tatum and Jenna Dewan broke up."
The former couple announced their separation in a joint statement: "come on, everyone. It includes news, functions and so on."
"Hey, world!"
"So We want to share something. "
"First of all, it's strange that we have to share this kind of thing with everyone, but it's the result of the life we choose to live, and we happen to be deeply grateful for it."
"We live in an incredible moment, but it's also a moment when the truth can easily be distorted into an 'alternative truth', so we want to share the truth and let you know that if you don't read it here, it must be fictional."
"We chose to separate with love."
"We fell in love so many years ago and had a wonderful journey together."
"The extent to which we love each other has never changed, but love is a beautiful adventure that is now taking us on a different path."



Number  1124
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A Star Is Born will be in theaters October 5.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementDave Chappelle also makes an appearance as an old friend of Cooper’s country music star, wearing a hat you will have to watch the trailer to believe.”
“She follows in the footsteps of Janet Gaynor, who starred in the 1937 original film, as well as Judy Garland and Barbra Streisand, who starred in later remakes.”
“The pop star and newly minted TV actress is taking on her first movie role after winning a Golden Globe for her role on American Horror Story: Hotel.”
“AdvertisementA Star Is Born will also be a first for Lady Gaga.”
“In his debut as a film director, Cooper spent three years learning to sing and developing his vision for the movie, according to a conversation he had with Robert DeNiro at the Tribeca Film Festival.”
“Some of it was even filmed in front of live audiences at packed summer festivals like Coachella and Stagecoach.”
“As his costar, Gaga insisted that there would be no pre-recorded vocals or lip-synching in the film.”
“In the first official trailer for A Star Is Born, Bradley Cooper sings live alongside Lady Gaga—and he sounds pretty good.”


"A star will be born in the cinema on October 5."
"Advertising Dave Chappelle also appears as an old friend of Cooper's country music star, wearing a hat that you have to watch the trailer to believe."
"She inherited the footsteps of Janet Gaynor, who starred in the original 1937 film, and Judy Garland and Barbara Streisand, who also starred in later remakes."
"The pop star and new TV actress will make her first film role after winning the Golden Globe for" American horror story: the hotel. "
"The birth of a star will also be Lady Gaga's number one."
In a conversation with Robert DeNiro at the Tribeca Film Festival, Cooper said that in his first film as a film director, he spent three years learning to sing and broaden his horizons for the film
"Some were even photographed in front of a summer festival audience full of people like Coachella and stagecoach."
"As his partner, Gaga insisted that there would be no pre recorded voice or lip synching in the film."
"Bradley Cooper sang live with Lady Gaga in the first official trailer of star birth, and he sounds pretty good."



Number  1125
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drop a comment below.”
“A royal insider just laughed off the claims and said that they are 100 percent "not true."”
“New Idea recently claimed that the Duchess of Cornwall is "set to blow the lid off the royal family" with her $12 million tell-all book.”
“"[The book] caused terror to rip through the royal family in what they fear could be the biggest scandal they've ever faced.”
“The entire family has been shaken to the core, especially Charles," claimed the site.”
“Their so-called source claimed that in the book, Camilla revealed her views about Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle that would surely "shock the world."”
“She also reportedly shared the queen's reaction over Prince Harry and the "Suits" star's romance.”
“Camilla reportedly received a $10 million offer to spill the secrets of her life with Prince Charles.”
“But the outlet claimed that the Duchess of Cornwall was not writing a tell-all for money, but because she was "so fed up with so many things behind palace doors."”
“The tabloid added that Prince Charles' wife is in "top secret negotiations with book publishers in the U.S."However, Gossip Cop has revealed that there is no truth to the report.”


"Comment below."
"A royal insider laughs at these claims, saying they are 100% untrue
"There's a new idea that the Duchess of Cornwall is going to use her 12 million dollar book tell everyone to" unveil the royal family. "
"(the book) caused a panic in the royal family, who worried that it might be the biggest scandal they faced."
"The whole family was completely shaken, especially Charles," the website claims
According to their so-called sources, Camilla's disclosure of her views on Kate Middleton and Megan markel in the book is bound to "shock the world"
According to reports, she also shared the Queen's reaction to the romance between Prince Harry and the "suit" star
"Camilla is reported to have received a $10 million offer to reveal the secrets of her life with Prince Charles."
But the Duchess of Cornwall didn't write wanted notices for money, the media said, but because she was "tired of a lot of things behind the Palace door."
The tabloid also said Prince Charles's wife was "in top secret negotiations with book publishers in the United States.". However, gossip police revealed that this report is not true



Number  1126
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Any suggestion otherwise is simple false.””
“An Obama spokes person later released a statement that said, “… neither President Obama nor anyone any White House official ever order surveillance on any U.S. citizen.”
““This is McCarthyism!” he tweeted.”
“Schwarzenegger responded in a video posted to Twitter, “Hey Donald, I have a great idea: Why don’t we switch jobs?”Just hours before on Saturday morning, Trump had unleashed a series of tweets accusing Barack Obama of “Nixon/Watergate”-level mismanagement, including wire tapping his phones during the election.”
““I want to just pray for Arnold if we can — for those ratings,” he said.”
“In one recent instance in February, the president mocked Schwarzenegger at the National Prayer Breakfast.”
“With Schwarzenegger as host, the show has struggled in the ratings, which Trump has dissed over Twitter and in person.”
““When people found out that Trump was still involved as executive producer and was still receiving money from the show, then half the people [started] boycotting it,” he said.”
“On Friday, Schwarzenegger blamed the show’s poor ratings on Trump’s continued involvement.”
“The NBC show has not yet been picked up for another season, with or without Schwarzenegger.”


"Any other suggestion is wrong."
An Obama spokesman later issued a statement saying, "..." Neither President Obama nor any White House official has ordered the surveillance of any American citizen. "
"This is McCarthyism! "He said on Weibo."
Schwarzenegger responded in a tweeted Video: "Hey, Donald, I have a good idea: why don't we change jobs? "Just hours before Saturday morning, trump launched a series of tweets accusing Barack Obama of mismanagement at the Nixon / Watergate level, including eavesdropping on his mobile phone during the election."
"If I can, I just want to pray for Arnold - for those ratings," he said
At a recent National Prayer Breakfast in February, the president mocked Schwarzenegger
"In the case of Schwarzenegger as host, the show has been struggling in ratings, and trump has criticized it on Twitter and in the face of it."
"When people find out that trump is still involved as an executive producer and still gets funding from the show, then half of them [start] boycott," he said
"On Friday, Schwarzenegger attributed the poor ratings to trump's continued involvement."
"Whether or not there's Schwarzenegger, NBC's show hasn't got another season."



Number  1127
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"With her, it’s about keeping it boho chic.””
““Kate is a very free spirit, and with that million-dollar smile you don’t want to constrict her with a ‘do,’" he said.”
““How many girls do you know that the day of the Golden Globes will let you cut off seven inches of hair?” asks celebrity hairstylist David Babaii rhetorically.”
“The beauty guru, who also works with Angelina Jolie and Gwyneth Paltrow, did just that to Kate Hudson hours before she walked the red carpet in an ab-baring sequined Michael Kors ensemble.”
“Read more Kate Hudson, Brie Larson Bare Their Midriffs at the Golden Globes“With Kate, there’s no planning things, we just go with the wind,” adds Babaii.”
““When I saw her dress, I had this vision of Kim Basinger in 9 1/2 Weeks and Sharon Stone in Casino.”
“I was like if those two had a haircut and it was today what would it be like a dirty boho 70s 80s chic A line bob He told his longtime client they met at the Globes 14 years ago...”
“...in fact that he wanted to cut her hair and she said Do it A photo posted by David Babaii davidbabaii on Jan 10 2016 at 5 11pm PST The Sassoon trained stylist first cut a really clean line and...”
“...then I was like enough with the cleanness and like Edward Scissorhands started cutting and chopping The back is chopped way in while the front is much longer...”
“The idea, he says, was to keep it free and fun.”


"For her, it's about keeping the Bohemian style."
He said: "Kate is a very free person, with that million dollar smile, you don't want to shackle her with" doing. "
"Do you know how many girls will ask you to cut off seven inches of hair on the day of the Golden Globes? "Asked celebrity hairstylist David babay
The beauty guru, who works with Angelina Jolie and Gwyneth Paltrow, did this to Kate Hudson hours before she walked down the red carpet in her sequined Michael kors suit
"To learn more about Kate Hudson, Bree Larson showed up at the Golden Globes," babay added. "With Kate, there's no plan. We just go with the wind."
"When I saw her dress, I saw Kim Basinger in the casino with Sharon Stone for nine and a half weeks."
"I thought, if those two people had their hair cut, it would be today, a dirty Bohemian Bob with the fashionable lines of the 1970s and 1980s, who told his regular clients that they met 14 years ago in universal..."
“… In fact, he wanted to cut her hair, she said to do a photo, released by David babaii at 5:11 p.m. Pacific Standard Time on January 10, 2016, Sassoon trained stylists first cut a very clean line, and then... "
“… Then I started to clean and cut like Edward's scissors hands, and the way to cut and chop is to chop at the back, while the front is longer... "
"The idea, he said, is to keep it free and fun."



Number  1128
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“THE DOGJacques must be getting on in years.”
“Pitt is the sole owner of the company, but could Jolie angle for a piece of that cinematic pie in the settlement?”
“PHILIPPE LAURENSON/REUTERS An aerial view of the 17th-century Chateau Miraval, the US$60m estate which is owned by actors Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie.”
“Maybe Angie will want to keep things as normal as possible for her brood in the Los Feliz house, or perhaps she'll want to ship them out to France – her ancestral and spiritual home – where the couple owns the frankly enormous Chateau Miraval.”
“While his prior ownership of the home might suggest Pitt will keep the home in this divorce too, it's been extensively remodelled for the kids and now includes a huge swimming pool, park land, and an area for dirtbike-riding – something his son Maddox enjoys.”
“The Jolie-Pitts have seven houses in various spots around the world, but the family home is a sprawling Craftsman style home in Los Feliz, Los Angeles, that Brad Pitt had previously lived in with jilted ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston.”
“Brad lived there with Jennifer Aniston during their marriage - but will he give it up for Angelina Jolie and the kids?”
“...split THE HOUSES SPLASH NEWS An aerial view of the Craftsman style home the Jolie Pitts called home...”
“Brangelina Key moments in the Hollywood romance Jennifer Aniston memes flood in after Brangelina split Jon Voight comments on estranged daughter s divorce How Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt raise their six children Angelina Jolie s divorce custody terms an insult lawyer Marion Cotillard devastated by claims she s behind...”
“* Brangelina's children: Who are the Jolie-Pitt brood?”


"The Jacques dog must have grown up years ago."
Pete is the only owner of the company, but can Julie get a piece of the settlement? "
Philip Lawrenson / Reuters aerial view of 17th century miravar castle, a $60 million estate owned by actors Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie
"Maybe Angie will want to make the children of the Los Feliz as normal as possible, or she will want to transport them to France - her ancestral and spiritual home - where the couple own a huge miravar castle."
"Although the house he owned before may mean that Pete will keep it in this divorce, the house has been extensively renovated for the children and now includes a huge swimming pool, a park and a bike riding area for his son Maddox."
"Julie Pitt's family has seven houses in all parts of the world, but this family house is a well-designed craftsman style house in Los Angeles, and Brad Pitt previously lived here with his abandoned ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston."
"Brad and Jennifer Aniston lived there when they got married - but would he give up for Angelina Jolie and the kids?"
“… Split the house, splash the news, see the craftsman style home in the air, Julie Pitt calls it home... "
"Brengelina at the critical moment of Hollywood romantic Jennifer Aniston film, after the flood, brengelina split, Jon Voith commented on the divorce of her separated daughter, how Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt raised their six children, Angelina Jolie's divorce custody clause insulted lawyer Marion godia and destroyed the claim behind her..."
"* brengelina's children: who are the Julie Pitts?"



Number  1129
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““Then she won’t have to hide her new beau anymore.”We pay for juicy info!”
““This split from Brad has been dragging on and Angie is looking forward to the day the ink dries on the divorce papers,” adds the insider.”
““Apparently, they’re having romantic weekends in the English countryside, away from prying eyes, whenever they get the chance,” shares the source.”
“Sources on set say the actress only refers to her new beau “by one initial,” and has asked the producers to arrange her schedule so that she can leave town on weekends.”
“...as the custody battle rages on while she films Maleficent 2”
“They will always be her priority and she wouldn t take that step if she didn t see this romance lasting Angie and her brood are currently living in London where Brad came to visit for Father s Day even...”
““She’s introduced him to the kids already, which is a sure sign that this is more than just a fling,” says the source.”
“She doesn’t want a media circus around her man.”Sources say that the polished Brit is a reputable art dealer and philanthropist, and that Angie, 43, met him through mutual friends.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Then she doesn't have to hide her new boyfriend any more." We pay for interesting information! "
"The break-up with Brad has been going on for a long time, and Angie is looking forward to the day when the ink on the divorce agreement dries out," the person familiar with the matter added
"It's clear that whenever they get a chance, they will spend a romantic weekend in the English countryside, away from the eyes of the peepers," shared the source
The actress mentioned her new boyfriend "in one letter" and asked the producers to arrange her schedule so that she could be out of town at the weekend, according to a studio source
“… When she filmed Evil 2, the custody battle was still raging. "
"They'll always be her top priority and she won't take this step if she doesn't see this romantic lasting Angie and her children currently living in London, where Brad comes to visit father's day or even..."
"She has introduced him to the children, which definitely shows that it's not just an indulgence," the source said
"She doesn't want the media around her men." The source said the glamorous Briton is a renowned art dealer and philanthropist, and Angie, 43, met him through a mutual friend



Number  1130
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For more — and to see the first pictures of Jen’s bump — pick up the new issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
“But now this surprise pregnancy has turned the worst of times into the best of times.”Congrats!”
“Their baby news came at a bad time in her life, too — she just lost her mother, and she and Justin almost broke up.”
“Jen has wanted to have a baby with Justin for years.”
““She and Justin are ecstatic.”
““She’s pregnant,” a friend of the couple tells In Touch.”
“This is the first child for Jen and her husband, Justin Theroux.”
“RELATED: Click Here for Your Chance to Win $1 Million!”
“1.”
“In Touch can exclusively confirm that the 47-year-old is pregnant with baby No.”


"To learn more, to see the first picture of Jennifer, now check out the new issue of contact at the newsstand."
"But now this unexpected pregnancy has turned the worst into the best." Congratulations
"The news of their baby came at the worst time of her life - she just lost her mother, and she and Justin almost broke up."
"Jane has wanted to have a baby with Justin for years."
"She and Justin are ecstatic."
"She's pregnant," a friend of the couple said in contact magazine
"This is the first child of Jane and her husband Justin Cyrus."
"Related: click here and you have a chance to win $1 million!"
“1.”
"In touch can confirm exclusively that 47 year old is pregnant with baby number one."



Number  1131
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She just wants to see if Ben is able to keep his promises.”To know more about Ben and Jennifer’s pregnancy, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, — and subscribe to our newsletter!”
““It’s important to him that their children be raised in a family with two loving parents who aren’t divorced, but she isn’t there yet,” the source continued.”
“The actor is over the moon about the surprise pregnancy, and wants Jen to make an effort in piecing their marriage back together, but she’s not quite ready.”
“Ben previously agreed to go to couple’s therapy following his alleged affair with the children’s nanny.”
““Ben is hoping another child will bring them back together as a family.”Splash NewsThe couple, who share children Violet, 10, Seraphina, 7, and Samuel, 4, have not yet filed for divorce.”
““Jen is telling her inner circle she’s having a baby and she’s happy about it, but being cautious about reuniting with Ben,” a source revealed to In Touch.”
“MORE: ‘Teen Mom 2’ Star Javi Marroquin Claims He Has Proof Kailyn Lowry Cheated!”
“The unexpected news comes over a year after the couple announced their divorce, and while Jennifer is keeping mum about her pregnancy — she’s only telling close friends and family — Ben is hoping for a possible reconciliation.”
“After it was previously reported that Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner were returning to Turks & Caicos for a second honeymoon, In Touch has now exclusively learned that the actress is expecting her fourth child with her estranged husband.”


"She just wanted to see if Ben could keep his promise." To learn more about Ben and Jennifer's pregnancy, please read the latest issue of contact and subscribe to our newsletters
"It's important for him that their children grow up in a family with two loving parents who are not divorced, but she hasn't been there yet," the source continued
"The actor is very upset about the unexpected pregnancy and wants Jane to try to reunite their marriage, but she's not quite ready."
"Ben had previously agreed to go to the couple's treatment because he was accused of having an affair with the baby's nanny."
"I was hoping another kid would make it up again." The couple, who have children in common, have yet to divorce violet, 10, Serafina, 7 and Samuel, 4
"Jane told her inner circle that she was going to have a baby and she was happy, but she had to be careful to reunite with Ben," a person familiar with the matter said
"More: 'teen Mom 2' star Harvey Marroquin claims that he has evidence that Caroline Lowry cheated!"
"The unexpected news came a year after the couple announced their divorce, and although Jennifer remained silent about her pregnancy - she only told close friends and family - she hoped it would be possible to reconcile."
"It has been reported that Ben Affleck and Jennifer Garner will return to the Turks and Caicos Islands for their second honeymoon, and contact magazine has exclusive knowledge that the actress is pregnant with her separated husband for a fourth child."



Number  1132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““If anything it’s given Jen a harsh reality that many if not most of her showbiz pals are superficial as hell.””
“Theroux was first caught with Stone when he posted a photo of himself hanging out with her in April, just weeks after his split from Aniston!”
““[Aniston] considered Emma as a good friend before all this, so it’s totally sideswiped her; even though Justin’s shameless networking deep inside her social circle has been going on a while.”
“A source told Radar exclusively that while the pair did their best to look friendly at the Hotel in Cap-d’antibes bash in Antibes, France, they couldn’t keep their hands off each other.”
“Though they sat apart on the A-lister filled front row, they were soon caught canoodling at the ritzy after party.”
“Theroux, 46, and Stone, 29, were recently spotted together in France, where they attended Louis Vuitton’s fashion show.”
“But they’re totally dating under the radar, and everyone knows including Jen who’s predictably fuming,” snitched a source.”
““They’re holding back on going totally public just yet, until the terms of Justin’s split have been fully worked out.”
“Justin Theroux and Emma Stone‘s romance is heating up RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively, much to the heartbreak of Jennifer Aniston.”


"If it gives Jennifer a cruel reality, it's that many (if not most) of her acting friends are superficial."
Cyrus was first caught by stone in April, a few weeks after he broke up with Aniston, and he released a picture of himself with her
"(Aniston) thought of Emma as a good friend before it all happened, so it's totally against her, even though Justin's shameless network in her social circle has been going on for some time."
"A source told radar exclusive that although the two did their best to look friendly at the cap-d'antibes bash hotel in Antibes, France, they couldn't help touching each other."
Although they sat separately in the front row, they were soon found loitering in the luxurious banquet after the party
Seru, 46, and stone, 29, were recently found together in France for a louis vuitton fashion show
"But they're totally dating under radar, and everyone knows, including Jen, who is predictably angry," the source of the snitch said
"They haven't been fully open until the conditions for Justin's breakup are completely settled."
"Justin seru and Emma stone are on the rise RadarOnline.com He's completely learned the website, which makes Jennifer Aniston very sad. "



Number  1133
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But in recent years, few top stars have gone as far as to move there.”
“Rome has been a popular destination for the entertainment world’s elite since the Dolce Vita days of the 1950s and 1960s.”
“The Material Girl, who has drawn the ire of the Vatican over the years, is eyeing luxury properties in two of the city's neighborhoods, according to reports.”
“ROME – Reportedly tiring of life in London and New York, the Material Girl is said it be mulling a move to the Eternal City.”
“The Italian media reported Wednesday that Madonna may be looking to acquire a luxury property in Rome.”
“The most likely candidates: a luxury villa on the Aventine Hill, or a penthouse apartment in the iconoclastic neighborhood designed by early 20th century architect Gino Coppede.”
“There is no official word from the camp of the singer born as Madonna Louise Ciccone about a possible move, though the 54-year-old pop icon has always maintained close ties with Italy, the home of her ancestors.”
“Madonna’s personal donation of $500,000 to help the victims of the devastating 2009 earthquake in Abruzzo was at first larger than the aid from the U.S. government.”
“She has also opined periodically on Italian affairs, and has been a vocal critic of media tycoon and former Italian Prime Minister Silvio Berlusconi.”
“VIDEO: Madonna Turns 54: Her Top 5 HitsMadonna’s directorial effort, W.E., which told the story of the love story between British King Edward VIII and American divorcee Wallis Simpson, premiered at the Venice Film Festival last year.”


"But in recent years, few top stars have gone so far."
"Rome has been a popular destination for entertainment Elites Since the era of dulceta in the 1950s and 1960s."
"It is reported that this material girl, who has been irritating the Vatican for many years, is staring at two blocks of luxury buildings in the Vatican."
"Rome - the material girl is reported to be tired of life in London and New York and is said to be considering moving to the eternal city."
"Italian media reported on Wednesday that Madonna may be looking to buy a luxury house in Rome."
The most likely choices are: a luxury villa on Aventine hill, or a penthouse in an anti traditional neighborhood designed by Gino copped, an architect in the early 20th century
"Although the 54 year old pop star has maintained close ties with her ancestral home, Italy, there is no official message from the singing camp where Madonna Louise sicone was born that she is likely to move."
"Madonna's personal donation of $500000 to help the victims of the 2009 Abruzzo earthquake was more than that of the U.S. government in the beginning."
"She also regularly commented on Italian affairs and made outspoken criticisms of Silvio Berlusconi, a media mogul and former Prime Minister of Italy."
"Video: Madonna is 54 years old: her top five directors, W.E., tell the love story between British King Edward VIII and American divorcee Wallis Simpson, which premiered at the Venice Film Festival last year."



Number  1134
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...advertisingJUDD: Berlin Station has wet my appetite for acting again.”
“Do the worlds that you work in – acting and humanitarian – feel very different?”
“Ambassador, who’s a political appointee.”
“My nemesis is the U.S.”
“JUDD: Another thing that appealed to me was learning that, as the season evolved, I would continue to be crashing the boy’s club.”
“...advertisingHow is BB Yates received by the boy’s club of being in a profession like this?”
“I think that audiences are going to love it.”
“I’m 49 and Michelle [Forbes] is 52, and that’s fantastic.”
“So, when you have all of us together, augmented with Keke [Palmer], it’s phenomenal.”
“I think that the show looks like what the 21st century should be, in terms of gender parity in the workplace.”


“…… Jude: Berlin TV dampened my desire to act again. "
"Does the world you work in - the performing arts world and the humanitarian world - feel very different?"
"Ambassador, he's the political appointee."
"My mortal enemy is the United States."
"Judd: another thing that attracts me is that as the season goes on, I will continue to destroy the boys' club
“… How did BB Yates get accepted by the boys' club? What kind of career did he have
"I think the audience will like it."
"I'm 49, Michelle (Forbes) is 52, that's great."
"So, when all of us are together, plus Keck (Palmer), it's amazing."
"I think from the perspective of gender equality in the workplace, the show looks like what the 21st century should be like."



Number  1135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She captioned the Instagram photo, “Awww Kanye sent me the coolest flowers!!”
“SEPTEMBER 2015: EVERYONE LOVES FLOWERSAfter that night, Kanye sent Taylor flowers, which pretty much led to her assertion that she would, indeed, be his running mate.”
“They also took a group shot with JAY-Z, because, why not?”
“This could really be the start of something beautiful.”
“They also embraced!”
“Everyone smiled.”
“Taylor enjoyed some nice conversation with Kim.”
“FEBRUARY 2015: GOOD VIBESTaylor and Kanye were reunited at the 2015 Grammys, and there was no drama to be seen.”
“There was also a moment when Kim took a photo for Taylor.”
“Yes, yes we were ever so young.”


She added a caption to the instagram photo: "Oh, kenye gave me the coolest flower!"
"September 2015: after the night everyone loved flowers, Kanye sent flowers to Taylor, which almost led her to assert that she would indeed be Taylor's running mate."
"They also took pictures with Jay-Z, because, why not?"
"It could really be the beginning of something good."
"They hugged, too!"
"Everyone laughed."
"Tyler and Kim had a good time talking."
"February 2015: good vibes Taylor and Kanye meet again at the 2015 Grammy Awards, there's no drama to speak of."
"For a while, Kim Jong Il is taking pictures of Tyler."
"Yes, yes, we used to be so young."



Number  1136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Advertisement'Whilst these traditions are not necessarily dark, there is the option here to use the magic for a darker purpose.”
“Then let the candle burn all the way down.”
“'When a person works magic to "keep" or "get" a particular love interest, it may work, but only for a short period of time,' she said.”
“Trying to control someone else’s will, as she believes Angelina is doing with her magic, won’t work.”
“HATHOR’S MIRROR: A LOVE SPELL FOR HALLOWEEN Carrie has shared a spell for those looking for love at Halloween, but advises that anyone who uses it must have pure intentions.”
“'Angelina is known to have a strong interest in the occult, especially Voodoo and Hoodoo.”
“For her, obsession and possession equal love.'”
“'It feeds into her tendencies towards BDSM.”
“'The way she used to wear her ex-husband Billy Bob Thornton's blood in a vial around her neck, this is a form of blood magic,' she explained.”
“...back following her split from Brad last year The actress flew her tattooist to Cambodia to do a new inking that would spiritually bind her marriage to Brad but months later they split up Carrie says Angelina has always been interested in the dark arts...”


"Advertising" although these traditions are not necessarily dark, but we can choose to use magic to achieve a darker purpose
"Then keep the candle burning."
When a person uses magic to "maintain" or "acquire" a particular love interest, it may work, but only for a short period of time, she said
"Trying to control other people's will, as she believes Angelina does with her magic, doesn't work."
"Hathor's mirror: the love curse of Halloween Carrie shares a curse for those who are looking for love on Halloween, but she suggests that anyone who uses it must have a pure intention."
"As we all know, Angelina is very interested in mystics, especially voodoo and witchcraft."
"For her, obsession and possession are equal to love."
"It's fueling her bias toward BDSM."
"She used to put her ex husband Billy Bob Thornton's blood in a small bottle and put it around her neck. It's a kind of blood magic," she explained
“…… After she broke up with Brad last year, the actress flew to Cambodia with her tattoo artist, injecting a new spiritual bond into her marriage with Brad. But a few months later, they broke up. Carrie said that Angelina has always been interested in dark art... "



Number  1137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!” (Ahoy, folks … it’s HOLLYWOOD!)”
“...nuts a local woman was spooking cracking up local folks by swimming with an elaborate 25 pound fishtail attached to HER tail...”
“Swore My Surfside Spy Even though Liam was convinced he d seen a real LIVE mermaid he figured no one would ever believe him but nearly swallowed his surfboard when Miley burst into giggles and assured him he was NOT”
“Miley Cyrus’s Wildest Instagram Posts!”
“Don’t Tell Liam!”
“...tale swearing to Sweetie he d spotted an actual real life MERMAID flailing her shapely tail beneath the waves a source claims...”
“Don t you DARE call this a fishy tale because studly Liam Not Liar Hemsworth swears that after scary pursuit by swarming sharks while surfing in Malibu he raced to shore and phoned fiancée Miley Cyrus with an even saltier...”
“Mike Walker reports ….”


"!" (HI guys This is Hollywood! "
“… Nonsense. A local woman was swimming with a 25 pound fish tail tied to her tail, which scared the local people. "
"Swear my surfboard spy, even though Liam was sure he saw a real mermaid and he thought no one would believe him, when she almost swallowed his surfboard, Miley burst out laughing and assured him he wasn't"
"Miley Cyrus's craziest instagram post!"
"Don't tell Liam!"
“… The story of swearing to sweetheart: he found a real-life Mermaid waving her symmetrical tail under the waves. It is said that
"You dare say this is a suspicious story, because studying Liam is not a liar. Hemsworth swears that after a terrible chase, groups of sharks surf in Malibu. He runs to the shore and calls his fiancee Millie Cyrus and Genghen..."
"Mike Walker reports..."



Number  1138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Randee Dawn on Twitter.”
“Of course, her co-workers past and present stepped up with condolences and good wishes:@OfficialJLD so sorry you have to go thru this, pal, but I know you will prevail.”
“...https://t.co/SAUd3kfp6j — Sam Richardson (@SamRichardson) September 28, 2017It is possible to be dignified and fierce at the same time.”
“Not even this.”
“Nothing can stop her.”
“...pic.twitter.com/EqvF6HXpj0 — Tony Hale (@MrTonyHale) September 28, 2017She is one of the strongest and caring people I know.”
“We love this woman.”
“️ — jason alexander (@IJasonAlexander) September 29, 2017While fellow former "Seinfeld" star Michael Richards told People magazine, "I wish Julia godspeed and a full recovery."”
“We are here if/when you need and we love you.”
“— Hillary Clinton (@HillaryClinton) September 28, 2017And Meghan McCain, the newly-announced "View" co-host and daughter of Senator John McCain, wrote: "Sending so much love and strength to Julia Louis-Dreyfus @OfficialJLD and her family."”


"Follow randee dawn on twitter."
"Of course, her past and present colleagues have expressed their sympathy and good wishes: @ officialjld is sorry to let you go through this, man, but I know you will win."
“... https://t.co/SAUd3kfp6j-Sam  Richardson (@ Sam Richardson) September 28, 2017 "it's possible to show both majesty and ferocity."
"Not even this one."
"Nothing can stop her."
“... pic.twitter.com/EqvF6HXpj0 -Tony Hale (@ Mr. tonyhale) September 28, 2017, she is one of the strongest and most loving people I know. "
"We love this woman."
"- Jason Alexander (@ ijasonalexander) in an interview with people magazine on September 29, 2017, former" Seinfeld "star Michael Richards said:" I wish Julia a good journey and an early recovery. "
"We'll be here if you need to, and we love you."
——On September 28, 2017, Hillary Clinton (@ hilaryclinton) and Meghan McCain, the newly announced "point of view" co hosts, the daughter of Senator John McCain, wrote: "to Julia Louis Dreyfus@OfficialJLD ）And her family sent so much love and power. "



Number  1139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“People were pushing for them to hook up from the start, but judging by how inseparable they are these days, it seems to have already happened.” Praise be!”
““Alex has been one of Elisabeth’s biggest supporters and a natural confidant.”
““Elisabeth was terrified of dating after she left Fred, so it helps that she and Alex started off as friends,” says a source close to the Scientologist, who filmed Listen Up Philip and Queen of Earth with the filmmaker, 32.”
“After ending her “extremely traumatic” marriage to Fred Armisen, the Handmaid’s Tale star, 34, is secretly seeing director Alex Ross Perry.”
“Elisabeth Moss isn’t letting the bastards grind her down!”


"People have been urging them to chat up from the beginning, but judging from how close they are these days, it seems to have happened."! "
"Alex is one of Elizabeth's biggest supporters and a natural confidant."
"Elizabeth was afraid of dating after leaving Fred, so she and Alex were friends at first, which helped her a lot," said a source close to Scientology, who filmed listen to Philip and the Earth Queen with a 32 year old producer
The 34 year old maid story star is secretly meeting director Alex Ross Perry after her "traumatic" marriage to Fred amison
"Elizabeth moss won't let those bastards knock her down!"



Number  1140
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play video content THE SAME NIGHT TMZ.com...”
“Law enforcement sources tell TMZ, the employee filed a police report, but changed his mind and decided not to pursue the matter.”
“A source who was there tells TMZ the victim "talked smack" as he opened the door for the group.”
“Younes grabs the guy's hair and continues the assault.”
“Another member of the crew jumps in and delivers his own series of punches as the victim appears to go down.”
“The employee mouths something to the group, which clearly pisses them off, and Younes delivers a flurry of punches to the employee's head.”
“Drake, Odell and at least a dozen other guys are leaving through the back door of the club when an employee throws open the door leading to the parking lot.”
“It went down March 24 at Delilah restaurant at 2:15 AM.”
“Play video content EXCLUSIVE MARCH 2018 TMZ.comDrake and Odell Beckham Jr. watched as Kourtney's ex, Younes Bendjima, viciously beat a man outside a West Hollywood restaurant ... and TMZ has the video.”


"Play the video that night TMZ.com Website
"Law enforcement officials told TMZ that the employee reported the case to the police, but changed his mind and decided not to pursue the matter."
"A source present told TMZ that the victims" had a lot of fun talking "when they opened the door for the group
"Younis grabs the guy's hair and continues to attack."
"Another crew member jumped in and made a series of punches when the victim seemed to be falling."
"The employee said something to the team, which obviously annoyed them. Younes punched the employee in the head."
"Drake, odel and at least a dozen other people were leaving the back door of the club when an employee pushed open the door to the parking lot."
"It went offline at Delilah's restaurant at 2:15 a.m. on March 24."
"Play video content exclusive" TMZ.comDrake Becky watched Courtney's ex girlfriend, yones benjima, beat up a man outside a restaurant in West Hollywood... TMZ has video. "



Number  1141
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow Be on Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, Tumblr and Instagram...”
“Send it to tips@yahoo7.com.auWant more celebrity, entertainment and lifestyle news?”
“Now it's being claimed that Keith has given his famous wife an ultimatum, reportedly telling her to cut back on her heavy workload or their marriage is over.”
“"He really wants her to take time off so they can spend more time together as a family," an insider told NW magazine.”
“"He knows they can get back to where they were if they work at it."”
“Keith Urban has reportedly giveb wife Nicole Kidman an ultimatum.”
“The pair are pictured here together in January at the SAG Awards.”
“Source: GettySince March, the couple – who have been married for 12 years – have been rumoured to be struggling, with reports emerging that claim they're "over" and have already seen divorce lawyers.”
“They appeared to try to silence the split allegations with a PDA packed appearance at the ACM's.”
“Nicole Kidman and Keith Urban looked more loved up than ever before when attending the Country Music Awards in Las Vegas last week.”


"Follow Facebook, twitter, pinterest, Tumblr and instagram..."
"Send it to me tips@yahoo7.com.auWant More celebrity, entertainment and life news? "
"Now it is said that Keith has given his famous wife an ultimatum. It is said that he wants her to reduce the heavy workload or their marriage will be over."
"He really wants her to take time off so they can spend more time with their family," a person familiar with the matter told NW magazine
"He knew that if they worked hard, they could go back to where they were."
"Keith Urban is reported to have given his wife Nicole Kidman an ultimatum."
"The two took a group photo at the sag awards ceremony in January this year."
"Source: gettysince in March, the couple, who have been married for 12 years, have been rumored to be struggling. There are reports that they have" ended "and have met a divorce lawyer."
"They seem to be trying to quell the charge of division by having a person full of PDAs in ACM's office."
"Nicole Kidman and Keith Urban looked more popular than ever when they took part in the country music awards in Las Vegas last week."



Number  1142
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO: ‘Selma’ Cast Marches in Selma, Alabama...”
“Beginning with Chance the Rapper, 15 celebrities including Jennifer Lopez and Alicia Keys came together to each tweet a line from King’s iconic “I Have A Dream” speech.”
“Stars even collaborated their efforts.”
“'”Celebrities such as Neil Patrick Harris, Ciara and more also took to Twitter to honor King.”
“Honor him for being the great man that he was!”Former president Bill Clinton shared a famous quote from the activist: “Life’s most persistent and urgent question is, ‘What are you doing for others?”
“President-elect Donald Trump wrote, “Celebrate Martin Luther King Day and all of the many wonderful things that he stood for.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Twitter has also launched a #MLK emoji, which can be activated by using hashtags such as #MLK, #IHaveADream, #MLKDay, #MartinLutherKingJr, and #MartinLutherKing.”
“...to salute him and his legacy...”
“Fifteen celebrities including Jennifer Lopez and Alicia Keys came together to each tweet a line from King s iconic I Have A Dream speech Famous faces from the entertainment industry and politics honored civil rights leader Martin Luther King Jr on Monday taking to Twitter and other social media platforms...”


"Related video: 'Selma' actors march in Selma, Alabama..."
Starting with rapper chance, 15 celebrities, including Jennifer Lopez and Alicia case, came together to tweet a sentence from King's classic "I have a dream" speech
"The stars even work together."
"Celebrities like Neil Patrick Harris and Sheila also paid homage to the king on twitter."
"Respect him, because he is a great man! Former President Bill Clinton quoted a well-known quote from activists: "the most lasting and urgent problem in life is," what are you doing for others? "
President elect Donald Trump wrote: "celebrate Martin Luther King's day and all the good things he represents."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Twitter has also launched a mlk Emoji, which can be activated with tags such as mlk, ihavedream, mlkday, Martin Luther King Jr and Martin Luther King."
“… To him and his legacy... "
"Fifteen celebrities, including Jennifer Lopez and Alicia case, gathered on Monday to deliver" King's idol i have a dream speech "on Twitter and other social media platforms - Martin Luther King Jr., a prominent figure in entertainment and politics and civil rights leader



Number  1143
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A few months earlier the couple was sued by American Express for $87,000 in credit card debt and $260,000 in unpaid taxes.”
“Meanwhile, while that lawsuit was going on Dean was also being sued by his ex for $100,000 in owed child support.”
“Dean McDermott earned his net worth through his many roles in movies and TV.”
“He was born in Toronto, Ontario, Canada and is the husband of Tori Spelling.”
“McDermott reached the peak of his fame in the mid 1990's when he was considered to be the greatest screen heartthrob.”
“Having appeared in more than 30 movies and 15 TV productions, he is best known for his portrayal of Constable Turnbull on the TV series Due South (CTV, 1995-96) and for his intriguing performance in Lives of Girls and Women (CBC Television, 1994).”
“However, he first rose to fame for his whirlwind affair with actress Tori Spelling, which instantly hit the headlines since both of them were still married at the time.”
“Once they split from their spouses, Dean and Tori tied the knot a month after they met in 2006.”
“Next, the newlywed couple found fresh fame into the reality series Tori & Dean: Inn Love (Oxygen, 2007-08) and Tori & Dean: Home Sweet Hollywood (Oxygen, 2008- ).”
“The success of these two shows led McDermott to became a household name and to gain a whole new legion of fans.”


"A few months ago, the couple was sued by American Express for $87000 in credit card debt and $260000 in unpaid taxes."
Meanwhile, at the same time as the lawsuit, Dean was sued by his predecessor for $100000 in alimony
"Dean McDermott earned his net worth through many of his roles in film and television."
Born in Toronto, Ontario, Canada, he is Torry's husband
"McDermott reached the peak of his fame in the mid-1990s, when he was considered the greatest screen man of all time."
"He has appeared in more than 30 films and 15 TV works, most famous for his role as Constable Turnbull in the TV series due south (CTV, 1995-96) and his wonderful performance in the lives of girls and women (CBC, 1994)"
"However, he became famous for the first time because of his affair with actress Tori Sperling, which immediately made headlines because they were still married."
"Dean and tori broke up with their spouse a month after they met in 2006."
"Next, the newlyweds gained a new reputation in the reality TV series" Torrey and Dean: inn "(oxygen, 2007-08) and" Torrey and Dean: Hollywood house "(oxygen, 2008 -)."
"The success of these two shows has made McDermott a household name and won him a brand new legion of fans."



Number  1144
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“6 oz.”
“Star Fights With Pregnant Kylie Over What To Call DaughterKim Kardashian Baby Name Shocker!”
“Star Fights With Pregnant Kylie Over What To Call Daughter Find out what the new mom of three has chosen for a moniker.”
“What’s in a name?”
“Turns out a major fight, if you’re Kim Kardashian and Kylie Jenner!”
“RadarOnline.com has exclusively learned Kardashian — who just welcomed her 7 lb.”
“...baby girl via surrogate last night — and her 20-year-old pregnant sister had been battling over who gets to name their newborn daughter Love!”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Six ounces."
"Stars and pregnant Kelly fight over the name of their daughter, Kardashian baby!"
"The star quarrels with the pregnant Kelly and wants to know what the new mother of three has named her daughter."
"What's in the name?"
"If you're Kim Kardashian and Kelly Jenner, it's a big fight!"
“ RadarOnline.com The site has fully learned about Kardashian - who just welcomed her 7 pounds
“… The surrogate girl - and her 20-year-old pregnant sister - had been arguing about who could name their newborn daughter love last night
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”



Number  1145
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Empress shall bide her royal time and then Her Serene Highness shall order Minion Knox to do something absolutely horrible to Shiloh’s beloved, dead, stuffed pet bird.”
“The Empress is not pleased with this.”
“Thus, this week’s tabloid covers are going to be pretty boring – OK!”
“Magazine is running a Twihard fan-fiction story, and now Star is phoning it in with a silly “Suri Cruise vs. Shiloh Jolie-Pitt” story.”
“They released an excerpt, and I’m not really seeing how “the nannies” are telling us anything we don’t already know, except for the whole idea of Suri playing with diamonds.”
“Can you imagine giving a little girl a diamond to play with?”
“At just four years old, both Suri Cruise and Shiloh Jolie-Pitt are already living like Hollywood royalty.”
“But for the little princess and the rough and tumble tomboy, life couldn’t be more different!”
“One plays with diamonds, the other, with dead animals.”
“And who would know better about their polar opposite lives than the people who care for them?”


"The queen will wait for her royal time, and then her serene highness will order the slave Knox to do something absolutely terrible, Shiloh beloved, dead, filled with pet birds."
"The queen is not satisfied with that."
So this week's tabloid cover will be pretty boring - OK! "
The magazine is running a novel about a twihard fan, and now the star is calling it with a silly "Suri cruise vs. Shiloh Julie Pitt" story
"They published an excerpt. I really don't understand what nanny told us. We don't know what Suri thought of playing with diamonds."
"Can you imagine giving a little girl a diamond to play with?"
"Suri cruise and Shiloh Julie Pitt are only four years old and have already lived the life of Hollywood royalty."
"But for the little princess and the rough tomboy, life can't be different!"
"One plays with diamonds and the other with dead animals."
"Who else knows their opposite lives better than those who care about them?"



Number  1146
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Read more about Khloé and Tristan in the latest issue of In Touch on newsstands now!”
“She found it in her heart to forgive him.”
“Even though the reality star and NBA baller have officially returned to Los Angeles with their precious daughter, Tristan feels “dumped” since she’s not letting him move in with them.”
““She still wants him in her life, and she wants True to have a father,” a source tells In Touch exclusively.”
““He may not be the best boyfriend, but he’s a good father.”“She’d been planning to ask him to move in when she returned home from Cleveland with True,” our source explained.”
““But then the cheating scandal happened, and she had to rethink everything.”
“There obviously are trust issues now.”
“But Khloé still hasn’t kicked him to the curb.”
“She just doesn’t think it’s the right time for them to be moving in together.”It looks like Khloé is trying to put the drama behind her once and for all, as she was spotted out with the Cavaliers star on June 18.”
“Time will tell if they can work through their differences!”


"Now read more about Heroe and Tristan in the latest issue of contact at the newsstand."
"She wanted to forgive him."
"Although the reality star and NBA Ballerina have officially returned to Los Angeles with their baby daughter, Tristan feels dumped because she won't let him move in with them."
"She still wants him in her life and she wants to really have a father," a source told exclusive in contact
"He may not be the best boyfriend, but he is a good father." "When she brought true home from Cleveland, she had been planning for him to move in," our source explained
"But then the cheating scandal happened and she had to rethink everything."
"There is obviously a problem of trust now."
"But Heroe still didn't kick him to the side of the road."
"She just doesn't think it's the right time for them to move together." It seems that Heroe is trying to put the play behind her because she was found with the Cavaliers star on June 18
"Time will tell us if they can overcome their differences!"



Number  1147
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Rihanna and Hassan are the real deal?”
“Rihanna’s romantic getaway was the first time she was spotted with a new man since she and Drake, 30, split in Oct. 2016.”
“No.”
“First comes money, then comes marriage, according to a new report, which claims Rihanna and Hassan Jameel headed to the alter!”
“But, they’re reportedly protecting their massive fortunes first.”
“The first sign of true love and trust is an iron-clad prenup, right?”
“Well, according to a new report, both Rihanna, 29, and her new rumored boyfriend, Hassan Jameel, 29, are in the midst of planning a wedding!”
“However, business is business.”
““Everything is moving so fast, but right now the priority is working out their individual assets with their attorneys in order to write up an ironclad contract,” a source tells Life & Style magazine.”
“So, what numbers are we exactly working with, here?”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Rihanna and Hassan are real?"
"Rihanna's romantic getaway is the first time she has been found with a new man since she broke up with Drake, 30, in October 2016."
"No
"First money, then marriage, according to a new report, claiming that Rihanna and Hassan Jamil are going to the altar!"
"But it's reported that they have to protect their huge wealth first."
"The first sign of true love and trust is a firm prenuptial agreement, right?"
"Well, according to a new report, Rihanna, 29, and her rumored new boyfriend, Hassan Jamil, 29, are planning a wedding!"
"Business, however, is business."
"It's going so fast, but the priority now is to work with lawyers to identify their personal assets in order to draft a solid contract," a source told life and fashion magazine
"So, what numbers are we using?"



Number  1148
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share it in the comments below.”
“"You could cut the tension with a knife at the Oscars.”
“Looks like Reese Witherspoon is allegedly 'furious' with her long-time best friend Nicole Kidman.”
“New Idea claims that the Legally Blonde star is unhappy with her Australian, Big Little Lies co-star's failure to promote the HBO series in the run-up to its debut in February, claiming that Nicole used too much of her airtime to discuss her latest Hollywood hit, Lion.”
“"Reese is furious that Nicole hasn't done more to support Big Little Lies.”
“All she talked about in the interviews was Lion.”
“Had Reese known that Nicole would put the show so far on the back-burner, she would have cast some random person in the show," Daily Mail quoted a source as saying.”
“Red carpet roundup: Golden girls at Oscars 2017In Australia, Big Little Lies' debut outranked any HBO series broadcast on Foxtel in a launch week, more than doubling the audience that tuned in to see Game of Thrones' first-ever episode.”
“But New Idea suggests that it's the underwhelming reception in her own home country that has left Reese disappointed.”
“Reese is one of the executive producers for the show after all.”


"Please share in the comments below."
"At the Oscars, you can use a knife to ease the tension."
"It seems that Reese Witherspoon is said to be" angry "with her long-time best friend Nicole Kidman."
"New ideas" claimed that the blonde actress was dissatisfied with her Australian co star "little lies" not being promoted before the HBO TV series premiere in February, and claimed that Nicole spent too much time discussing her latest Hollywood hit film "the lion"
"Reese was angry that Nicole didn't do more to support the lies, big and small."
"All she said in the interview was lions."
"If Reese knows Nicole is going to put the show on hold, she'll put some people on the show at random," the Daily Mail quoted a source as saying
"Red carpet review: golden boy and girl at the 2017 Australian Academy Awards, the premiere of big lie surpassed any HBO series broadcasted by Fox in a week, and the number of viewers watching the first episode of game of Thrones more than doubled."
"But the new idea shows that it was the cold reception in her own country that disappointed Reese."
"Reese is, after all, one of the executive producers of the show."



Number  1149
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(It was a short-term lease.)”
“Bieber has rented in Beverly Hills before, taking up residence in a $59,000-a-month glass house that looks a bit like a glamorous salad spinner.”
“He’s rented quarters in the hotel “for up to a year,” says Page Six.”
“Cast out of the Bev Hills rental market, poor Bieber has been forced to move into an unidentified posh hotel in the neighborhood.”
“Bieber is reportedly offering well over the asking rent—up to $100,000 a month—and still no one has rented him any of the places he’s interested in.”
“...to Justin The Canadian pop star is better known for upsetting his neighbors with dangerous driving and random eggings than for his house destroying parties but whatever the reason Beverly Hills residents really don t want him in their hood...”
“An unnamed real estate agent told Page Six that Bieber wants to rent a big estate but many of the owners of the big Beverly Hills properties which are for rent have clubbed together to agree that nobody should rent...”
“Page Six reports that Beverly Hills landowners have banded together to reject Bieber from renting a house in the neighborhood.”
“Justin Bieber’s reputation as a party-loving house-trasher and terrible neighbor is biting him in the butt.”


"(this is a short term lease)"
"Bieber used to rent a house in Beverly Hills. He lived in a glass house with a monthly rent of 59000 dollars. It looks like a charming salad spinning machine."
"He rented a dormitory in a hotel for a year," says page 6
"Being driven out of the Beverly Hills rental market, poor Bieber was forced to move into an unidentified luxury hotel nearby."
"It's reported that Bieber's rent is much higher than the asking price, as high as $100000 a month, but no one has rented him any place he is interested in."
“…… For Justin, the Canadian pop star is known for dangerous driving and random egging on neighbors, not for his house wrecking parties, but for whatever reason, Beverly Hills residents really don't want him to wear a hat... "
"An unnamed real estate agent told page 6 that Bieber wanted to rent a big property, but many owners of the rental property in Beverly Hills gathered together and agreed that no one should rent..."
"Page six reports that the landowners of Beverly Hills united to refuse Bieber to rent a house nearby."
"Justin Bieber is a party loving family wrecker and terrible neighbor, and his reputation is in his heart."



Number  1150
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“Do you think that Brad and Neri make a good couple?”
““Brad already has the keys to her apartment and they are getting very serious,” a source told Radar.”
“...revealed that Pitt and Oxman have been practically living together for almost a month in her luxury condo in Cambridge...”
“Pitt who has yet to finalize his divorce from ex wife Angelina Jolie has become infatuated with Oxman and has even referred to her as the sexiest woman he s ever met As Radar previously reported after the pair were spotted numerous times together on the MIT campus a source...”
““She has been on cloud nine!”“The two were trying to keep their romance under wraps, but Brad is not concerned with being discreet about it anymore,” added the source.”
““Neri is planning a vacation with Brad after this semester is finished,” a source close to the stunning Massachusetts-based brunette said.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Voice in the comments below."
"Do you think Brad and Nelly are a good couple?"
"Brad already has the key to her apartment and they're getting very serious," a source told radar
“…… It is revealed that Peter and Oxman have been living together in a luxury apartment in Cambridge for nearly a month... "
"Pete has not yet divorced his ex-wife Angelina Jolie. He has become infatuated with Oxman and even calls her the sexiest woman he has ever seen. As radar reported earlier, they were found together many times on the MIT campus, a source of information..."
"She's always been out of the blue! "The two tried to cover up their relationship, but Brad was not worried about being more cautious in that regard," the source added
"Nery plans to spend a holiday with Brad at the end of the semester," said a source close to the glamorous Massachusetts brunette



Number  1151
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Trust me, these two won’t be touring together again — they might not even be speaking after this.””
“...money to spend for basically half a show from the artist you want to see...”
“With ticket sales this slow they will be lucky to break even Mariah Carey Cut From Film As Stars Blast Diva Behavior His fans are not into her and her fans are not into him 140 is a lot of...”
““Lionel and Mariah’s show was meant to be a blockbuster summer tour, but it’s turning out to be anything but,” one insider told The National ENQUIRER‘s Rob Shuter.”
“Mariah Carey joined forces with Lionel Richie for what was supposed to be a monster tour, but fans aren’t flocking to their shows — causing tickets to be reduced from $140 to a paltry 30 bucks!”


"Believe me, these two people will never tour together again - they may not even talk in the future."
“… The artists you want to see basically spend half the money for the performance... "
"Because ticket sales are so slow, they will be lucky to break Mariah Carey's cut from the movie as a star after blasting behavior. His fans don't like her and her fans don't like him. 140 is a lot..."
"Lionel and Maria's performance was supposed to be a big summer tour, but it didn't turn out to be," an industry source told rob Shute of the National Enquirer
Mariah Carey and Lionel Ritchie joined forces on what was supposed to be a devil's journey, but fans didn't rush in - which reduced tickets from $140 to a paltry $30! "



Number  1152
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“One day later, he and his ex Angelina Jolie released a joint statement stating that they have reached an agreement to handle their divorce privately and keep details confidential.”
““And this is when he’s at MY house!!!”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The Rules of Engagement actor took to Instagram on Friday to jokingly vent about Brad Pitt reportedly living at his home, saying "He's messy as s---"Oliver Hudson has a bone to pick with Brad Pitt.”
“The Rules of Engagement actor took to Instagram on Friday to jokingly unleash a massive list of fake grievances he has against Pitt.”
“The motivation for the hilarious rant was the cover of a tabloid that claimed — with zero evidence — that his sister, actress Kate Hudson, is dating the Ocean’s Eleven star.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He drinks out of the f— carton and he leaves the door open when he’s taking a dump!”
“!” the 40-year-old actor jokingly vented.”
“He s already calling me brother and has driven a wedge between myself and my real brother Wyatt who now won t speak to me Oliver went on to write even his mother Overboard star Goldie Hawn was overtly flirting with him going around wearing these little nighties around the...”


A day later, he and his predecessor, Angelina Jolie, issued a joint statement that they had reached an agreement to deal with the divorce in private and to keep the details secret
"This is when he comes to my house!"
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Engagement rules" actor joked on instagram last Friday about Brad Pitt's home, saying "he's as sloppy as s -" Oliver Hudson and Brad Pitt have a bone to pick
The "rules of engagement" actor jokingly posted on instagram on Friday a large list of his false dissatisfaction with Pitt
"The funny motive is a tabloid cover claiming - without any evidence - that his sister, actress Kate Hudson, is dating ocean eleven."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He drinks from the f-carton and leaves the door open when he takes out the garbage!"
"!" the 40 year old actor let out a joke. "
"He has already called me brother, and separated me from my real brother Wyatt. Wyatt doesn't talk to me now. Oliver wrote an article and even his mother's foreign movie star Goldie horn openly flirted with him. He was wearing these pajamas in Walking around. "



Number  1153
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She famously dated her Vampire Diaries costar Ian Somerhalder until they split in 2013.”
“According to a source, the exes realized that “they make better best friends than they do partners.”Dobrev, who was spotted at Coachella’s Neon Carnival on Saturday, April 16, was last linked to Austin Stowell.”
“As previously reported by Us in February, the “Chained to the Rhythm” singer and Bloom decided to press pause on their relationship after more than a year together.”
“The rumor of a romance between them comes after Bloom’s recent split from Katy Perry.”
“A source tells Us Weekly that the Vampire Diaries alum and Pirates of the Caribbean actor are just friends.”
“Nina Dobrev and Orlando Bloom are not dating, contrary to recent reports.”
“Nope, not happening.”


"She dated her partner in the vampire diaries, Ian summerhold, until she broke up in 2013."
According to a source, the two ex girlfriends realized that "their best friend is better than their partner.". Dobrev, who was found at the neon Carnival in cochella on Saturday, April 16, is in contact with Austin Stowell for the last time
"As we reported earlier in February, the beat bound singer and bloom decided to suspend their relationship after more than a year together."
"After Bloom's recent breakup with Katie Perry, there have been rumors of romance between them."
"A source told us that alum of the vampire diaries and the Pirates of the Caribbean actors are just friends."
"Contrary to recent reports, Nina Dobrev and Orlando Bloom are not dating."
"No, it can't be."



Number  1154
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel below!”
“As you’ll recall, Kanye released his song, “Famous,” in which he rapped, “I feel like me and Taylor might still have sex.”
“Kim Kardashian could take a major loss when Taylor Swift drops her new song at midnight tonight, and Beyonce is ‘curious’ to see what happens if she does.”
““Beyonce is curious to see what Taylor [Swift] may have in store for Kim Kardashian, as Taylor’s about to drop some new music.”
“Kim could take a major L when Taylor drops her new song and Beyonce is intrigued by it all.”
“Beyonce has always been a fan of Taylor’s music and will be grabbing some popcorn tonight to watch the eruption of diss track drama, which may ensue online with Taylor’s new song,” a source close to Beyonce tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“As Taylor previously announced, she’ll be dropping the first single from her forthcoming new album (Reputation) at midnight tonight!”
“At this time little is known about the sure to be epic new track but rumors claim it s called Timeless And based on Taylor s history with subtly dissing people in her songs there s a good chance she may clap back at Kim and Kanye West for trying...”
“...to annihilate her after the 2016 Grammy Awards...”
“Why?”


"Tell us how you feel!"
As you can remember, Kanye released his song "fame," in which he rapped, "I think Tyler and I might still have sex."
"When Taylor Swift gives up her new song at midnight tonight, Kim Kardashian may suffer a lot. Beyonce is curious about what will happen if she gives up her new song."
"Beyonce would like to see what Taylor (Swift) has prepared for Kim Kardashian, because Taylor is about to introduce some new music."
"When Taylor gives up her new song and Beyonce is interested in all this, king can choose l major."
A source close to Beyonce told reporters: "Beyonce has always been a fan of Taylor's music. Tonight, she will grab some popcorn to watch the explosion of diss, which may follow Taylor's new songs on the Internet." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"As Taylor announced earlier, she will remove the first single from her upcoming album (reputation) at midnight tonight!"
"At this time, few people know for sure the epic new repertoire, but the rumor is that it's called eternal and Taylor's history with subtle dissidents in her songs has a good chance that she might film back Kim and Kanye West trying to..."
“… Kill her after the 2016 Grammy Awards... "
"Why?"



Number  1155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow Be on Facebook, Twitter, Pinterest, Tumblr and Instagram...”
“Send it to tips@yahoo7.com.auWant more celebrity, entertainment and lifestyle news?”
“Got a story tip?”
“Be has reached out to Brad's representatives for comment.”
“The former couple are allegedlyWhile Jen issued a statement to announce her separation from Justin, 46, in February, insisting they were still "two best friends who have decided to part ways as a couple, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship."”
“Brad, 54, is in the midst of divorce proceedings from his wife of 10 years Angelina Jolie.”
“Source: GettyWhile it's not super clear exactly what this new working relationship will entail, the friend — who is quoted as having known the pair for years — added that getting their romance back on track would be a 'fairytale.'”
“The pair are pictured here together in 2017.”
“Jen married actor Justin Theroux in 2015 after four years of dating but recently announced their split.”
“"There's talk of merging their business interests again, plus there's obvious chemistry between them that never really went away," they added.”


"Follow Facebook, twitter, pinterest, Tumblr and instagram..."
"Send it to me tips@yahoo7.com.auWant More celebrity, entertainment and life news? "
"Any news?"
"Bay has contacted Brad's representative for advice."
"The first two have been charged, and Jennifer announced in February that they were separated from Justin, 46, insisting that they are still" two good friends who decided to break up, but look forward to continuing our cherished friendship. "
Brad, 54, is in divorce proceedings with his wife of 10 years, Angelina Jolie
"Source: although it's not clear what this new working relationship will bring, this friend - who, according to reports, has known the couple for many years - added that it would be a 'fairy tale' to get their relationship back on track."
"The two took a picture here in 2017."
"After four years of dating, Jennifer married actor Justin serrux in 2015, but recently announced her break-up."
They added: "it's been said that they're going to merge commercial interests again, and that the obvious chemical reaction between them never really disappeared."



Number  1156
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Cardi B runs out of breath during Coachella performance as she jokes about how she got pregnantMORE : Justin Bieber dances like no one’s watching at Coachella following ‘altercation’”
“The 28-year-old and her former Twilight co-star were allegedly spotted by fans having a drink together at a bar in California.”
“They have been dating ever since 2015, but only revealed they were an item a whole year after rumours started to circulate that they were seeing each other.”
“However, despite the hush around their romance, all of this seems to have gone out of the window at Coachella, as the pair are spotted putting on a passionate display of PDA.”
“What happens at Coachella stays at Coachella, right?”
“The couple had been hanging out with friends all day, but it looks like they’d been able to sneak away from the crowds and grab a moment alone as they were pictured together perched under a tree.”
“The pair have been dating since 2015 and generally keep their relationship under wraps (Picture: MEGA)While enjoying each other’s company, the pair shared a kiss before heading back off to the festival to enjoy the rest of Saturday’s evening.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementThis photo has emerged after Kristen was rumoured to be meeting up with her ex flame Robert Pattinson.”
“Five years after their massively public split, onlookers took to Twitter to share the news that they had finally reconciled.”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”


"More: Katie B was out of breath in cochella's performance because she joked that she was pregnant more: Justin Bieber danced after cochella's" quarrel "as if no one was watching"
"The 28 year old actress and her former" Twilight "co star are said to have been spotted by fans drinking together in a California bar."
"They've been dating since 2015, but it wasn't until there were rumors all year that they were dating that they revealed that they were a partner."
"However, despite the calm of their relationship, it all seems to have disappeared from kocera's window, as people see the couple enthusiastically displaying their PDAs."
"What happened in kocera stays in kocera, right?"
"The couple spent the whole day with friends, but when they were photographed perching together under a tree, they seemed to be able to slip away from the crowd and seize the time alone."
"They have been dating since 2015, and generally keep their relationship secret (photo: Mega). While enjoying each other's company, they share a kiss before going back to the film festival and enjoy the rest of Saturday night."
"The ad photo came after Christine was said to have met with her ex lover Robert Pattinson."
"Five years after their massive public breakup, onlookers tweeted that they had finally reconciled."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "



Number  1157
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Subscribe now to keep up with the latest in movies, television and music.”
“WANT MORE EW?”
“See other messages below from Mariah Carey, John Stamos, Ariel Winter, Dolly Parton, Queen Latifah, and more.”
“...in on the fun sharing photos of fan made Hamileggs...”
“Reese Witherspoon is among those who decorated eggs Taylor Swfit had an egg battle with hers and Madonna captioned a photo with a cheeky Don t Put All Your Eggs In One Basket Even the smash Broadway musical Hamilton got...”
“Celebrities got into the Easter spirit over the holiday weekend, sharing holiday wishes with fans on social media and posting photos of their own celebrations.”


"Subscribe now to learn about the latest movies, TV and music."
"Want more?"
"Please refer to other messages from Maria Kelly, John Stamos, Ariel winter, Dolly Patton, Queen Latifa, etc. below."
“… In fun to share photos of fan made legs... "
"Reese Witherspoon is one of those who decorate eggs, Taylor swfit and her egg fight, and Madonna added a cheeky title to a picture: don't put all your eggs in one basket, even for the Broadway musical what Hamilton got..."
"Celebrities have embraced the spirit of Easter over the holiday weekend, shared holiday blessings with fans on social media and posted photos of their celebrations."



Number  1158
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They first announced their engagement in 2012, split in 2013, then got back together in 2015.”
“If true, this is hardly the first time the couple has split — or called off a wedding.”
“A source reportedly told OK!”
“Australia on Thursday that the couple couldn't agree on when to have children.”
“While the article appears to have since been taken down, the news has spread like wildfire.”
“The rumours come after Cyrus deleted all of her Instagram posts last week.”
“Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth have reportedly called off their wedding yet again — and it's apparently because of a disagreement over when to have kids.”
“OK!”
“Australia reportedly published the news on Thursday after a source told the site that 28-year-old Hemsworth was keen to become a dad, while 25-year-old Cyrus wasn't ready.”
“While the article appears to have since been taken down, the news has spread like wildfire and has since been reported by the likes of The Daily Mail, The Sun, and the Evening Standard.”


"They announced their engagement in 2012, broke up in 2013, and then got back together in 2015."
"If it's true, it's not the first time the couple have broken up - or cancelled their wedding."
"According to reports, a source said," OK! "
"Australia announced on Thursday that the couple could not agree on when to have a baby."
"Although this article seems to have been removed later, the news spread like wildfire."
"These rumors came after Cyrus deleted all her posts on instagram last week."
"Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth are reported to have cancelled their wedding again - apparently because of differences over when to have a baby."
"All right!"
According to reports, Australia released the news on Thursday after a source told the website that 28 year old Hemsworth was eager to become a father, while 25-year-old Cyrus was not ready
"Although this article seems to have been deleted, the news has spread like wildfire and has been reported by the daily mail, the sun and the evening news."



Number  1159
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The man's not exactly your typical divorced, 54-year-old father of six.”
“He's still working as much as ever, and something tells us he's not having a hard time in the female department.”
“Pitt got sober after decades of substance abuse; he re-foucused his energies on being the best father he could be; and he worked with Jolie to hammer out a mutually amicable co-parenting relationship.”
“But according to the folks at Life & Style, not all of the changes in Pitt's life were quite so beneficial.”
“The tabloid claims that the emotional toll taken by the divorce left its marks on Pitt's famous face--and the 54-year-old responded by taking corrective action.”
“A plastic surgeon--who, of course, has not actually treated Brad--examined some "before and after" photos, and--surprise, surprise--his professional opinion is that Pitt has totes gone under the knife.”
“"His forehead looks smoother, so most likely he got Botox," says Dr. Steve Fallek, a Jersey-based surgeon.”
“"He also looks to have had some filler in the cheeks and around the mouth to improve those lines, a laser or peel to improve skin texture, and maybe some filler in the lower eye area."”
“Not surprisingly, the folks at L&S were also able to dig up an anonymous source willing to "confirm" that Brad got his face overhauled.”
“"He went to a Beverly Hills plastic surgeon this year and got fillers and Botox and some eye work,"Â an "insider" tells the tabloid.”


"This man is not your typical divorced, 54 year old father of six."
"He still works as usual, and in a way, his days in the women's department are not hard."
"Pete became sober after decades of drug abuse; he refocused on being the best father; he and Julie worked together to build a friendly parenting relationship."
"But not all the changes in Pete's life are so beneficial," according to the Lifestyle Association
"The tabloid claimed that the emotional loss caused by the divorce left a mark on Pitt's famous face - Pitt, 54, took corrective measures."
A plastic surgeon - who, of course, did not treat Brad - examined some "front and back" photos, and - unexpectedly, unexpectedly - his professional view was that Pete had a knife through his hand
"His forehead looks smoother, so it's probably Botox," said Dr. Steve farek, a New Jersey surgeon
"He looks like he's also using some padding around his cheeks and mouth to improve wrinkles, using lasers or peeling to improve the texture of his skin, and maybe some padding around his lower eyelids."
Not surprisingly, L & s colleagues also found an anonymous source willing to "confirm" that Brad's face had been facelift
"He went to the plastic surgeons in Beverly Hills this year, got implants and Botox injections, and had some eye surgery," one "insider" told the tabloid



Number  1160
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1161
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel for fun, exclusive videos with your favorite stars.”
“If any other fans out there are still having issues streaming “Sign of the Times” deleting then reinstalling the Spotify app should be enough to resolve the issue.”
“Everyone who wanted to hear the song or have it on repeat all day after it s release was able to do so but for a select group of fans who were hoping to stream the track on Spotify they soon realized that searching for the song brought them zero...”
“...results...”
“It wasn't available!”
“No, this wasn’t a case of Spotify snubbing Hazza, them not having the rights to stream the track, or even the fault of the One Direction singer's camp.”
“Turns out a technical glitch on the streaming giant's side prevented fans from finding the song when they search for Harry’s catalog, and from it even being a part of the streaming service’s New Music Friday playlist for a couple of hours.”
“RELATED See the Best Fan Reactions to Sign of the Times Spotify released an official statement to Variety regarding the issue once it had been resolved that reads There should be no further issue though users unable to play this track need to reinstall the Spotify application to remove the...”
“...cache There you have it...”
“The music service also sent out a tweet once the issue that had been resolved that said, "Hey @Harry_Styles fans, sorry if you had trouble playing this, but here it is now," and linked fans directly to his artist page.”


"Be sure to subscribe to our YouTube channel and watch interesting exclusive videos with your favorite stars."
"If there are other fans who still have problems with the deletion of time, then re installing the spotify app will be enough to solve the problem."
"Anyone who wants to hear this song or repeat it all day after it's released can do it, but for those fans who want to play it on spotify, they soon realize that searching for this song brings them zero..."
“… Results... "
"No!"
"No, it's not the case of spotify ignoring Hazza. They don't have the right to play songs, or even the fault of the one-way singer camp."
"It turned out that a technical failure of the streaming giant made fans unable to find the song when they searched the Harry Potter catalog. Even within a few hours, the song could not be part of the new music Friday play list launched by the streaming service."
"Please see time's best fan reaction. Spotify has issued an official statement to variety that once the problem is solved, there will be no more problems, although users who can't play the track need to re install the spotify app to remove it..."
“… Hide it... "
"After the problem was solved, the music service department also sent a microblog, which said," Hey @ Harry Yan styles fans, if you have trouble playing this, I'm sorry, but here it is now, "and directly linked the fans to his artists page."



Number  1162
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Seacrest also serves on the board of the Los Angeles County Museum of Art (LACMA) and as honorary chair of the Grammy Foundation.”
“Live from the Red Carpet” award shows, Bravo’s “Shahs of Sunset,” and CMT’s “I Love Kellie Pickler.” Additionally, RSP produces “Shades of Blue,” an NBC drama series starring Jennifer Lopez.”
“His entrepreneurial interests have led to his involvement in a diverse range of media and entertainment companies, while his philanthropic efforts—focused on youth-oriented initiatives—are having a significant impact nationwide.”
“On radio, Seacrest is host of “On Air with Ryan Seacrest,” his market-topping #1 nationally-syndicated LA morning drive-time show for iHeart Media’s 102.7 KIIS-FM, as well as a nationally-syndicated Top 40 radio show.”
“He is also host and executive producer of ABC’s annual New Year’s Eve program, “Dick Clark’s New Year’s Rockin’ Eve with Ryan Seacrest” and “E!”
“Live from the Red Carpet” award shows.”
“Seacrest launched Ryan Seacrest Productions (RSP) in 2006, which has since become an Emmy-winning entertainment production powerhouse creating unscripted, scripted and digital programming.”
“RSP produces the E!”
“...hit cable series “Keeping Up with the Kardashians” and its spin-offs, as well as “E!”
“The company produced the Emmy Award-winning reality series “Jamie Oliver’s Food Revolution.”As an entrepreneur, Seacrest has investments in media and entertainment companies including Civic Entertainment Group, a marketing services company, Pinterest, and attn:, a news media company targeted at millennials through Seacrest Global Group.”


"Seacrest is also a board member of the Los Angeles County Museum of Art (LACMA) and honorary chairman of the Grammy Foundation."
"Red carpet live" award shows, Bravo's "sunset king" and CMT's "I love Kelly picker.". In addition, RSP also produced the NBC TV series "blue shadow" starring Jennifer Lopez
"His entrepreneurial interests have enabled him to participate in a variety of media and entertainment companies, and his focus on youth oriented philanthropy is making a significant impact across the country."
"On the radio, Seacrest hosts" with Ryan Seacrest ", which is the first national joint show in the Los Angeles morning driving time market for iHeart media's 102.7 kiis-fm program, as well as the national joint top 40 radio program."
He's also on ABC's annual New Year's Eve shows "Dick Clark and Ryan Seacrest's new year's Eve" and "E!"
"Red carpet live" award ceremony
"Seacrest launched Ryan Seacrest Productions (RSP) in 2006, which later became an Emmy award-winning entertainment production giant, creating scriptless, scripted and digital programs."
"RSP produces e!"
“… The hit cable series "keep up with Kardashian" and its derivatives, and "E!"
The company produced the Emmy award-winning reality TV series Jamie Oliver's food revolution. As an entrepreneur, Seacrest has invested in media and entertainment companies, including marketing service companies such as civic entertainment group, pinterest and news media company Attn, which targets millennials through Seacrest global group



Number  1163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ pic.twitter.com/lGN4PQNayv — People Magazine (@people) April 17, 2017”
“Image Credit: FameFlynetHappy birthday Jennifer Garner!”
“Let us know your thoughts in the comments below and don’t forget to check CDL for more Jennifer Garner news and updates.”
“Is Ben Affleck texting the nanny Christine Ouzounian again, and is Jennifer Garner really pregnant with twins and ‘all alone’?”
“What do you guys think?”
“And soon enough, Jennifer won’t even let him help her with her ‘pregnancy’, and before long, he’ll stop being able to see his children (and his alleged soon-to-be newborn twins) as much as he wants.”
“After all that work, and when he’s finally on the upswing, he would be shooting himself in the foot if he started texting the nanny again, even if it’s a gut reaction to the divorce and his loneliness.”
“His career is still recovering from the critical panning of his last few films, and he’s been working hard to re-cultivate his image of a good dad and Decent Human Being, especially after the nanny drama sent his public image into the gutter.”
“However, it’s difficult to believe that Ben Affleck would be this self-destructive, especially so soon after his last bout of self-destructiveness.”
“But now, if he really is back in touch with the nanny (a big if), he’s set to mess up even the peaceful co-parenting and the ‘amicable’ nature of his relationship with Jennifer, possibly risking his future with Jen and his children.”


“  pic.twitter.com/lGN4PQNayv -People magazine (@ people) April 17, 2017
Photo source: Happy Birthday to fameflynet Jennifer Garner
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below. Don't forget to check CDL for more news and updates about Jennifer Garner."
"Is Ben Affleck texting Paul Christina uzunian again, and is Jennifer Garner really pregnant with twins and" alone "
"What do you think?"
"And very soon, Jennifer won't even let him" get pregnant "for her. Soon, he won't be able to visit his children (and his so-called twins) as he likes."
"After so much work, when he finally gets better, if he starts texting his nanny again, even his instinctive reaction to divorce and loneliness will hurt his feet."
"His career is still recovering from the critical gold rush of recent films, and he has been trying to reshape his image as a good father and decent person, especially after nanny drama pushed his public image to the gutter."
"However, it's hard to believe that Ben Affleck would be so self destructive, especially so soon after his last self destruction."
"But now, if he does get in touch with the nanny (a big if), he will even make a mess of the peaceful way of CO parenting and his" friendly "relationship with Jennifer, which may endanger his future with Jennifer and his children."



Number  1164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch the video above.”
“Please share.” Gossip Cop will continue to update as more celebrities react to Kimmel’s comments on the Las Vegas shooting.”
“Please watch.”
“Thank you, @jimmykimmel.” Will Arnett tweeted, “@jimmykimmel says what needs to be said.” And Alyssa Milano, who shared the link to Kimmel’s monologue on her Twitter account, expressed, “Good morning!”
“...call to action...”
“Because it is it is so crazy Among those commenting on the late night host s powerful and emotional monologue is Rosie O Donnell who said Jimmy Kimmel is an American hero watch his Emotional Monologue About The Mass Shooting In Las Vegas useURvoice Olivia Wilde similarly wrote A powerful...”
“They should be praying for God to forgive them for letting the gun lobby run this country.”
“Our forefathers wanted us to have AK47s, is the argument.”And before showing the faces of the 56 senators who voted against new and tighter gun laws just days after the shooting in Orlando last year, Kimmel said, “They should be praying.”
“Because [of] the Second Amendment.”
“But when an American buys a gun and kills other Americans, then there’s nothing we can do about that.”


"Watch the video above."
"Please share." As more and more celebrities respond to Kimmel's comments on the Las Vegas shooting, the scandal police will continue to update
"Attention, please."
"Thank you, @ jimmykimel." Will Arnett tweeted that "@ jimmykimel said what he needed to say." Eliza Milano shared a link to Kimmel's monologue on her twitter account, saying, "good morning!"
“… Call to action... "
"Because it's so crazy, in those comments late at night, the host's powerful and emotional monologue is Rosie O'Donnell, who says that Jimmy Kimmel is an American hero. Watch his emotional monologue about the mass shooting in Las Vegas, our voice Olivia Wilde also wrote a powerful..."
"They should pray that God will forgive them for letting the gun lobby run the country."
"Our ancestors wanted us to have AK47, which is an argument." Before showing the faces of 56 senators who voted against a new, stricter gun law a few days after last year's shooting in Orlando, Kimmel said: "they should pray."
"Because of the second amendment."
"But when an American buys a gun and kills other Americans, there's nothing we can do."



Number  1165
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comment below, let us know!”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — What do YOU think about Katie and Jamie finally going public with their relationship?”
“We can only hope!”
“Maybe a red carpet debut is coming up next?”
“While they still haven’t spoken out, the pictures of them holding hands during a romantic beach stroll speaks volumes.”
“Despite the rumors and reports, Katie and Jamie always stayed mum — until now.”
“As previously mentioned, the secret wasn’t exactly well-kept as reports claimed for years that the two were a pair.”
“We are so happy to hear that Katie and Jamie feel so secure in their longtime romance.”
“Our insider also added that, “The timing is right for them to take the relationship out from the shadows as they are truly, confident, secure with their relationship and totally in love.” Isn’t that sweet?”
““Most of the important people in their lives have known about them for a long time and they felt they were tired of living a lie to the rest of the world.” Make sure you click here to see the first pictures of Katie and Jamie holding hands!”


"The comments are as follows, let us know!"
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - what do you think of Katie and Jamie finally making their relationship public?"
"We can only hope!"
"Maybe there will be a red carpet show next?"
"Although they haven't made a statement yet, the photos of them walking hand in hand on the romantic beach are enough to illustrate the problem."
"Despite rumors and reports, Katie and Jamie have been silent - until now."
"As mentioned earlier, the secret has not been kept as well as it has been reported for many years. The two are a couple."
"We're glad to hear that Katie and Jamie feel so secure in their long-term relationship."
Our insider added: "it's time for them to come out of the shadows, because they are real, confident, secure in their relationship, totally in love." Isn't that sweet? "
"Most of the important people in their lives have known them for a long time, and they feel tired of lying to the rest of the world." Be sure to click here to see the first picture of Katie and Jamie holding hands! "



Number  1166
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Gossip Cop quickly debunked these claims.”
“According to NBC News, Angelina filed documents in a Los Angeles court on Tuesday that accused Brad of failing to pay any ‘meaningful’ child support during their divorce battle.”
“According to Hollywood Life, the former Friends actress feels terrible for her former husband.”
“She’s struggling to imagine the pain he’s feeling as a father separated from his children.”
“A source told Hollywood Life: ‘Jen is feeling horrible for the fight Brad is involved in over custody of the kids with Angelina.”
“Jen can’t imagine what it must be like to fight with someone as powerful as Angelina over your own kids.”
“Jennifer Aniston is rumored to be standing by ex husband Brad Pitt s side through his battle with Angelina Jolie for custody of their children Angelina Jolie filed documents with a court on Tuesday alleging that estranged husband Brad Pitt hasn t paid any meaningful child support since they split...”
“...in 2016 Knowing Brad as well as she does Jen is in agony over the pain Brad must be going through fighting with his ex just to be with his own kids...”
“Jen thinks it’s shameful that Angelina cannot be more mature, put the kids needs first, and compromise with Brad on this important decision.’Brad, 54, and Angelina called off their marriage in September 2016.”
“They have been living separately and moving on with their lives, but are still struggling to reach an agreement related to custody.”


"The gossip police quickly debunk these claims."
"Angelina filed a filing with a Los Angeles court on Tuesday accusing Brad of not paying any 'meaningful' child support in the divorce dispute, NBC News reported
"According to Hollywood life, this ex friend's actress feels sorry for her ex husband."
"She's trying to imagine the pain a father feels when he's separated from his child."
"A source told Hollywood Life:" Jane is horrified by Brad and Angelina's fight for custody of the child. "
"Jane can't imagine fighting with someone as powerful as Angelina for her children."
"It is said that Jennifer Aniston has been on the side of her ex husband Brad Pitt in her fight for child custody with Angelina Jolie. Angelina Jolie filed a file with the court on Tuesday accusing her separated husband Brad Pitt of not paying any meaningful child support since the separation..."
“…… In 2016, Jen, who knows Brad as well as her, is suffering from Brad's fight with her ex boyfriend in order to be with her children.... "
"Jennifer thinks Angelina can't grow up any more. It's shameful to put the needs of her children first and compromise with Brad on this important decision." Brad and Angelina, 54, canceled their marriage in September 2016
"They have been separated and continue to live, but are still trying to reach an agreement on custody."



Number  1167
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More on Gossip Cop:Jennifer Aniston did NOT throw Justin Theroux's things in trash despite reportRihanna thinking babies with Hassan Jameel is made-upDo Katy Perry's friends want her to dump Orlando Bloom for Jake Gyllenhaal?”
“This latest story claiming Prince was supposed to play a part in the singer's Man of the Woods tour is equally bogus.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk this bogus story.”
“We're told it's simply not true.”
“PG / Splash NewsLast month, Prince fans criticized Timberlake on social media for incorporating the late singer into his Super Bowl halftime show.”
“During the set, Timberlake created a duet with Prince by performing his song "I Would Die 4 U" alongside a giant projection of the late artist.”
“Many fans of Prince believed the use of his image was in poor taste and not something the late musician would have appreciated.”
“The National Enquirer is now capitalizing on the controversy by claiming that Timberlake was planning to pay homage to Prince during his 2018 Man of the Woods tour, but scrapped the idea following the Super Bowl backlash.”
“A so-called "source" tells the magazine, "Since the devastating reviews of his Super Bowl performance, all Prince references have been removed."”
“But Gossip Cop checked in with a source close to Timberlake, who exclusively assures us the tabloid's story is completely false.”


"More about gossip police: Jennifer Aniston didn't throw Justin Cyrus's stuff in the trash, even though Rihanna thinks her child with Hassan Jamil is fictional. Do Katie Perry's friends want her to abandon orlando bloom for Jack Gyllenhaal?"
"The recent report that the prince should play a role in the singer's" Woodman "tour is also false."
"The gossip police can completely expose this false story."
"We were told it wasn't true at all."
Last month, fans of Prince criticized Timberlake on social media for integrating the late singer into his super bowl midfield show
In the set, Timberlake and Prince create a duet. He sings "I will die 4U", next to a huge projection of the late artist
"Many of the prince's fans think that using his image is vulgar and not something that the late musicians would appreciate."
"Now, the National Enquirer has taken advantage of this controversy, claiming that Timberlake plans to pay homage to Prince at the 2018" forest man "tour, but cancels the idea after strong opposition to the super bowl."
A so-called "source" told the magazine that "since the devastating comments on his super bowl performance, all the prince's references have been removed."
"But the gossip police confirmed to a source close to Timberlake that he exclusively assured us that the tabloid story was completely false."



Number  1168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO:”
“The Manhattan district attorney’s office is expected to charge Weinstein Friday regarding a case involving allegations of forced oral sex from Lucia Evans.”
“Weinstein has been accused of sexual harassment, assault, and other inappropriate behavior by more than 50 women, all of which he has denied.”
“The actress expressed her approval of Pitt’s actions: “He leveraged his fame and power to protect me at a time when I didn’t have fame and power yet,” she said.”
“Pitt then allegedly told Weinstein: “If you ever make her feel uncomfortable again, I’ll kill you.”Paltrow had already signed on to make two movies with the producer, so she was particularly disconcerted by the hotel room incident.”
““It was the equivalent of throwing him against the wall,” she said.”
“Pitt confronted the producer when the three attended the opening of “Hamlet” on Broadway.”
“During an interview on Howard Stern’s Sirius XM radio show Wednesday, Paltrow said she immediately told her then-boyfriend Pitt when Weinstein asked her for a massage while the two were alone in a hotel room.”
“Weinstein...”
“With Harvey Weinstein set to turn himself in to the New York police Friday Gwyneth Paltrow revisited her own experiences with the disgraced mogul in the 1990s revealing that Brad Pitt threatened to kill Weinstein after she told him of the alleged sexual harassment she experienced at the hands of...”


Related videos:
"The Manhattan district attorney's office is expected to sue Weinstein on Friday in a case involving Lucia Evans' forced oral sex charges."
Weinstein has been accused by more than 50 women of sexual harassment, assault and other misconduct, but he denies it
The actress agreed with Pitt's behavior: "when I didn't have fame and power, he used his fame and power to protect me," she said
"If you make her feel uncomfortable again, I'll kill you," Pitt later said to Weinstein Paltrow has signed up with the producer to make two films, so she is particularly upset about the hotel room incident
"It's like throwing him on the wall," she said
Pitt confronts producers at the premiere of Hamlet on Broadway
"In an interview on Howard Stern's Sirius XM radio on Wednesday, Paltrow said that when Weinstein asked her to have a massage, she immediately told her then boyfriend Pete that they were alone in the hotel room."
"Weinstein..."
On Friday, as Harvey Weinstein prepares to surrender to the New York police, Gwyneth Paltrow recounts her association with the infamous tycoon in the 1990s. She reveals that Brad Pitt has threatened to kill Weinstein because she told him she was Sexual harassment charges



Number  1169
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Taylor Hill/GettyLawrence was previously linked to British actor Nicholas Hoult and Coldplay frontman Chris Martin.”
“In November, they joined forces to encourage college students to get out and vote.”
“They then spent time in Los Angeles in October, where they had an intimate dinner with her close friends at the Commissary restaurant at The Line Hotel.”
“Image zoom Credit: Evan Agostini/Invision/APThe Oscar winner was first spotted dining with the Brooklyn native in New York City in August.”
“The private couple kept mum about their relationship while promoting the movie a year later and only posed together at the New York premiere of the film.”
“The two began seeing each other in September shortly after wrapping mother!, and their relationship continued to blossom despite their 22-year age difference.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“...of all relationships is over.”
“Jennifer Lawrence, 27, and director Darren Aronofsky, 48, have split after over a year of dating, PEOPLE confirmsThe mother!”


"Image scaling credit: Taylor Hill / Getty Lawrence has previously been associated with British actor Nicholas Holt and Coldplay leader Chris Martin."
"In November, they joined hands to encourage college students to come out and vote."
In October, they spent some time in Los Angeles, where they had a close dinner with her close friends in the buffet restaurant of the line hotel
"Credit for image zooming: in August, Oscar winner Evan Agostini / introduction / AP was found dining with Brooklyn natives in New York for the first time."
"The illegitimate children kept silent about their relationship when they promoted the film a year later and only took pictures at the film's New York premiere."
"In September, they began to meet soon after wrapping up their mother's clothes! Even though they are 22 years apart in age, their relationship continues to develop. "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
“… All the relationships are over. "
It has been confirmed that 27 year old Jennifer Lawrence and 48 year old director Darren Aronofsky split up after dating for more than a year



Number  1170
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““And the feedback from fans and investors is that Kourtney’s the most relatable, down-to-earth member of the family.”It's Kourtney to the rescue, fam!”
“...insider adds...”
“Khloe s in the doghouse for sticking with Tristan while Kim s very focused on her and Kanye s dramas and the other girls are too young or inexperienced business wise Kris is thrilled with Kourtney s work rate the...”
““She’s the go-to of all the sisters right now, for big picture decisions as well as being the more serious and intellectual face of the brand,” a family insider told Radar Online.”
“Momager Kris Jenner has had it with all the drama so she's reportedly enlisted her eldest child, Kourtney Kardashian to sort shit out.”


"Feedback from fans and investors is that Courtney is the most reliable and down-to-earth member of the family." This is Courtney's savior, family
“… The insider added
"Khloe is locked up in a doghouse because of being with Tristan, while Kim is very focused on her and Kanye's plays, while other girls are too young or lack business experience. Kris is excited about Kourtney's efficiency..."
A family insider told radar online: "she is now the best of all the sisters, not only a more serious and intelligent image of the brand, but also a spokesman for the overall decision-making."
"Mother Chris Jenner has had enough of all the drama, so it's reported that she has recruited her eldest son, Courtney Kardashian, to deal with these things."



Number  1171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Above, a look at seven films that prove that if anyone is up for a hair-color challenge, it’s Emma Stone.”
“Now, as Cruella, she’ll wear both the visual equivalent of the absence of color and every single color at once.”
“Spiderman 2 saw her go paler still, but her part in Birdman took the peroxide even further with a shock of near-white layers.”
“Even as a blonde she’s left no shade unturned: The Help may be significant for those wild curls, but we’ll remember it for her pitch-perfect strawberry hue.”
“While she’s often thought of as a redhead, she’s actually only donned the fiery color for fun and film, trying everything from the warm cinnamon of Irrational Man to the auburn waves in Gangster Squad.”
“Take 2009’s Zombieland, for which she dipped her natural blonde locks a dark chocolate.”
“Stone has never shied away from a scene-stealing dye job.”
“...in that signature color blocked bob...”
“While we don t see Stone herself as the anti puppy type her casting comes as no surprise not only because the actress has spent the better part of her career proving she can drive almost any film in a starring role but also because we can already imagine her...”
“Cruella...”


"These are seven movies that prove that if anyone is going to take part in the hair dye challenge, it's Emma stone."
"Now, as Clara, she's going to wear the visual equivalent of no color and every color at the same time."
"Spiderman 2 saw that her face became paler, but her role in Birdman went a step further, and the shock was that she was almost white."
"Even as a blonde, she spared no effort: this help may be important for wild curls, but we will remember her perfect strawberry color."
"Although she is often regarded as a redhead, she only wears fiery red for fun and making movies, trying everything from warm cinnamon in irrational men to russet waves in gangster."
Take zombie paradise in 2009, where she dipped her blonde hair in dark chocolate
"Stone has never avoided stealing dyes."
“… In that iconic color block, Bob... "
"Although we don't think stone is anti doggy, her cast is not surprising, not only because the actress has proved that she can drive almost any starring film for most of her career, but also because we can already imagine her..."
"Crura..."



Number  1172
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You can find Haunted Rooms on Twitter and Facebook, where they regularly share offers and time sensitive deals on haunted hotels and events.”
“Windsor CastleWindsor is perhaps the most haunted of all the royal residences, with as many as 25 ghosts reported.”
“If you see his ghost anywhere in the park beware, as legend has it that you'll be struck by misfortune.”
“He was a huntsman for King Richard III.”
“On the grounds in Windsor Great Park, the ghost of Herne has been reported.”
“Henry VIII is said to haunt the deanery cloisters, often heard hobbling around, the sound of his ulcerated leg thudding on the floor as he walks.”
“The ghost of George III has been witnessed, looking longingly out of the room beneath the library, where he was confined during his several periods of madness.”
“Often seen in the library, her footsteps can be heard on the bare floorboards, before her striking presence appears.”
“The ghost of Elizabeth I has been seen by several members of the royal family, including Queen Elizabeth II and her sister Margaret.”
“Unable to cope with a life of shame, he ended his life in his first floor office, shooting himself in the head.”


"You can find haunted rooms on Twitter and Facebook, where they regularly share deals and time sensitive deals for haunted hotels and events."
Windsor Castle is probably the most haunted of all royal houses, with up to 25 ghosts reported
"If you see his ghost anywhere in the park, be careful. It's said that you will be hit by misfortune."
"He was the hunter of King Richard III."
"In the open space of Windsor Park, there are reports of the ghost of Hearn."
It is said that Henry VIII often haunted the cloister of the parish. He often heard the sound of faltering when he walked, and his festering legs thumped on the floor
"The ghost of George III was seen peering eagerly out of the room under the library, where he had been locked up several times."
"Her footsteps are often seen in the library, and can be heard on the bare floor before her striking figure appears."
The ghost of Elizabeth I has been seen by several members of the royal family, including Queen Elizabeth II and her sister Margaret
"Unable to cope with the humiliating life, he ended his life in the first floor office and shot himself in the head."



Number  1173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Under our 100% Buyer Guarantee, all confirmed ticket orders come with the assurance of on-time delivery and authenticity.”
“If there isn't a Blake Nation - Blake Shelton Tribute tour to check out, you can browse our selection of concert tickets for seats to all the latest live events taking place from coast to coast.”
“Once you've made a selection, press the "Buy" link to begin the safe and secure online checkout process.”
“You'll be able to sort Blake Nation - Blake Shelton Tribute tickets according to various filters including price, to ensure you find just the right listing for you.”
“Depending on the show, there will either be a venue-specific seating chart displaying the event's expected layout, or an indication of general admission.”
“To place an order today, just find the Blake Nation - Blake Shelton Tribute tickets for the show of your choice, and then press its respective "Tickets" button to advance to the next step in the buying process.”
“From one-off shows to major nationwide tours, music festival sets, and more, you won't want to miss out on seeing Blake Nation - Blake Shelton Tribute in concert.”
“Call 866.848.8499 or connect to Live Chat seven days a week for personalized help from a Vivid Seats team member.”
“You also can get in touch with our customer support team at any time while shopping for Blake Nation - Blake Shelton Tribute tickets.”
“Pertinent event details will be populated on the page as they become available, including date, location, venue, co-headliners, and more.”


"According to our 100% Buyer guarantee, all confirmed air ticket orders are guaranteed on time delivery and authenticity."
"If you don't have a black country blacksheldon salute tour to check out, you can browse through the concert tickets we've selected for you to see all the latest live events from coast to coast."
After selection, press the "buy" link to start the safe and reliable online checkout process
"You can sort Blake nation Blake Shelton tribute tickets by various filters, including prices, to make sure you find the right list for you."
"Depending on the performance, there will be a venue specific seating table showing the expected layout of the event or general admission instructions."
"To place an order today, just find the Blake nation Blake Shelton tribute ticket of your selected program, and then press the corresponding" ticket "button to enter the next purchase process."
"From one-time performances to large-scale national tours, music festival settings and so on, you must not miss the opportunity to watch the black nation - blacksheldon tribute concert."
"Call 866.848.8499 or connect to live chat seven days a week for personalized help from members of the video seats team."
"You can also contact our customer support team at any time when you purchase a Blake nation Blake Shelton Souvenir Ticket."
Relevant activity details will be filled in the page, including date, location, location, common headlines, etc



Number  1174
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“Taylor sings, “But I’m not the only friend you’ve lost lately/Mm mmm/If only you weren’t so shady.”Source: GettyDo you think Taylor's going to get a response from Kanye?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyShe even goes as far as to diss Kanye for no longer having Jay Z on his side, after the two had a falling out reportedly over money as well as Kanye’s relationship with Kim.”
“The pop star sings, “And therein lies the issue/Friends don’t try to trick you/Get you on the phone and mind-twist you/And so I took an ax to a mended fence.” Yikes.”
“Source: GettyAnd Taylor wasn’t done on the song, as she also references the phone call that Kim claimed to have recorded with Taylor approving the lyrics.”
“I made that b**** famous.” He claimed to have sought Taylor’s approval before using her in the song, but her camp denied it.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyFast forward seven years, and a few apologies later, and Kanye releases his hit song “Famous” which includes lyrics “I feel like me and Tayor might still have sex/ Why?”
“Source: GettyAs fans know, the two have been feuding on-and-off since 2009, after Kanye ruined Taylor’s shine at the MTV Video Music Awards, saying Beyonce should have won the award for Best Female Video.”
“...again There I was giving you a second chance But you stabbed me in the back while shaking my hand...”
“The singer is holding nothing back on her new album Reputation and dissing Kanye West and Kim Kardashian as she reignites their ongoing feud in the song This Is Why We Can t Have Nice Things Article continues below advertisement Source Getty She sings It was so nice being friends...”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
Taylor sings, "but I'm not the only friend you've lost recently, if you're not that dark." Source: do you think Taylor will get a response from kenye? "
"The article continues with the following advertising source: Geddes even expressed dissatisfaction with Kanye because he no longer has jay z around him, and the two people were reported to have a dispute over money and Kanye's relationship with Kim."
The pop star sang, "that's the problem / friends, don't try to deceive you / call you to upset you / so I picked up the ax to repair the fence."
"Source: Getty and Taylor didn't finish the song because she also mentioned the phone call Kim claimed to have recorded with Taylor, who approved the lyrics."
"I made b * * famous." He claimed that he had asked Taylor's permission before using her to play the song, but her camp denied that
The article continues with the following advertising source: fast forward seven years, after a few apologies, kenye released his hit song "famous", including the lyrics "I think Tyrol and I may still have sex / why?"
"Source: gettyas fans know that since Kanye ruined Taylor's appearance at the MTV Music Video Awards in 2009, the two have been at loggerheads, saying that Beyonce deserves the best female Video Award."
“…… I gave you a second chance, but you stabbed me when you shook hands with me... "
"The singer has no reservation about the reputation of her new album. She rekindled the feud between Kanye West and Kim Kardashian in her songs. That's why we can't have good things. The article continues in the following advertising source Getty. She sings that being a friend is so good..."



Number  1175
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I’m sure I drank out of every colored cup that night.””
“Remember, while she was just days away from giving birth, Tristan got caught two-timing Khloe.”
“Actually, as we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned, there are reasons why she’s in no rush to get hitched.”
“Ever since Khloe Kardashian, 34, and Tristan Thompson, 27, welcomed True into the world, fans have been eagerly waiting to see if a diamond ring would appear on her finger.”
“Fans better keep waiting, because as a source close to Khloe EXCLUSIVELY tells HollywoodLife.com that she “is in no rush to get engaged to Tristan right now.”
“Even though it is her dream to marry the father of her baby, she is also happy with the way things are.”“True has given her so much satisfaction,” the source adds.”
““[Khloe] loves finally being a mom after her tough journey.” However, if Tristan were to get down on one knee, Khloe “would not say no to a proposal, but it’s not something she’s pushing for anymore.”
“She decided to stop putting pressure on things and just let it happen naturally.”
“Now that she has True in her life, and Tristan has stepped up as an amazing father, Khloe feels like everything is going to be OK no matter what happens between them.”There was a time when she wasn’t feeling so optimistic about her relationship.”
“That cheating may have sunk the chances of these two getting married any time soon.”


"I'm sure I drank all the colored glasses that night."
"Remember, when Tristan was only a few days away from childbirth, she was arrested twice."
"In fact, as far as we know, there is a reason why she is not in a hurry to get married."
"Since Khloe Kardashian, 34, and Tristan Thompson, 27, welcomed true to the world, fans have been eagerly waiting to see if a diamond ring appears on her finger."
"Fans had better keep waiting because, according to a source close to Khloe, Hollywood Life" is not in a hurry to get engaged to Tristan right now. "
"Although it's her dream to marry the father of the child, she's happy with the situation." "It really gives her a lot of satisfaction," the source added
"(Chloe) after a hard journey, she finally likes to be a mother." However, if Tristan goes down on one knee, Chloe "won't refuse to propose, but it's not something she's been pushing for."
"She decided to stop putting pressure on things and let it be."
"Now that she has a real side in her life and Tristan has become a great father, Chloe feels that no matter what happens between them, everything will be OK." For a while, she was not so optimistic about her relationship
"This kind of deception may reduce the chance that these two people will get married soon."



Number  1176
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
““There’s reason to believe the jewelry stolen from Kim Kardashian is going directly into the coffers of terror groups,” said a European official involved in tracking terror groups’ funding.”
“Kim Kardashian's Stolen Gems Funding Evil Terrorists!”
“How her missing bling is being converted to black market cash.”
“Kim Kardashian is trapped in a terrorism nightmare after RadarOnline.com learned cops have linked her stolen gems to the coffers of Islamic jihadists!”
“In a bombshell world exclusive, a top Interpol source claimed they have connected the diamonds snatched from Kardashian’s Paris hotel suite during a brazen Oct. 3 robbery to shady moneymen with ties to radical Islamic terrorists.”
“French police have busted 17 suspects allegedly involved in the heist, and authorities have connected that gang to black-market dealers in Antwerp, Belgium.”
“Most of the world’s diamonds pass through the city, where underground brokers are notorious for mixing “dirty” stolen stones with “clean” gems for resale.”
“Antwerp’s illicit marketplace is a hotbed for devious money-laundering schemes — with profits going to fund violent terrorists around the globe, according to the Financial Action Task Force, an elite band of bean counters that tracks terrorist funds.”
“What s more David Levine a professor at the University of California Berkeley who s published works on terrorism confirmed Violent groups are funded by black market gems Kardashian s nightmare unfolded last fall when robbers forced their way into...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"There is reason to believe that jewelry stolen from Kim Kardashian will go directly into the terrorist organization's coffers," said a European official involved in tracking the source of funds
"The jewels stolen by Kim Kardashian finance evil terrorists!"
"How her lost jewelry was converted into black market cash."
Kim Kardashian fell into a nightmare after the terrorist attacks RadarOnline.com The erudite police on the website linked her stolen gems to the Islamic jihadists' coffers! "
A senior Interpol source said in a sensational exclusive report that they linked the diamonds robbed by Kardashian in a brazen robbery in a hotel suite in Paris on October 3 to the black money dealers associated with radical Islamic terrorists
French police have arrested 17 suspects suspected of involvement in the robbery and authorities have linked the gang to black market dealers in Antwerp, Belgium
"Most of the diamonds in the world pass through this city, where underground brokers are notorious for mixing" dirty "stolen diamonds with" clean "gems to resell them."
"Antwerp's illegal market is a hotbed of cunning money laundering schemes - according to the financial action task force, the profits will be used to finance violent terrorists around the world, an elite team that tracks terrorist funds."
"More importantly, David Levine, a professor at the University of California, Berkeley, has published a book on terrorism. He confirmed that the violent organization was funded by black market gems. Kardashian's nightmare was staged last fall when the robbers forced their way in..."



Number  1177
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Earlier this week, a source close to the "Bad Liar" singer reportedly told the gossip site, "Selena still cares for Justin very deeply.”
“The chronically on-again, off-again couple are taking time apart, but are reportedly still thinking about each other very much.”
“This week, Gomez has been teasing the release of her new single, "Back to You," which will appear on the 13 Reasons Why Season 2 soundtrack.”
“In her latest tease for the track, the singer shared a very suggestive caption: "I wanna hold you when I’m not supposed to…"To some, the caption seems like it just *might* be a lyric from the song.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“According to HollywoodLife, Gomez still cares about her ex, and "she thinks about him all the time."”
“He will always be her first real love, and she thinks about him all the time....Selena thinks he is one of the most talented guys she has ever known, and she listens to his music almost every day.”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
According to reports, earlier this week, a source close to the "bad liar" singer told gossip website, "Selena is still very concerned about Justin."
"The long-time open and closed couple are living apart, but they are still reported to miss each other very much."
"This week, Gomez has been joking about the release of her new single," back to you, "which will appear on the soundtrack of season 2 for 13 reasons
"In her recent tease for the song, the singer shared an inspiring Title:" I want to hold you when I shouldn't hold you... " For some, the title seems to be just the lyrics of a song. "
"This content was imported from instagram."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"According to Hollywood life, Gomez still cares about her ex girlfriend, and" she always thinks about him“
"He will always be her first love. She thinks about him all the time Selena thinks he's one of the most talented men she's ever known, and she listens to his music almost every day. "
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address



Number  1178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Why I Disagree With My Dad pic.twitter.com/g44nE4wiXs — R. Eric Thomas (@oureric) June 7, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”
“WHY WE DISAGREE WITH OUR DAD pic.twitter.com/A0B1dcv73y — Lauren Duca (@laurenduca) June 7, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”
“WHY I DISAGREE WITH MY DAD pic.twitter.com/gGZlK2FmlQ — Lauren Duca (@laurenduca) June 7, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”
“WHY I DISAGREE WITH MY DAD pic.twitter.com/XWsCpCB0Re — Lauren Duca (@laurenduca) June 7, 2017This content is imported from Twitter.”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”


You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Why don't I agree with my father pic.twitter.com/g44nE4wiXs -R. Eric Thomas (@ oureric) this content was imported from twitter on June 7, 2017. "
"Why don't we agree with dad pic.twitter.com/A0B1dcv73y -Lauren Duca (@ laurenduca) June 7, 2017 this content was imported from twitter. "
"Why don't I agree with my father pic.twitter.com/gGZlK2FmlQ -Lauren Duca (@ laurenduca) June 7, 2017 this content was imported from twitter. "
"Why don't I agree with my father pic.twitter.com/XWsCpCB0Re -Lauren Duca (@ laurenduca) June 7, 2017 this content was imported from twitter. "
"This content was imported from twitter."



Number  1179
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Alyssa Bailey News and Strategy Editor Alyssa Bailey is the news and strategy editor at ELLE.com, where she oversees coverage of celebrities and royals (particularly Meghan Markle and Kate Middleton).”
“Prince William and Kate Middleton also lived together in a North Wales farmhouse before they got married.”
“It gives Meghan some to get settled and will be a great start to 2018.”Markle and Prince Harry will live together in his two-bedroom Nottingham Cottage on the Kensington Palace grounds.”
““Meghan will move right in.”Their official engagement announcement, Us claims via an insider, “will likely be some time in January.”
““There are are no plans for them to live separately,” a friend of Markle’s told the outlet.”
“She is the one.”Meanwhile, Us Weekly is going one step further and reporting that yes, the two are totally engaged now, planning a summer wedding (it'll happen by late June), and that Markle is indeed moving in with Harry ASAP.”
““Harry has made no secret of the fact that he wants to marry her.”
““It’s not a question of if she’s moving in, it’s just a matter of when," a source told the outlet.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Alyssa Bailey, news and strategy editor ELLE.com She oversees coverage of celebrities and royalty, especially Megan markel and Kate Middleton
"Prince William and Kate Middleton lived in a farmhouse in North Wales before they married."
"It gives Megan some opportunities to settle down, which will be a great start for 2018." Marcel and Prince Harry will live together in a two bedroom Nottingham cottage in the Kensington Palace courtyard
"Megan is about to move in." Us insiders said their official engagement statement "may be released sometime in January."
"They have no plans to live separately," a friend of Marcel's told the media
"She's the one." At the same time, US weekly went further and reported that yes, the two are now fully engaged, planning a summer wedding (to be held in late June), and that markel is indeed cohabiting with Harry as soon as possible
"Harry made no secret of the fact that he wanted to marry her."
"It's not a matter of whether she moves in, it's just a matter of time," a source told the media



Number  1180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by John Sciulli/Getty Images]”
“Instead, he seems to be playing his relationship by ear as he juggles his busy career.”
“However, when it comes to their future plans and an engagement, Seacrest hasn’t been clear with his intentions.”
“Ryan Seacrest and Shayna Taylor reconciled their relationship earlier this year ahead of Seacrest’s move to New York City after initially dating several years ago.”
“...with Ryan and Kelly that he wouldn’t be sporting a wedding band for another 15 years.”
“That said, Seacrest recently joked on Life!”
“Although the report suggested that Ryan Seacrest and Shayna Taylor may be on the brink of a split, other reports have suggested that they could soon get engaged.”
“A post shared by Shayna Terese Taylor (@shaynateresetaylor) on Aug 27, 2017 at 12:05pm PDTRadar Online‘s source continued on, claiming that Shayna Taylor is insisting on spending the majority of her time in Los Angeles while Ryan Seacrest has been making frequent visits to the area.”
“According to an insider, Ryan Seacrest sprung the move to New York City on Shayna Taylor and while she may have been on board with the relocation at first, she opted to keep her home in Los Angeles as he adjusts to life on the east coast.”
“Instead, the outlet suggested that Taylor was spending the majority of the time in Los Angeles, where she was recently seen enjoying time with her girlfriends.”


"[John Scully / Getty pictures]
"On the contrary, in his busy career, he seems to be playing with his feelings."
"However, when it comes to their future plans and engagement, Seacrest is not clear about his intentions."
"Earlier this year, Ryan Seacrest and Shana Taylor reconciled after their first date a few years ago, before Seacrest moved to New York City."
"Tell Ryan and Kelly he won't wear a wedding ring in 15 years."
"That is to say, Seacrest recently joked about life!"
"While reports suggest that Ryan Seacrest and Shana Taylor may be on the verge of breaking up, other reports suggest that they may soon be engaged."
"A post shared by shayna Terese Taylor (@ shayanateresetaylor) on PDT radar online at 12:05 p.m. on August 27, 2017 continued that she claimed that shayna Taylor insisted on spending most of her time in Los Angeles, while Ryan Seacrest visited the area frequently."
"According to a person familiar with the matter, Ryan Seacrest suddenly moved to New York City with the help of shayna Taylor. Although she may have been involved in the relocation at first, she chose to stay in Los Angeles when he adapted to life on the east coast."
"Instead, the media suggested that Taylor spent most of her time in Los Angeles, where she was recently seen enjoying time with her girlfriends."



Number  1181
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!”
“As many of you know, Blake was previously married to Miranda Lambert from 2011-2015 and Kaynette Williams from 2003-2006.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on why they’re considering surrogacy or adoption!”
“Then comes the baby in the baby carriage!”
“Blake Shelton has taken quite a liking to Gwen Stefani’s kids Kingston Rossdale, Apollo Bowie Flynn Rossdale, and Zuma Nesta Rock Rossdale.”
“The Voice coach has been spotted out with Gwen’s boys on numerous occasions, and it has them both thinking of having children together.”
““Mother’s Day was rough for Blake Shelton.”
“He loves being close to Gwen and the bond he shares with her kids, but the day is a sad reminder to him that he never had kids of his own,” a source close to Blake tells HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Aw!”
““He loved celebrating with Gwen and her kids, but it is not the same for him, there’s is still a big piece missing in his life,” our source continued.”


“!”
"A lot of people know that Blake married Miranda Lambert in 2011-2015 and Kenneth Williams in 2003-2006."
"We have exclusive details about why they are considering surrogacy or adoption!"
"And then the baby in the pram comes!"
Blake Shelton was very fond of Gwen Stephanie's children, Kingston Rosedale, Apollo Bowie Flynn Rosedale and Zuma Nesta rock Rosedale
"Voice coaches have been found many times with Gwen's children, which makes them want to have children together."
"Mother's Day is hard for black Shelton."
"He likes to be close to Gwen, and he likes to be with Gwen's children, but it's a sad day for him. He never has children of his own," a source close to black told the Hollywood Life exclusive
"Ah
"He likes to celebrate with Gwen and her children, but it's not the same for him, there's still a big missing piece in his life," our source continued



Number  1182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Subscribe and listen to the “In Case You Missed Us” podcast!”
“That looks like Nathan Scott, James Lafferty.”
“...for Stephen Colletti?”
“The former Laguna Beach star may have gotten his start on reality TV, but would the single star ever return to his roots to find love?”
““I’m a single man.”
“Yes, so The Bachelor season 47,” Colletti, 32, said to Us during our “In Case You Missed Us” podcast.”
“However, after a little more thought it appears that Colletti will not be going on any group dates anytime soon.”
“The Everyone is Doing Great star told Us, “No I wouldn’t [go on The Bachelor.]”
“I think we ve handled enough realty TV on this end That s not to say he wouldn t consider making an appearance on the hit ABC show but his former One Tree Hill costar James Lafferty would have to...”
“...tag along...”


Subscribe and listen to "in case you miss us" podcast
"That looks like Nathan Scott, James Lafferty."
“… To Stephen Colletti? "
"The former Laguna Beach star may have made his mark on reality TV, but will the single star return to his hometown in search of love?"
"I'm a bachelor."
"Yes, so singles season 47," 32 year old Colletti told us in our "in case you miss us" podcast
"However, after much consideration, it seems that Colletti won't go on any group date soon."
"Everyone is making great stars and telling us," no, I'm not going. "
"I think we've dealt with enough real estate TV shows. That's not to say he won't consider a hit on ABC, but his former tree mountain partner, James Lafferty, will have to..."
“… Follow... "



Number  1183
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I went, ‘Oh my God, that’s so brilliant, that’s genius.’ That moment when you see something come to life is so incredible.””
““I was sitting in a corner near the camera, watching the first take, when Redford just threw the line away like he was asking someone for a cup of water.”
“She had nothing with her but a backpack and she was going back to Cambodia to work with the refugees.”
““Right after Tomb Raider, she was on my same flight out of London where she sat next to me.”
““I saw it earlier on,” Lansing tells PEOPLE of Jolie’s passion for philanthropy.”
“The actress had already become involved with the United Nations High Commissioner for Refugees at the time, for which she is now a Special Envoy, thanks to her trips to the Southeast Asian country.”
“The former executive got to witness Jolie begin her life as a philanthropist after working in Cambodia where the film was shot — and where she eventually ended up adopting her first son, Maddox, in 2002.”
““She took what might have been a cardboard character and added a layer of mystery and emotion and humanity.”Image zoom Credit: BRENT STIRTON/GETTYJolie with Maddox in Cambodia in 2006And Lansing says she was more than just impressive on film.”
““In the dailies, she was riveting,” Lansing recalls in the book.”
“But after the actress fought for the role, she immediately impressed the studio and the crew with her hard work and talent on camera.”


"I said," oh my God, it's wonderful, it's genius. " It's amazing when you see something coming back to life
"I was sitting in a corner next to the camera, looking at the first picture, Radford threw away his lines, as if asking for a glass of water."
"She has nothing but a backpack. She's going back to Cambodia to work with refugees."
"Just after Tomb Raider, she and I were on the same plane, from London, sitting next to me."
"I've seen that a long time ago," Lansing told people about Julie's passion for charity
"Due to her visit to Southeast Asian countries, the actress had already dealt with the United Nations High Commissioner for refugees at that time, and now she is the special envoy of the United Nations High Commissioner for refugees."
The former executive witnessed Julie's life as a philanthropist after working in Cambodia, where she eventually adopted her first son, Maddox, in 2002
"She played a role that could be cardboard, adding a layer of mystery, emotion and humanity." Photo source: Brent Stirton / Getty Jolie, who worked with Maddox in Cambodia in 2006, says she's not just impressed in the film
"In the daily, she was very attractive," Lansing recalls in the book
"But after the actress struggled for the role, the producers and crew were immediately impressed by her hard work and talent on camera."



Number  1184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Celebrity Central...”
“Do not reproduce (even with permission).”
“© 2021 MediaMass All rights reserved.”
“We can't wait to see it.”
“Petition's goal: ‘Get Leonardo DiCaprio to dance live on TV’Some fans recently launched an online petition to see Leonardo DiCaprio performing ‘Gangnam Style’ live on American national television.”
“I have never seen him so dedicated about something before,” said a source close to the actor.”
““Leonardo DiCaprio spent hours working on his dance moves out on the balcony every night, riding an imaginary horse.”
“...or Titanic has been secretly practising Gangnam Style for the past couple of weeks...”
“A call that did not fall on deaf ears Actor to practice Gangnam Style dance steps several hours a day An insider recently admitted that the actor best known for his roles in The Revenant The Wolf of Wall Street...”
“...doing his famous horse riding Gangnam Style dance...”


Celebrity Center
"Do not copy (even with permission)."
"? 2021 mediamass all rights reserved."
"We can't wait to see it."
"The goal of the petition is:" let Leonardo DiCaprio dance live on TV. "Some fans recently launched a petition online, hoping to see Leonardo DiCaprio perform" Jiangnan style "live on US national television."
"I've never seen him so focused on something," said a source close to the actor
"Leonardo DiCaprio spends hours every night dancing on the balcony, riding an imaginary horse."
“…… Or the Titanic has been secretly practicing Jiangnan style in the past few weeks... "
"A call for actors to practice Jiangnan style dance steps for several hours a day has not been ignored. A person in the industry recently admitted that the actor's most famous role is" the wolf of Wall Street "..."
“… Dance his famous Jiangnan horse dance



Number  1185
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’re in it for the long haul?”
““Jamie and Katie have been talking at great length about having a child together,” a source for the magazine recently told the publication.”
“Looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie Foxx, 50, may be more serious than fans previously thought!”
“While the couple had kept their relationship hidden for years, the two stepped out as a duo just last year.”
“Since then, they’ve been spotted out and about together in public on multiple occasions — including making a big splash sitting side-by-side at Clive Davis’ pre-Grammy gala in NYC on Jan. 27.”
“From the photos, Katie and Jamie looked happier than ever, and a new report claims that could be because they’re FINALLY on the same page about wanting to start a family together!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Katie Holmes with her daughter Suri Cruise.”
“Although it reportedly took some time for Katie to be on board, she apparently feels ready to have a baby with her new man — at least according to Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s crazy about her and thinks they’ll have an adorable baby.” In fact, some witnesses at the gala last month allegedly think Katie could actually already be expecting.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — would you love to see Jamie and Katie have a child together?”


"Do you think they will be involved for a long time?"
"Jamie and Katie have been talking about having a child together," a source for the magazine recently told the publication
"It looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie fox, 50, may be more serious than fans thought before!"
"Although the couple have been hiding their relationship for years, just last year, they came out as a couple."
"Since then, they have been found together in public many times - including Clive Davis sitting side by side at the Grammy Awards in New York on January 27."
"From the photos, Katie and Jamie look happier than ever, and a new report says it may be that they have finally reached a consensus on how to form a family together!"
"Click here to see a lovely picture of Katie Holmes and her daughter Suri cruise."
"Although it was reported that it took Katie some time to get on the plane, she clearly felt ready to have a baby with her new boyfriend - at least according to life and fashion magazine."
"He was fascinated by her and thought they would have a lovely child." In fact, some witnesses at last month's party claimed that Katie might be pregnant
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - would you like to see Jamie and Katie have a baby together?"



Number  1186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shot entirely in Cambodia and in the Khmer language the film a Netflix original is the largest production the country has witnessed since the war and according to the reports of several Cambodians who ve seen it it s one of the most revelatory pieces of art about that chapter...”
“Jolie has directed a moving, large-scale adaptation of First They Killed My Father, Loung Ung’s 2000 memoir of the Khmer Rouge genocide, in which Ung’s parents and two of her siblings perished, along with an estimated two million other Cambodians, a quarter of the country’s population.”
“Shiloh, who likes to dress like a boy, is wearing a camouflage jacket, long shorts, and heavy black sneakers, despite the blazing heat.”
“We step outside and there’s Shiloh, 11, and Knox, 9, hanging out.”
“She actually said to me the other day, ‘Mom, I can taste my blanket.’ ‘That, honey, is a sign that it really, really needs to be washed.’ ”Jolie tidies up Vivienne’s things and promptly spills her entire mug of tea all over the counter.”
“She is very into her blanket, and she gets very mad if you wash her blanket.”
“Jolie picks up a small piece of a blanket, shredded to death, and explains, laughing, “She has 32 blankets.”
“She dumps her stuff on the counter and goes out to play with her friend.”
“I ask the girl if she’s called “Viv” or “Vivienne.” “Either one!” she says with a smile.”
“Jolie envelops her in her arms.”


"The film was completely shot in Cambodia and written in Khmer. It is the largest work of the country since the war. According to several Cambodians who have seen the film, it is one of the most enlightening works of art in this chapter..."
"Julie directed a moving and large-scale adaptation of first they killed my father, a memoir of Loong's Khmer Rouge massacre in 2000, in which ung's parents and two brothers and sisters, as well as other 2 million Cambodians, who are estimated to account for one fourth of Cambodia's population, were killed."
"Shiloh likes to dress like a boy. He wears a camouflage jacket, trousers and thick black sneakers in spite of the hot weather."
"We went outside and Shiloh, 11, and Knox, 9, were hanging out."
"The other day she really said to me," Mom, I can taste my blanket. " "Honey, this is a sign that it really, really needs washing." Julie arranged Vivian's things and quickly spilled her large cup of tea on the counter
"She likes her blanket very much. If you wash her blanket, she will be very angry."
Julie picked up a small torn blanket and explained with a smile, "she has 32 blankets."
"She dumped things on the counter and went out to play with her friends."
"I asked whether the girl's name was" Vivian "or" Vivian. "! "She said with a smile
"Julie held her in her arms."



Number  1187
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Meanwhile, Khloe's older sister Kim tweeted a message of heart-eyed emojis about Meghan and Harry's wedding, which took place on Saturday.”
“If Meghan can become a member of the British royal family, then Khloe doesn't see why her daughter can't."”
“"Khloe thinks it would be amazing for one of the Kardashian girls to be the future Queen, and it would be the perfect combination of British and American royalty.”
“"Khloe thinks Meghan and Harry's love story is incredibly inspirational," HollywoodLife quotes its source as saying.”
“An unnamed source 'close to the Kardashian family' has now told gossip publication HollywoodLife that Khloe dreams of True one day being wed to Prince George, the four-year-old son of royals William and Kate.”
“The reality TV star gave birth last month as multiple videos seemingly showing the infant's father, Tristan Thompson, cheating with various women were published online.”
“Khloe Kardashian wants her baby daughter True to follow in fellow American Meghan Markle's footsteps and marry an actual prince, according to reports.”


Meanwhile, Khloe's sister Kim tweeted an emotional message about Meghan and Harry's wedding on Saturday
"If Megan can be a member of the British royal family, Chloe doesn't understand why her daughter can't."
"Khloe thinks it's amazing that a girl from the Kardashian family can become a future queen, which will be a perfect combination of British and American royalty."
"Khloe thinks Megan and Harry's love story is very inspiring," Hollywood Life quoted the source as saying
"An unnamed source, close to the Kardashian family, told gossip magazine Hollywood life that Khloe dreams of marrying Prince William and Kate's four-year-old son, Prince George, one day."
"The reality TV star gave birth last month, when several videos were published on the Internet, which seemed to show that Tristan Thompson, the father of the baby, was having an affair with several women."
According to reports, Kardashian hopes her little daughter will really follow in the footsteps of American compatriot Megan markel and marry a real prince



Number  1188
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We are still open to try and settling this without judicial intervention.”Neither a rep nor an attorney for Spears immediately returned a request for comment.”
““This is the choice they have made, and they will now have to deal with it.”
“Federline, 40, claims that Spears’ increased earnings compared with his decreasing income create “an extreme disparity” in their sons’ lifestyles from her home to his, documents obtained by The Blast revealed Tuesday.”
“Federline alleged in the documents that his work as a DJ nets him less than 1 percent of Spears’ reported $34 million income because he is “less of a name” than he was in 2008 when he took in six figures.”
“The former backup dancer claims he earns roughly $3,000 per month but that he doesn’t know how much Spears, 36, truly earns because she has allegedly refused to turn over her tax returns or reveal her income.”
“The couple, who were married from 2004 to 2007, agreed at the time that Spears would make $20,000 monthly child support payments to Federline for sons Sean Preston, 12, and Jayden James, 11.”
“She also gave him $1.3 million at the time of their split.”
“Spears agreed to the terms through her father, Jamie, who controls her finances through a conservatorship to this day following her highly publicized breakdown in 2007.”
“Since then, she’s landed two lucrative Las Vegas residencies, gone on tour, released four new albums, five compilation albums, 18 fragrances and a lingerie line.”
“Federline laments in the documents that Spears is a single woman who lives alone in a 13 264 square foot Neoclassical Italianate villa on 21 acres of land in a gated community with an elevator a library a media game room 3 500 bottle wine cellar an additional 1 200”


"We are still willing to try to resolve this matter without judicial intervention." Neither a representative of spears nor a lawyer immediately responded to requests for comment
"It's a choice they made, and they have to face it now."
Federline, 40, claimed that the increase in Spears' income caused a "significant difference" in their son's lifestyle compared with the decrease in his income, documents obtained by the explosion revealed on Tuesday
"Federline claims in the document that his work as a DJ makes him less than 1% of the $34 million reported by spears because he is" not worthy of the name "of his six figure income in 2008
"The former backup dancer claims that he earns about $3000 a month, but he doesn't know what the 36 year old's real income is because he is said to have refused to hand in his tax returns or disclose his income."
"The couple, who got married between 2004 and 2007, agreed that spears would pay Federline $20000 a month in alimony, Sean Preston, 12, and Jaden James, 11."
"When they broke up, she gave him back $1.3 million."
"Spears agreed to these terms through her father, Jamie, who has been controlling her finances as a housekeeper since her much publicized collapse in 2007."
"Since then, she has won two lucrative Las Vegas residences, touring, distributing four new albums, five compilation albums, 18 perfume and a series of underwear."
"Federline laments in the document that Spears is a single woman living alone in a 21 acre, 13264 square foot neo classical Italian villa, a gated community with elevators, libraries, media game rooms, 3500 bottle cellars and another 1200 cellars."



Number  1189
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On the other hand, Olivian law limits relationships to “seven years, without an option to renew.” So, maybe just the ideal place for a nice marriage?”
“In Olivia Land, prostitution is legal, “the streets are paved with dark chocolate,” and “people are free of body hair and menstrual cramps.” Sounds like the ideal place for a lasting marriage!”
“Now, while we’d usually gloss over that line as standard PR-speak, we can’t help but wonder whether the source was hinting at the location of Olivia Land — a magical and practical place Wilde described to Vulture in October.”
“Someone who knows the couple described them as “over the moon” to the New York Post.”
“(Photo by Kevin Winter/Getty Images) Photo: Michael Buckner/2011 Getty ImagesSNL’s Sudeikis reportedly proposed to Wilde over the holidays in Rome, where she has been shooting a movie.”
“LOS ANGELES, CA - AUGUST 01: Actors Leslie Mann (L) and Olivia Wilde talk at the after party for the premiere of Universal Pictures’ “The Change-Up” at the Hammer Museum on August 1, 2011 in Los Angeles, California.”


On the other hand, Olivian's law limits the marriage relationship to "seven years, no choice to renew the contract", so maybe this is the ideal place for a happy marriage? "
"Prostitution is legal in Olivia land," the streets are covered with dark chocolate. "People don't have body hair or menstruation." Sounds like the ideal place for a lasting marriage! "
"Now, although we usually hide this sentence as a standard PR speech, we can't help asking whether the source hinted at the location of Olivia land - a magical and practical place Wilde described vultures in October."
"Someone who knew the couple described them to the New York Post as" flying over the moon. "
(Kevin winter / Getty Images) photo: Michael Buckner / 2011 Getty Images SNL's sudaikis is reported to have proposed to Wilde during his holiday in Rome, where Wilde has been filming films. "
Los Angeles, California - August 1: Actors Leslie Mann (left) and Olivia Wilde talk at a party after the premiere of Universal Pictures' metamorphosis at the hammer Museum in Los Angeles, California, on August 1, 2011



Number  1190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: Instagram/MichelleObama...”
“Gossip Cop sincerely wishes the couple a rumor-free anniversary, and we’ll be here to correct any continued misinformation as necessary.”
“And today, they mark a quarter of century united in marriage.”
“Well, the Obamas remained together, just as Gossip Cop said they would.”
“The wedding band is gone — and Michelle will soon follow!” So, what really followed those contentions?”
“It was even alleged they “secretly agreed to a $25 million divorce deal,” and a purported “insider” was quoted as saying, “Their marriage is through.”
“But according to this tale, the ex commander-in-chief had “kicked wife Michelle to the curb” and wanted to “enjoy all the lovely young women” around him.”
“It was followed, however, by another story claiming Barack wanted to “cut loose and party” and had secret plans to “live life as a bachelor without Michelle” amid “divorce rumors.”Those manufactured “divorce rumors,” however, had no merit and only came from the webloid and its print counterpart.”
“Yet Radar Online decided to revive the split narrative this past July, suggesting there were “marriage problems” because the former president was “spotted smiling without his wedding band.” It was sensationalized drivel that was spun simply because Barack posed for a photo in an airport.”
“In the time since, they’ve made no move towards a divorce.”


"Photo: instagram / Michelle Obama..."
"Gossip police sincerely wish the couple a rumor free anniversary and we will be here to correct any persistent misinformation if necessary."
Today, they have been married for 25 years
"Well, the Obamas are still together, as the gossip police say."
"The wedding ring is gone - Michelle will be here soon! "So, what are these arguments about?"
Some even allege that they "secretly agreed to a $25 million divorce agreement" and quote an alleged "insider" as saying, "their marriage is over."
But according to the story, the former commander-in-chief "kicked his wife Michelle to the side of the road" to "enjoy all the lovely young women around him."
However, another report later said that Barak wanted to "joke" and secretly planned to "live a single life without Michelle" in the "divorce rumors". However, those fabricated "divorce rumors" are worthless and only come from webweek and its printed edition
In July, however, radar online decided to revisit the split, suggesting "marital problems" because the former president "was found smiling without a wedding ring.". It's sensational nonsense, just because Barack is posing for a picture at the airport
"They haven't divorced since then."



Number  1191
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“According to Woman’s Day, supposed “witnesses” at the Italian restaurant Nello’s spotted the actor and actress, who […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“A rep for the actor, however, tells Gossip Cop it’s completely untrue.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s tabloids.”
“Did Jennifer Aniston and Jake Gyllenhaal go on a “secret date” in New York City last week?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
According to women's day, the so-called "eyewitness" at Italian restaurant Nello found the actor and actress, who [...] ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"However, a representative of the actor told gossip police that it was totally untrue."
"That's what a tabloid said this week."
Did Jennifer Aniston and Jack Gyllenhaal have a "secret date" in New York last week



Number  1192
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...kids pick up the new issue of Us Weekly on newsstands now...”
“It fills her heart and makes her love him even more Even more the couple has scaled back on work projects to spend more time with their children as their top priority is always family For more on Roberts and Moder s relationship and life at home with their three...”
“The duo, who are very “hands-on parents,” the source says, love their “simple, laid-back life in Malibu, attending school functions and community events.”“Julia just loves watching [Danny] with the kids,” says the pal, adding that the family of enjoy love hitting the waves.”
““They have a really solid, loving marriage.”Their strong bond has helped them remain a united front for their three children, twins Hazel and Phinnaeus, 13, and Henry, 10.”
“...they always come out on the other side very much together adds the insider...”
“They still have crazy passion and love for each other a source reveals in the new issue of Us Weekly noting that the pair s secret to success is always making time for each other Although the Wonder star 50 and the cinematographer 49 have faced challenges throughout their relationship...”
““When you see them together, there is no doubt about it.”
“Despite experiencing their fair share of ups and downs, the A-list couple is in it for the long haul.”
“The couple, who are celebrating 16 years of marriage in July, are stronger than they’ve ever been.”
“Julia Roberts and Danny Moder’s love story is one for the ages.”


“… Now the children are buying a new issue of American weekly at the newsstand
"It made her happy, and it made her love him more. The couple cut back on their work projects and spent more time with their children, because their first priority is always the family, to learn more about the relationship between Roberts and Maud and the lives of the three of them at home... "
"Both of them are very" hands-on "parents, and the source said they like to" live a simple and leisurely life in Malibu, participate in school activities and community activities. " "Julia just likes to see Denny with the kids," the friend said, adding that the loving family enjoys the shock wave. "
"They have a really strong, loving marriage." Their strong ties helped them maintain the united front of three children, 13-year-old twins hazel and Phineas, and 10-year-old Henry
“… They always come out on the other side together, the insider added
"They still have crazy passion and love for each other. A source revealed in the new issue of American weekly that the secret of their success is always to make time for each other, although miracle star 50 and photographer 49 have been facing challenges in their relationship..."
"When you see them together, there's no doubt about it."
"Despite quite a lot of ups and downs, this A-class rich couple will still be involved for a long time."
"The couple, who celebrated their 16th wedding anniversary in July, are stronger than ever."
"The love story between Julia Roberts and Denny Maud is eternal."



Number  1193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“?””
““I wake up in the middle of the night and I can’t move,” the Keeping Up With the Kardashians star revealed in a November 2016 episode of the E!”
“But earlier, the 22-year-old slipped into a hospital gown after suffering a bad reaction to a vitamin IV drip, according to a Blast report published Tuesday, March 6.”
“Sources close to the model told the outlet that she was getting ready for her Oscar weekend appearances when she tried the health fad that is supposed to make skin glow.”
“But things didn’t go according to plan and Jenner checked into Cedars Sinai Medical Center in Beverly Hills, where she received treatment.”
“Per the Blast, she was released a short time later.”
“This isn’t Jenner’s first health scare.”
“She previously struggled with sleep paralysis, a condition that causes temporary inability to move or speak while falling sleep or upon waking.”
“...series.”
“Who knows what’s in there!”


“?””
"I wake up in the middle of the night and I can't move," the "keep up with Kardashian" star said in November 2016's "E!"
"But according to the report of the explosion released on Tuesday, March 6, earlier, the 22-year-old had an adverse reaction after receiving a vitamin IV drip and then put on a hospital robe."
"A source close to the model told the media that she had tried a healthy fashion that would make her skin shine as she prepared for her Oscar weekend appearance."
"But things didn't go according to plan. Jenner was admitted to the sidas Sinai Medical Center in Beverly Hills, where he was treated."
"Shortly after the explosion, she was released."
"This is not Jenner's first health scare."
She has previously suffered from sleep paralysis, which can cause temporary inability to move or speak when she falls asleep or wakes up
“… Series. "
"Who knows what's inside!"



Number  1194
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“One day later, he and his ex Angelina Jolie released a joint statement stating that they have reached an agreement to handle their divorce privately and keep details confidential.”
““And this is when he’s at MY house!!!”
“If you make a purchase using these links we may earn commission.”
“The Rules of Engagement actor took to Instagram on Friday to jokingly vent about Brad Pitt reportedly living at his home, saying "He's messy as s---"Oliver Hudson has a bone to pick with Brad Pitt.”
“The Rules of Engagement actor took to Instagram on Friday to jokingly unleash a massive list of fake grievances he has against Pitt.”
“The motivation for the hilarious rant was the cover of a tabloid that claimed — with zero evidence — that his sister, actress Kate Hudson, is dating the Ocean’s Eleven star.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““He drinks out of the f— carton and he leaves the door open when he’s taking a dump!”
“!” the 40-year-old actor jokingly vented.”
“He s already calling me brother and has driven a wedge between myself and my real brother Wyatt who now won t speak to me Oliver went on to write even his mother Overboard star Goldie Hawn was overtly flirting with him going around wearing these little nighties around the...”


A day later, he and his predecessor, Angelina Jolie, issued a joint statement that they had reached an agreement to deal with the divorce in private and to keep the details secret
"This is when he comes to my house!"
"If you use these links to make a purchase, we can earn a commission."
"Engagement rules" actor joked on instagram last Friday about Brad Pitt's home, saying "he's as sloppy as s -" Oliver Hudson and Brad Pitt have a bone to pick
The "rules of engagement" actor jokingly posted on instagram on Friday a large list of his false dissatisfaction with Pitt
"The funny motive is a tabloid cover claiming - without any evidence - that his sister, actress Kate Hudson, is dating ocean eleven."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"He drinks from the f-carton and leaves the door open when he takes out the garbage!"
"!" the 40 year old actor let out a joke. "
"He has already called me brother, and separated me from my real brother Wyatt. Wyatt doesn't talk to me now. Oliver wrote an article and even his mother's foreign movie star Goldie horn openly flirted with him. He was wearing these pajamas in Walking around. "



Number  1195
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Anna, you’d make our #MomCrushMonday list any day.”
“He’s happy.”
“All in favor?”
“After all, motherhood isn’t a solo sport.”
“It definitely requires a tribe — for inspiration’s and sanity’s sake.”
“And Mom star Anna Faris says she’s found that tribe in fellow mamas Kristen Bell and Reese Witherspoon.”
“More: Kristen Bell Gets Why Chris Pratt & Anna Faris Split“I like how they combine humor with raising kids, but also how they tackle motherhood and work without being pretentious,” Faris told Us Weekly.”
““The first few years, I was like, ‘Oh, my God.”
“Everyone else seems to know exactly what to do and I don’t.’”Faris said she’s grateful for Witherspoon and Bell’s keep-it-real parenting style and their willingness to be candid about their mistakes.”
“Faris admits she’s still figuring things out.”


"Anna, you will be our mother's lover one day."
"He's very happy."
"Do you agree?"
"After all, motherhood is not a separate sport."
"It absolutely needs a tribe - for inspiration and reason."
"Mother star Anna Faris said she found the tribe in her fellow mothers, Christine bell and Reese Witherspoon."
"More: why Christine belmingbai, Chris Pratt and Anna Faris broke up," Faris told us weekly. "I like how they combine humor with parenting, and how they deal with motherhood and work without pretentiousness."
"In the first few years, I said," Oh, my God. "
"Everyone else seems to know what to do, and I don't know." Faris said she was grateful to Witherspoon and bell for "maintaining a real parenting style" and for their willingness to be honest about their mistakes
"Faris admits she's still working on it."



Number  1196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more birthday messages for the iconic actress below:”
“White later reposted the photo, writing, “No better way to kick off 95 than with a visit from my dear friend, @katiecouric.”Reese Witherspoon shared a GIF of White dabbing and tweeted, “Proof of why #BettyWhite is my all time fav!”
“Betty White turned 95 on Tuesday, January 17, and the beloved Golden Girl got an outpouring of love on social media from celebrities and fans.”
“(Watch White’s greatest onscreen moments in the video above!)”
“Katie Couric tweeted about sitting down with the Mary Tyler Moore Show actress for a birthday interview.”
““How lucky am I?”
“I got to wish my girl crush @BettyMWhite a happy…wait for it…95th birthday!”
“!” she tweeted alongside a photo of the pair holding up a fruit tart with a candle.”
“HBD @BettyMWhite !”
“Happy birthday to our favorite 95-year-old fan, Betty White!” the tweet said.”


"For more information about the idol actress's birthday below:
White then forwarded the photo, saying: "there is no better way to celebrate the 95th anniversary than my dear friend @ Katie resource's visit." Reese Witherspoon shared a white graffiti GIF and tweeted: "prove why Betty White has always been my favorite!"
On Tuesday, January 17, at the age of 95, Betty White was warmly welcomed by celebrities and fans on social media
"Watch White's best screen moment in the video above!"
"Katie Couric tweeted that she and Mary Tyler Moore's actress sat down for a birthday interview."
"How lucky am I?"
"I want to wish my girlfriend @ Betty mwhite happiness Wait My 95th birthday
"!" she posted a picture of two people holding fruit pies with candles on her micro blog. "
“ HBD@BettyMWhite ！”
"Happy Birthday to our favorite 95 year old fan Betty White! "On Weibo," he said



Number  1197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us, below!”
““Rihanna wants him to get caught up in the excitement and have him thinking about putting a ring on it asap,” our insider added.”
“Now, we’ve EXCLUSIVELY learned if Hassan Jameel popped the question!”
“Boys, don’t cry out your eyes just yet.”
“Even though Rihanna, 29, was spotted with a glamorous sparkler on THAT finger in Madison Square Garden on Dec. 7, she’s not exchanging her vows with Hassan Jameel anytime soon.”
““Rihanna is not actually engaged,” a source close to the songstress tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““If she were engaged, she would let the whole world know about it pretty quickly.”
“That is news she would love to share with her family, friends and fans.”
“They have been spending time together and Rihanna would love to get serious, but right now she is just toying with people.”
“She loves the attention she gets wearing a big ring like that and she is trying to send a not-so-subtle message to Hassan too.” See Rihanna’s sexiest pics, right here.”


"Tell us, down there!"
"Rihanna wanted to keep him excited and make him think about wearing the ring as soon as possible," our insider added
"Now, we know exclusively whether Hassan Jamil raised this question!"
"Don't cry, children."
"Although Rihanna, 29, was found with a glamorous flash on her finger in Madison Square Garden on December 7, she will not exchange vows with Hassan Jamil soon."
"Rihanna is not actually engaged," a source close to the singer told reporters
"If she's engaged, she'll let the world know soon."
"This is the message she wants to share with her family, friends and fans."
"They've been together. Rihanna wants to be serious, but now she's just playing with other people."
"She likes to get people's attention with a big ring like this, and she's trying to convey a less subtle message to Hassan." Look at Rihanna's sexiest picture, right here



Number  1198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If anything, she might be upset with the tabloids for spreading false information.”
“Most of the humor is really without teeth.”So we can rest assured that unlike what has been falsely reported in tabloids, Beyonce is not actually upset with Reynolds or Lively over jabs in Deadpool 2.”
““There’s a little bit of making fun, but I think everyone sees it for what it is, in the spirit of what it is.”
“As Reynolds himself noted, everyone who has been made fun of in Deadpool 2 understands what the intention of the makers really is.”
“Tens of celebrities including Hugh Jackman, Matthew McConaughey, and Justin Bieber have all been laughed at in some way or the other in the sequel, but it is unlikely that these jokes would cause anything other than a chuckle or two.”
“Moreover, considering the nature of Ryan Reynolds’ character in the Deadpool series, where he is foul-mouthed and provides a running sort of social gag, it would be surprising if every celebrity he made fun of would begin to take offense with the jokes in the film.”
“But despite the spoof, Beyonce attended the SNL after-party the following year with Jay Z invited as the musical guest.”
“For example, as Gossip Cop reports, in October 2016, Saturday Night Live spoofed the music video of her song “Sorry” which had an implicit implication about Jay Z cheating on her.”
“But if history is anything to go by Beyonce has a great sense of humor and doesn t get unhappy with every joke made at her expense...”
“This was reportedly because Beyonce felt that she had broken girl code by not telling Ryan to think twice about poking fun at another woman being cheated on The source quoted by NW magazine even went on to claim that Beyonce thinks it s cruel and certainly isn t laughing...”


"If anything, she might be upset by tabloids that spread false information."
"Most humor is toothless." So we can rest assured that, unlike the misinformation in the tabloids, Beyonce is not angry with Reynolds or the bayonet in death pool 2
"It's kind of funny, but I think everyone sees it as it is and sees its spirit."
"As Reynolds himself pointed out, everyone who is teased in dead pool 2 understands the real intention of the producer."
"Dozens of celebrities, including Hugh Jackman, Matthew McConnell and Justin Bieber, have been ridiculed to some extent in the sequel, but these jokes are unlikely to cause only one or two laughs."
"In addition, considering the character of Ryan Reynolds in the death pool series, he is full of swearing and provides a continuous social gimmick. It would be surprising if every celebrity he teases starts to get angry with the jokes in the film."
"But despite the prank, Beyonce went to SNL's party the next year and invited jay z as a music guest."
"For example, according to gossip police, in October 2016, a music video of her song sorry was broadcast live on Saturday night, suggesting that jay z cheated her."
"However, if history has any meaning, Beyonce has a good sense of humor and will not be dissatisfied with every joke at her expense..."
"According to the report, this is because Beyonce felt that she had violated the girls' code of conduct. She didn't tell Ryan to think twice and made fun of another woman being cheated. The source quoted by NW magazine even claimed that Beyonce thought it was cruel and certainly didn't laugh..."



Number  1199
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Generally, phase three is not a major danger for male stars.”
“Phase 3: This woman is absolutely everywhere, and I hate herThe consequence of plastering a starlet’s face everywhere — on all the magazine covers, all the talk shows, all the movie trailers — is that people get sick of her.”
“Nor is it because we are all exponentially more woke now than we were in 2013.”
“...if you've always been aware of the ways gender bias affected how society treated Anne Hathaway, you are Hathawoke — Kevin O'Keeffe (@kevinpokeeffe) April 4, 2017But that shift doesn’t have all that much to do with Hathaway herself.”
“It’s now culturally acceptable to say that 2013’s Anne Hathaway hatred was based on systemic misogyny, just as it was culturally acceptable to say in 2013 that you hated Anne Hathaway.”
“Afterward, people approvingly passed around screencaps on Twitter, and talked about how unfair it is that people say mean things about Hathaway so often.”
““I am … not eager, but I am ready for the conversation to move to a place beyond it.”It’s a thoughtful, graceful interview, one that ends with Juzwiak recognizing his own role in perpetuating Hathahate and repenting for it.”
““It comes up in every interview I do, just about,” Hathaway said of the “why does everyone hate her” narrative, in an interview last week with Rich Juzwiak for Jezebel.”
“They still do.”
“Shut up, Anne Hathaway.”There was think piece after think piece about why everyone hated Anne Hathaway, and every interviewer who talked to her asked about them.”


"Generally speaking, the third stage is not a big danger for male stars."
"Stage three: this woman is everywhere. I hate her smearing star faces on all magazine covers, all talk shows, all movie trailers. The result is that people hate her."
"It's not because we're more sober now than we were in 2013."
“…… If you have always been aware of how gender bias affects social treatment of Anne Hathaway, you are Hathaway - Kevin OKeeffe, April 4, 2017, but this change has little to do with Hathaway herself. "
"It is now culturally acceptable to say that Anne Hathaway's hatred in 2013 is based on a systematic aversion to women, just as it is culturally acceptable to say that you hate Anne Hathaway in 2013."
"Later, people tweeted praiseworthy screenshots and talked about how unfair it was for people to say bad things about Hathaway so often."
"I No hurry, but I'm ready to move the conversation to another place. " It was a thoughtful and elegant interview, and at the end of it, zhuzwick realized his role in continuing hathahate and repenting for it
"I mention that in every interview I do," Hathaway said in an interview with rich juzwiak for Jezebel last week about "why everyone hates her."
"They still are."
"Shut up, Anne Hathaway." There are one idea after another about why everyone hates Anne Hathaway, and every interviewer who talks to her will ask them



Number  1200
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"The women he sees are not in the public eye,” they added.”
“"The key thing is that they agree to custody sharing, with Brad having access and working with Angelina on logistic issues about work and travel," they added.”
“...of their six children months after increasingly bitter rows...”
“The Hollywood stars, who announced their split in the summer of 2016, have reached a decision that will help their kids come to terms with the break-up.”
“Despite Angelina initially requesting sole custody of them all, she's since decided to allow Brad to have access to the children and has been talking to him about the logistics of childcare while they work and travel around the world.”
“"The terms of the divorce are now agreed," a source told the Sun.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America)"They are being finalised by both legal teams, but will be filed within weeks."”
“The insider went on: "It's a huge turnaround from where the marriage ended, especially given the claims Angelina made against Brad, but they are now on pretty good terms."”
“While it had been rumoured that the former married couple had called off their divorce, the source said that is not the case.”
“(Image: WENN.com)(Image: AFP)Meanwhile, as well as moving on from the final details of their divorce, both Brad and Ange are said to be back in the dating game.”


"The women he saw were not in the public eye," they added
"The key is that they agree to share custody and Brad has the right to work with Angelina on the logistics of work and travel," they added
“… Their six children, after months of increasingly fierce quarrels
"Hollywood stars announced their breakup in the summer of 2016, and they have reached a decision that will help their children accept the breakup."
"Although Angelina initially asked for separate custody of all of them, she later decided to allow Brad access to the children and has been talking to Brad about the logistics of child care while they work and travel around the world."
"Divorce conditions have now been agreed," a source told the sun
"(photo source: Getty Images North America)" the two legal teams are in the process of finalizing, but will submit it in a few weeks. "
"It's a huge turning point from the end of the marriage, especially given Angelina's claim against Brad, but they are now in pretty good condition," the person said
"Although there are rumors that the ex-wife canceled the divorce, the source said that was not the case."
"(image: Wenwang) (image: Agence France Presse) meanwhile, it is said that Brad and Angie have returned to the dating game in addition to the final details of their divorce."



Number  1201
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“After a paternity test, the case is thrown out.”
“It was just pancakes!”Bieber, too, stays mum on the subject, telling MTV that she’s “an amazing person,” but, “I think that people are always gonna be interested in my personal life .”
“And so began the long, complicated, and endless saga of “Jelena,” which, in its latest of many twists, has the on-again, off-again couple once again hitting the “off“ switch.”
“How did we get here, exactly?”
“You’re forgiven for not knowing.”
“After all, IHOP was centuries ago, or at least 2010, when Barack Obama was a first-term president and America watched American Idol and Survivor.”
“Here’s a comprehensive guide to their on-and-off, up-and-down, are-they-or-aren’t-they relationship.”
“December 2010—The Infamous IHOP DateTMZ breaks the news that the teen idols enjoyed a “cuddly” date at an IHOP in Philadelphia ahead of a Q102’s Jingle Ball.”
“Gomez tells Us Weekly that it was platonic, and that Bieber is “one of my best friends .”
“.”


"After paternity testing, the case was rejected."
"Just pancakes! "Bieber, too, remained silent on this issue, telling MTV that she was a" great person, "but" I think people will always be interested in my personal life. "
So "Jennie" began a long, complex, endless legend, in the recent twists and turns, the couple again pressed the "off" switch
"How on earth did we get here?"
"You can be forgiven for not knowing."
"After all, IHop was centuries ago, at least in 2010, when Barack Obama was the first president, and the United States watched American Idol and survivor
"Here's a comprehensive guide to their relationship, whether it's them or not."
"In December 2010, the infamous IHop datetmz revealed that teenage idols enjoyed a" hug "date at IHop in Philadelphia, followed by a Q102 jingle ball."
Gomez tells us that this is platonic, and Bieber is "one of my best friends."
“.”



Number  1202
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Sun also reported that sources close to Pitt have denied the dating rumors and said that he and Lawrence are not together.”
“The two ended their relationship in August of 2014.”
“Prior to dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28-year-old “X-Men” co-star, Nicolas Hoult, for five years off and on.”
“Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a short fling with Coldplay lead singer and ex-husband a Gwyneth Paltrow, Chris Martin — Paltrow being another common thread between her and Brad.”
“But age hasn’t seemed to stop Lawrence before.”
“According to The Sun, Lawrence broke up with Aronofsy after a year of dating due to their great difference in age.”
“However, the tabloid checking website Gossip Cop reported that despite reports about the two A-listers becoming a pair, for now the rumors remain just rumors.”
“The source added that Pitt was nervous to contact Lawrence, but was encouraged by friends to make the first move.”
“There’s an intense connection between them!”An insider also told the magazine that Pitt allegedly reached out to Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend.”
“[They] have been enjoying lots of late nights together.”


"The sun also reported that sources close to Pitt denied rumors of a date and said he was not with Lawrence."
"The two ended their relationship in August 2014."
Before dating Martin, Lawrence dated her 28 year old X-Men partner Nicholas Holt intermittently for five years
Before dating Aronofsky, Lawrence had a brief relationship with Gwyneth Paltrow, the lead singer and ex husband of Coldplay. Chris Martin Paltrow is another common clue between her and Brad
"But age never seemed to stop Lawrence."
According to the sun, Lawrence and aronofs broke up after a year of dating because of a big age gap
"However, the tabloid censorship website gossip police report that despite reports that two first-line stars have become a couple, the current rumors are still just rumors."
"The source added that Pete was nervous about contacting Lawrence, but encouraged by his friends, he was the first to act."
"There is a close connection between them! "An insider also told the magazine that Pete was said to have contacted Lawrence after getting her phone number from a mutual friend."
"(they) spent many late nights together."



Number  1203
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““If they did, they’d be looking for a new job.”For more on this story, pick up the latest issue of In Touch, on newsstands now!”
““No one on her team would dare tell her that an outfit is too snug or that she should lay off the late-night cocktails, sweets and refrigerator raids,” an insider previously told In Touch.”
““I feel sorry for those dancers who have to pick her up.”Mariah’s weight is obviously a touchy subject these days — and her entourage knows to never bring it up around her.”
““She’s a big fat lump,” one commenter wrote, while another compared the Glitter actress to a sumo wrestler.”
““One audience member said she looked like a sausage encased in glitter,” said the witness, “and others were saying she needs to change her clothes.” Social media haters were even more cutthroat.”
““She looked bigger all over, but Mariah was flaunting every curve.”The body shamers were ruthless, too.”
““Some audience members immediately started whispering about her appearance — her costumes were incredibly revealing and tight,” a witness exclusively told In Touch at the time.”
“(Photo Credit: Getty Images/Splash)As previously reported, concertgoers at Mariah’s final show of her Sin City residency at Caesars Palace on July 18 were more focused on her weight rather than her performance.”
“Mariah Carey in a photo from February 2017 (left) and at Caesars Palace on July 18.”
““[Mariah] has been in a much better mood” since the mirrors were installed, the insider continues, adding that the Grammy winner is “very much in denial about her weight right now.” But TBH, if skinny mirrors make Mimi feel better, then more power to her!”


"If they do, they will find a new job." To learn more about this story, listen to the latest issue of contact at the newsstand now! "
"No one on her team dares to tell her that a suit is too comfortable, or that she should stop late night cocktails, candy and refrigerator shopping," an insider said earlier in contact magazine
"I feel sorry for the dancers who have to pick her up." Maria's weight is clearly a sensitive topic now - her entourage knows never to mention it around her
"She's a fat woman," one commentator wrote, while another compared the glamorous actress to a sumo wrestler
"One audience said she looked like a sausage wrapped in a flash," the witness said. "Others said she needed to change." The enemies of social media are more ferocious. "
"She looks bigger all over, but Maria is showing off every curve." Those shameless people are also ruthless
"Some viewers immediately began to whisper about her appearance - her costumes were incredibly revealing and close," an exclusive witness told the contact
"(photo source: Getty Images / splash) as previously reported, at Maria's last performance in sin city on July 18 at Caesar's palace, audiences at the concert paid more attention to her weight than her performance."
"Maria Kelly in the picture of Caesar Palace on February (left) and July 18, 2017."
"Since the mirror was installed, [Maria] has been in a much better mood," the person said, adding that the Grammy winner "now denies her weight very much.". But if the skinny mirror makes Mimi feel better, then she's more powerful! "



Number  1204
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I showed up with mustard down my T-shirt and they're like giving me the wink, 'Yeah, man, you're on the list.'"”
“"It's like that scene in Doubt [2008, in which Philip Seymour Hoffman plays a priest suspected of inappropriate behavior], where he's talking about how to take back gossip?"”
“Two years after his ex-girlfriend Kristen Stewart cheated on him, Robert Pattinson showed that he was long over the scandal by laughing it off in an interview for the September 2014 issue of Esquire UK.”
“"S— happens, you know?"”
“Pattinson, 28, told the magazine with a laugh.”
“"It's just young people… it’s normal!”
“And honestly, who gives a s—?"”
“The British actor's latest comments come two years after Us Weekly exclusively revealed Stewart's fling with her married Snow White and the Huntsman director Rupert Sanders in shocking pics published in July 2012.”
“"The hardest part was talking about it afterwards," Pattinson said of the affair.”
“"Because when you talk about other people, it affects them in ways you can't predict."”


"I have mustard on my T-shirt and they're like winking at me," yes, man, you're on the list. "
"Like the scene in doubt (in 2008, Philip Seymour Hoffman played a pastor suspected of misconduct), he was talking about how to recover the scandal?"
"Two years after his ex girlfriend, Kristen Stewart, betrayed him, Robert Pattinson laughed it off in an interview with gentleman magazine in September 2014 to show that he had long been bitter about the scandal."
"What happened, you know?"
"Pattinson, 28, told the magazine with a smile."
"Just young people That's normal! "
"To be honest, who gave an S -"
"Two years ago, US weekly exclusively revealed Stewart's affair with married snow white and Humboldt Sanders in a shocking photo released in July 2012."
"The hardest thing is to talk about it afterwards," Pattinson said of the incident
"Because when you talk about people, it affects them in ways you can't predict."



Number  1205
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Are ya holdin’ on tight?’””
“Later in “The Clique,” Smith praises his family: “The real-life Incredibles, last name Smith.”
“The rapper addresses the constant divorce rumors he and wife Jada Pinkett Smith face in his new song.”
“The 49-year-old actor hinted at new music he has been working on in a YouTube video on Wednesday, May 23.”
“He shared a snippet of one of his new tracks, “To the Clique,” in which he raps about his personal life.”
““Stop the divorce rumors and mind your damn business,” Smith says in the song.”
“The Fresh Prince of Bel-Air actor and the Girls Trip actress, 46, have dealt with gossip about their relationship status throughout their 20-year marriage.”
“They do not comment on the reports often, though.”
“Jada Jaden Willow Trey ya ll ain t f king with my clique Smith spoke up to defend his marriage after outlets ran with a report that the couple who are parents of Jaden 19 Willow 17 and Smith s son from his previous marriage Trey 25 were divorcing in...”
“Get ready.”


"Are you holding on? '"
Later, in faction, Smith praised his family: "incredible in real life, surnamed Smith."
"In his new song, the rapper talks about the divorce rumors that he and his wife Jada pinkert Smith often face."
"The 49 year old actor hinted at the new music he was creating in a YouTube video on Wednesday, May 23."
"He shared a piece of his new song," to pike, "which tells about his private life
"Stop the divorce rumors and mind your business," Smith said in the song
The 46 year old prince and the heroine of the girl's journey have been talking about their relationship for 20 years
"However, they don't often comment on these reports."
"Jada Jaden willow treya will not be associated with my faction. In the media reports, Jaden Jaden willow 17's parents and Smith's son treya 25 are in After the divorce, Smith defended his marriage
"Ready."



Number  1206
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See Now: Famous Actors Who Turned Down Iconic Movie Roles...”
“In addition, they have both already been married before and didn't feel that an elaborate ceremony was necessary.”
“Over two years into the musical couple s relationship a new report claims that 48 year old Stefani has been left heartbroken at the alleged loss especial considering she and her boyfriend had reportedly been trying to get pregnant for...”
“...over a year...”
““It was very hard for her,” a source close to the singer told Radar Online on Feb. 8.”
“According to the report, Stefani learned that she had allegedly suffered a miscarriage during a recent visit to her obstetrician where an ultrasound technician was said to have been unable to find her baby's heartbeat.”
“However, she has kept the rumored news on the down-low.”
“During the process of trying to get pregnant, Stefani resorted to in-vitro fertilization and after being forced to take a number of fertility drugs, she was reportedly left exhausted, both physically and emotionally.”
““Gwen is 48 and was very insecure about not being able to give Blake a baby,” a friend claimed.”
““She knows that would never be a problem for his ex Miranda Lambert because she’s only 34!"”


"Now look at the famous actors who refuse idol movie roles..."
"In addition, they have been married before, so they don't think it's necessary to have a careful wedding."
"The musical couple's relationship lasted more than two years, and a new report says Stefani, 48, is heartbroken by the alleged loss, especially given that she and her boyfriend are said to have been trying to conceive..."
“… More than a year... "
"It's very difficult for her," a source close to the singer told radar online on February 8
It is reported that Stephanie learned that he had a miscarriage when he went to see an obstetrician recently. It is said that an ultrasonic technician could not find the child's heartbeat
"However, she has been keeping a low profile on the rumors."
"In the process of trying to conceive, Stefani resorted to in vitro fertilization, and after being forced to take some fertility drugs, she was reported to be physically and mentally exhausted."
"Gwen, 48, is very upset about not being able to give birth to Blake," a friend claimed
"She knew it would never be a problem for his ex boyfriend, Miranda Lambert, because she was only 34 years old!"



Number  1207
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“The film is rumored to focus on Clinton’s career and marriage to Bill — Straight Shuter’s Rob Shuter has all the latest gossip!”
““Glenn and Meryl [Streep]‘s names were both mentioned a lot but after Meryl got so political at the Golden Globes, producers thought it might be better to go with Close,” sources said.”
“A movie is in the works about Hillary Clinton and her amazing life, and legendary actress Glenn Close has been chosen to play the former first lady and presidential candidate!”
“Find out why Meryl Streep got the boot.”
“Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Hillary Clinton The Movie — Starring Glenn Close!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"It's rumored that the movie focuses on Clinton's career and marriage. Bill strickleshott's robeshott has all the latest gossip!"
"Glen and Meryl (Streep) were mentioned a lot, but after Meryl became so politicized at the Golden Globes, the producers thought it might be better to keep in close touch with them," the source said
"A movie about Hillary Clinton and her amazing life is being made, and legendary actress Glenn Close has been chosen to play the role of the former first lady and presidential candidate!"
"Find out why Meryl Streep was fired."
Click Share on twitter (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Hillary Clinton's movie Glenn Close



Number  1208
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Meghan should give up her career to be with Harry?”
“Prince Harry is getting a lot of pressure from the royal fam to make his alleged fiancee Meghan Markle quit acting once they get married.”
“But will that fly with the ‘Skins’ star?”
“Fans of the royals are still freaking out after news broke that Prince Harry, 32, may have popped the question to girlfriend Meghan Markle, 36.”
“Unfortunately, there has been no official announcement, so there’s still no way of knowing for sure.”
“If they are truly engaged, why would they keep the happy news a secret?”
“A palace insider told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that it may have to do with some behind-the-scenes drama with the royal family.”
“Click here for pics of Meghan and Harry.”
““Harry and Meghan still have a lot of details to work out before they announce anything and one of the big sticking points is her career,” said the source.”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Megan should give up her career and be with Harry?"
"Prince Harry is under great pressure from the royal family to ask his so-called fiancee Meghan Markle to leave the show business once she gets married."
"But will that take off with Pi?"
"Royal fans are still mad after the news that Prince Harry, 32, may propose to his girlfriend Megan markel, 36."
"Unfortunately, there is no official announcement yet, so it is still uncertain."
"If they are really engaged, why should they keep the good news secret?"
”An insider of the Forbidden City told reporters that the only reason for Hollywood life is that it may be related to some behind the scenes scenes scenes of the royal family. "
"Click here to see photos of Megan and Harry."
"Harry and Megan have a lot of details to work out before announcing anything, and one of the biggest sticking points is her career," the source said



Number  1209
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Perhaps Younes should give serious thought to deleting his account – or, at least, stay out of the comments section.”
“While he’s physically distant from his girl, he’s been working on closing the emotional distance that opened up between them after he got rude on IG.”
“After leaving rude comments on Kourtney Kardashian s Instagram we re hearing he ll do anything to get on her good side again Younes Bendjima 25 has been in the doghouse ever since he left a snarky comment on Kourtney Kardashian s instagram insinuating that his girlfriend was thirsty for...”
“...likes...”
“The comment threw their relationship into a tailspin, and Younes is willing to do what it takes to set things right.”
““Younes is desperate to fix things with Kourtney after his regretful and rude comment,” a source close to Younes shares EXCLUSIVELY with HollywoodLife.com.”
“Things between the two have been tense ever since his dumb Instagram remark and he wants to fix things However the source tells HollywoodLife com he has been travelling While Younes has been off in Europe the source says he s struggled to stay connected with his girlfriend during this...”
“...time...”
““He has been apologizing, sending her sweet texts and flowers to let her know that he is sorry for the foolish remark,” the insider says.”
“Yet, when Kourt’s bestie Simon Huck rolled his eyes at the comment, Younes said he was just trying to “play around fam.” Hmm.”


"Maybe you should seriously consider deleting his account - or, at least, not in the comments section."
"Although he is physically distant from his girlfriend, he has been trying to close the emotional distance between them due to their rudeness to Ig."
"After leaving rude comments on Courtney Kardashian's instagram, we heard that he would be on her good side again by all means. Younes bendjima 25 since he left sharp comments on Courtney Kardashian's instagram suggesting that his girlfriend is eager to..."
“… I like... "
"This comment has put their relationship in a dilemma, and younes is willing to make every effort to put things right."
A source close to younes said in an exclusive interview with the New York Times: "younes, after making regrettable and rude comments on Courtney, really wants to solve the problem with him." Hollywood life. "
"Since his stupid instagram comment, the relationship between the two has been very tense. He wants to solve the problem, but the source told Hollywood Life com that he has been traveling and younes has been in Europe. The source said that it is difficult for him to keep in touch with his girlfriend during this period..."
“… Time... "
"He has been apologizing, sending her sweet messages and flowers to let her know that he is sorry for this stupid remark," the person said
However, when Kurt's good friend Simon Huck rolled his eyes at the comment, yones said he just wanted to "play with his family."



Number  1210
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Selena recently stole the Biebs look — watch the video below for all the deets!”
“Who wore it better?!”
“With Chelsey expecting a baby girl this summer, there was also baby fever going around — particularly for groomsman Justin, 24, and his girlfriend Selena Gomez, 25.”
““Justin and Selena are talking babies now!” a source exclusively tells Life & Style.”
“They spent a lot of their time at the wedding playing with all the kids and they both think it s the perfect time to take their relationship to the next level Those children they played with included Chelsey s...”
“...daughter Allie 10 and Justin s little half sibs Jazmyn 9 and Jaxon 8”
“And Selena was impressed by what she saw from her man.”
““Selena thinks Justin will make a great dad,” the source says.”
““He’s a total natural with children.”
“And Selena adores kids, too.”


"Serena recently stole Biebs - watch all the deets videos below!"
"Who is better dressed?"
"This summer, as Chelsea became pregnant with a baby girl, baby fever spread - especially Justin, 24, best man, and Serena Gomez, 25
"Justin and Serena are talking babies now! "Exclusive sources tell life and style."
"They spent a lot of time playing with all the kids at the wedding, and they all thought it was the best time to take their relationship to a new level, and the kids they played with, including Chelsea..."
“… Daughter Ellie 10 and Justin's half brothers jazmin 9 and jakson 8 "
"Selena was impressed by what she saw from men."
"Selena thinks Justin will be a great father," the source said
"He's totally natural to children."
"Serena likes children, too."



Number  1211
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, she failed to join her husband on the trip, albeit for an understandable reason.”
“Many may not realise that Kate Middleton grew up in Jordan as a child after moving there for a number of years.”
“Yet Prince William headed to Israel and Jordan alone last month in a landmark visit and was the first of any British monarch to do so.”
“As part of the royal family, the couple head abroad to promote good relations between countries in the name of the crown as Queen Elizabeth reduces her overseas visits.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge, 36, has joined Prince William, also 36, on a number of important royal tours such as Canada and India over the years.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”


"However, she was not able to travel with her husband, although the reason is understandable."
"A lot of people may not realize that Kate Middleton grew up in Jordan as a child after living in Jordan for a few years."
"However, Prince William went to Israel and Jordan alone last month, a landmark visit and the first British monarch to do so."
"As part of the royal family, with Queen Elizabeth reducing overseas visits, the couple went abroad in the name of the royal family to promote good relations between countries."
"The Duchess of Cambridge, who is 36 years old, has joined Prince William, who is also 36 years old, in some important Royal tours such as Canada and India for many years."
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."



Number  1212
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“She talks about the baby nonstop.”Another insider told PEOPLE last month that Kylie is “only trusting her closest friends and her sisters right now.””
“He kept bringing her drinks and doting on her.”
““Kourtney seemed so happy that Younes joined her,” the insider says.”
““He mingled, looked good and didn’t drink,” the source says, adding that there wasn’t any awkwardness with Kourtney’s new boyfriend Younes Bendjima.”
“...surrogate Kourtney Kardashian and their kids Kim s daughter North 4 and son Saint 2 and Kourtney son Reign 3 daughter Penelope 5 and son Mason 8”
“...christmas blessed ohholynight Image zoom Credit Khloe Kardashian Instagram Kim Kardashian West Kris Jenner and Khloé Kardashian Image zoom Credit Khloe Kardashian Instagram Khloé Kardashian and Scott Disic Aside for Khloé and Kendall Kris party also brought together siblings Kim Kardashian West who s expecting her third child via a...”
““Love you guys!!!!!!!!”
“Wishing all of you and your families much Joy Happiness Peace and Health…” Kris added in her own post, a photo of her and Khloé alongside Kendall Jenner.”
“✨ #BabyBump”“Merry Christmas!!!!!”
“God bless you!”


Last month, another person familiar with the matter told people that Kelly "now trusts only her closest friends and sisters."
"He kept bringing her drinks and spoiling her."
"Courtney seems happy that yones has joined her," the person familiar with the matter said
"He mingles, looks good and doesn't drink," the source said, adding that there was no embarrassment with coortney's new boyfriend, yones benjima
“… Agent kurtanica Dashan and their children King's daughter north 4 and son Saint 2 and kurtany's son rule 3, daughter Penelope 5 and son Mason 8 "
“… Christmas greeting ohholynight image zooming credit Khloe Kardashian instagram Kim Kardashian West Kris Jenner and khlo é Kardashian image zooming credit Khloe Kardashian instagram khlo é Kardashian and Scott Disic also gathered brothers and sisters Kim Kardashian West for khlo é and Kendall Kris, and they passed a... "
"I love you all ~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
"I wish you all and your families happiness, peace and health..." Chris added in his post that this is a picture of her with Carol and Kendall Jenner
“ ✨  #Baby "Merry Christmas!!"
"God bless you!"



Number  1213
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel about this!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it was wrong of Courteney to flirt with Brad?”
“She got flirty with Jennifer Aniston’s ex Brad Pitt at a recent event, according to a shocking Jan. 25 report, and we’ve got all the details right here.”
“So has Jen heard?”
“Here’s what’s going on!”
““Courtney Cox, 52, behaved like a smitten fan girl around Brad Pitt, 53, [at the Rock4EB charity concert],” an eyewitness at the Jan. 14 event in Malibu, CA, tells Life & Style magazine in their Feb. 6 issue.”
“Yikes!”
““She kept telling him how great he looked and flirted with him like crazy,” the source adds of Courteney, who hosted the big shindig.”
“Well, Brad did look exceptionally good that evening, but still!”
“Here’s where it gets interesting: Brad might just have a little crush on the Cougar Town actress, too!”


"Tell us how you feel about it!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think it's wrong for Courtney to flirt with Brad?"
"According to a shocking report on January 25th, she flirted with former Brad Pitt of Jennifer Aniston at a recent event. We have all the details here."
"Did Jane hear that?"
"Here's the thing!"
"Courtney Cox, 52, acts like a fan girl beside Brad Pitt, 53, [at the rock4eb charity concert]," witnesses to the January 14 event in Malibu, California, said in the February 6 issue of life and fashion magazine
"Oh dear!"
"She kept telling him how great he looked and flirting with him madly," added Courtney's source, who hosted the big party
"Well, Brad did look great that night, but he was still!"
"It's interesting: Brad might be a little bit obsessed with Cougar actresses, too!"



Number  1214
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That is not one of them.’”
“But they are defining you with a Taylor Swift song.’Jake joked: ‘There are dark things that happen on Good Morning America.”
“Speaking to Jake Gyllenhaal about his love affair with Taylor Swift on Wednesday, the shock jock said he wanted the actor to take it all the way to the altar.”
“Speaking on his Sirius XM show Howard told Jake I feel and this is me stepping in you should have married Taylor Swift and I ll tell you why What a power couple Scroll down for video Third degree Jake Gyllenhaal was quizzed on his romance with Taylor Swift on...”
“Wednesday when he made an appearance on the Howard Stern XFM show The Southpaw actor 34 responded Oh that s the reason Howard 61 who was now in his stride revealed he was super attracted to Taylor and said if he had been friends with Jake when they were dating...”
“...he would have told him she was worth staying with long term...”
“The Nightcrawler star who dated the Shake It Off singer for three months back in 2010 admitted She s a beautiful girl Romance He dated the singer for three months in 2010 Jake joked Why didn t you have me on this show sooner Howard warming to his topic continued...”
“I would have said Jake this is The One Because to me nothing is sexier than a woman who can play songs and write Robin Quivers who co hosts with Howard then brought up Taylor had written a song about her relationship with Jake their break up is said to...”
“...have inspired tracks on the Red album...”
“To the altar: Howard pressed the actor for details and then said he thought they should have got hitchedJake, feigning ignorance said: ‘Do I?’Howard chimed in asking which one it was.”


"That's not one of them."
"But they define you with a Taylor Swift song," Jack joked. "In Good Morning America, some dark things happen."
"Speaking with Jack Gyllenhaal on Wednesday about his relationship with Taylor Swift, the shocked athlete said he wanted the actor to go all the way to the altar."
"In his Sirius XM program, Howard told Jack that I think it's my intervention. You should marry Taylor Swift. I'll tell you why a couple of power rolling video three times, Jack Gyllenhaal was asked about his relationship with Taylor Swift..."
"On Wednesday, when he appeared on Howard Stern's XFM show, the 34 year old left-handed actor replied," Oh, that's why Howard 61 is faltering now. He revealed that he's crazy about Taylor and said if he was a friend when he dated Jack... "
“… He'll tell him that she deserves to be together for a long time... "
"The" Night Walker "star, who dated the" shake off "singer for three months in 2010, admitted that she was a beautiful and romantic girl. He dated the singer for three months in 2010. Jack joked," why don't you let me on this show earlier, Howard continues to heat up his topic... "
"I would say it's Jack, because for me, there's nothing sexier than a woman who can sing and write. Robin quevos and Howard hosted the show together. Later, when she grew up, Taylor wrote a song about her relationship with Jack. It's said that they broke up..."
“… Inspired songs on the red album... "
"Going to the altar: Howard asks the actors for details, then says he thinks they deserve hichedjak, pretending to be ignorant and saying: 'is that right? "Howard cut in and asked which one."



Number  1215
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She insists that she was taken by surprise by my ultimate transition to Caitlyn...I told her I dressed as a woman, and she knew I did, because I did it several times in front of her after we were married," she claimed.”
“The source added, "She thinks he's got what it takes to play both her and her former self, Bruce, and now Rob's throwing his weight behind the project as well."”
“Jun 8, 2017AceShowbiz - Caitlyn Jenner new memoir "The Secrets of My Life" reportedly will be adapted into a movie, with "How to Be a Latin Lover" actor Rob Lowe reportedly in talks to play her.”
“A source told OK!”
“...that the actor would be interested to portray the Olympian-turned-transgender reality show star.”
“"Rob’s been hunting for an awards-caliber movie part.”
“This would be a game-changer for him," a source told the magazine.”
“The insider went on saying that Caitlyn had sent Rob a copy of her book and that "they've met up a few times to discuss it."”
“However, Gossip Cop has learned that the report is simply "not true."”
“"This will always be a subject of dispute between Kris and me as to how much she could intuit about my gender issues.”


"She insisted that it was a surprise to her that I finally became Caitlin I told her I was dressed as a woman, and she knew I was dressed as a woman, because after we got married, I dressed in front of her several times, "she claimed
The source added, "she thinks he has the ability to play her and her former self, Bruce, and now rob is also investing in the project."
"Aceshowbiz Caitlyn Jenner's new memoir" the secret of my life "is said to be adapted into a film, and Rob Lowe, the actor of how to be a Latin lover, is said to be talking to her."
"A source said," OK! "
“…… The actors are interested in playing the reality TV star who has become a transsexual from an Olympic athlete. "
"Rob has been looking for an award-winning movie character."
"It's going to be a game changer for him," a source told the magazine
Caitlin sent rob a copy of her book, the person said. "They've met and discussed it several times."
"However, the gossip police have learned that this report is" untrue. "
"It's always the subject of my argument with Chris because of how intuitive she is about my gender issues."



Number  1216
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is imported from Twitter.”
“But the pair are keeping romance alive despite everything.”
“Fans were delighted to spot Jelena out on a date in L.A. at the Rex Orange County show in Los Angeles last night.”
“Not only were they looking totally adorbs attending the concert together — fans also spotted them getting cuddly in the middle of the street.”
“Really.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“Look at how cute Justin is dude  i legit sneaked this pic so hard but fuck i had to get his cuteness before I left pic.twitter.com/X9u78zR0MM — ♡♎︎ ☆ (@lovergirlles) February 9, 2018Fans claim they were totally mid makeout sesh.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"This content was imported from twitter."
"But no matter what happens, they're both romantic."
"At the Rex orange show in Los Angeles last night, the fans were very happy to see Jenna dating in Los Angeles."
"When they go to the concert together, not only do they look cute, but the fans also find them cute in the middle of the street."
"Really."
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"Look how cute Justin is, man. I'm really trying too hard to take this picture, but damn it, I have to find out how cute he is before I leave pic.twitter.com/X9u78zR0MM — ♡ ♎ ︎ (@ lovergrilles) on February 9, 2018, fans claimed that they were all semi-finished products



Number  1217
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Somerhalder then says there's a "six-minute video" where Reed is "freaking out" about it.”
“...to pop all those suckers out there was like 25 of them...”
“But unbeknownst to poor Nikki she didn t realize that I was gonna go in her purse and take out her birth control and pop them by the way it was at the beginning of the pack so I had...”
“"And it was just time," Somerhalder said.”
“Somerhalder then tells a story of how they met up with two of their best friends in Barcelona and they decided they wanted to all have children at the same time.”


Somerhard went on to say that there was a "six minute video" that Reid was "Crazy" about
“… Kill all those bastards, there are 25... "
"But poor Nicky didn't know. She didn't realize that I was going to go into her purse, take out her birth control devices and open them as they were at the beginning of the package, so I..."
"It's just time," summerhard said
"Somerholder goes on to tell the story of two good friends they met in Barcelona and they decided to have children at the same time."



**Something goes wrong**
“— Samantha (@sammyvig) January 12, 2018”
“...screenshot from the rapper s Snapchat has convinced fans that Jenner has given birth...”
“Twitter is buzzing with reports that Kylie Jenner is in labor.”
“While it’s unclear where the rumors started, multiple social media users are claiming that the 20-year-old Lip Kit maven has been spotted at Cedars-Sinai hospital in Los Angeles.”
““Is Kylie Jenner really in labour or fake news?” one user tweeted with pictures of the two screenshots that seemingly started the rumor that Jenner was seen at Cedars.”
“Is Kylie Jenner really in labour or fake news?”
“...pic.twitter.com/xcNFJJfhlK — ellisehilton (@ElliseHilton) January 12, 2018“@zax_to_da_max has source at Cedar Sini who says Kylie is in labor RIGHT NOW.”
“#BabyWatch,” a fan tweeted on Friday, January 12.”
““Inside scoop: Kylie Jenner is in labor.”
“You heard it here first,” another user tweeted.”


"- Samantha (@ sammyvig) 12 January 2018"
“…… A screenshot of rapper snapchat convinced fans that Jenna had a baby... "
"Twitter is full of reports about Kelly Jenner in labor."
"Although it is not clear where the rumor started, many social media users claim that the 20 year old lipstick Maven has been found at Cedars-Sinai hospital in Losangeles.
"Is Kelly Jenner really labour or fake news? "A user posted two screenshots on twitter, which seems to have triggered rumors that Jenner was seen in cedar."
"Is Kelly Jenner really labour or fake news?"
“... pic.twitter.com/xcnfjfhlk -Ellisehilton (@ ellisehilton) 12 January 2018 "@ Zax_ to_ da_ Max at Cedar Sini, there's news that Kelly is in labor right now
"Babywatch," a fan tweeted on Friday, January 12
"The scoop: Kelly Jenner is in labor."
"You heard it here first," another user tweeted



Number  1219
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Online has contacted Margot’s reps for a comment.”
“OK!”
“...she added.”
“"I can’t obviously wear it during the week when I’m working – I don’t want to lose it on set."”
“(Image: Margot Robbie/Instagram)"Other than the fact that I get to wear this on the weekends," she joked about her huge diamond ring.”
“"We were best friends and roommates before and now we’re like best friends and roommates still, so nothing’s really changed at all," she explained.”
“Speaking to Vogue, she admitted nothing had changed between the pair following their nuptials.”
“(Image: Tom Ackerley Instagram)Margot recently opened up about married life, after tying the knot with her British filmmaker beau, last December.”
“However, the former Neighbours star has yet to confirm or deny any rumours on social media.”
“"Margot has wanted to be a mum ever since she and Tom tied the knot and she's always said that that when she does get pregnant she'll keep the news to herself and her closest family members."”


"Online has contacted Margot's representative for comments."
"All right!"
“…… She added
"Obviously, I can't wear it for a week at work - I don't want to lose it on set."
"(image source: Margot Robbie / instagram)" except that I can wear this on weekends, "she joked about her big diamond ring."
"We used to be best friends and roommates, and now we're still best friends and roommates, so there's no real change," she explained
"In an interview with fashion magazine, she admitted that there has been no change since they got married."
(photo: Tom Ackley instagram) in December last year, Margot married a British filmmaker and recently disclosed his marriage
"However, the former neighbor star has yet to confirm or deny any rumors on social media."
"Since Margot and Tom got married, she has always wanted to be a mother. She always said that once she got pregnant, she would tell the news to herself and her closest family."



Number  1220
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’ve been blessed and lucky enough to have been given a gift to share with other people.””
“There are so many powers greater than me in the world.”
“She once said she was a “very spiritual person” on Oprah Winfrey’s show, and had “become more spiritual as time has gone on.”“I’m really in touch, whether it’s prayer or meditation.”
““She also spent some time in Dubai earlier this year,” the spokesperson continued, “and became interested in their way of life.”Lohan, born and raised Catholic, has dabbled in a series of religious traditions, for a time embracing the Jewish mystical tradition of Kabbalah and Scientology.”
“Lohan was also looking ahead to “upcoming projects in the Middle East,” the paper reported.”
“Get The Times of Israel's Daily Edition by email and never miss our top stories Free Sign Up“To my knowledge she is not considering fully converting to Islam, but I know she has been taking a keen interest in the Arabic culture of late,” the spokesperson explained.”
“But these steps toward Islam, her spokesperson told The Independent, do not constitute “fully converting” to the religion.”
“...you re a donkey Lohan said the mistranslation was intentional part of an inside joke with a friend...”
“Lohan was seen recently carrying a copy of the Muslim holy book the Quran and has been public about her Arabic lessons including drawing jibes online last month when she posted an Instagram image that showed Arabic words above the ostensible English translation You re beautiful The Arabic actually read...”
“Amid speculation that Hollywood’s best-known troubled actor Lindsay Lohan may have converted to Islam, a report in Britain’s Independent newspaper suggests the word “converted” may be too strong.”


"I'm lucky to get a gift to share with others."
"There are so many more powerful forces in the world than me."
She once said on Oprah Winfrey's show that she was a "very spiritual person" and that "over time, she has become more spiritual." "I'm really in touch, whether it's prayer or meditation."
"She spent some time in Dubai earlier this year and became interested in their lifestyle," the spokesman added. Born and raised as a Catholic, Lohan has been involved in a series of religious traditions, and once believed in the mysterious Jewish traditions of Kabala and Scientology. "
"Rohan also looked forward to" upcoming projects in the Middle East, "the paper reported
"Get the daily edition of the times of Israel by e-mail, don't miss our top stories, register for free," the spokesman explained. "As far as I know, she is not considering a complete conversion to Islam, but I know she has recently developed a strong interest in Arab culture."
But her spokesman told the independent that these steps towards Islam do not constitute a "complete conversion" to Islam
“…… You are a donkey. Luohan said that the mistranslation was intentional and a part of joking with friends. "
"Recently, it was seen that Rohan was carrying a Muslim holy scripture, the Koran. She made public her Arabic course, including a picture on instagram last month, which showed Arabic words. On the surface, the English translation was you are beautiful, but in fact, what she read in Arabic was..."
"There is speculation that Lindsay Rohan, Hollywood's most famous problem actor, may have converted to Islam, and a report in the independent suggests that the word" conversion "may be too strong."



Number  1221
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Shot entirely in Cambodia and in the Khmer language the film a Netflix original is the largest production the country has witnessed since the war and according to the reports of several Cambodians who ve seen it it s one of the most revelatory pieces of art about that chapter...”
“Jolie has directed a moving, large-scale adaptation of First They Killed My Father, Loung Ung’s 2000 memoir of the Khmer Rouge genocide, in which Ung’s parents and two of her siblings perished, along with an estimated two million other Cambodians, a quarter of the country’s population.”
“Shiloh, who likes to dress like a boy, is wearing a camouflage jacket, long shorts, and heavy black sneakers, despite the blazing heat.”
“We step outside and there’s Shiloh, 11, and Knox, 9, hanging out.”
“She actually said to me the other day, ‘Mom, I can taste my blanket.’ ‘That, honey, is a sign that it really, really needs to be washed.’ ”Jolie tidies up Vivienne’s things and promptly spills her entire mug of tea all over the counter.”
“She is very into her blanket, and she gets very mad if you wash her blanket.”
“Jolie picks up a small piece of a blanket, shredded to death, and explains, laughing, “She has 32 blankets.”
“She dumps her stuff on the counter and goes out to play with her friend.”
“I ask the girl if she’s called “Viv” or “Vivienne.” “Either one!” she says with a smile.”
“Jolie envelops her in her arms.”


"The film was completely shot in Cambodia and written in Khmer. It is the largest work of the country since the war. According to several Cambodians who have seen the film, it is one of the most enlightening works of art in this chapter..."
"Julie directed a moving and large-scale adaptation of first they killed my father, a memoir of Loong's Khmer Rouge massacre in 2000, in which ung's parents and two brothers and sisters, as well as other 2 million Cambodians, who are estimated to account for one fourth of Cambodia's population, were killed."
"Shiloh likes to dress like a boy. He wears a camouflage jacket, trousers and thick black sneakers in spite of the hot weather."
"We went outside and Shiloh, 11, and Knox, 9, were hanging out."
"The other day she really said to me," Mom, I can taste my blanket. " "Honey, this is a sign that it really, really needs washing." Julie arranged Vivian's things and quickly spilled her large cup of tea on the counter
"She likes her blanket very much. If you wash her blanket, she will be very angry."
Julie picked up a small torn blanket and explained with a smile, "she has 32 blankets."
"She dumped things on the counter and went out to play with her friends."
"I asked whether the girl's name was" Vivian "or" Vivian. "! "She said with a smile
"Julie held her in her arms."



Number  1222
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Beyonce’s cautions with Jay-Z?”
“We can’t help but love this family and we can’t wait to see what they get up to next!”
“Although they both looked amazing, their daughter, Blue Ivy, 6, was the one who stole the spotlight that night due to her sassy side telling her parents to calm down after clapping.”
“Bey proved to be a devoted wife when she was by Jay’s side at the Grammy Awards on Jan. 28.”
“After going through a rocky road, it’s no surprise that Beyonce would be weary of any women having to get close to her hubby, but it’s good to see the hip-hop royals still going strong as lovers and parents.”
“Bey and Jay have both been open about their marital troubles in the past and Jay even admitted to cheating on Bey during a rough time.”
“Beyonce may be feeling cautious, but the two lovebirds have seemed to be enjoying their time together and recently took an early Valentine’s Day trip to Miami, where they got cozy on a yacht.”
“After being together for almost 15 years and sharing three children together, we don’t blame her!”
“It sounds like Bey definitely wants Jay all to herself.”


"Please let us know in the comments below."
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Beyonce's warning to Jay?"
"We can't help loving this family, we can't wait to see what they're going to do next!"
"Although they both look great, their 6-year-old daughter, LAN Ai Wei, stole the spotlight that night because her fashionable side told her parents to calm down after clapping."
"Bei was with Jay Chou at the Grammy Awards ceremony on January 28, proving that she is a loyal wife."
"After going through a rough road, Beyonce will be tired of any woman having to approach her husband, which is not surprising, but it's nice to see that hip-hop royal family members are still very strong as lovers and parents."
"Both Bei and Jay have disclosed their marriage problems in the past, and Jay even admitted that he was unfaithful to Bei in difficult times."
"Beyonce may feel cautious, but the couple seem to enjoy their time together. Recently, they went to Miami ahead of time on Valentine's day, where they are very comfortable on the yacht."
"We've been together for nearly 15 years, and we've had three children together. We don't blame her!"
"Sounds like beckon wants Jay to be alone."



Number  1223
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Tell us your thoughts below.”
““At the same time, she and the dancers are really starting to get emotional because they have been a family for so long.”Do you think that Britney has finally found true love with Sam?”
“Sam seems to want this too,” the insider told Radar.”
““Of course they’ve talked about marriage and Britney’s dream is to have a real wedding someday.”
“All she really wants in life after this is over is to have a baby girl, get married and focus on her family for a while!”Needless to say, Spears already has a lucky man in mind — her 23-year-old hunky model boyfriend, Sam Asghari!”
““Britney’s friends and family know what she is planning to do after she is done with Vegas,” a source close to the 35-year-old mother of two said, noting that “it’s not work!”“She isn’t even thinking of a new album or another tour right now.”
“And according to a source close to Spears, she already has her post-Vegas agenda set!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Tell us what you think."
"At the same time, she and the dancers really started to fall in love, because they have been a family for so long." do you think Britney Spears has finally found her true love with Sam? "
"Sam seems to want this too," the person familiar with the matter told radar
"Of course they talked about marriage. Britney's dream is to have a real wedding one day."
"After all this, what she really wants is to have a baby girl, get married, and focus on her family for the time being! "Needless to say, spears already has a lucky man in her heart - her 23-year-old handsome model boyfriend Sam asgali!"
"Britney's friends and family know what she's going to do after breaking up with Vegas," a source close to the 35 year old mother of two said, noting that "it doesn't work! "She's not even thinking about a new album or any other tour right now."
According to a source close to spears, she has her own post Vegas agenda! "



Number  1224
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Our thoughts are with Mary’s loved ones in the wake of this tragedy.”
“MORE: Enter Here for Your Chance to Win a Trip to MiamiWe think it’s great that these two can still lean on each other in the most difficult times — and hope this could lead to him reconnecting with his daughter.”
“Meanwhile, Tom was recently rumored to be dating a British woman.”
““They’re very serious,” said a source.”
“He hasn’t seen her since she was seven.”Katie moved on from the relationship with actor Jamie Foxx, and they were recently spotted spending New Year’s Eve together in Miami.”
“He’s disconnected from Katie, and then de facto from Suri, because of her connection to Katie.”
““Tom eats, breathes and sleeps Scientology.”
“He uses his film commitments as an excuse, but the truth is that doesn’t hold much weight with Suri anymore,” a source previously told In Touch.”
““They used to Skype and text, but that trailed off drastically.”
“They are also parents to a 10-year-old daughter, Suri — though Tom hasn’t seen her in quite some time.”


"After the tragedy, we were with Mary's family."
"More: enter here and you have a chance to win the Miami we tour. We think it's good that these two people can still rely on each other in the most difficult times - hopefully it will allow him and his daughter to re-establish contact. "
Meanwhile, there's a recent rumor that Tom is dating an English woman
"They're serious," one source said
"He hasn't seen her since she was seven." Katie left her relationship with actor Jamie fox, who was recently discovered spending the new year together in Miami
"He broke up with Katie, and then he actually broke up with Suri, because she was in contact with Katie."
"Tom eats, breathes, sleeps, Scientology."
"He used his movie promise as an excuse, but the fact is that it doesn't have much impact on Suri anymore," a source said earlier on touch
"They used to use Skype and text messages a lot, but now they're far behind."
"They are also the parents of a 10-year-old daughter, Suri - though Tom hasn't seen her for a long time."



Number  1225
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...singer After a period of good behavior Justin is back on the comped celebs list with people likeand...”
“...pay full membership fees for himself and all eight of his bodyguards about 25 000 a year revealed the tipster noting that while free throwing punches could land regular folks in jail everything is now muy bueno for the Despacito...”
“Justin was banned from Equinox after getting into a fist fight during a basketball game reports a source but it turns out it wasn t too late to say sorry He apologized so they let him back but made him...”
“After a scuffle in an L.A. gym, Justin Bieber was determined to prove that he’s a baller — not a brawler.”


“… After a good performance, Justin is back on the celebrity list. Many people like him... "
“… He paid a total membership fee of about 25000 yuan a year for himself and his eight bodyguards. The informant pointed out that although free boxing may put ordinary people in prison, it's all about desperation now... "
"Justin was banned from participating in the spring equinox after kicking and punching in a basketball match, but now it's too late to say sorry. He apologized, so they let him go back, but let him..."
"After a scuffle in a gym in Los Angeles, Justin Bieber is determined to prove that he is a ballerina, not a boxer."



Number  1226
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“More follows...”
“Clooney is currently filming his new TV series "Catch 22" on the island, which also features Hugh Laurie and Austin Stowell ("Whiplash").”
“Police are said to be investigating the accident.”
“La Nuova Sardegna reports that Clooney suffered "slight trauma to the pelvis and bruises to one leg and an arm."”
“—La Nuova Sardegna (@lanuovasardegna) July 10, 2018An NBC News reporter tweeted that Clooney has already been discharged by the hospital.”
“A photo tweeted by the local news outlet shows a motorcycle beside a slightly damaged Mercedes and a fire extinguisher.”
“La Nuova Sardegna says Clooney was knocked off his bike by a car and sustained minor injuries.”
“George Clooney was taken to hospital for treatment after a motorcycle accident in Sardinia, Italian media has reported.”
“Clooney is currently filming his new TV series "Catch 22" on the island.”
“An NBC News reporter tweeted that Clooney has already been discharged by the hospital.”


"There's more behind..."
Clooney is currently filming his new TV series "Catch-22" on the island, which also includes Hugh Laurie and Austin Stowell
"It is said that the police are investigating the accident."
"La Nuova Sardegna reported minor trauma to Clooney's pelvis and bruises on one leg and one arm."
"La Nuova Sardegna (@ lanuovasardegna) tweeted that Clooney has been discharged from hospital on July 10, 2007."
"A picture posted by the local news agency on twitter showed a slightly damaged Mercedes Benz and a fire extinguisher next to a motorcycle."
"La Nuova Sardegna said Clooney was hit by a car from his bicycle and suffered minor injuries."
George Clooney was taken to hospital after a motorcycle accident in Sardinia, Italian media reported
Clooney is currently filming his new TV series "Catch-22" on the island
"A reporter for NBC News tweeted that Clooney had been discharged from the hospital."



Number  1227
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Neither Brad nor Jen’s reps have yet commented on Star’s story.”
“It seems just like old times, only better.’While Star notes that George Clooney’s rep had denied their story, the magazine goes on to note that Jennifer ‘wants to keep the reunion under the radar’, given that she only announced her marriage split weeks ago.”
“‘They reminisced about the past and had a lot of laughs.”
“‘Their evening together was very relaxed and low-key,’ the source told Star.”
“...the pair to her home...”
“The plan was to head over to Jen s place afterward for a nightcap but of course George would just drop Brad off The magazine claims that Jen was so excited by the idea that she even went to the extreme of lending George her bodyguard so he could drive...”
“...a private pre Oscars party in Beverly Hills...”
“After Jen and Justin Theroux announced their split he encouraged Brad to reach out and give their relationship another chance The magazine cover that all of America is talking about today Star magazine According to the magazine the duo had their first post slip meet up an March 3 at...”
“‘George was the first person to call him when his marriage to Angie imploded.”
“‘They’ve been secretly getting together for late night hook ups, and it’s all because of George,’ a source told Star.”


"Neither Brad nor Jennifer's representatives have commented on the star's story."
"It seems to be the same as in the past, but better." Although star pointed out that George Clooney's representatives denied their story, the magazine went on to point out that Jennifer "wanted to ignore the reunion" because she announced her divorce a few weeks ago
"They recalled the past and laughed a lot."
"Their night together was very relaxed and low-key," the source told sky
“… They went to her house... "
"The plan is to go to Zhan's house for supper afterwards, but of course George will put Brad down from the magazine, claiming that Zhan is very excited about this idea. She even loaned her bodyguard to George to let him drive..."
“… A private party before the Oscars at Beverly Hills... "
"After Jan and Justin Cyrus announced their breakup, he encouraged Brad to lend a helping hand and give their relationship a chance to talk about today's magazine cover, star magazine. According to the magazine, a meeting between them on March 3 was at..."
"George was the first person to call him when his marriage with Angie broke up."
"They've been getting together in secret, getting ready to chat up late at night, because of George," a source told sky



Number  1228
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jennifer Garner y Bean Affleck están en proceso de divorcioAunque de momento ninguno de los dos se ha pronunciado al respecto, losmedios estadounidenses los llaman "la nueva pareja del año".”
“Online.”
“En el filme, que se estrenará este año, Garner (45) y Duhamel (45) dan vida al matrimonio Spier, y por lo que parece, su amor ha traspasado las pantallas, según ha informado el portal E!”
“...en marzo pasado.”
“Recordemos tanto Jennifer como Josh son solteros, ya que sus matrimonios previos, con Ben Affleck y Fergie respectivamente, llegaron a su fin.Josh y Jennifer se hicieron cercanos mientras filmaban su película juntos, ?Love, Simon?”
“Existen rumores que apuntan que los actores mantienen un romanceTras superar la polémica de sus separación con sus respectivas parejas, todo parece indicar que Jennifer Garner y Josh Duhamel han decidido darle una nueva oportunidad al amor juntos.”


"In the process of divorce, Jennifer Garner and bean Affleck respect marriage, and respect for marriage."
"Online."
"In this movie, Mr. Arnold, Mr. garner (45) and Mr. Duhamel (45) Mr. Dan Vida al martinio Speer (45), Mr. Peres (45), Mr. Peres (45), Mr. Peres (45), Mr. pares Pasado raspantaras (45), Saigon hamdo Earl portal!"
“… MAZO Pasado. "
Jennifer Como Josh sotros, the marriage of prevos, the relationship between Affleck and Fergie, the relationship between legalon, Finn. Josh, are you Jennifer Cecilia silon secanos mientras fimaban supelikula jutos? Love you, Simon? "
"It's rumored to be a romantic story, an independent country, a country decided by Jennifer Garner and Josh duhamer Han."



Number  1229
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And both knowing that the reality of that was a big thing, something that was going to take a lot of serious consideration."”
“And it took until, really, the end of the shoot for us, I think, to realize that it might mean something more than we’d earlier allowed ourselves to believe.”
“We just became kind of a pair.”
“...lot of real teamwork...”
“Whether it was shooting a scene or arguing about a scene or gun practice or dance class or doing stunts anything we had to do with each other we just found a lot of joy in it together and a...”
“I think a few months in I realized, 'God, I can’t wait to get to work.'”
“...partnership that kind of just suddenly happened...”
“Angelina later described falling for Brad while filming the movie during an interview with Vogue Because of the film we ended up being brought together to do all these crazy things and I think we found this strange friendship and...”
“May 2004Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie meet on the set of Mr. and Mrs. Smith, and sparks fly/explode all over the place—specifically, all over Brad's marriage.”


"And both sides know it's a big thing and need to think about it seriously."
"I think it wasn't until the end of the shooting that we realized that it could mean more than we thought before."
"We're just a couple."
“… A lot of real teamwork... "
"Whether it's shooting a scene, or arguing a scene, or practicing guns, or having a dance class, or doing stunts, we can all have a lot of fun together, and
"I think a few months later I realized, 'my God, I can't wait to go to work.'"
“… That kind of thing happened all of a sudden... "
"Angelina later described in an interview with fashion magazine that she fell in love with Brad when she made the film, because we were finally called together to do all these crazy things. I think we found this strange friendship, and..."
In May 2004, Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie met on the set of Mr. and Mrs. Smith. Sparks were flying all over Brad's marriage



Number  1230
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When it comes to Lachey, though, the insider says last week could’ve been her last performance with Chmerkovskiy: “I wouldn’t be surprised if Maks doesn’t return as her partner for the rest of the season.”However, a DWTS rep says Chmerkovskiy will compete next week.”
“““The reason why Maks and I worked out so well was because I come from a world where all I worked with was men, and pretty much I’m like a guy in a lot of ways,” the ESPN personality told PEOPLE in 2015.”
“I’ve already done more on this season than I’ve done on Dancing with the Stars in 13 seasons.”RELATED VIDEO: Peta Murgatroyd and Maksim Chmerkovskiy Welcome Son Shai AleksanderAndrews, now 39, has also raved about her experience working with the new dad on season 10.”
“It’s cool.”He added at the time, “She lets me be creative.”
““He pushes me to stand up for myself, whether it’s in real life or on the dance floor.”
“In 2015, he told The Real of his season 13 partner, soccer star Hope Solo, “That’s literally the only person that I could dislike from my past, present or future.”“I feel that I can really be myself with Maks,” she told PEOPLE in 2014.”
“This isn’t the first time Chmerkovskiy, 37, has butted heads with his DWTS celebrity counterparts.”
“Image zoomWhile the former Total Request Live host, 36, has called the Ukrainian dancer the “best coach,” the source adds, “They’ve been fighting a lot.” (Reps for Chmerkovskiy and Lachey could not immediately be reached for comment.)”
““They both have big personalities and that’s not always the best recipe for a good partnership.”PEOPLE’s special issue 25 Seasons of ‘Dancing with the Stars’ is on stands now.”
““There’s a big chemistry issue,” the insider says.”


However, when it comes to lacy, the insider said last week could be her last performance with chimmelkovsky: "I wouldn't be surprised if Michael didn't come back as a partner for the rest of the season." However, a representative of the German professional baseball team said that chimmelkovsky will play next week. "
"The reason Max and I work so well together is because I come from a world that only works with men, and I'm like a man in many ways," the ESPN celebrity told people in 2015
"I've done more in this season than in 13 seasons of dance with the stars." Related video: PETA murgatroyd and maxim chimmerkovsky welcome their son Shay Aleksander Andrews, 39, and praise her experience with her new dad in season 10
"Cool," he added at the time, "she makes me creative."
"Whether in real life or on the dance floor, he urged me to stand up for myself."
"In 2015, he told his 13th season partner, football star hope Solo's the real," this is the only person I didn't like in the past, now or in the future. " "I feel like I can really be myself with Michael," she told people in 2014
"This is not the first time that the 37 year old chimmerkovsky has confronted his DWTS celebrity."
The 36 year old former total request live host called the Ukrainian dancer "the best coach," the source added, "they've been fighting." (representatives of chmerkovskiy and Lachey were not immediately available for comment.)
"They all have strong personalities, which is not always the best recipe for a good partnership." The 25th season of people's special issue "dancing with stars" is now on the exhibition stand
"There's a big chemistry problem," the insider said



Number  1231
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...the sun...”
“The staff of your villa can happily arrange some tennis time maybe a boat excursion or horseback ride but each villa on the island is such a delight that the best thing to do is ask your chef for a rum punch lay out on a chaise and soak up...”
““The beauty of Mustique is that there really isn’t much to do,” Vogue writer Todd Plummer explains in his guide to Mustique.”
“But taking it easy is certainly an option.”
“The waterfront hot spot on Britannia Bay is known to be the setting for British blue bloods’ wild nights, and its owner, Basil Charles, was a guest at William and Kate’s 2011 wedding.”
“If Will and Kate choose to go out and about, they might head to Basil’s Bar.”
“Her former villa, Les Jolies Eaux, is now available for rent.”
“They aren’t the first Windsors to set foot on the idyllic Caribbean island—Princess Margaret famously had a house on its sandy shores, where rumor has it she’d throw raucous parties on Macaroni Beach.”
“It’s said that they were joined on this trip by Kate’s parents, Carole and Michael Middleton, as well as Pippa Middleton and her husband, James Matthews.”
“It’s long been a favorite spot for William and Kate, who have been there a number of times over the years, including for a babymoon when Kate was pregnant with Prince George.”


“… The sun
"The staff of your villa can arrange some tennis time happily, maybe by boat or by horse, but every villa on the island is so happy. The best way is to invite your chef to have a glass of rum on the couch and enjoy it..."
Todd plummer, the author of fashion, explains in his musique Guide: "the beauty of musique is that there's nothing to do."
"But relaxing is definitely an option."
"As we all know, the seaside hot spot in the bay of Britannia is the background of the British blue blood wild night, and its owner Basil Charles is the guest of William and Kate's wedding in 2011."
"If will and Kate choose to go out for a walk, they may go to Basil's bar."
Her former villa, les Jolies Eaux, is now available for rent
"They are not the first Windsor to set foot on the idyllic Caribbean island. Princess Margaret has a house on the beach and is said to hold a noisy party on macaroni beach."
Kate's parents, Carol and Michael Middleton, as well as Pippa Middleton and her husband, James Matthews, are also said to have taken part in the trip
"It's always been a favorite place for William and Kate. They've been there many times over the years, including a baby when Kate was pregnant with Prince George."



Number  1232
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“When the interviewer asked why he stopped drinking, Brad Pitt replied that he simply didn’t want to live that way anymore.”
“Their “impeccable” Pitt source says that if he looks different, it’s because he has stopped drinking and is focused on healthy living.”
“Dr. Steve Fallek, New Jersey plastic surgeon – who has never met the actor – claims that his forehead looks smoother in recent pictures.”
“Is it possible that one of the hottest men on the planet went under the knife?”
“According to Cafe Mom, Dr. Fallek goes on to say that Pitt looks to have some filler in his cheeks, mouth, and around the eyes to improve the lines.”
“Plus, an unnamed source claims that the 54-year-old went to a Beverly Hills plastic surgeon to get Botox, fillers, and some eye work.”
“Stories surfaced last spring that Pitt felt the divorce has taken a toll on his looks, prompting his need for a little nip and tuck.”
“But, could there be any truth to these rumors?”
“Gossip Cop says absolutely not, and this is just a tabloid’s attempt at end-of-the-year nonsense.”
“An inside source recently told People that his divorce from Jolie was actually a good thing for the Fight Club star.”


"When the interviewer asked him why he didn't drink, Brad Pitt replied that he didn't want to live like this anymore."
Their "impeccable" Pete source said that if he looked different, it was because he had stopped drinking and focused on a healthy life
New Jersey plastic surgeon Dr. Steve faleck, who has never seen the actor, claims his forehead looks smoother in recent photos
"Is it possible that one of the hottest men on earth was stabbed to death?"
"According to the cafe mom, Dr. farek went on to say that Pete seems to have some padding around his cheek, mouth and eyes to improve wrinkles."
In addition, an unnamed source said the 54 year old went to a plastic surgeon in Beverly Hills for Botox injections, fillings and some eye surgery
Last spring, news came that Pete felt the divorce had damaged his appearance, prompting him to take a nap
"But is there any truth in these rumors?"
"Gossip police say absolutely not, it's just tabloids trying to talk nonsense at the end of the year."
"An insider recently told people that his divorce from Julie was actually a good thing for the fight club star."



Number  1233
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Submit...”
“Free CP Newsletters Join over 250,000 others to get the top stories curated daily, plus special offers!”
“...is dating Halle Berry...”
“Following the rumors claiming that Pitt is dating Berry, Gossip Cop has reached out to a representative of the actor, who did not only laugh off the rumors but vehemently denied it.”
“For the gossip-busting online publication, the rumor linking Pitt to Berry is another clear fabrication and an attempt to pair stars randomly.”
“To the uninitiated, the rumor about the Pitt and Berry's supposed affair was first reported by an Australian publication that claimed the two big names in Hollywood are casually wining and dining.”
“According to the publication, the two Hollywood stars had a number of secret meet-ups at the bungalows at the Hotel Bel-Air.”
“The supposed incognito source of the publication also claimed that Pitt and Berry are jumping at the opportunity of getting to know each other now that they are both single.”
“Allegedly, although the two had crossed paths before, their respective past relationships prevented them from dating despite being attracted towards one another already.”
“Apart from claiming that Pitt and Berry were dating the publication also said that Pitt s estranged wife Angelina Jolie was not happy upon learning that her would be ex husband was seeing Berry as supposedly the Maleficent actress never liked the Catwoman actress because she had always suspected that...”


Submit
"Free CP newsletters with more than 250000 other people get top news planned every day, as well as special offers!"
“… I'm dating Harry berry... "
"Following rumors that Pete is dating berry, gossip police has contacted a representative of the actor, who not only laughs at the rumors, but also denies them."
"For this gossip online publication, the rumor linking Pete and berry is another obvious fabrication, an attempt to randomly match stars."
"For outsiders, the rumor about Pitt and Berry's extramarital affair was first reported by an Australian magazine, which claimed that the two Hollywood celebrities drank and ate casually."
According to reports, the two Hollywood stars met secretly in the bungalow of the belle Aire hotel
"The author of the book also claims that Pitt and berry are single now and are seizing the opportunity to meet each other."
It is said that although the two have met before, their past relationship has prevented them from dating, even though they have been attracted to each other
"In addition to claiming that Pitt and berry are dating, the magazine also said that Pitt's separated wife, Angelina Jolie, was not happy when she learned that she was going to be her ex husband's wife and saw berry, because it was said that the evil actress never liked cat actresses because she always suspected that..."



Number  1234
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“As husband Tim McGraw recovers after collapsing on stage, Faith Hill is facing fresh throat cancer fears, RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!”
““Tim collapsed from dehydration, but Faith has been having massive problems with her throat,” a source close to country music’s first couple revealed.”
“A rep for the songstress denied Faith is having problems with her throat.”
“PHOTOS; Paris Jackson Turns To Cancer-Stricken Mom Debbie Rowe Amid MeltdownAdded the source: “Even though doctors calmed her cancer fears last year, Faith’s still terrified!”That means a full workup by a team of top doctors.”
““Faith just doesn’t feel like herself,” added our spy.”
““She has trouble keeping weight on, her voice comes and goes, and she gets sore throats repeatedly.”
““She and Tim are praying for the best while preparing for the worst.”McGraw and Hill, both 50, maintained a grueling pace in 2017, playing 70 shows on their world tour.”
“Her throat problems forced them to cancel a show in August, but it wasn’t the first time Hill’s throat has acted up.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"When her husband Tim McGraw recovered from a collapse on stage, Faith Hill faced a new fear of laryngeal cancer, RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
"Tim fainted from dehydration, but faith has been having serious throat problems," a source close to the country music first couple said
"A representative of the singer denied that there was something wrong with faith's throat."
"Photo: Paris Jackson turned to her cancer mother Debbie Rowe in the crash," the source added. "Although doctors soothed her cancer fears last year, faith is still scared! "It means a team of top doctors doing a comprehensive examination."
"Faith just doesn't feel much like herself," our spy added
"She's having trouble losing weight. She's got a throbbing and sore throat."
"She and Tim are praying for the best and preparing for the worst." McGraw and hill, both 50 years old, performed 70 performances on the world tour in 2017, maintaining a tense rhythm
"Her throat problem forced them to cancel a show in August, but it's not the first time Hill's throat has had a problem."



Number  1235
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“A Las Vegas […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop, however, can exclusively set the record straight.”
“That’s the outrageous claim being made in one of the tabloids, which says the actor has banned the male strippers from fraternizing with the customers.”
“Has Channing Tatum really forbid the Magic Mike Live dancers from having sex with women in the audience?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Las Vegas [..." ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"However, the gossip police can completely clarify the facts."
"This is a shameless remark made by one of the tabloids that male strippers are not allowed to have sex with customers."
"Is Channing Tatum really banning magic Mike live dancers from having sex with women in the audience?"



Number  1236
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...s been through with her divorce Madatyan added She has some stress but she s getting help and she s a fighter she s Scary Spice...”
“RELATED VIDEO Mel B Granted Restraining Order Against Ex After Hostile Confrontation and Panic Attack Her friend Gary Madatyan slammed the reports of sex and alcohol addiction on Monday telling PEOPLE exclusively Yes she has some issues she s working on but it s emotional issues stemming from everything she...”
“...as many as three men in a day and abuses alcohol...”
“I suffer a lot from PTSD Over the weekend Brown told The Sun that she is planning to seek treatment and that she is fully aware I have been at a crisis point At the time her friend Rusty Updegraff told the outlet that she is sex crazed sleeping with...”
“But … I did kind of have to ease my pain.”
“I’d like to say a lot more, but on this show, let’s keep it PC.”
“That’s all I can say about it.”
“But no, I’m not an alcoholic; no, I’m not a sex addict.”Brown added: “You know, I was with the same person for 10 years, and that was quite a turmoil, very intense.”
““I do address a lot of those issues.”
““My therapy changed a little bit because I was in a very intense relationship, which you can all read about in my book,” she said of her unreleased memoir, Brutally Honest, due in November.”


“…… She's divorced, madattian added, she has some pressure, but she's getting help, she's a fighter, she's a terrible spice... "
"Related video Mel B issued a restraining order on her ex girlfriend after hostile confrontation and panic attacks. Her friend Gary madatyan attacked reports about sex and alcohol addiction on Monday. She only told people that yes, she had some problems she was dealing with, but it was an emotional problem caused by everything she did..."
"Three people drink too much one day..."
"I suffered from post-traumatic stress disorder at the weekend. Brown told the sun that she was planning to seek treatment, and she was fully aware that I was in a crisis when her friend RASTI updgrav told the media that she was sleeping with a sexual mania..."
"But I have to relieve my pain. "
"I want to say more, but on this show, let's keep the PC up."
"That's all I can say."
"But no, I'm not an alcoholic; no, I'm not a sex addict." Brown added: "you know, I've been with the same person for 10 years and it's quite chaotic, very intense."
"I did solve a lot of problems."
"My treatment has changed a little bit, because my relationship is very tense, and you can all read about it in my book," she said of her unpublished memoir, cruel honesty, which is due to be published in November



Number  1237
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And you don’t change who you are inside just because you have a kid.””
“It’s everything.”
“But in a new cover story for Women’s Health, Dewan opened up on life post-Tatum, where she talked finding personal growth in a time of intense scrutiny.”
““I feel I’ve been on a wave of growth,” Dewan told the magazine.”
““It’s always challenging to go through a big change and have the whole world have an opinion about it.”
“.”
“It’s okay for a relationship to change into a new form that is actually better for both people involved, and I think that’s maybe what shocked everyone so much—that it can be a positive thing.”
“That was ultimately what happened with us.”Dewan said the mutual separation was a positive decision, and that it felt right for the family as a whole.”
“(She and Tatum have a five-year-old daughter, Everly).”


"You don't change your inner self just because you have children."
"That's all."
"But in a new cover story for women's health, Dewan talks about life in the post Tatum era, and about looking for personal growth in an era of high concern."
"I feel like I've been on a wave of growth," Dewan told the magazine
"It's always challenging to go through a big change and let the whole world have their own views."
“.”
"It's OK for a relationship to be transformed into a new form that benefits both sides. I think that may be the reason why everyone is shocked. It can be a positive thing."
Devin said the separation was a positive decision and was right for the whole family
"She and Tatum have a five-year-old daughter, Avery."



Number  1238
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...opportunity to represent and defend the LGBTQ community within the party Jenner was not invited by Trump but will be a guest of the American Unity Fund a non profit conservative organization dedicated to advancing the cause of freedom and equal opportunity for LGBTQ Americans...”
“Of course real question is if they danced who would lead RELATED VIDEO Natasha Stoynoff Breaks Silence Accuses Donald Trump of Sexual Assault Meanwhile a source close to the star told PEOPLE on Wednesday that Jenner who has been an advocate of nondiscrimination legislation sees the event as an an...”
“I can’t deal in hypotheticals and have no idea what any Trump aids hope happens.”
““There have been no discussions about who Caitlyn will or won’t dance with, or if she will dance at all.”
““This is a ridiculous story,” a rep for Jenner tells PEOPLE.”
“On Wednesday, PEOPLE exclusively confirmed Jenner would be attending and a flurry of reports have since surfaced in regards to whether the 67-year-old Republican reality tv star will dance with Trump, 70, on Friday evening’s inaugural balls.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“The I Am Cait star was spotted jetting out of Los Angeles on Thursday as she made her way to Washington, D.C. to attend the inauguration, where Donald Trump will take the oath of office on Friday to become the 45th president of the United States.”
“"There have been no discussions about who Caitlyn will or won't dance with, or if she will dance at all," a rep for Jenner tells PEOPLE exclusivelyCaitlyn Jenner is on her way to the Capitol.”


“…… Opportunities to represent and defend the LGBTQ community in the party Jenner was not invited by trump, but a guest of the American unity fund, a non-profit conservative organization dedicated to promoting the cause of freedom and equal opportunities for LGBTQ Americans... "
"The real question, of course, is who will lead the video if they dance. Natasha stoynov broke the silence and accused Donald Trump of sexual assault. Meanwhile, a source close to the star told people on Wednesday that Jenner, who has been advocating non discrimination legislation, called the incident a..."
"I can't make assumptions, and I don't know what trump wants to happen."
"There was no discussion about who Caitlin would dance with, or whether she would dance."
"It's a ridiculous story," a representative of Jenner told people
"On Wednesday, Jenner was exclusively confirmed to be present, and since then, a series of reports have surfaced about whether the 67 year old Republican reality star will dance with 70 year old trump at the inaugural ball on Friday night."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I am Cain star" was found flying from Los Angeles to Washington on Thursday to attend the inauguration ceremony. Donald Trump will be sworn in on Friday to become the 45th president of the United States
A representative of Jenner told people exclusive that Caitlin Jenner was on her way to Congress. "There's no discussion about who Caitlin's going to dance with, or whether she's going to dance," she said



Number  1239
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s tried and true and exactly what she needs, so they’re hoping he’ll officially become family this summer.” Aww!”
“They can see how committed Blake is to Gwen.”
“We have the exclusive details on why they think so, here.”
“The sun is shining, the birds are chirping, and Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are more in love than ever!”
“So why not get married this summer?”
“Their friends and family are convinced that a summer wedding is actually happening, a source close to Gwen told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY, and they think that the couple have been hinting at it for awhile.”
“HollywoodLife has reached out to Blake and Gwen’s reps for comment.”
““Gwen family and friends are buzzing right now, because she’s been dropping hints that she and Blake have a big announcement coming,” the source told us.”
““She’s been teasing that they have a big secret they’re getting ready to share and everyone’s convinced they’re going to have a surprise wedding this summer.”
“Gwen’s told her family and friends to block off some dates for a big party at Blake’s place in Oklahoma this summer.”


"He's real, and that's what she needs, so they want him to get married this summer."! "
"They can see Blake's loyalty to Gwen."
"We have exclusive details about why they think so."
"The sun is shining, the birds are chirping, Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stephanie are in love more than ever
"Then why not get married this summer?"
"Their friends and family believe that the summer wedding is really going to take place," a source close to Gwen told exclusive Hollywood life. They think the couple have hinted at it for some time
"Hollywood life has contacted representatives of black and Gwen for advice."
"Gwen's family and friends are very busy now because she has been hinting that she and Blake are about to announce a big news," the source told us
"She kept joking that they were going to share a big secret and everyone believed there would be a surprise wedding this summer."
"Gwen told her family and friends that at a big party at the black house in Oklahoma this summer, some of the appointments would be cancelled."



Number  1240
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1241
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They were also pictured high-fiving.”
“The two were reportedly drinking beer, wine and Jagerbombs at the Verbier resort.”
“The second in line to the throne in England was rumored cheating on his wife Kate after he was spotted "having a cozy lunch" with Aussie-born model Sophie Taylor during the ski trip.”
“He was partying with his pals Guy Pelly, James Meade and Tom van Straubenzee at a club in Verbier, Switzerland on Monday, March 13.”
“As reported before, Prince William skipped a Commonwealth Day service to enjoy a lads-only holiday.”
“No Kensington Palace reps have responded to the news.”
“"Kate wears the trousers in their marriage," the alleged insider further purports, before adding that the mother of 3-year-old George and 1-year-old Charlotte found her husband's behavior "humiliating and William will be made to pay."”
“These boys-only skiing trips are a thing of the past."”
“The publication goes on citing a so-called source as saying, "Kate was furious when she saw the pictures.”
“National Enquirer is the first to claim that Kate refuses to let William travel alone, blaring an alarming headline, "Kate Puts Wild William On A Short Leash."”


"They were also high fives."
"The two were reported to be drinking beer, wine and jagerbombs at the Weber resort."
"The second in line heir to the British throne was found on a skiing trip to have a" comfortable lunch "with Australian born model Sophie Taylor, who is rumored to have betrayed his wife Kate."
On Monday, March 13, he and his friends guy Perry, James Mead and Tom van straubenzie met at a club in Weber, Switzerland
"As mentioned earlier, Prince William skipped a Commonwealth Day ceremony in order to enjoy a youth only festival."
"No representative from Kensington Palace responded to the news."
"Kate wore pants in their marriage," the alleged insider further claimed, then adding that the mother of George, 3, and Charlotte, 1, found her husband's behavior "humiliating and William will pay the price."
"These kids' skiing trips have become a thing of the past."
The magazine continued to quote a so-called source as saying, "Kate was very angry when she saw the photos."
"National inquirer" was the first to claim that Kate refused to let William travel alone, and its headline was shocking, "Kate tied wild William on a short belt."



Number  1242
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Kevin Winter/Getty Images]”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“Although their relationship ended just as fast as it began, the Thor: Ragnarok star said that he had no regrets and described the singer as an “amazing woman.” A new report, however, claimed that Hiddleston was only trying to stay on Swift’s good side.”
“According to Radar Online, Tom Hiddleston is “scared” to cross Taylor Swift.”
“After he found out that he’s doing an interview with GQ magazine, where he would definitely be asked about his relationship with Swift, the actor allegedly reached out to her people to “strategize” and come up with the right answers.”
““All his answers were pre-approved and very carefully constructed.”
“Even his reason for wearing a tank top with I heart T S was all pre planned Given Swift s infamous reputation with her exes insiders close to Hiddleston revealed that he did not want to get on Swift s bad side thinking that she is one of the most...”
“...powerful people in the music industry...”
““It’s like he is scared of her.”
“She is one of the most powerful people in the business and no one wants to cross her,” they explained.”


"[close up by Kevin winter / Getty pictures]"
"Voice in the comments below."
Although their relationship ended as quickly as it started, the star of Thor: Ragnarok said he had no regrets and described the singer as a "great woman.". However, according to a new report, sidleston just wanted to be on Swift's good side
According to radar online, Tom sidleston was "scared" to cross Taylor Swift
"When he found out that he was being interviewed by GQ magazine, where he would definitely be asked about his relationship with swift, it was said that the actor took the initiative to contact her people for" strategy "and put forward the correct answer."
"All of his answers were pre approved and carefully designed."
"Even his reason for wearing a vest with heart-shaped t s was planned in advance, because Swift was notorious among her ex girlfriends. Insiders close to sidleston revealed that he didn't want to take swift's side and think she was the best
“… Powerful people in the music world... "
"It's like he's afraid of her."
"She's one of the most powerful people in the business world and no one wants to fight against her," they explained



Number  1243
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““They want to make sure their love lasts forever.””
““They want to take their time and do things properly,” our source continued.”
“A source close to Gwen told HL EXCLUSIVELY the reason why they call each other ‘husband & wife’!”
“Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton had fans thinking they might have gotten married after Gwen posed for a picture with her brother Todd’s wife Jen on Jul.”
“29 during the couple’s Florida vacation.”
“However fans mistook Jen for Blake s sister Endy and since Gwen called Jen her sister in law in the caption some people believing Jen to Endy wrongly believed that this was a cryptic clue that maybe just maybe Gwen...”
“...and Blake got married...”
“On top of that, a source close to Gwen confirmed to us EXCLUSIVELY that the two have not gotten hitched.”
““Gwen and Blake haven’t gotten secretly married, but they’re always joking around and calling each other husband and wife,” our source said.”
“Gwen and Blake have spoken about getting married and it s something that they definitely do want to do one day but they re really happy with the way things are right now and they ve both been married before...”


"They want to make sure their love lasts."
"They want to take their time and get things done," our source continued
"A source close to Gwen told HL exclusively why they called each other 'husband and wife'!"
"After Gwen Stefani and Blake Sheldon filmed with their brother Todd's wife Jane on July 1, fans thought they might be married."
"On the 29th, during the couple's vacation in Florida."
"However, fans mistook Jen for Black's sister Endy because Gwen called Jen her sister-in-law in the title. Some people who believe in Jen mistakenly think that this is a mysterious clue, maybe just Gwen..."
“… Black is married... "
"In addition, a source close to Gwen confirmed to us that they were not married."
"Gwen and black didn't marry in secret, but they always joked and called each other husband and wife," our source said
"Gwen and Blake talked about getting married, which is something they definitely want to do one day, but they are very satisfied with the present situation, and they have all been married before..."



Number  1244
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She also later helped their oldest son Brooklyn surprise his dad by showing up to lunch unannounced.”
“The two have been together since 1997 and married in July 1999 at a castle in Ireland.”
“David and Victoria Beckham are not heading for divorce, a rep for the couple tells PEOPLE.”
““What nonsense.”
“Journalist Chinese whispers and fake news fueled by social media.”
“There is no impending statement, no divorce!” the rep says.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Internet rumors swirled early Friday morning about the status of the longtime couple’s relationship.”
“As reports began circulating, Victoria sent her “love” to David on Instagram with a photo of her with their 6-year-old daughter Harper.”
“They most recently stepped out together at Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s royal wedding in late May, after first attending Prince William and Kate Middleton’s wedding in 2011.”


"She later helped their eldest son, Brooklyn, to surprise his father with a surprise lunch."
"They have been together since 1997 and married in a castle in Ireland in July 1999."
"David and Victoria will not divorce," a representative of the Beckhams told people
"That's bullshit."
"The whispers and fake news of Chinese journalists are driven by social media."
"No imminent statement, no divorce! "The representative said
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Early Friday morning, Internet rumors about the long-term relationship poured in."
"As the reports began to circulate, Victoria sent David a picture of her" love "with their six-year-old daughter Harper on instagram
"After their first wedding to Prince William and Kate Middleton in 2011, they recently attended the royal wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel in late May."



Number  1245
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And I am pushing them to do three dance songs in a concert-style way at the end, a bit like they do in ‘Mamma Mia.’ I think the audience would like that.””
““I have a lot to say.”
“Over the weekend the actress and singer quietly sneaked into Chicago where the Broadway-bound play is set to debut.”
“After catching preview performances, she declared that the musical about her life could use a little more life.”
““Some times, I was having a blast.”
“Some times, my mind was wandering.”
“I think those are the parts that are going to get better,” she said in a Q&A with the Chicago Tribune.”
“Never one to hold back, Cher said the production is a work in progress.”
““Some parts of it are really fabulous.”
“We’re going to work on the other parts,” the 72-year-old pop icon said.”


"I'm pushing them to sing three dances in concert style at the end, a bit like they did in Mamma Mia. I think the audience will like it. "
"I have a lot to say."
"Last weekend, the actress and singer sneaked into Chicago, where the Broadway play will premiere."
After watching the rehearsal, she announced that the musical about her life could use a little more life
"Sometimes, I'm excited."
"Sometimes, my heart is wandering."
"I think these parts will get better," she told the Chicago Tribune
"There's never been one that can stop, Cher said. Production is a work in progress."
"Some places are really great."
"We will continue to work on other parts," said the 72 year old pop icon



Number  1246
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’re in it for the long haul?”
““Jamie and Katie have been talking at great length about having a child together,” a source for the magazine recently told the publication.”
“Looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie Foxx, 50, may be more serious than fans previously thought!”
“While the couple had kept their relationship hidden for years, the two stepped out as a duo just last year.”
“Since then, they’ve been spotted out and about together in public on multiple occasions — including making a big splash sitting side-by-side at Clive Davis’ pre-Grammy gala in NYC on Jan. 27.”
“From the photos, Katie and Jamie looked happier than ever, and a new report claims that could be because they’re FINALLY on the same page about wanting to start a family together!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Katie Holmes with her daughter Suri Cruise.”
“Although it reportedly took some time for Katie to be on board, she apparently feels ready to have a baby with her new man — at least according to Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s crazy about her and thinks they’ll have an adorable baby.” In fact, some witnesses at the gala last month allegedly think Katie could actually already be expecting.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — would you love to see Jamie and Katie have a child together?”


"Do you think they will be involved for a long time?"
"Jamie and Katie have been talking about having a child together," a source for the magazine recently told the publication
"It looks like Katie Holmes, 39, and Jamie fox, 50, may be more serious than fans thought before!"
"Although the couple have been hiding their relationship for years, just last year, they came out as a couple."
"Since then, they have been found together in public many times - including Clive Davis sitting side by side at the Grammy Awards in New York on January 27."
"From the photos, Katie and Jamie look happier than ever, and a new report says it may be that they have finally reached a consensus on how to form a family together!"
"Click here to see a lovely picture of Katie Holmes and her daughter Suri cruise."
"Although it was reported that it took Katie some time to get on the plane, she clearly felt ready to have a baby with her new boyfriend - at least according to life and fashion magazine."
"He was fascinated by her and thought they would have a lovely child." In fact, some witnesses at last month's party claimed that Katie might be pregnant
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - would you like to see Jamie and Katie have a baby together?"



Number  1247
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“What used to make me tick is not necessarily making me tick any- more … The most challenging thing right now is trying to find what it is that makes my heart sing.”[Featured Image by Jonathan Leibson/Getty Images]”
“Cox and Pitt were at a charity event and were reportedly quite flirtatious with one another, which allegedly made Aniston a bit annoyed with her pal.”
“The pair have a longtime friendship, and certain tabloids are set on portraying the actresses as though their friendship is a facade.”
“This time around, the rumor that has made headlines due to a false report by the National Enquirer states that Cox went on a jealous tirade over the success and happiness of Aniston.”
“Gossip Cop shares the details about this ludicrous fabrication.”
““A so-called ‘source’ tells the National Enquirer, in oddly unnatural language, ‘A longtime friendship’s about to go up in flames!”
“Courteney stunned close pals at a recent dinner, launching into a jealous, un-‘Friend’-ly attack on Jen, saying, ‘I should have been the movie star!”
“'”The source goes on to claim that Courteney was openly sharing her frustrations about the fact that Jen “catapulted” to a whole other level of stardom, while her own career failed to take off.”
“GC continues to relay the words of the source.”
““Slamming Jen for being the more famous one, Courteney grumped that she can’t understand how Jen catapulted to huge movie stardom while her own big-screen career never took off!”


"What used to excite me didn't necessarily excite me - more Now the most challenging thing is trying to find something that makes my heart sing
Cox and Pete took part in a charity event. They were said to be flirting with each other, which is said to make Aniston a little angry with her friends
They have a long friendship, and some tabloids portray the two actresses as an illusion
"This time, the rumor that Cox made headlines because of a false report in the National Enquirer said he was jealous of Aniston's success and happiness."
"The police share the details of this ridiculous fabrication."
"A so-called 'source' told the National Enquirer in a strange and unnatural language:" a long friendship is about to burn down! "
At a recent dinner party, Courtney stunned her close friends and launched a jealous, non "friend" attack on Jane, saying, "I should be a movie star!"
"'" the source continues to claim that Courtney is publicly sharing her frustration, and in fact, Jane "catapulted" to a complete other level star while her own career failed to take off
"If GC continues to deliver the source."
"Criticizing her for being more famous, Courtney complains that she doesn't understand how she became a movie star, but her big screen career never took off!"



Number  1248
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Kidman and Farrell recently worked […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop, however, can exclusively set the record straight.”
“One of this week’s new tabloids claims the country star isn’t happy about the bond between his wife and the actor, who co-starred together in two movies this year.”
“Is Keith Urban actually upset about Nicole Kidman ’s friendship with Colin Farrell ?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Kidman and Farrell have worked recently ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"However, the gossip police can completely clarify the facts."
"A new tabloid claimed on Monday that the country star was dissatisfied with the relationship between his wife and the actor, who co starred in two films this year."
Is Keith Urban really upset about Nicole Kidman's friendship with Colin Farrell? "



Number  1249
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The only place this Kevin Bacon story may have legs, in other words, is in a game of "Six Degrees of Kevin Bacon."”
“Late last month, the Daily News for Americans ran a made-up story claiming actress Julia Roberts — an attendee of the Women's March in Washington, D.C. — called Trump "the best president in US history."”
“Like, why did he wear spandex for an Apple commercial that aired exclusively in Europe?”
“It was funny.”
“That's a good enough reason.”
“Also, ever since his grave misfortune at the hands of Bernie Madoff, Bacon has been vocal about the need for creatives to take a more structured approach to managing their finances.”
“Perhaps the money was worth the spandex.”
“The latest Bacon question: Is he really singing the praises of President Donald Trump?”
“In the depressing age of fake news there is a dual responsibility to identify the difference between news that is actually false or fabricated and news that simply rubs us the wrong way generally because it comes with a slant or there are omissions that would otherwise provide a more...”
“...comprehensive picture...”


"The only place where the story of Kevin Bacon can have legs, in other words, is in the game of six degrees of Kevin Bacon."
"At the end of last month, the daily news of the United States ran a fictional story claiming that actress Julia Roberts, a participant in the women's march in Washington, D.C., called trump" the best president in the history of the United States. "
"For example, why is he wearing spandex in an exclusive Apple ad in Europe?"
"That's interesting."
"That's a good reason."
Moreover, since Bernie Madoff brought bacon serious misfortune, bacon has always said that creative people need to take a more structured way to manage their finances
"Maybe it's worth spandex."
"The latest bacon question: is he really praising president trump?"
"In this depressing era of false news, we have a dual responsibility to distinguish between the true false or fabricated news and the news that will only lead us astray, because these news have a tendency, or some omissions, otherwise it will provide a more accurate information
“… Comprehensive picture... "



Number  1250
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jolie has primary physical custody of their six children and has been told by a judge that she must let Pitt see the kids regularly while she films Maleficent 2 in the UK this summer.”
“A spokesman for Angelina recently revealed that new custody terms have been agreed allowing Brad, more access to the duo's children, including a summer schedule which gives the actor substantial time with the kids while Angelina films in the UK.”
“But it has been claimed that Brad Pitt isn't looking to settle down anytime soon, with sources telling Entertainment Tonight the actor is not in a official relationship with Neri, 42.”
“The actor, 54, who shares six children with ex Angelina, is said to want to focus on fatherhood and his career.”
“On off?”
“It has been claimed that Brad Pitt isn t looking to settle down anytime soon with sources telling Entertainment Tonight the actor is not in a official relationship with Neri Oxman 42 New flame He was rumoured to have embarked upon a romance with MIT professor Neri 42 in his...”
“...first serious relationship since splitting from Angelina Jolie The source told the website He has gone on dates but he s not looking to leap into a serious relationship at the moment...”
“He is content on his own and enjoys the quality time he spends with the children when he isn’t working.”
“'He is focused on two of the most important things he should be focused on, and those are his children and his work.”
“Being a father is his number one job and he knows that.”


"Julie has primary physical custody of their six children, and the judge told her that when filming villain 2 in the UK this summer, she had to let Pete look after the children regularly."
A spokesperson for Angelina recently revealed that a new guardianship clause has been agreed to allow Brad to have more contact with the two's children, including a summer arrangement to allow the actor enough time to be with the children while Angelina is filming in the UK
"But it is reported that Brad Pitt does not intend to settle down soon. A source told entertainment tonight that Brad Pitt has no formal relationship with Neri, 42."
"The 54 year old actor has six children with former Angelina and is said to want to focus on fatherhood and career."
"On off?"
"It's reported that Brad Pitt doesn't intend to settle down soon. It's reported that the actor has no formal relationship with entertainment tonight's actress nery Oxman's 42 year old new flame. It's said that he has started a relationship with MIT professor nery Oxman's 42 year old new flame..."
“… In his first serious relationship after breaking up with Angelina Jolie, the source told the website that he has already dated, but he is not planning to jump into a serious relationship at the moment... "
"He's very content with himself and enjoys being with his children when he's not working."
"He focused on the two most important things, his children and his work."
"Being a father is his first job, and he knows that."



Number  1251
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Perhaps awkwardly for Kendall and Anwar, Gigi was also in attendance at the awards and posed for several photos with her little brother, but is yet to comment on his romantic make-out session with her friend.”
“Following the intimate moment, TMZ published a grainy photo of the 22-year-old straddling Anwar during their kiss at Socialista New York, which according to the publication lasted two hours and ended around 4am when the model left on her own.”
“Yes, two hours.”
“That’s the equivalent of two episodes of Love Island.”
“In other words - dedication.”
“InstagramOn Monday, Jenner also posted multiple photos to her Instagram Story, including a snap of Anwar’s tattooed hands modeling two sequined cherries, which the Keeping Up With The Kardashians star also snapped Gigi holding at the awards.”
“Kendall Jenner InstagramDespite being currently linked to NBA star Ben Simmons, Kendall’s kiss with Anwar isn’t entirely surprising, given their close relationship over the years.”
“In 2016, the reality star even posted an adorable photo with 18-year-old in which she plants a kiss on his cheek with the caption ‘dibs’, suggesting this recent smooch was a long time coming for the pair.”
“This content is imported from Instagram.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Perhaps to the embarrassment of Kendall and Anwar, Gigi also attended the award ceremony and took a picture with his younger brother, but has not commented on his romantic date with his friends."
"After the moment of intimacy, TMZ released a blurred picture of Anwar, 22, kissing on New York socialist day, which was reported to last for two hours and ended around 4 a.m. when the model left alone."
"Yes, two hours."
"It's equivalent to two episodes of Love Island."
"In other words - dedication."
"On instagram on Monday, Jenner also posted a number of photos on instagram, including pictures of Anwar's tattooed hand shaping two sequined cherries, and the star who followed Kardashian also took pictures of Gigi at the awards ceremony."
"Kendall Jenner instagram despite is currently associated with NBA star Ben Simmons. Considering their close relationship over the years, Kendall's kiss with Anwar is not entirely surprising."
"In 2016, the reality TV star even released a lovely picture with an 18-year-old girl, in which she kisses the boy on the cheek with the title" dibs ", indicating that the recent kiss has been a long time for both of them."
"This content was imported from instagram."



Number  1252
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"Just another metaphor for my life online."”
“"Here I am once again at the Roman Colosseum," Perry said in a video.”
“In one pic, she and Bloom cozy up for a selfie inside the ruins of the famous ancient Roman amphitheater.”
“Perry posted on her Instagram Stories videos and photos of the two touring the Sistine Chapel in Vatican City as well as the Colosseum in Rome.”
“On Saturday, after the singer and American Idol judge and the actor met Pope Francis at the Vatican during a the United to Cure conference, where the singer spoke about transcendental meditation, the pair headed off to do some sightseeing.”
“Katy Perry and her "darling" Orlando Bloom take Italy!”


"It's just another metaphor for my online life."
"I've come to the Colosseum again," Perry said in a video
In one photo, she and bloom take a self portrait in the ruins of the famous Roman Coliseum
"Perry posted videos and photos of the two visiting the Sistine Chapel and Colosseum in the Vatican on instagram stories."
"On Saturday, the singer, American Idol Judge and actor met with Pope Francis at the Vatican's joint healing conference, where the singer talked about extraordinary meditation and the two went sightseeing."
Katie Perry and her "dear" Orlando Bloom are going to Italy



**Something goes wrong**
“November 30, 2016: Rihanna spends time in her homeland to celebrate the 50th anniversary of Barbados’ independence.”
“While booked at different locations, Dubai isn’t that big, and never once are the two stars spotted together.”
“September 11, 2016: Rihanna is spotted with fans backstage at a Drake concert in Los Angeles looking less than perky.”
“Whether she curved his attempt to kiss her is hotly debated for days to follow.”
“August 28, 2016: Drake presents Rihanna with the Michael Jackson Video Vanguard Award at the MTV’s Video Music Awards.”
“This was their first public outing and seemingly also their last.”
“Whether their relationship was ever deeper than friendship is not known.”
“July 10, 2016: Naomi Campbell and Jameel attend a Stevie Wonder concert in London.”
“There are a billion gossip sites, but only one Lipstick Alley.)”
“(And shout out to Lipstick Alley for the assist.”


"November 30, 2016: Rihanna spent time in her homeland celebrating the 50th anniversary of Barbados' independence."
"Although booking in different places, Dubai is not that big. The two stars have never been found together."
"September 11, 2016: Rihanna was found backstage at the Drake concert in Los Angeles with fans and didn't look so lively."
"Whether she bent his attempt to kiss her is a heated debate in the next few days."
"August 28, 2016: Drake presented Rihanna with the Michael Jackson video Pioneer Award of the MTV Video Music Award."
"This is their first public outing, and it seems to be their last."
"It's not clear whether their relationship is deeper than friendship."
"July 10, 2016: Naomi Campbell and Jamie at Steve wonder concert in London."
"There are 1 billion gossip websites, but only one lipstick lane."
"And shout for help at lipstick lane."



Number  1254
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "In Case You Missed Us" below!”
“The Billy Lynn’s Long Halftime Walk star, 27, opted for a more casual look with a blue long-sleeved henley, dark jeans and sneakers.”
“Taylor Swift and her boyfriend, Joe Alwyn, enjoyed a dinner date in London on Wednesday, August 22.”
“The low-key couple stepped out at Hawksmoor, a steak restaurant in the Covent Garden district of the U.K. capital.”
“They held hands as they walked down the street to the award-winning eatery.”
“The 10-time Grammy winner, 28, looked stunning in an emerald-green off-the-shoulder maxidress.”
“She coordinated her black leather clutch with a matching belt and sandals.”
“Her hair was styled in a loose updo.”
“Swift and Alwyn’s relationship first made headlines in May 2017, though she hinted on her album Reputation that it began around late 2016.”
“For access to all our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews – Subscribe on YouTube!”


For the latest celebrity news and interviews, subscribe to our new podcast "in case you miss us" below
"The 27 year old Billy Lynn's midfield running star has opted for a more casual look, with long blue sleeves, Henley, dark jeans and sneakers."
Taylor swift and her boyfriend Joe Alvin have dinner in London on Wednesday, August 22
"The low-key couple came out at hawkmoor, a steakhouse in Covent Garden, the British capital."
"Hand in hand, they walk down the street to the award-winning diner."
"The 28 year old 10-time Grammy winner looks fantastic in an emerald green off the shoulder dress."
"She coordinated her black leather bag with a matching belt and a pair of sandals."
"Her hair is fluffy."
"Swift's love affair with Alvin made the headlines for the first time in May 2017, but she hinted in her album reputation that it started around the end of 2016."
"To access all of our exclusive celebrity videos and interviews, subscribe on YouTube!"



Number  1255
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And of course it's not done with any kind of delicacy or insight – it's done to sell."”
“GALLERY: See the photos of Angelina Jolie's new homeAngelina has moved into a six-bedroom mansionAngelina's new mansion is an incredible 11,000 square feet, and has an outdoor swimming pool with a pool house, a home gym and library as well as huge landscaped gardens.”
“The mum of six is moving to a Hollywood mansion in Hollywood one mile from Brad Pitt s house Angelina Jolie has moved into a stunning six bedroom home with her six children Maddox Shiloh Zahara Pax Vivienne and Knox in order for them to spend more time with their...”
“...father Brad Pitt who lives just a mile away from the mansion...”
“According to sources, the children are "much happier" to be living closer to their dad.”
“An insider told Hollywood Life: "[Angelina Jolie and the children] had spent their spring and part of the summer in Malibu, about an hour drive from Brad, which was hard on the kids.”
“While they liked being at the beach, despite everything, they did not like being so far from dad.”
“Now that they are skateboarding distance to Dad's house, they are much happier being close to him, and back in the neighbourhood they consider home — about a mile from Dad."”
“The Maleficent actress has stayed out of the limelight after announcing that she and Brad were divorcing back in September 2016.”
“Until you live it… I worry about it more for my kids, being subjected to it, and their friends getting ideas from it.”


"Of course, it's not done with any refinement or insight, it's for sale."
"Gallery: take a look at the picture of Angelina Jolie's new home. Angelina has moved into a Six Bedroom mansion, which covers an area of 11000 square feet, with an outdoor swimming pool with a swimming pool, a family gym and library, and a huge landscape garden."
"The mother of six is moving to a Hollywood mansion, just a mile away from Brad Pitt's house. Angelina Jolie and her six children, Maddox Hilo Zahara parks Vivian and Knox, have moved into a beautiful six bedroom house so that they can spend more time with their children..."
“… Father Brad Pitt, he lives just a mile from the mansion... "
"According to the source, the children live closer to their father and are" much happier. "
"Angelina Jolie and the kids spent part of the spring and summer in Malibu, about an hour's drive from Brad, which was tough for the kids," a person familiar with the matter told Hollywood life
"Although they like to stay on the beach, anyway, they don't like to be so far away from dad."
"Now they're very close to Dad's house. They'll be much happier if they get closer to him and go back to what they think is home - about a mile from dad."
"After announcing her divorce from Brad in September 2016, the evil actress has been out of the spotlight."
"Before you live I'm more worried about my children, the impact of it, and their friends getting inspiration from it. "



Number  1256
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The giggly gal is never afraid of showing off her body at Hollywood events or on vacation, as Radar's photo have shown.”
“8 of 9 Hawn and Russell are going into their golden years together and both look great for their age.”
“He drove away with the cone still stuck under the vehicle.”
“7 of 9 Shortly after Hawn left, Russell emerged from the house and stared at a traffic cone wedged under his GMC truck.”
“Hawn was driving through Malibu when she realized her mistake and pulled over to slam the passenger side shut.”
“6 of 9 The star who had a big hit with Private Benjamin doesn't look camera ready as, in her obvious anger, she forgot to close her car door.”
“However they did have a son, Wyatt, together.”
“4 of 9 On Britain's ITV chat show, Loose Women, Hawn said she and Russell "would have been long divorced" if they had wed.5 of 9 Hawn has said she and the rugged Escape from New York star "liked the choice" of not marrying each other.”
“3 of 9 Looking disheveled as she wore a sloppy sweater and no makeup, Hawn reached up to slam her car's trunk in disgust after the incident.”
“The usually bubbly former Laugh-In star was clearly in no laughing mood as she scowled while walking to her white Range Rover.”


"As radar photos show, this giggling girl is never afraid to show off her body at Hollywood events or holidays."
"Eight out of nine Horne and Russell are going into their golden age together, and both seem to fit their age well."
"He drove away with the cone stuck under the car."
"Shortly after horn left on September 7, Russell came out of the house and stared at a traffic cone under his GMC Truck."
"When horn drove past Malibu, she realized her mistake, pulled over and slammed the passenger's side."
"Six of the nine were very popular with private Benjamin, but she didn't seem ready to take pictures because she was obviously angry and forgot to close the door."
"But they do have a son, Wyatt, together."
In ITV's talk show loose women, horn said she and Russell would have "divorced a long time ago" if they had married. Horne said five of her and the wild star, who left New York, "like" the choice of not getting married
"Three of the nine were wearing sloppy sweaters, no makeup and looked disheveled. After the incident, horn reached out and slammed her trunk in disgust."
"When the usually lively and cheerful former comedian came to the white range rover, he was obviously not in the mood of laughing."



Number  1257
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Kylie knows they’ve all been through the ringer with their own kids and newborns and wants what’s best for her and Stormi.””
“Click here to get those and more in the PEOPLE Babies newsletter.”
“...a mama bear...”
““Kylie is very protective of Stormi,” a source tells PEOPLE of the 20-year-old’s parental instincts, sharing one particular example.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kylie is socializing with her friends as well and includes Stormi.”
“Of course, she doesn’t want her baby to get sick while she is little,” the source says of the 6-week-old.”
““It just seems normal and she is definitely not hysterical about it.”
“It is after all still the flu season The Keeping Up with the Kardashians reality star welcomed her first child with rapper boyfriend Travis Scott on Feb 1 three days before she announced her baby girl s arrival on Instagram and with a video titled To Our Daughter shared on...”
“YouTube...”


"Kelly knows that they've all gone through pain with their children and newborn babies, and what they want is the best for her and Tommy."
"Click here to get these and more information in the people's baby newsletter."
“… "Mama Bear..."
"Kelly is very protective of Tommy," a source told people about the 20-year-old's parental instincts and shared a special example
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Kelly is also socializing with her friends, including Tommy."
"Of course, she didn't want her child to be sick, and she was small," the source said of the six week old child
"It seems normal. She will never be hysterical."
"After all, it's still flu season. The reality TV star Kardashian and rapper boyfriend Travis Scott ushered in her first child on February 1. Three days ago, she announced the arrival of the baby girl on instagram and shared a video called" our daughter "on instagram..."
“YouTube…”



Number  1258
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us below.”
“Unfortunately she was fired after nine weeks on the show.”
“Reality television star and President Donald Trump’s employee, Omarosa Manigault was rushed to the hospital after suffering a leg injury, according to a new report, Feb. 3.”
“Her injury could have occurred inside the White House.”
“Here’s what we know.”
“Omarosa Manigault, 42, was rushed to Walter Reed National Military Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland on Feb. 3, to be treated for a prior injury to left her leg, according to TMZ.”
“She was transported to the Maryland medical center via a government vehicle, and it is unclear if she was inside the White House when she needed medical attention.”
“Omarosa was actually injured last month [Jan. 2017], and her leg was placed in a walking boot, as reported by the site.”
“She was actually seen leaving The View, Jan. 27, wearing the orthopedic boot.”
“Omarosa was apparently taken to the hospital for her existing injury.”


"Tell us below."
"Unfortunately, she was fired nine weeks after the show."
According to the latest report on February 3, Omarosa Manigault, an employee of the reality TV star and President Donald Trump, was rushed to hospital after suffering leg injuries
"Her injuries could have happened inside the White House."
"That's what we know."
Omarosa Manigault, 42, was rushed to Walter Reed National Military Medical Center in Bethesda, Maryland, on February 3 for treatment for a left leg injury, TMZ reported
"She was taken to Maryland Medical Center in a government vehicle, and it's not clear if she was in the white house when she needed medical treatment."
"According to the website, Omarosa was actually injured last month (January 2017) and her leg was put in her walking boots."
On January 27, she was seen leaving in orthopedic boots
"Omarosa was apparently taken to the hospital because of her current injury."



Number  1259
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more exclusive celebrity news, be sure to pick up the latest issue of Life & Style magazine, on newsstands now.”
““But suddenly, Angelina reversed course when she felt Brad was pushing too hard to resolve the situation to his benefit.” Hopefully, the couple reaches an agreement soon — for the kids’ sake.”
““They had been diligently going along privately and amicably, trying to keep the focus on the family,” an insider told In Touch.”
““Maddox wants to lead as normal a life as possible.”Angelina and Brad split nearly two years ago, but it is being reported that the couple is still struggling to come to a custody agreement.”
““He finds it all pretentious,” the insider adds.”
“...is not pressuring the teen...”
“That meant being a part of meetings helping with the script preparing shoots and reviewing dallies Angelina who also shares kids Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and nine year old twins Knox and Vivienne with her estranged husband would love Maddox to join her on the red carpet but...”
““I was trying to help wherever I could.”
“She’s a wonder,” he told People magazine.”
““[She’s] fun, funny, and easy to work with.”


"To get more exclusive celebrity news, be sure to buy the latest issue of lifestyle magazine at the newsstand immediately."
"But all of a sudden, Angelina changed her mind because she felt Brad was working too hard to solve the problems that were good for him." I hope the couple can reach an agreement soon - for the children. "
"They have been trying to be friendly in private, trying to focus on the family," one person familiar with the matter said in contact magazine
"Maddox wants to live as normal a life as possible." Angelina and Brad broke up two years ago, but the couple are still reported to be trying to reach a custody agreement
"He felt that all this was pretentious," the person familiar with the matter added
“… It's not about putting pressure on teenagers... "
"It means that as part of the meeting, she helped prepare the script for filming and vetting Dali Angelina, and she also shared with her separated husband her children parks 14 Zahara 13 Shilo 11 and 9-year-old twins Knox and Vivian, who wanted Maddox to join her on the red carpet, but..."
"I want to help people as much as I can."
"She's a miracle," he told people
"(she) interesting, interesting and easy to get along with."



Number  1260
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image zoom Credit: Splash NewsOn Sunday, PEOPLE confirmed that the Drop the Mic co-host and the singer are engaged.”
““Justin is of course ahead of the trends, selecting an oval stone for Hailey’s ring, which has been somewhat rare over the past decade but is making a huge resurgence,” Andrew Brown, President of WP Diamonds tells PEOPLE.”
“See the photosAre Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin Married?”
“See the Band She's Wearing with Her Engagement RingJustin Bieber brought some serious bling with him to the Bahamas.”
“The singer proposed to Hailey Baldwin after only a few weeks of dating (but close to a decade of friendship) during a special island engagement moon, and the model is now wearing not one but two rings on her left hand.”
“In photos circulating social media, Baldwin is seen wearing a huge oval diamond engagement ring set on what looks to be a rose gold pavé diamond band.”
“A second solo wedding-like band is seen on top of the diamond.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Hailey’s oval stone is about six carats, F-G color grade and VS clarity, making it one of the better diamonds out there.”
“Baldwin, 21, often turns to the Schwartz with help accessorizing her red carpet looks, but a rep for the brand confirmed to PEOPLE that the jeweler is not behind the ring.”


"Image zooming credit: splash news confirmed on Sunday that the microphone co host and the singer were engaged."
Andrew brown, President of WP diamond, told people: "Justin is certainly ahead of the trend, choosing an oval stone for Haley's ring, which has been rare in the past decade, but it is on the rise."
"Look at the pictures. Are Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin married?"
"Look at the band she's wearing with her engagement ring. Justin Bieber came to the Bahamas with some serious jewelry."
"The singer proposed to Haley Baldwin after only a few weeks of dating (but nearly a decade of friendship) in a special island engagement month, and now the model is wearing two rings instead of one on her left hand."
"In the photos circulating on social media, Baldwin is wearing a huge oval diamond engagement ring, inlaid on a Pave Diamond ring that looks like rose gold."
"There's a second wedding ring on top of the diamond."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Haley's oval diamond is about 6 carats. The F-G color level and vs transparency make it one of the best diamonds."
Baldwin, 21, often uses Schwartz's help to decorate his red carpet look, but a representative of the brand has confirmed that the jeweler is not behind the scenes



Number  1261
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...you don t then it s not...”
“Turner is just completely wonderful and he s my best friend so that s I guess you can either choose to talk about it or not She added If you talk about it it becomes interesting to people but if...”
““I’ve been lucky because I barely get recognized, and I keep my relationship super private,” Kirby shared.”
“Not even a snog, it was marriage.”“The Crown” actress has been dating actor Callum Turner for two years and plans to keep that part of her life private.”
““To be getting married to him?”
““None of it is real,” Kirby added.”
““The most disconcerting thing was the people I didn’t think would believe it, did, and they were texting my boyfriend, asking, ‘Are you OK?’ I don’t think they believe anything they read now because you just can’t.”
““Even though the [film] crew were there, it was all [in the tabloids] like, ‘The next wife falls at his feet,'” Kirby, 30, told Marie Claire UK in a new interview.”
“While filming “Mission: Impossible – Fallout” with 56-year-old Cruise last spring, paparazzi caught the co-stars kissing on set and the tabloids went wild.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Two years into a relationship with her boyfriend, actress Vanessa Kirby was shocked to wake up one day and find out she was married to Tom Cruise.”


“… You don't know that's not... "
"Turner is great. He's my best friend, so I think you can choose to talk about it or not." She added: 'if you talk about it, people will be interested in it, but if you talk about it
"I'm lucky because I'm almost unrecognized and I keep my relationship a secret," Kirby said
"Not even a kiss. It's marriage." The crown actress has been dating the actor for two years and plans to keep this part of her life secret
"To marry him?"
"None of this is true," Kirby added
"The most disturbing ones are the people I don't think I'll believe. They text my boyfriend and ask," are you ok? "I don't think they believe anything they read now, because you just don't believe it."
"It's like 'the next wife falls at his feet' even though [the film] crew is there," 30-year-old Kirby told Mary Claire UK in a new interview
Last spring, while filming "mission: Impossible - dust settled" with cruise, 56, the paparazzi caught two leading actors kissing on the set, which made the tabloid crazy
"Click to send this email to a friend who has been with her boyfriend for two years. Actress Vanessa Kirby was shocked when she woke up one day to find that she was married to Tom Cruise."



Number  1262
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Beckgrid Sheldon, who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015, is also fascinated by Stephanie."
"Recently they were found wandering on Carmen beach in Mexico and even met Sheldon's friend Luke Bryan."
Stefani wore a white bikini top with a black sarong and Tan sweater, while Sheldon wore a blue trucker hat to match his board shorts and button down shirt
"Although they may have been an unexpected couple when they first started dating, Sheldon and Stephanie have been gone for some time."
"Background" Gwen really loves black because of who he is and has never tried to change him or anything about him
"She even likes his style!"
“… Source tells et
"She thinks he's a very manly person and is fascinated by that."
"When they don't take romantic walks on the beach, the couple often visit Sheldon's house in Oklahoma with Stefani's three sons, as well as Gavin Rossdale, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9 and Apollo, 3."



Number  1263
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The palace has yet to respond to Life & Style's report.”
“'Kate has been advised to go on bed rest now that she's around the seven-month mark.'”
“'She's decided she'd like to give birth at Kensington Palace,' a palace insider told Life & Style.”
“The palace is reportedly gearing up for the arrival of two new royal bubs, with the duchess planning to give birth at Kensington Palace in just under two months.”
“The US report further reveals that Kate is desperate to name one of the twins Diana, which William is reportedly 'thrilled' about.”
“A palace insider told the publication: 'They don't plan to coordinate the girls' names to rhyme or start with the same letter'.”
“Getty ImagesLife & Style further claims William and Kate 'want the twins to be seen as individuals.'”
“A source revealed, 'She's been telling pals that she's thrilled to be pregnant with two little princesses and has been proudly showing the sonogram to those closest to her.'”
“According to the publication, William and Kate 'couldn't be happier' about their double baby news.”
“Life & Style explosively reveals the 36-year-old mother-of-two is 'soon to be a mother-of-four'.”


"The palace has yet to respond to the lifestyle report."
"Kate is over seven months old and is advised to stay in bed."
"She decided to have a baby at Kensington Palace," a palace insider told life & style
"It is reported that the Royal Palace is preparing for the arrival of two new royal members, and the Duchess plans to give birth at Kensington Palace in less than two months."
"Reports in the United States further revealed that Kate wanted to name one of the twins Diana very much. According to reports, William was" excited "about this."
"They are not going to rhyme or start with the same letter," a palace insider told the media
"Getty Images life & style further claims that William and Kate" want the twins to be seen as individuals. "
"A source revealed that she had been telling her friends that it was exciting to be pregnant with two little princesses and that she was proud to show ultrasound to her closest friends."
"According to the publication, William and Kate are very happy with their twin news."
Life and fashion reveals that a 36 year old mother of two is "about to become a mother of four"



Number  1264
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At least this proposition actually has photographic proof.”
“For example, a snapshot of the “Friends” actress wearing a ring for the movie she was shooting called “Murder Mystery” was mistaken for an engagement ring.”
“Numerous publications have been circulating details about how the pair will supposedly reunite on-screen with a romantic comedy project, for example.”
“There have also been reports of the two getting married.”
“As it turns out, neither of these is true.”
“Listing a variety of rumors and reports that it considers false, Gossip Cop has certainly gone out of its way to try and prove other publications wrong.”
“The stated fictional declarations on that list include the supposed secret Jennifer Aniston, Brad Pitt marriage and that the pair is engaged once again.”
“Apparently, publications have been taking the smallest details to spin a narrative that was nowhere close to the truth.”
“This was quickly picked up and circulated all over the web, leading to a Jennifer Aniston, Brad Pitt rumor feeding frenzy.”
“This tidbit was posted by Twitter user Sarah McGonagall after she spotted it on an old Daily Express article.”


"At least this proposition is actually supported by photographs."
"For example, a snapshot of a friend actress wearing a ring in the movie murder mystery was mistaken for an engagement ring."
"Many publications are circulating details of how the couple will reunite with a romantic comedy project on the screen, such as."
"There are also reports that they are married."
"It turns out that none of this is true."
"The gossip police have listed all kinds of rumors and reports that they think are false. Of course, they have tried every means to prove other publications wrong."
Fictional statements on the list include the secret marriage of Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt and their re engagement
"Obviously, publications have been making up a story with the smallest details, which is far from the truth."
"The news quickly spread all over the Internet, triggering rumors of Jennifer Aniston and Brad Pitt."
"The grapevine was discovered by twitter user Sarah McGonagall in an old article in the daily express."



Number  1265
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“Do you think Bradley and his pregnant fiancée’s relationship will last?”
“As Radar exclusively reported, Cooper proposed to Shayk with an emerald and diamond engagement ring, but those close to the couple observed his changed demeanor in the last few weeks.”
“The hot pair, who once weren’t able to hide their attraction to each other during steamy PDA make out sessions all over the world, have been keeping a very low profile as they get ready to become parents.”
““Bradley has never looked so miserable,” a source told Radar about witnessing the way the Silver Linings Playbook star acts around his model fiancée.”
“As the stunning model, 31, and her actor fiancé, 42, prepare to welcome their first child, a source close to the couple told RadarOnline.com exclusively that the couple’s relationship has hit a low point.”
“Bradley Cooper‘s recent malaise about his pregnant baby mama and wife-to-be Irina Shayk have sparked worries that their engagement could be on the rocks.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Voice in the comments below."
"Do you think Bradley's relationship with his pregnant fiancee will continue?"
Cooper wore an emerald and diamond engagement ring when he proposed to Shayk, but people close to the couple have observed that his behavior has changed in the past few weeks, according to radar
"This hot couple, once at the world's steaming PDA intimate meeting, could not hide their attraction, but they kept a very low profile when preparing to become parents."
"Bradley has never been so miserable as he is now," a source told radar magazine, witnessing the first-line star's behavior around his model fiancee
The 31 year old model and the 42 year old actor's fiance are preparing for their first child, according to people familiar with the matter RadarOnline.com Website "the couple's relationship is at a low ebb."
"Bradley Cooper's recent dissatisfaction with his pregnant mother and wife to be, Elena Scheck, has raised concerns that their engagement may be on the rocks."



Number  1266
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The House Bunny The Rocker and Superbad...”
“Oscar nominated for Birdman her additional screen credits include the Amazing Spider Man film series Magic in the Moonlight The Croods Gangster Squad Easy A The Help Crazy Stupid Love Friends with Benefits Paperman Marmaduke Zombieland Ghosts of Girlfriends Past...”
“We were recently happy to see Stone make her Broadway debut in Cabaret.”
“Emma Watson was originally tapped for the role of Mia, before taking on Belle in Beauty and the Beast instead.”
“She falls in love with Sebastian, a magnetic jazz musician, in Los Angeles, but the city that united them may split them up.”
“Stone would play wannabe actress Mia, who is anxious to fit in.”
“According to The Wrap, Damien Chazelle’s song-and-dance romance has also eyed both Ryan Gosling and Tony winner Eddie Redmayne for the male lead.”
“The Broadway alum and Oscar nominee is in talks to headline the film musical La La Land.”
“Emma Stone must have had a perfectly marvelous time headlining a tuner!”


"Rabbit rock in the house and super bad..."
"Oscar nominated Birdman - her other films on screen include magic in the moonlight, the crotz Gang, take it easy, help crazy, stupid, loving friends and welfares, Marduk zombie Park and ghost of girlfriend..."
"We're very happy to see stone premiere on Broadway recently."
"Emma Watson was originally chosen to play mia, and later as bell in beauty and the beast."
"She fell in love with Sebastian, a magnetic jazz musician in Los Angeles, but the city that held them together might separate them."
Stone will play actress mia, who is eager to blend in
"It's reported that Damian chazel's love song and dance movie also features Ryan Gosling and Tony Wenner Eddie Redman as the leading roles."
"The Broadway alumni and Oscar nominee is negotiating with the headlines of the musical" the earth. "
"Emma stone must have been great on the tuner!"



Number  1267
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Abraham Lincoln pic.twitter.com/vkJnlXbnXg — J.K. Rowling (@jk_rowling) June 29, 2017 I see Melania's campaign to end cyber bullying is off to a slow start — John Legend (@johnlegend) June 29, 2017Click inside to read what more celebrities are saying about what Donald Trump tweeted this morning…”
“'Nearly all men can stand adversity, but if you want to test a man's character, give him power.'”
“Now, celebrities including John Legend, JK Rowling and more have voiced their concerns over the disgusting tweet.”
““It’s a sad day for America when the president spends his time bullying, lying and spewing petty personal attacks instead of doing his job,” MSNBC, the network that airs Morning Joe, responded in a statement.”
“Mika responded later in the day with a simple tweet.”
“The President tweeted that once, Mika “was bleeding badly from a face-lift” from his personal Twitter account.”
“Celebrities have been taking to Twitter all morning to slam Donald Trump for his tweet about Morning Joe hosts Mika Brzezinski and Joe Scarborough – specifically with regards to his words about Mika.”


"Abraham Lincoln pic.twitter.com/vkJnlXbnXg -J. K. Rowling (@ JK \ \ u Rowling) on June 29, 2017, I saw Melania's campaign to end online bullying started very slowly - John Legend (@ John Legend) on June 29, 2017, click inside to read more celebrities' comments on Donald Trump's Twitter this morning... "
"Almost everyone can endure adversity, but if you want to test a person's character, give him strength."
"Now, celebrities like John Legend and JK Rowling have expressed concern about this disgusting microblog."
"It's a sad day for the United States, where the president spends his time bullying, lying and making little noise, rather than doing his own job," MSNBC, which broadcast Good Morning Joe, responded in a statement
"Mika responded later in the day with a simple tweet."
The president tweeted that once Micah's personal twitter account was "bleeding from plastic surgery"
"Celebrities have been tweeting all morning about Donald Trump's tweets about Mika Brzezinski and Joe Scarborough, the morning hosts, especially about what he said about Mika."



Number  1268
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'It was only a matter of time before they fell in love,' claimed the source.”
“'The truth is, they're both at similar stages of their lives and have so much in common - kids, looking for love, big careers.”
“The 52-year-old Hollywood star took to Twitter to slam bizarre reports that the pair were planning to marry, after her reps shut down the rumours.”
“Russell tweeted to his more than 2.2 million followers: 'I have such a dramatic life in bulls**t magazines.'”
“Scroll down for video I have such a dramatic life in bulls t magazines Russell Crowe has finally broken his silence on his rumoured romance with Terri Irwin he s pictured in Rome in May Saying it how it is The 52 year old Hollywood star took to Twitter to...”
“...slam bizarre reports Last week New Idea magazine said I was getting married now Woman s Day sic saying the weddings off Russell added...”
“It comes after Woman's Day reported this week that Terri and Russell's rumoured wedding was 'off' so that she can focus on her children, Bindi, 18, and Robert, 13.”
“But according to the publication, Terri, 52, still 'loves' the Gladiator actor.”
“Coming out swinging!”
“The actor slammed recent reports in New Idea and Woman s Day he is seen here in 2007 at a Los Angeles event with Terri middle and Naomi Watts right Fed up Last week New Idea magazine said I was getting married now Woman s Day sic saying the weddings...”


"It's only a matter of time before they fall in love," the source claimed
"The fact is that they are all at similar stages of life and have a lot in common - children, finding love, big business."
The 52 year old Hollywood star tweeted a bizarre story about the couple's plans to get married, after her spokesperson denied it
"Russell tweeted to more than 2.2 million fans:" my life in magazines is too dramatic. "
"Scroll down video I have such a dramatic life in bulls magazine that Russell Crowe has finally broken the silence of his affair with Terry Owen. His photo in Rome in May says this is how a 52 year old Hollywood star tweets
“…… Last week, there were a lot of bizarre reports that new ideas magazine said that I was getting married now. On women's day, Russell's wedding added
"Previously, this week's women's day reported that Terri and Russell's affair wedding had been" cancelled "so that she could focus on her children, 18-year-old Bingdi and 13-year-old Robert."
"But according to the publication, Terry, 52, still loves the Gladiator actor."
"Come out and swing!"
"The actor attacked the latest reports from new ideas and women's day. He attended an event in Los Angeles in 2007. Terry Mead and Naomi Watts were fed up with it last week. New ideas magazine said I'm getting married now. Women's day said wedding..."



Number  1269
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“People are eternal beings and our job is to love, encourage, affirm," he added.”
“The celebrity pastor recently sat down with ET where he opened up about Bieber, who Wilkerson calls "the most talented person" he knows.”
“WATCH 7 Tonight Show Moments That Made Us Love Justin Bieber All Over Again He s been thrown into a whirlwind that I ll never know and so I think on his journey he s always trying to figure it out Wilkerson said regarding Bieber s meteoric rise to fame...”
“...and childhood spent in the spotlight...”
“"Anybody who gets put into that limelight gets a bad rap," the 31-year-old minister and author shared.”
“"When you do something good, that gets exploited.”
“When you do something bad, that gets exploited."”
“WATCH: Justin Bieber Turns on the Waterworks for Emotional AMAs Finale"People aren’t projects, people are people.”
“Projects have a start date and a finish date -- that's not people.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"People are eternal beings, and our job is to love, encourage, affirm," he added
The famous pastor recently sat down with ET, where he talked about Bieber, whom Wilkerson called "the most talented person he knew."
"Watch" tonight 7 "show" let's fall in love with Justin Bieber again "- he is involved in a whirlwind, I will never know, so I think in his journey, he always tries to understand Wilkerson Bieber's famous words..."
“… Childhood in the spotlight... "
"Anyone who is in the spotlight is going to get bad reviews," said the 31 year old minister and writer
"When you do good, you are used."
"When you do bad things, you are used."
"Watch: Justin Bieber turns on the water plant and makes the final episode for Emma" human is not a project, human is human“
"A project has a start date and an end date - it's not a person."



Number  1270
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He played Finn Hudson, a football quarterback with two left feet who found more camaraderie in the choir room than on the football field.”
“Over the past four seasons, he delivered renditions of such classics as U2’s “One” and R.E.M.’s “Losing My Religion.”Monteith served as the show’s resident hunk with a heart of gold.”
“No one had any idea what to say or do.”
““The news was devastating.”
““The whole day was simultaneously the best and worst experience of my life,” said Chloe Harvey, an 18-year-old fan from Portsmouth, England.”
“The actor’s struggles with addiction echoed those of other young stars whose premature deaths also left young fans grieving.”
“The hundreds of “gleeks,” as they’re known, joined a chorus of thousands worldwide who took to social media with similar expressions about Monteith’s passing.”
“...after news of the co star s death rocked a Glee fan convention...”
“Sampai saat ini berita tentang pernikahan Cory Monteith dan Lea Michele masih belum bisa dikonfirmasi atau dianggap benar Glee Indonesia gleekindonesia July 15 2013 In England what was supposed to be a weekend celebration of the musical TV series turned into an impromptu memorial of song and dance for Monteith...”
“Fans are tweeting around the clock in a Tower of Babel of languages from countries as far-flung as Indonesia, which has recently forged closer ties with Western countries.”


He plays Finn Hudson, a football quarterback with two left feet, who finds more friendships in the choir room than on the football field
Over the past four quarters, he has performed classic songs such as U2's "one" and R.E.M.'s "losing my religion.". Montith is a regular on the show, with a heart of gold
"No one knows what to say or do."
"The news is devastating."
"It was the best and worst experience of my life," said Chloe Harvey, 18, a Portsmouth fan
"The actor's fight against drug addiction is the same as that of other young stars, whose premature death also makes young fans sad."
Hundreds of gleiches have joined thousands of people around the world to express similar views on Monteith's death on social media
“…… After the news of the co star's death shocked the fans' meeting of glee.... "
"Sampai saatini berita Teng pernikahan Cory Monteith Dan lea Michele Masih Belum bisa dikonfirmasi atau dianggap benar glee Indonesia on July 15, 2013, in the UK, what was originally a music TV series weekend celebration turned into an impromptu commemoration of Monteith's singing and dancing..."
"Fans tweet 24 hours a day in a Babel Tower of languages from Indonesia, which has recently established closer ties with western countries."



Number  1271
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For now, fans of Jennifer Aniston will have to wait and watch to see who she may end up with next, as she instead focuses her time on her friends and work.”
“...https://t.co/tBORl39Yv2 — Glamour (@glamourmag) March 10, 2018While it is likely that Aniston will eventually be linked to someone new for real in the future, at least this time around it seems that the reports are false and there is no brewing fight over Orlando Bloom.”
“Also, where can we get one?”
“According to the magazine, not only is Jennifer Aniston not a big fan of dating, she is actually not “looking forward” to being back in the dating scene as a single woman.”
“However, recent reports from People Magazine refute that bit of information as well.”
“On top of the fact that the alleged fight over Orlando Bloom between Aniston and Katy Perry is false, the other claim that the outlet made was that the Friends actress was looking to get back into the dating scene.”
“...first time that the latter site has linked Jennifer Aniston romantically to someone only for that apparent connection to be proven false...”
“Jennifer Aniston Katy Perry NOT In Fight Over Orlando Bloom Despite Claim https t co XbuaHo1KXm Jose Reyes NYY001 March 15 2018 Gossip Cop shared that a rep for the actress told them that the claims being put forth by RadarOnline are nothing more than nonsense This is not the...”
“Instead, the outlet which is known for debunking many Hollywood rumors indicated that Aniston has no intention of going after Orlando Bloom.”
“Aniston were to go after Bloom she may have a fight on her hands from Perry according to Gossip Cop this is actually false...”


"For now, fans of Jennifer Aniston will have to wait and see who she'll be with next, because she's spending her time with friends and work."
“... https://t.co/tBORl39Yv2-Glamour (@ glamourmag) March 10, 2018 although Aniston is likely to eventually be associated with a real newcomer, at least this time, these reports seem to be false and there is no brewing dispute about Orlando Bloom. "
"And where can we get it?"
"According to the magazine, not only does Jennifer Aniston dislike dating, she doesn't actually" look forward "to returning to dating as a single woman."
"However, recent reports in people magazine also refute this point."
"In addition to the fact that the so-called quarrel between Aniston and Katie Perry over Orlando Bloom is wrong, another statement in the media is that the heroine of friends wants to go back to the dating scene."
“… The latter site romantically connects Jennifer Aniston with someone for the first time, just to prove that the obvious connection is wrong... "
"Jennifer Aniston Katy Perry didn't quarrel with Orlando Bloom, despite claiming that she was not talking about xbuaho1kxm Jose Reyes nyy001 on March 15, 2018. The police said the actress's representative told them that radaronline's statement was just nonsense, it's not..."
"Instead, the media, known for debunking Hollywood rumors, said Aniston had no intention of pursuing Orlando Bloom."
"If Aniston goes after bloom, she may fight with Perry. According to the gossip police, it's actually fake..."



Number  1272
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“...or blog posts...”
“A website known for peddling wild conspiracy theories claims the magazine mogul was killed because he was on the verge of exposing a IMDb com Inc takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles Tweets...”
“The Los Angeles Police Department has not launched a murder investigation into the death of Playboy founder Hugh Hefner , who passed away of natural causes last week at the age of 91.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
“… Or blog post... "
"A website famous for peddling crazy conspiracy theories claimed that the magazine tycoon was killed because he was about to expose an IMDB com company, which did not take any responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news article tweets..."
"The Los Angeles Police Department has yet to launch a murder investigation into the death of Playboy founder Hugh Hefner, who died of natural causes last week at the age of 91."



Number  1273
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you glad that Brad and Angelina have finally put the needs of their kids first in their bitter divorce?”
“It’s so great to know that the kids weren’t sitting at a hotel with nannies but instead were at a resort under the loving care of their father, having a blast!”
“Her children did make a big public appearance with her at the film’s premiere, but then she continued on with her press responsibilities.”
“It worked out perfectly as Angie, 41, was able to spend time promoting her latest directorial effort First They Killed My Father while meeting with Cambodian dignitaries.”
“The kids and Brad were all very relieved and happy to be able to spend quality time together, out in the open, without drawing a ton of attention like the would in the states,” our insider adds.”
“He was able to play freely with his children in and around the resort, at the pool, without ever having his privacy being invaded by others.”
““Brad picked an obscure resort, in a foreign country, which helped protect his anonymity.”
“So Angelina OK’d Brad’s trip overseas to spend some time with them while she was busy with other obligations in Cambodia,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Brad was missing his children like crazy and Angie has actually been much more agreeable with him lately.”
“The former couple is finally playing nice for the sake of the children and he flew to Asia to help take care of their brood while she was busy working.”


"Hollywood stars, Brad and Angelina have finally put the needs of their children first in divorce. Are you happy?"
"I'm glad to know that the children are not sitting in the hotel with the nanny, but with their father's care, enjoying themselves in the resort!"
"Her children did make a public appearance with her at the film premiere, but then she continued to take on the responsibility of the media."
"It turned out to be perfect. Angie, 41, was able to spend time promoting her latest directing work. First, they killed my father when they met Cambodian dignitaries."
"The kids and Brad are very happy to have a good time together, in public, without as much attention as they did in the United States," our insider added
"He can play freely with his children in the resort and in the surrounding swimming pool without being invaded by others."
"Brad chose an unknown resort in a foreign country, which helps to protect his anonymity."
"So Angelina agreed to Brad's overseas trip to be with them while Cambodia is busy fulfilling other obligations," a source said Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Brad misses his children very much, and Angie has been more affable to him recently."
"For the sake of the children, the old couple finally became amiable. While she was busy working, he flew to Asia to help take care of their children."



Number  1274
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The way you have handled all of this has been more inspiring and made me more proud than you’ll ever know.”
“I have been thinking of my fans, and of you all, non stop over the past week.”
“...singer Ariana Grande had been performing in Manchester Reuters Manchester explosion in pictures A Royal Logistic Corps RLC bomb disposal robot is unloaded outside the Manchester Arena following reports of an explosion in Manchester...”
“Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures A woman sits in the street in a blanket near the Manchester Arena as police guard the area following reports of an explosion in Manchester Britain EPA Manchester explosion in pictures Two women wrapped in thermal blankets stand near the Manchester Arena where US”
“...in pictures Police escort members of the public from the Manchester Arena in Manchester England...”
“Ambulances were seen rushing to the Manchester Arena venue and police added in a statement that people should avoid the area AFP Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures An ambulance drives away from the Manchester Arena where U S singer Ariana Grande had been performing in Manchester Reuters Manchester explosion...”
“British police said early May 23 there were "a number of confirmed fatalities" after reports of at least one explosion during a pop concert by US singer Ariana Grande.”
“Manchester explosion in pictures Police deploy at scene of a reported explosion during a concert in Manchester England on May 23 2017”
“...at scene of explosion in Manchester England at a concert in Manchester Arena AFP Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures Police stand by a cordoned off street close to the Manchester Arena Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures Police deploy at scene of explosion in Manchester England AFP Getty Images...”
“...in pictures AFP Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures Police and fans close to the Manchester Arena after reports of an explosion Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures There have been reports of explosions at Manchester Arena where Ariana Grande had performed Getty Images Manchester explosion in pictures Police deploy...”


"The way you deal with all this is more inspiring, and I'm very proud of it."
"For the past week, I've been thinking about my fans and you."
“…… Singer Ariane Grande once performed in Manchester Reuters pictures of Manchester explosion report of RLC bomb disposal robot of Royal logistics force after unloading off Manchester stage in Manchester... "
"Getty Images a woman sits on a street near the Manchester arena in the picture of the Manchester explosion. While police guard the area, there are reports that two women in the picture of the explosion in Manchester, England EPA Manchester explosion are standing near the Manchester arena where we live, wrapped in hot blankets."
“… In the picture, police escort the public from the Manchester arena in Manchester, England... "
"Ambulances were seen rushing to the Manchester arena, and police added in a statement that people should avoid the area where Manchester exploded Agence France-Presse Getty pictures Manchester exploded pictures an ambulance drove out of the Manchester arena, and American singer Ariane G Rand once performed the Manchester explosion in Manchester..."
British police said that earlier on May 23, after reports of at least one explosion at a pop concert by American singer Ariana Grande, "multiple deaths have been confirmed."
"Pictures of the Manchester explosion police were deployed at the scene of the explosion at a concert in Manchester, England, May 23, 2017"
“… At the scene of the explosion in Manchester, England at a concert at the Manchester arena, police stood near a blocked street near the Manchester arena, pictures of Manchester explosion, pictures of Manchester explosion, pictures of police deployed at the scene of the explosion in Manchester, England. "
“… In the picture, AFP picture shows Manchester explosion police and fans close to the Manchester arena. After receiving the report of the explosion, Manchester explosion in the picture has been reported that Ariane Grande performed the Manchester explosion police department in the Manchester arena in the picture... "



Number  1275
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I used to feel guilty about taking personal time,” she revealed, “but I also think I never met someone who was worth it before,” she said about her romance with Hassan.”
“It is what it is.” However she did come the close to discussing her relationship with Hassan, telling the publication that she dating and she is happy.”
“We’ve got the pics of their steamy Mexican getawayRihanna has kept her one year romance with Saudi billionaire Hassan Jameel super private.”
“So when rumors surfaced in June that they had broken up fans were waiting to see proof they were still a couple.”
“They got it on July 9 when pics surfaced of the 30-year-old singer and the businessman on a sexy Mexican getaway.”
“The two appeared to be locked in a animated conversation as bikini clad RiRi is seen pointing her right index finger in the air with her mouth open, looking like she had something important to say.”
“In another pic Hassan is seen looking back at her with his hand on his chest as if they’re involved in a somewhat heated conversation.”
“CLICK HERE to see all the pics.”
“On June 1 MediaTakeOut claimed RiRi had dumped Hassan.”
“The site reported that “Rihanna just got tired of him.”


"I used to feel guilty about taking up personal time, but I don't think I've ever met anyone worth it before," she said of her relationship with Hassan
"That's what happened." However, as she approached to discuss her relationship with Hassan, she told the magazine that she was dating and that she was happy
"We've taken pictures of their steaming vacation in Mexico. Irihana kept her one-year relationship with Saudi billionaire Hassan Jamil secret once. "
"So when the rumor of a breakup came out in June, fans were waiting to see the evidence that they were still lovers."
"They were photographed on July 9, when 30-year-old singers and businessmen were on a sexy getaway in Mexico."
"It seems that they are locked in an animated dialogue. Wearing Riri, they see her right index finger in the air and her mouth open. It seems that she has something important to say."
"In another photo, Hassan's hand is on his chest and looks back at her as if they are having a bit of a heated conversation."
Click here to see all the pictures
"On June 1, mediatakeout claimed that Riri dumped Hassan."
"Rihanna is just tired of him," the website reported



Number  1276
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m fed up with the sport-like scrutiny and body shaming that occurs daily under the guise of “journalism,’ the ‘First Amendment,’ and ‘celebrity news.’””
“What I am is fed up.”
“She’s done a commendable share of philanthropic work (although she doesn’t advertise it) for St. Jude's Children's Research Hospital, among other causes.”
“She’s reached impressive new heights as a dramatic actress, with a performance in last year’s Cake so heartbreaking that many believed it deserved Oscar recognition.”
“And she wrote a powerful essay this summer, trying to redirect the endless tabloid attention on her to more important issues in the world.”
“Nevertheless, when Pitt confirmed that he and Angelina Jolie were divorcing earlier this month, Aniston found herself swept back up into the magazine headline melee.”
“Despite the suddenly aggressive tabloid and paparazzi attention since news of a celebrity breakup that has nothing to do with her it seems as though Aniston has gone about her business as usual joining husband Justin Theroux in New York this week for the premiere of his latest film The...”
“Girl on the Train...”
“And while there, Theroux was tossed a question about the Brangelina breakup and Aniston’s new involvement in the headlines.”
“Rather than refuse to answer the question, as is certainly his red-carpet right, the Leftovers actor took the decidedly classy route in responding.”


"I'm fed up with the daily sports censorship and physical humiliation under the guise of journalism, the first amendment and celebrity news."
"I've had enough."
"She works for St. Jude's children's research hospital（ St.Jude 's children's research hospital did a commendable charity work (though she didn't advertise it), "she said
"As a dramatic actress, she has reached an impressive new height. Her performance in last year's" cake "was heartbreaking, and many people think she deserves Oscar recognition."
This summer, she wrote an influential article, trying to shift the tabloid's unlimited attention to her more important issues in the world
"However, when Pete confirmed his divorce from Angelina Jolie earlier this month, Aniston found herself in the headlines again."
"Although tabloids and paparazzi have suddenly become aggressive since the news that a celebrity who has nothing to do with Aniston broke up, Aniston and her husband Justin Theroux seem to have participated in the premiere of his latest film in New York as usual..."
"The girl on the train..."
"While there, seru was asked about Brangelina's breakup and Aniston's new involvement in the headlines."
"The leftover actress did not refuse to answer this question (which is, of course, his correct answer on the red carpet), but took an absolutely elegant way of answering it."



Number  1277
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
“Do you hope she and Blake are having a baby?”
“Blake and Gwen are inseparable, they spend almost every night together and a baby might be on the way for the happy couple!”HollywoodLifers, what do you think of the rumor that Gwen is pregnant?”
““She loves Blake and they are a perfect couple, she would certainly be overjoyed to have his baby.”
““She has always wanted a girl and she is really in love with Blake,” the source said.”
“The insider also told us that if Gwen is pregnant she would want to paint a nursery pink this time — not blue.”
“Click here to see pics of Gwen’s previous pregnancy looks.”
““She is walking, differently and holding her body differently, almost covering-up or protecting her belly the exact same way she did last time she was pregnant.” OMG, we really hope that means she is carrying Blake’s baby already!”
““The way she has recently started to carry herself, is the same as when she was carrying Apollo,” the source continued, referencing how Gwen acted when she was pregnant with her youngest son, who is now three years old.”
““Gwen’s body language lately has been of that of someone that is in the early stages of pregnancy,” the insider said.”


"Tell us next!"
"Do you want her to have a baby with black?"
"Black and Gwen are inseparable, they are together almost every night, a child may be born, this happy couple! "Holly worms, what do you think of the rumor that Gwen is pregnant?"
"She loves Blake. They are a perfect couple. She will be overjoyed to have his baby."
"She always wanted a girl and she really fell in love with black," the source said
"The person also told us that if Gwen was pregnant, she would want to paint the nursery Pink - not blue this time."
"Click here to see photos of Gwen when she was pregnant before."
"She walks in different positions and holds her body in different positions, covering or protecting her stomach almost as she did when she was pregnant last time." God, we wish that meant she was pregnant with Blake's baby
"She recently started to hold herself the same way she did when she held Apollo," the source added, referring to Gwen's behavior when he was pregnant with his youngest son, who is now three years old
"Gwen's recent body language is from people in early pregnancy," the person familiar with the matter said



Number  1278
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““She’s tried talking to her sisters but they aren’t that bothered.”“Kim was always Kris’ favorite until Jennifer crashed the scene.”We pay for juicy info!”
““Kim is fed up and doesn’t know what to do.”And not even her circle of loyal siblings will help.”
“...invite list for her annual holiday party so Kim s dreading Jennifer stealing the show The sunshine walks with Jennifer in Kris eyes adds the informant...”
“Kris says she s a hoot and treats her like the blonde daughter she never had To make matters worse sources reveal to Radar that Kris has invited the A lister over several times for breakfast lunch and dinner and always with cocktails flowing Jennifer s definitely on the VIP”
““She’s waltzing into the family’s world acting like a superstar and upsetting the order with her loud chaos.”
“The mother-of-two, 37, is said to be envious “as hell” over the hold Lawrence, 27, has on her infamous momager Kris Jenner.”
“Kardashian-obsessed Jennifer Lawrence is starting to overstep her boundaries on Kim‘s clan — so much so it’s sent the reality star into a “jealous rage,” RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!”
“Kim Kardashian In A 'Jealous Rage' Over Jennifer Lawrence Reality star hates the hold the actress has on her mom Kris Jenner.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"She tried to talk to her sisters, but they were not so upset." "Before Jennifer crashed the scene, Kim was Chris's favorite." We pay for interesting information! "
"Kim has had enough. He doesn't know what to do." Even her faithful brothers and sisters couldn't help
“… Invitation list for her annual holiday party, so Kim's afraid of Jennifer stealing the show sunshine walk with Jennifer in Chris's eyes added, "informant..."
"Chris said she was a playboy and treated her like a blonde daughter. She never made things worse. A source told radar that Chris had invited A-lister to breakfast, lunch and dinner many times, and always had cocktails on the VIP table. "
"She waltzes into the family world like a superstar, and her noise disturbs the order."
Lawrence, 37, a mother of two, is said to be envious of the 27 year old's control of her infamous mother, Chris Jenner
Kardashian's infatuated Jennifer Lawrence began to transcend her boundaries in the Kim family, so that the reality TV star fell into "jealous anger" RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
"Kim kardashan is jealous of the reality TV star, Jennifer Lawrence. She hates the actress's control over her mother, Chris Jenner."



Number  1279
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It boasts 6-bedrooms, 7-bathrooms, and 9,214 square feet of luxury living space.”
“The house is GORGEOUS!”
“They brought in a private firefighting crew to save not only their home but the entire neighborhood.”
“In November 2018, Kim and Kanye’s house was threatened by the Woolsey Wild Fire.”
“The massive property, as well as the residence itself, provides the West crew plenty of space for their growing family and to thrive.”
“Amenities include a fitness room, spa, 2 swimming pools, 2 vineyards, a guest house, a recording studio, and a 1,050 square foot entertainment pavilion.”
“What has been revealed about the 15,667 square foot French country-inspired home is that it boasts 8-bedrooms, 8-full bathrooms, and 2-half bathrooms.”
“...if it weren’t in a gated community we’d send the team to get our own photos…but we aren’t trying to get arrested.”
“Believe us, we scour EVERYDAY for more recent photos of this unbelievable home.”
“We haven’t gotten our hands on any recent photos of the completed renovation, but as soon as we have them, you’ll be the first to know!”


It has six bedrooms, seven bathrooms and 9214 square feet of luxury living space
"What a beautiful house!"
"They brought in a private fire brigade, which not only saved their home, but also saved the whole community."
"In November 2018, king and Kanye's house was threatened by the Woolsey wildfire."
"The huge property, as well as the house itself, provides enough space for the crew of the western side to make their families grow and thrive."
Amenities include a gym, spa, two swimming pools, two vineyards, a guest room, a recording room and a 1050 square foot entertainment Pavilion
"About this 15667 square foot French country style home, it was found to have eight bedrooms, eight full bathrooms and two and a half bathrooms."
“…… If it's not in a closed community, we'll send someone to take pictures of ourselves But we don't want to be arrested. "
"Believe us, we search every day for the latest photos of this incredible home."
"We haven't got the latest photos of the decoration, but as soon as we get the photos, you will be the first to know!"



Number  1280
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Britney hates to be alone, so this was worrying.”
“She sent her best friend and personal assistant, Alli Sims, home.”
“Scroll down for more...”
“Spears has been a wreck ever since filing for divorce from husband Kevin Federline last November.”
“Scarcely a day goes by without fawning coverage of her antics in the world media.”
“It is a portrait of a troubled life that raises disturbing questions, not just about her chaotic private life, but about her suitability as a role model to millions of teenagers.”
“Indeed the frequent screaming bouts and episodes of depression left him fearing the singer might kill herself or even harm her children Preston, aged two, and Jayden, one.”
“Barretto, a former private investigator and celebrity bodyguard, from Ventura, California, claims he saw Britney abuse narcotics and alcohol and that she neglected her children to the point of putting them at serious physical risk.”
“He fears not just for her future, but for all those close to her.”
“Today, for the first time, Barretto speaks about the fear, the heartache and, at times, the sheer horrors of working alongside Britney.”


"Britney hates being alone, so it's worrying."
"She sent her best friend and personal assistant, Ellie Simms, home."
Scroll down to see more
"Spears has been a failure since she filed for divorce from her husband, Kevin Federline, in November last year."
"Hardly a day goes by without flattering her antics in the world media."
"It's a picture of a troubled life that raises disturbing questions not only about her chaotic private life, but also about her suitability as a role model for millions of teenagers."
"In fact, frequent screams and depression made him worry that the singer might commit suicide or even hurt her two children, Preston, two, and Jaden, one."
Barretto, a former private investigator and celebrity bodyguard from Ventura, California, claims he saw Britney abuse drugs and alcohol, ignoring her children and putting them in serious physical danger
"He's worried not only about her future, but also about the people around her."
"Today, for the first time, Barretto talks about the fear, heartache and sometimes pure terror of working with Britney Spears."



Number  1281
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In April last year Katie and Jamie were pictured having dinner together in NYC, and they were spotted leaving a hotel in Paris and boarding the same private jet in May.”
“In September 2014 she moved back to Los Angeles from New York, presumably to be nearer to the actor and to make their romantic dinners and sleepovers a whole lot easier.”
“...they made a rare public appearance at a pre Grammys bash on Saturday...”
“The couple - who finally went public with their secret four year romance in September - could barely take their eyes off each other at the star-studded party in NYC.”
“Katie - who styled her recently shorn hair in a sleek bob - giggled like a schoolgirl as Jamie threw a protective arm around the back of her chair.”
“And when they weren't staring at each other, they whispered sweet nothings behind their hands.”
“After years of rumours, the duo confirmed their relationship four months ago, holding hands on a romantic Malibu beach stroll just months after her ‘dating ban’ from ex-husband Tom Cruise expired.”
“(Image: Getty Images North America)(Image: Getty Images North America)(Image: Getty Images North America) (Image: Getty Images North America)These sneaky lovebirds had reportedly been ducking and diving since August 2013, when they apparently caught feelings at a charity bash in the Hamptons.”
“The pair was actually first introduced by Tom at a Washington Redskins game against the Minnesota Vikings in Landover, Maryland in 2006, after the blokes bonded on the set of 2004 movie, Collateral.”
“Image Getty Images North America Image Reuters Image Getty Images North America But it wasn t until August 2013 14 months after the collapse of her six year marriage to Tom that their friendship became something way more flirty with the pair spotted enjoying an intimate dance at a charity...”


"In April last year, someone took pictures of Katie and Jamie having dinner in New York. They were found to have left a hotel in Paris and boarded the same private plane in May."
"In September 2014, she moved back to Los Angeles from New York, presumably to get closer to the actor and make their romantic dinner and overnight stay easier."
“…… They made a rare public appearance at a party before the Grammy Awards on Saturday. "
"The couple finally opened up their four-year secret love affair in September, and they could hardly look away from each other at the starry party in New York."
"Katie - she made a smooth Bob out of her recently cut hair - giggles like a schoolgirl, and Jamie puts a protective arm around the back of her chair."
"When they don't stare at each other, they whisper sweet words behind their backs."
"After years of rumors, they confirmed their relationship four months ago. Just a few months after the expiration of the" dating ban "between her and her ex husband Tom Cruise, they walked hand in hand on Malibu beach."
"(photo source: Getty Images North America) (photo source: Getty Images North America) (photo source: Getty Images North America) According to the report, these sneaky couples have been avoiding and diving since August 2013, when they apparently captured their feelings at a charity party in Hampton. "
In fact, the couple were first introduced by Tom during a match with the Minnesota Vikings in 2006 in randolver, Maryland, when they got married on the set of the 2004 Film collateral
"Picture source: North America picture source: Reuters picture source: North America picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source Picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source: picture source



Number  1282
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know below!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Beyonce should challenge Wendy Williams to a sing-off?”
“Wendy Williams certainly should have thought twice before coming for Beyonce, 36.”
“After hearing Wendy slam her vocal skills on Feb. 20, Queen Bey is ready to set the record straight.”
““If Beyonce really worried about what Wendy Williams said then Beyonce would not be Beyonce.”
“She is so far above that chatter.”
“She just had to laugh it off.”
“But, if Wendy ever wanted to put her money where her mouth is she would welcome a sing-off between the two to show who can really sing, and who is just a big bag of hot air!” a source close to Bey tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“If Beyonce and Wendy were to battle it out, we think Yonce would have an unfair advantage.”
“After all, the “Run The World” singer has 20 Grammy Awards, and has been on the music scene for over a decade.”


"Tell us next!"
"Hollywood actresses, do you think Beyonce should challenge Wendy Williams' top song?"
"Wendy Williams should certainly think twice before he comes to find Beyonce, 36."
"On February 20, when she heard that Wendy's singing skills were successful, Queen Bei was ready to clarify the truth."
"If Beyonce was really worried about what Wendy Williams said, then Beyonce would not be Beyonce."
"She can't nag at all."
"She had to laugh it off."
"But if Wendy wants to put money on her lips, she will welcome two people to sing a song to let everyone know who can really sing and who is just a big bag of hot air! A source close to Shelley said, "Hollywood life is exclusive."
"If Beyonce and Wendy fight to the death, we think Eugene will have an unfair advantage."
"After all, the world-wide singer has 20 Grammy Awards and has been in the music industry for more than a decade."



Number  1283
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Now that she's back with Justin that weight has lifted, she just seems very light and joyful."”
“?”
“The two had been inseparable even since Selena, 25, broke up with The weeknd, 27, and jumped right into the arms of her on-and-off guy, Justin Bieber, 23.”
“But this Thanksgiving saw the Wolves singer in Texas, spending quality time with her family, without Justin.”
“Also read: Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber heating up their PDA game, share an intimate kissSpeculations surfaced on the internet about things hitting a rough patch, but in recent news, photos of Justin playing hockey with several high-school kids have just been revealed.”
“The Sorry singer was all smiles, even though Selena wasn't there to cheer him on, unlike previous times.”
“Justin is known for his fondness for the game, and this time his entourage reportedly called up the coach to see if he could join the Canadian team for practice.”
“Of course, Biebs didn't stop at just that as he also sported full gear, in an official Whistler 'A1' Winterhawks jersey.”
“As for Selena, she spent the time apart from her beau, with her family and closed ones in the Lone Star state on November 21.”
“She kept fans and followers in the loop by posting adorable snaps and video clips on her Instagram story.”


"Now she's back together with Justin, she's losing weight, and she looks very relaxed and happy."
“?”
"Serena, 25, and Justin Bieber, 27, have been inseparable ever since they broke up at the weekend, jumping straight into the arms of their interrupted 23-year-old boyfriend
"But this Thanksgiving, wolves singers have a good time with their families in Texas, without Justin."
"I also read: Selena Gomez and Justin Bieber warm up for handheld computer games, share intimate kisses, and there are some speculations on the Internet about the ups and downs of things, but in recent news, photos of Justin and several high school students playing hockey have just been exposed."
"The sad singer is smiling, even though Selena is not there to cheer him on, not like before."
"Justin is known for his love of the game and it is reported that this time his entourage called the coach to see if he can join the Canadian team for training."
"Of course, Bibbs didn't stop there, because he was fully armed and wearing the official Whistler 'A1' winter hawks Jersey."
"As for Serena, she left her boyfriend on November 21 to be with her family and the closed family in lone star state."
"She keeps fans and followers in touch by posting cute snapshots and videos on instagram."



Number  1284
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The way I am portrayed by the media is simply a reflection of how we see and portray women in general, measured against some warped standard of beauty.”[Featured Image by Mark Davis/Getty Images]”
“The tabloid claims that the couple had a “miserable night out” while at Bloom’s 40th in Palm Springs.”
“Even an open letter in the Huffington Post pleading that the tabloids stop reporting false stories about her and her marriage has not managed to take tabloid focus off the star.”
“Although the pregnancy rumors have halted since Jen penned the letter in the publication she remains the subject of falsities about her marriage and has recently admitted that she feels although the essay did make media members more aware of the affects such falsities have on celebrities and the manner...”
“...that women are discussed in the media that it did little to halt the fabricated tales from making the front page about she and other female figures in the spotlight...”
“The beauty spoke with Variety recently on the topic as Vanity Fair relays.”
““I had no idea it would get the response that it did; I was thrilled with that.”
“But sadly, people still buy into it.”
“They are consumers of this trash and they eat it up.”
“It’s definitely in people’s consciousness a lot more.”


"The media's description of me only reflects our views and portrayals of women, compared with some distorted standards of beauty."
The tabloid claimed that the couple spent a "tragic night" at Palm Springs' bloom 40th anniversary
"Even an open letter from the Huffington Post begged the tabloids to stop reporting false stories about her and her marriage, but it didn't take the tabloids' focus away from the stars."
"Although the rumor of pregnancy has stopped since Jennifer wrote this letter in a publication, she is still the subject of lies about her marriage. Recently, she admitted that although this article does make members of the media more aware of the impact of these lies on celebrities and ways..."
“…… The media's discussion of women has not prevented the fabricated stories about her and other female characters from appearing on the front page and becoming the focus of the spotlight... "
"When Vanity Fair relay reported recently, this beautiful woman made all kinds of comments on this topic."
"I didn't know it would get such a response; I'm excited about that."
"But unfortunately, people still believe that."
"They are consumers of this rubbish, they eat it up."
"It must be more in people's minds."



Number  1285
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kim and Kanye are really divorcing?”
“Kim’s allegedly ready to divorce Kanye!”
“What happened?”
“This is so sad!”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, is reportedly at her wits end when it comes to dealing with husband Kanye West, 40.”
“She’s struggled since Kanye’s terrifying November 2016 breakdown, and she reportedly can’t see a light at the end of the tunnel, according to an insider who spoke to Star Magazine.”
““Between his raging ego and mood swings, Kanye has been a total train wreck,” the insider alleged to the Star.”
““Kim is stressed enough raising two kids and getting ready for the baby without Kanye dragging her down.”
“She’s tried to hang in there, but she just can’t take it anymore.”Poor Kim!”


"Let us know!"
"Hollywood stars, do you think Kim and kenye are really divorced?"
"Kim is said to be ready to divorce kenye!"
"What's the matter?"
"That's pathetic!"
"Kim Kardashian, 37, is reported to be at a loss when dealing with her husband Kanye West, 40."
"Kanye has been struggling since her terrible collapse in November 2016, and it is reported that she can't see a light at the end of the tunnel, according to an insider interviewed by star magazine."
"Between his violent ego and mood swings, Kanye is a complete train wrecker," the insider told the star
"Kim is under a lot of pressure in raising two children and preparing for them, not Kanye."
"She tried to hold on, but she couldn't stand it any more." Poor Kim



Number  1286
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I am also so thankful to the fans that have supported me and continue to do so.”HollywoodLifers, are you shocked over the allegations against Danny Masterson?”
“And, as we previously reported, the news shocked Kunis as well.”
“Masterson has since been fired from Netflix’s ‘The Ranch’.”
“Ashton Kutcher, 39, is still processing the numerous rape allegations that have been made against his friend and The Ranch co-star Danny Masterson, 41.”
“Masterson has since been fired by Netflix from the show in which he and Kutcher both work on.”
““Ashton has been rocked by the firing of his friend Danny,” a source close to Kutcher tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““He doesn’t want to believe any of the accusations against his longtime friend, but he does hope the truth will come out.” However, Kutcher knew he had to do what was best for everyone involved.”
““As one of the executives on the show, Ashton is agreeing to swift action being taken.”
“He is trying to protect the show and jobs of others working on the project.”
“He just feels horrible about the whole situation.” Kutcher has yet to release an official statement following the allegations of misconduct against Masterson.”


"I am also very grateful to the fans who support me and continue to support me Hollywood stars, are you shocked by the charges of Denny Masterson? "
"And, as we've reported before, it's a shock to Kunis."
"After that, Masterson was fired by Netflix's ranch."
"Ashton Kutcher, 39, is still dealing with numerous rape charges against his friend and co star of ranch, 41 year old Danny Masterson."
"After that, Masterson was fired by Netflix from the show he and Kutcher were involved in."
"Ashton has been fired by his friend Denny," a source close to Kutcher told reporters
"He doesn't want to believe any charges against his old friend, but he does want the truth to come out." However, Kutcher knows he has to do the best for all concerned
"As one of the show's executives, Ashton agreed to act quickly."
"He tried to protect the work of the show and other people involved in the project."
"He just thought the whole situation was bad." Kutcher has yet to make an official statement after accusing Masterson of misconduct



Number  1287
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I’m okay with it.””
“Chmerkovskiy’s DWTS partner, Heather Morris, initially broke the news during a Tuesday appearance on Good Morning America following her Monday night elimination, revealing that Chmerkovskiy could not do the interview with her because of the alleged incident.”
“Shai Aleksander are all okay after an intruder attempted to break into their Los Angeles home...”
“PEOPLE confirmed that Los Angeles police responded to a “civil dispute” on Tuesday morning at the home of the Dancing with the Stars pros after a man tried to break into the property.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Early this morning, there was a trespasser who attempted to break into our home,” Chmerkovskiy, 37, tells PEOPLE.”
““The LAPD responded and my family and I are all okay.”A source tells PEOPLE that a man claiming to own the couple’s rental property tried to get into the residence Monday night.”
“The insider adds that police arrived to peacefully sort out the situation.”
“Image zoom Credit: Stefania Orru/All Things Fam & GlamThe couple’s 3-month-old son, Shai, was in the home at the time.”
“An LAPD spokesman described the incident as a civil dispute telling PEOPLE that officers responded to the 1500 block of Sunset Plaza Drive between 1 30 and 2 a m but made no arrests because there was no crime A police spokeswoman tells PEOPLE that officers suggested that all parties...”


"I don't mind."
"Heather Morris, Mr. chimmelkovsky's DWTS partner, revealed this on Tuesday's" Good Morning America "program after being eliminated on Monday night, and revealed that Mr. chimmelkovsky could not be interviewed because of the so-called incident."
"After an intruder tried to break into their home in Los Angeles, Shay Aleksander was all right..."
"It has been confirmed that Los Angeles police responded to a" civil dispute "at the home of a professional dancer with a star on Tuesday morning after a man tried to break into the property."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Early this morning, an intruder tried to break into our house," zimmerkovsky, 37, told people
"LAPD responded. My family and I are OK." A source told people that on Monday night, a man who claimed to own the couple's rental property tried to enter the house
"The person familiar with the matter added that the police are here to solve the problem peacefully."
"Thanks to the image zooming: the three month old son of Stefania orru / all things fam & glamt, Shai, was at home."
"A spokesman for the Los Angeles Police Department described the incident as a civil dispute. He told people that the police responded to 1500 blocks of sunset square Avenue between 1:30 a.m. and 2:00 a.m., but did not arrest anyone because there was no crime. A police spokesman told people that the police suggested that all parties... "



Number  1288
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““The way things are going, who knows if there will be a third season?” the Closer source said.”
“After quickly becoming a favorite of both critics and TV viewers, and winning a slew of prestigious awards, HBO announced in December that it would air a second season of the drama, slated to premiere sometime in 2019.”
“There’s a feud brewing behind-the-scenes on the Season 2 set of the HBO series, Big Little Lies, and it’s between two much-adored actresses.”
“An insider told Closer Weekly that original series star Nicole Kidman and show newcomer Meryl Streep are just not getting along, and it is affecting everyone working on the project.”
“Even though the series leads, Kidman, Reese Witherspoon, Shailene Woodley, Zoë Kravitz, and Laura Dern, have consistently promoted female power throughout the promotion of the series and awards season, it seems as if jealousy may still be rearing its ugly head.”
““Nicole feels she’s the star of the show and is threatened by Meryl,” the source revealed to Closer.”
““Meryl’s picked up on it and the two have really gotten into it….”
“[They had] an epic falling-out.”Kidman, 50, won multiple awards for her portrayal of Big Little Lies‘ Celeste Wright, including an Emmy, a Golden Globe, and a Screen Actors Guild award.”
“She has only one Oscar though, which was for her role in The Hours.”
“Meanwhile, 58-year-old Streep is highly revered in Hollywood and has been nominated for an Oscar an outstanding 21 times, with three total wins.”


"Now, who knows if there will be a third season? "A more recent source said
"After quickly becoming a favorite of critics and TV viewers and winning a series of prestigious awards, HBO announced in December that it would broadcast the second season of the play, which is scheduled to premiere sometime in 2019."
"Behind the scenes of the second season of HBO series, there is a grudge, big and small lies, which is between two adored actresses."
"An insider told closer weekly that the original series Star Nicole Kidman and rookie Meryl Streep didn't get along well, which affected everyone involved in the project."
"Although Kidman, Reese Witherspoon, Shireen Woodley, Zoe Kravitz and Laura Dean have been promoting women's rights throughout the series and the awards season, jealousy seems to be on the rise."
"Nicole feels like the star of the show, threatened by Meryl," the source told closer
"Meryl found out about it, and they really got into it..."
Kidman, 50, has won many awards for her role as Celeste Wright in the big lie, including an Emmy, a golden globe and a Screen Actors Guild Award
"But she has only one Oscar, and that's her role in the hours."
Meanwhile, 58 year old Streep is highly respected in Hollywood. He has been nominated for 21 Oscars and won three awards



Number  1289
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Comment below with your thoughts.”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — Are you concerned that the end of Kimye is near?”
“Are Kim Kardashian and Kanye West headed for splitsville?”
“A new report claims that there is definitely trouble in paradise, and the couple are even sleeping in different beds.”
“Kim Kardashian, 35, could be preparing to divorce for a third time.”
“After her husband, Kanye West, 38, had a number of different outbursts on social media, a new report says that Kim — and her family — have had enough and are ready to cut the cord.”
“Yikes!”
““Kim is at a loss,” a family insider shared with OK!”
“Magazine inside their March 21 issue.”
“Of course, the insider is talking about Kim’s relationship with Kanye, and how it’s allegedly falling apart at the seams due to his reckless behavior on social media and at Saturday Night Live.”


"Comment below with your thoughts."
"Tell us, Hollywood - are you worried about the end of the golden leaf?"
"Are Kim Kardashian and Kanye West going to springsville?"
"A new report says there must be trouble in heaven, and the couple even sleep in different beds."
"Kim Kardashian, 35, may be preparing for a third divorce."
"After her husband Kanye West, 38, broke into a series of different emotions on social media, a new report says Kim and her family have had enough and are ready to cut the umbilical cord."
"Oh dear!"
"Kim is at a loss," a family insider shares with OK
"March 21 issue."
"Of course, the insider is talking about Kim Jong Un's relationship with kenno and the breakdown of the relationship caused by Kim Jong Un's reckless behavior on social media and live on Saturday night."



Number  1290
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So long as Markle is healthy (and she's got a fiancé and a royal family to look out for her there), it's no one's business what size she'll be wearing.”
“Nonetheless, Star reported that an "insider" claims she has "lost a shocking amount of weight in just the last two weeks" and that she "seems obsessed with losing even more before the big day."”
“But tabloids are accusing Meghan Markle of starving herself for the royal wedding, and it's hugely problematic.”
“According to Star, Markle is a "shadow of her former self," and she "caused a stir" when she attended an Invictus Games reception with Prince Harry last month because she "couldn’t hide her frail frame and pin-thin legs."”
“Now, the tabloid reported, that she's "wasting away" and friends and family are "fretting" that she's "starving herself into emaciation."”
“The fact is that many women work out and change up their diets to feel their healthiest before their nuptials.”
“And this is nothing new.”
“A 2007 Cornell University study found that 70 percent of 272 engaged women said they wanted to lose weight — typically 20 pounds, according to The New York Times.”
“In the two months of fittings before most clients’ weddings at Kleinfeld Bridal in New York, for example, one seamstress told The New York Times that she's kept busy taking in gowns.”
“That's because brides-to-be say, “I don’t want the size 16; I want the 14 or the 12,’" Jennette Kruszka, Kleinfeld’s marketing director, reportedly told the outlet in 2007.”


"As long as markel is in good health (she has a fiance and royal family to take care of her), no matter what size she wears."
Still, according to the star, an "insider" said she "has lost an amazing amount of weight in the past two weeks" and that she "seems obsessed with losing more weight before the big day"
"But the tabloids accused Megan markel of starving herself for the royal wedding, which is a big problem."
According to the star, markel is "the shadow of the past". Last month, she attended an invitational reception with Prince Harry, which caused a "big stir" because she "couldn't hide her weak body and slender legs."
"Now, the tabloid reports that she is" losing weight "and that her friends and family are" worrying "about her" starving to become thin "
"In fact, many women exercise and change their eating habits before marriage to feel the healthiest."
"It's nothing new."
A 2007 Cornell University study found that 70 percent of 272 engaged women said they wanted to lose weight, usually 20 pounds, the New York Times reported
For example, in the two months before the wedding of most clients in Kleinfeld, New York, a seamstress told the New York Times that she had been busy dressing up
"It's because brides to be will say, 'I don't want the size 16, I want the size 14 or 12,'" Jennette kruszka, Kleinfeld's marketing director, told the media in 2007, according to reports



Number  1291
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Any statement or implication to the contrary is false.””
“...has directly impacted the women accusing Masterson of rape...”
“Shelton said Scientologists use an “internal justice system” that utilizes fear mongering to stop alleged sexual assault victims from going to the police.”
“Shelton said he saw similar practices during his time as a member of the church.”
“Ortega, a journalist who has dedicated his time to investigating the Church of Scientology, claimed members of the church are threatened with being ostracized from the tight-knit community if they go to authorities with sexual assault allegations.”
“"That is how Scientology handled sexual assault,” he added.”
“Citing inside knowledge of the church, he alleged Scientology leaders asked the accuser to undergo “intensive counseling from May to December 2003, going back into her past lives to find out what evil thing she did then to cause this now.”
““For example, one of Masterson’s accusers … went to the church in 2003 to report the incident,” Ortega claimed.”
“It creates an us versus them mentality and tells members that wogs at law enforcement won t protect them Tony Ortega editor of The Underground Bunker told Fox News Scientologists are not allowed to file a lawsuit against another Scientologist or report another Scientologist to the authorities Ortega said this...”
“Ortega said one of Masterson’s accusers was “brutally interrogated” by a senior member of the organization.”


"Any statement or implication to the contrary is false."
“…… Directly affected the women who accused Masterson of rape... "
Sheldon said Scientology uses an "internal justice system" that uses fear mongering to prevent suspected victims of sexual assault from reporting to the police
"Sheldon said he saw similar practices as a member of the church."
"Ortega, a journalist working on the investigation of the Church of Scientology, claims that if members of the church file sexual assault charges with the authorities, they will face the threat of being excluded from their closely connected communities."
"That's how Scientology deals with sexual assault," he added
Citing inside information from the church, he claimed that Scientology leaders asked the plaintiff to "receive intensive psychological counseling from May to December 2003, return to her past life and find out what evil things she did at that time led to the present situation."
Ortega claimed: "for example, a plaintiff in Masterson In 2003, he went to the church to report the case. "
"It creates a" we fight them "mentality, telling members that law enforcement staff won't protect their underground bunker editor Tony Ortega told Fox News that Scientologists can't sue another Scientologist or report another Scientologist to the authorities," Ortega said
Ortega said one of Masterson's plaintiffs was "brutally tried" by a senior member of the group



Number  1292
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“See the full post from Iggy confirming that she isn't dating Odell Beckham Jr. below.”
“"That sh*t you say for fun & games really effects [sic] peoples real relationships."”
“...she concludes.”
“"Keep my name out of your fanfiction, Soap opera, bored housewives b*llshit - Please!"”
“The "Switch" entertainer then attacks those that have been provoking the rumors and adding fuels to them, telling people to keep her name out of their mouths and narratives.”
“"I can't sit back and let you all drag my name in the mud talking about how I'm someone's f*ck friend, when Ive done [nothing] but mind my business."”
“...in a way that s got me losing sleep she continued...”
“I try my best to stay quiet and not let the things I see written throw me off but today this sh t is taking a toll on my REAL PRIVATE LIFE and the people in it I care about...”
“"We weren't dating back in May and we're not dating now!”
“"Stop trying to make me and Odell a thing," she writes.”


"Please see the following full post of Yiji confirming that she didn't date Xiaobei."
"The entertainment and games you're talking about really affect people's real relationships."
“…… She concluded
"Don't let my name appear in your fan novels, soap operas, boring housewives, please!"
"The" changed "artist then attacked those who provoked rumors and embellished them, telling people not to put her name in their mouths and narratives."
"I can't wait to die, let you all drag my name into the mud, talk about that I am a good friend of others, and I do nothing but mind my own business."
“… To some extent, it made me sleepless, she continued
"I try to keep quiet. What I don't want to see throws me away, but today it's done harm to my real private life and people I care about..."
"We didn't date in May, and we don't date now!"
"Stop taking odel and me seriously," she wrote



Number  1293
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...on the cheek...”
“Image zoom Kim Kardashian West Credit Kim Kardashian Twitter RELATED Kim Kardashian Forces Tristan Thompson to Unblock Her on Instagram as They Mark Khloé s Birthday Earlier on Wednesday the reality star also shared adorable videos of her 2 year old son Saint kissing his little sister Chicago 5 months...”
“And while her first attempts were unsuccessful, Kardashian West proved she’s not one to give up easily as she eventually managed to surf the water for several seconds.”
“!” she wrote alongside the action-filled clips.”
““This is way harder than it looks!!”
“The KKW Beauty mogul tried to get her balance as she was pulled on a wakeboard behind a boat.”
“Naturally, she documented the entire thing on social media.”
“...which Kardashian West described as being just a little slice of heaven the mother of three tried her hand at wakeboarding for the first time...”
“They were happy and very friendly the insider continued adding that the couple and their friends ordered a lot of good food and seemed to enjoy it all Image zoom Kanye West and Kim Kardashian West Credit Stephane Cardinale Corbis Getty While vacationing at a lakeside destination over Independence Day...”
““They arrived with a small group of friends.”


“… On the cheek... "
"Picture zooming Kim kardashan West credit Kim kardashan twitter related Kim kardashan forces Tristan Thompson unlocked her on instagram as they celebrated khlo é's birthday earlier on Wednesday. The reality show star also shared a lovely video of her 2-year-old son Saint kissing his sister Chicago for 5 months..."
"Although her first attempt was unsuccessful, Kardashian West proved that she was not a person to give up easily, because she finally succeeded in surfing the water for a few seconds."
"!" she wrote next to the action filled footage. "
"It's much harder than it looks!"
"The kkw beauty tycoon tried to keep her balance because she was pulled onto a tailboard at the back of a boat."
"Naturally, she recorded the whole thing on social media."
“…… Kardashian West described it as a piece of Paradise - a mother of three trying to skate for the first time... "
"They are very happy and friendly. The couple and their friends ordered a lot of delicious food and both seemed to enjoy it, people familiar with the matter added. This is a picture of Kahn West and Kim Kardashian West during independence day, a holiday at a lakeside destination
"They came with a small group of friends."



Number  1294
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““But Kelly and Ryan certainly are!””
““The folks at ‘Today’ aren’t thrilled with those numbers,” a source spills.”
“Instead, her ratings have dropped 28 percent from last year!”
“Insiders say Megyn originally set her sights on taking Kelly and Ryan down.”
““They’re celebrating like crazy!”The triumph was especially sweet for Kelly, since she believed Megyn used a guest-hosting gig on “Live” to help her land the “Today” job.”
““This is a complete and utter victory for Kelly and Ryan,” a source close to the syndicated talk show told The National ENQUIRER.”
““Live with Kelly and Ryan” has more than doubled its lead over the troubled “Today Show” since Megyn took over the 9 o’clock hour in September.”
“Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest are turning cartwheels over crushing Megyn Kelly in the ratings!”


"But Kelly and Ryan must be!"
"Today's audience are not excited about these figures," a source said
"On the contrary, her ratings are 28% lower than last year!"
"Insiders say Megan's original goal was to bring down Kelly and Ryan."
"They're celebrating crazily! Kelly's victory was especially sweet because she believed Megan used a guest concert to help her get the job of today
"It's a complete victory for Kelly and Ryan," a source close to the joint talk show told the national inquirer
"Living with Kelly and Ryan" has more than doubled its lead over the troubled "Today Show" since Megan took over the 9 o'clock show in September
"Kelly Ripa and Ryan Seacrest are crushing Megan Kelly in ratings!"



Number  1295
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He will be missed by his Live Nation and Roc Nation family.”
“He and Maroon 5’s Levine were friends from childhood and Feldstein managed Maroon 5 from their inception, guiding the band as they became one of music’s most successful and universally popular international touring acts with three Grammy Awards and 20 million albums sold worldwide.”
“He was 40.”
“The cause of death was a heart attack, according to the Feldstein family.”
“The Los Angeles County coroner confirmed Feldstein’s death.”
“Feldstein founded management company Career Artist Management (CAM), which was based out of the Live Nation offices in Beverly Hills.”
“In addition to Maroon 5, the CAM roster includes Miguel, Elle King and Robin Thicke, among others.”
“Feldstein negotiated Maroon 5’s Adam Levine’s coach role on NBC’s “The Voice.”Feldstein got his start in the industry working for ICM and Bill Leopold Management.”
“He is a father to two children and was previously married twice, once to Francesca Eastwood in 2013, the daughter of Clint Eastwood.”
“Jordan was a gifted manager whose artists benefited greatly from his guidance and talents.”


"He will be remembered by his living nation and the family of the Republic of China."
"He and Levine of maroon 5 have been friends since childhood. Feldstein has been managing maroon 5 from the beginning, leading the band to become one of the most successful and popular international tours in the music industry, winning three Grammy Awards and selling 20 million copies worldwide."
"He was 40 years old."
"According to the Feldstein family, the cause of death was a heart attack."
"The Los Angeles County coroner confirmed Feldstein's death."
Feldstein founded the management company professional artist management (CAM), which is headquartered in the live nation office in Beverly Hills
"In addition to maroon 5, the list of Macau International Airport franchise Co., Ltd. also includes Miguel, Al king and Robin hick."
Feldstein is in talks with the coach of Adam Levine of maroon 5 on NBC's "the voice.". Feldstein started out in the industry working for ICM and bill Leopold management
"He's a father of two and has been married twice before, once to Francesca Eastwood, Clint Eastwood's daughter, in 2013."
"Jordan is a talented manager, and his guidance and talent have benefited his artists a lot."



Number  1296
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments!”
““Since then he’s been bombarding her with calls and flowers.”
“The emotional track makes it very clear that he’s missing his ex big time.”
“So, is he going hard to get her back?”
“Here’s what we know!”
“Katy Perry, 32, and John Mayer, 39, had a very intense — and tumultuous — relationship.”
“They dated on and off from August 2012 until they finally split for good in 2015.”
“Katy moved on to Orlando Bloom, 40, and it seemed like John was history.”
“But a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY that John has never given up on winning her back.”
““John was practically jumping for joy when he found out about her breakup with Orlando,” says our source.”


"Please let us know in the comments!"
"Since then, he's been bombing her with phones and flowers."
"The emotional trajectory is very clear that he missed his pre era."
"Is it hard for him to get her back, then?"
"We know that!"
"The relationship between Katie Perry, 32, and John Meyer, 39, is very tense and chaotic."
"They dated intermittently from August 2012 until they finally broke up in 2015."
"Katie moved to Orlando Bloom, 40, and John seems to be history."
But it is reported that John never gave up to win her back
"John was ecstatic when he found out that she had broken up with Orlando," our source said



Number  1297
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Couple During Met Gala Date Night Exclusive This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors...”
“RELATED CONTENT David Foster and Katharine McPhee Are Engaged Katharine McPhee and David Foster Make Met Gala Debut as a Couple With a Nice Date Night Exclusive David Foster and Katharine McPhee Can t Keep Their Hands Off Each Other in Paris Katharine McPhee and David Foster Make a Stunning...”
“Hear more on their love story in the video below.”
“The two were first linked together last May, and by December of 2017, they couldn't seem to keep their hands off each other during a PDA-packed trip to Paris, France.”
“A rep for Foster confirmed to ET earlier Tuesday that he proposed to McPhee while the two were vacationing in Europe.”
“She also seemingly addressed the news on Twitter, sharing a gif of Ariana Grande (who recently got engaged to Saturday Night Live star Pete Davidson) accompanied with a ring emoji.”
“While McPhee has yet to publicly share a photo of the engagement ring the 68-year-old musician proposed to her with, Eng (who has seemingly seen a sneak peek of it) described it as "beautiful" and "classic."”
“And in the end he spared me."”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"Exclusive video on dating night of lovers' blind date party is not available because we can't load sponsor's message..."
"David Foster and Katherine McPhee are engaged. Katherine McPhee and David Foster make their debut at the metropolitan party as a couple. On a wonderful date night, they have exclusive coverage of David Foster and Katherine McPhee in Paris. Katherine McPhee and David Foster are amazing..."
"Please learn more about their love story in the video below."
"The two were first connected in May last year, and by December 2017, they seemed to have no choice but to intervene in a full PDA tour of Paris, France."
"A representative of foster confirmed to et earlier Tuesday that he proposed to McPhee while they were on holiday in Europe."
"She also seems to have posted the news on twitter, sharing a GIF photo of Ariana Grande (recently engaged to Saturday night life star Pete Davidson) with a ring emoticon."
Although McPhee hasn't publicly shared a picture of the engagement ring the 68 year old musician proposed to her, Engel (who seems to have seen a peeper) described the ring as "beautiful" and "classic."
"At last he spared me."



Number  1298
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Slideshow continues on the next slide5/5 SLIDES © Jordan Strauss/Invision/AP Ellen DeGeneres, Portia De Rossi marriage at a breaking point Microsoft and partners may be compensated if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“4/5 SLIDES © Getty Images Robert Pattinson and Emma Watson are dating Microsoft and partners may be compensated if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“3/5 SLIDES © Andy Kropa/Invision/AP Kim Kardashian, Kanye West $1 billion divorce announcement Microsoft and partners may be compensated if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“2/5 SLIDES © Evan Agostini/Invision/AP Brad Pitt begging Angelina Jolie to let him spend Christmas with kids Microsoft and partners may be compensated if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”
“1/5 SLIDES © AP Photo/Matt Dunham Prince Harry, Meghan Markle have fight over prenup Microsoft and partners may be compensated if you purchase something through recommended links in this article.”


"Next slide continue with 5 / 5 slides} Jordan Strauss / invasion / AP Ellen DeGeneres, Portia de Rossi marriage is at the point of breakdown. If you buy something through the recommended links in this article, Microsoft and partners may be compensated."
"4 / 5 slides} Getty Images Robert Pattinson and Emma Watson are dating Microsoft, and if you buy something through the recommended links in this article, the partner may be compensated."
"3 / 5 slides} Andy kropa / invasion / AP Kim Kardashian, Kanye West $1 billion divorce statement if you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft and its partners may be compensated."
"2 / 5 slides} Evan Agostini / invision / AP Brad Pitt pleads with Angelina Jolie to let him spend Christmas with his children. If you buy something through the links recommended in this article, Microsoft and its partners may be compensated."
"1 / 5 slide} Associated Press Photo / if you buy something through the link recommended in this article, Microsoft and partners may be compensated for a dispute between Prince Matt Dunham Harry and Megan markel over a prenuptial agreement."



Number  1299
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...issue of Us Weekly on stands Wednesday April 11”
“A source told Us in February that the parents of Maddox 16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and twins Knox and Vivienne 9 are trying to keep the case private and they want things to be amicable For more on Pitt and Oxman s romance pick up the new...”
“Meanwhile, the actor-director and Jolie, 42, are still working out the details of their divorce settlement.”
“Though a second Pitt source claims “this is solely a professional relationship [and] there’s nothing more to it as of now,” the first insider calls that story a cover-up: “They are very much a couple.” Page Six was first to report news of their romance.”
“(The professor was a featured speaker at the event.)”
““Brad and Neri have traveled together internationally on several occasions,” the source reveals, noting that the new couple went to the Design Indaba conference in South Africa in February.”
““He’s been going to great lengths to make sure he’s not spotted by prying eyes.”Still, that hasn’t stopped Pitt and Oxman from taking secret trips.”
““They got romantically involved almost right away,” the insider tells Us.”
“Oxman is the first person to whom Pitt has been linked since his headline-making split from Angelina Jolie in September 2016.”
“Lab...”


“… Us weekly Wednesday, April 11
"A source told us in February that the parents of Maddox 16 Pax 14 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11 and twins Knox and Vivienne 9 are trying to keep the case secret. They want things to be friendly so that they can learn more about Peter and Oxman's romance and take up new ones..."
Meanwhile, the actor and director and Julie, 42, are still working on the details of the divorce agreement
"Although another Pete source claimed that" it's just a professional relationship and nothing so far, "the first person familiar with the matter said the report was a cover up:" they are a very close couple. " Page six is the first person to report their romance
The professor is the guest speaker of the event
"Brad and Neri have traveled internationally many times," the source said. The couple attended the Indaba design conference in South Africa in February
"He's done his best to make sure he's not seen by prying eyes." Still, it didn't stop Pitt and Oxman from traveling secretly
"They fell in love almost immediately," people familiar with the matter told us
"Oxman is the first person Pitt has been associated with since breaking up with Angelina Jolie in September 2016."
"Laboratory..."



Number  1300
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'Since they got back together, he hasn’t given her any reason to worry — so she’s not going to.'”
“He’s promised her that she’s the only one, and she believes him,' a source told HollywoodLife.”
“Justin Bieber 'has asked on-again girlfriend Selena Gomez to move into his LA party pad'They've been spending most of their spare time together.”
“And if the reports are true, Justin Bieber, 20, is keen on taking his relationship with Selena Gomez, 22, to the next level.”
“'Selena and Justin are a hundred percent together right now, he’s asked her to move in with him and she couldn’t be happier,' an insider revealed to HollywoodLife.com on Thursday.”
“Scroll down for videoTaking the next step?”
“Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez are reported to be moving in togetherBut with their rocky history, the Come & Get It hitmaker is making sure she covers her bases.”
“'She’s still being cautious, she’s not going to give up her place, that way if anything goes wrong or if she decides she needs some space, she’ll have her own spot to go to.”
“'But, officially she’s going to be living with him.”
“It’s a huge step.'”


"He hasn't given her any reason to worry since they got back together, so she won't worry."
"He assured her that she was the only one and that she believed in him," a source told Hollywood life
"Justin Bieber" invites his girlfriend Selena Gomez to move into his Los Angeles party apartment again. "They spend most of their spare time together."
"If these reports are true, Justin Bieber, 20, is keen to take his relationship with Selena Gomez, 22, to a new level."
"Serena and Justin are 100 percent together now, and she can't be happier if he lets her live with him," a person familiar with the matter told reporters
"Scroll down to see the video, and then go to the next step?"
"It's reported that Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez will move together, but because of their unstable history, the elated killer is making sure she can protect her base."
"She's still very cautious and won't give up her position, so if something goes wrong or she decides she needs some space, she'll have a place to go."
"But, officially, she's going to live with him."
"It's a big step."



Number  1301
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CAPTIVE will reveal the steps Catherine has taken to extract her daughter from what she considers a “dangerous, mind-controlling cult” in which she claims the women are treated like “slaves.” She also draws on interviews from former members and cult experts.”
“NXIVM has been around for 20 years, with approximately 16,000 people paying thousands of dollars for experiences like executive-coaching workshops.”
“...to share her story with the hope it can also help others...”
“Her memoir CAPTIVE A Mother s Crusade to Save Her Daughter From a Terrifying Cult cowritten by PEOPLE contributor Natasha Stoynoff will be released in Fall and will recount Catherine s estrangement from her 26 year old daughter India and her attempt to rescue her from what she believes is...”
“...a dangerous group...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I was completely ignorant about these sorts of the dangers and traps associated with these so-called personal growth self help groups.”
“It’s an $11 billion, completely unregulated industry, so I reached out to a lot of experts for guidance,” Catherine tells PEOPLE.”
““What I learned along the way could help others [and] prevent them from falling into the same trap, know what warning signs to look for, and also to give hope to those parents that are struggling and who have lost children to similar situations.”
““So many people reached out to me when I went public saying, ‘Oh my God, I’m in the same situation.”


Capture will reveal Catherine's steps to free her daughter from what she considers a "dangerous, mind controlling cult." she claims that these women are treated as "slaves.". She also used interviews with former members and cult experts
"Nxivm is 20 years old, with about 16000 people paying thousands of dollars for executive training courses and other experiences."
“… Share her story in the hope that it will help others as well... "
"Her memoir captures a mother's Crusade to save her daughter from a terrible cult, which will be released in the fall by people's writer Natasha stoynov, and will tell about Catherine's estrangement from her 26 year old daughter India and her attempts to save her from what she considers to be..."
“… A dangerous group... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"I know nothing about the dangers and pitfalls of these so-called self-help groups for personal growth."
"It's a $11 billion, completely unregulated industry, so I contacted a lot of experts for guidance," Catherine told people
"What I've learned in the process can help others (and) prevent them from falling into the same trap, know what warning signs to look for, and bring hope to parents who are struggling and losing their children."
"When I appeared in public, so many people came to my aid and said," my God, I'm in the same situation. "



Number  1302
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“!” They’re such a precious family!”
“It’s textbook, and Kylie has been wearing Stormi’s swaddles around her shoulders and waist more often so that her scent can be transferred to it, and that has helped Stormi become extra calm once Travis wraps her in them.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how Travis Scott and Kylie Jenner put their baby to sleep!”
“For many, the most difficult part of being a new parent is knowing how to put your baby to sleep.”
“Luckily, Travis Scott, 25, and Kylie Jenner, 20, have found a solution to this common problem.”
““Kylie and Travis have been busting their behinds caring for their beautiful daughter, and believe it or not, they’ve lost a ton of sleep as well.”
“Stormi [Webster] is super energetic and getting her down is a bit challenging sometimes.”
“Travis has been a huge help and has a secret weapon of his own to get Stormi to calm down when it’s time for bed,” a source close to Kylie tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“And the “secret weapon” the source is referring isn’t complicated at all.”
““His swaddling game is on point!”


"!" they are such a precious family
"It's a textbook. Kelly often puts Tommy's swaddling clothes on her shoulders and waist so that her smell can be transferred to the swaddling clothes. Once Travis wraps her in the swaddling clothes, it makes Tommy very calm."
"We have exclusive details of how Travis Scott and Kelly Jenner put their kids to sleep!"
"For many people, the most difficult part of being a new parent is knowing how to get the baby to sleep."
"Fortunately, Travis Scott, 25, and Kelly Jenner, 20, have found a solution to this common problem."
"Kelly and Travis have been trying to take care of their beautiful daughter. Believe it or not, they lost a ton of sleep."
"Tommy (Webster) is full of energy and it's sometimes a bit challenging to get her down."
"Travis is a huge help, he has his own secret weapon, let Tommy calm down when it's time to go to bed," a source close to Kelly told Hollywood Life exclusive
"The source's" secret weapon "is not complicated at all."
"His swaddling game is right!"



Number  1303
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And we hope you can continue to count on us and his team for any information on Jim Carrey's work.We will keep you all updated as real news come.-- Click to comment this article...”
“...make this very clear It s fake news...”
“The worse is that these rumours even mention that Jim Carrey has taking drugs to get into character and they have went as far as to quote Jim Carrey That is an absolute lie A rep for the actor exclusively told the website Gossip Cop We at JCO want to...”
“...know category that have been surfacing online in the last months Rumours have started about a movie about the Psychedelic Drugs Philosopher Terence McKenna with Jim Carrey...”
“Web correspondent If you are a fan of any artist especially an actor there s three kinds of news you will find the good the bad and the we don t really care to know The news of this article are part of the we don t really care to...”
“...are absolutely false...”
“Home Recent News Fake News About Jim Carrey Starring In Terence McKenna Movie You are here NEWS Fake News About Jim Carrey Starring In Terence McKenna Movie Jim Carrey has not signed on to do a movie about Terence McKenna and any quotes attributed to him about experimenting with psychedelics...”


"We hope you can continue to rely on us and his team to get any information about Jim Carrey. We will keep you updated when the real news comes. --Click comment on this article
“… Make it clear that this is fake news... "
"What's worse, these rumors even refer to Jim Carrey taking drugs in order to get into the role. They even quote Jim Carrey, which is absolutely a lie. A representative of the actor told the gossip police website exclusively that our JCO hopes to... "
“…… In recent months, there have been rumors on the Internet about the movies of the psychedelic philosophers Terence McKenna and Jim Carey... "
"Network reporter, if you are a fan of any artist, especially the actor, there are three kinds of news that you will find good, bad and we don't want to know. The news of this article is part of what we don't want to know..."
“… Absolutely fake... "
"Homepage recent news fake news about Jim Carrey starring in Terence McKenna movies you're here news fake news about Jim Carrey starring in Terence McKenna movies Jim Carrey hasn't signed up to make a movie about Terence McKenna, and any quotes about his trial of psychedelic drugs..."



Number  1304
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it’s a bad sign that Rihanna didn’t bring Hassan to the Barbados?”
“As much as she’d love to have Hassan there, she doesn’t need him in order to have fun.”
“Rihanna is in Barbados this weekend for the Crop Over Festival, noticeably without boyfriend Hassan Jameel.”
“HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned why she left her man behind.”
“All of Rihanna‘s favorite things are packed into this weekend.”
“Her native country of Barbados, the Crop Over Festival, and dressing up in elaborate outfits.”
“The only thing missing is new boyfriend Hassan Jameel.”
“The ANTI-hitmaker, 29, “hasn’t invited him because she doesn’t want the pressure of having to look out for him and entertain him,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She just wants to let her hair down and relax with friends.”
“Attending the Crop Over festival is extremely important to Rihanna, she’s proud of her roots and loves to give back by bringing publicity to her homeland.”The girl is obviously fiercly independent.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think it's a bad omen that Rihanna didn't bring Hassan to Barbados?"
"Although she wanted Hassan to be there, she didn't need him to have fun."
"Rihanna is in Barbados for the crop Festival this weekend, obviously without her boyfriend Hassan Jamil."
"Hollywood life has fully understood why she left her man."
"Rihanna's favorite things are packed into this weekend."
"Barbados, her native country, harvests crops and wears fine clothes during festivals."
"The only thing missing is a new boyfriend, Hassan Jamil."
"The 29 year old anti assassin didn't invite him because she didn't want to be under pressure to take care of him and entertain him," a source said Exclusive to Hollywood life
"She just wanted to relax with her friends."
"It's very important for Rihanna to attend the crop Festival. She is proud of her roots and likes to give back by bringing publicity to her motherland." This girl is obviously very independent



Number  1305
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“(The only woman we can think of who may be more powerful than Her Majesty.)”
“Well sure, but that’s hardly evidence of a feud.”
“According to The Express, a group that calls itself the Scrap Mersey Tolls has changed the date of a previously scheduled demonstration in Cheshire in order to coincide with the royal visit on June 14th.”
“Anyway — back to the protest.”
“BFFs who can t get enough of hanging out and talking about their dogs...”
“People magazine has reported that Her Majesty wants to take a steadying hand with her new granddaughter in law to ensure the dignity of the monarchy remains intact but isn t it also possible that they unlikely duo are new...”
“...on their first ever sleepover so soon...”
“The rumour Protestors will greet the Queen and Meghan Markle on their first royal overnight trip Where you heard it The Express The report First of all can we just discuss the fact that Meghan and the Queen are going...”
“As for the alleged friction between Angie and Amal, that (probably false) narrative has been around for a while now, stemming from the fact that Brad Pitt got George in the divorce.”
“Is it plausible that Angelina is interested in meeting with the newly powerful Duchess of Sussex to discuss their shared passions for human rights and social justice?”


"(the only woman we can think of who is more powerful than her majesty.)
"Well, of course, but it's not evidence of discord."
"According to the express, an organization calling itself" Abolishing the Mersey toll "changed the date of the demonstration in Cheshire in order to cooperate with the royal family's visit on June 14."
"Anyway - back to the protests."
"Friends who hang out and talk about their dogs..."
"According to people magazine, her majesty wants to shake hands with her new granddaughter-in-law to ensure that the dignity of the monarchy is intact, but they may also be newcomers..."
“… After their first night so fast... "
"It's rumored that the protestors will pay their respects to the queen and Megan Marcel on their first royal night tour, where you hear the express report. First of all, can we discuss the fact that Megan and the queen are going..."
"As for the so-called friction between Angie and Amar, this (possibly wrong) argument has been around for some time because Brad Pitt got George in the divorce."
"Is it reasonable that Angelina is interested in meeting with the new Duchess of Sussex to discuss their common passion for human rights and social justice?"



Number  1306
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So that was a real conversation."”
“...about leaving me after TMZ”
“As Kanye recalled There was a moment where I felt like after TMZ maybe a week after that I felt like the energy levels were low and I called different family members and was asking you know Was Kim thinking...”
“In May, West sparked widespread backlash when he said slavery was a choice, a statement he also told the NYT was taken out of context.”
“In a new interview with The New York Times, the rapper revealed that he had a "real conversation" about the possibility of a divorce over controversial remarks he made during an unfiltered appearance on TMZ Live.”
“As recently as a month and a half ago, Kanye West had serious doubts about the future of his marriage to Kim Kardashian.”


"So it's a real conversation."
"About leaving me after TMZ"
"As Kanye recalled, there was a time when I felt that after TMZ, maybe a week later, I felt that my energy level was very low. I called different family members and asked if you knew what Kim was thinking..."
"In May this year, West said that slavery was an option, which triggered a broad backlash. He also told the New York Times that this was a clear verdict."
In a new interview with the New York Times, the rapper revealed that he had published a "real conversation" about the possibility of divorce on the unfiltered live TMZ show
"Just a month and a half ago, Kanye West had serious doubts about the future of her marriage to Kim Kardashian."



Number  1307
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““The teens didn’t care about Blake at all!”We pay for juicy info!”
““They were determined to see where the American princess once blended soft serve for tips,” said the onlooker.”
““The girls weren’t screaming for Blake — they were die-hard fans of Meghan Markle!” laughs an eyewitness, who points out that the supermarket is home to Humphrey Yogart, the fro-yo shop where Markle, 36, worked as a teen.”
“But the screeching gaggle skidded right past the musician without so much as a single selfie!”
“RadarOnline.com has learned Shelton, 41, recently was schlepping groceries at Gelson’s Market in Sherman Oaks, Calif., when a stampede of shrieking teenage girls came running toward him and his cart.”
“Blake Shelton may be a huge country star, but he’s not nearly as popular as future princess Meghan Markle!”
“Teens didn't care about the country superstar 'at all.'”
“Shelton Pushed Aside By Rabid Meghan Markle Fanatics!”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"The children don't care about black at all! "We pay for interesting information!"
"They were determined to see where the American Princess had mixed soft serve as a tip," bystanders said
"The girls aren't screaming for Blake - they're big fans of Megan Marcel! A witness said with a smile that the supermarket is the home of Humphrey yougart, where 36 year old markel worked as a teenager
"But there was a screeching rattle past the musician. There wasn't even a selfie!"
“ RadarOnline.com He learned that when Sheldon, 41, was recently shopping at the Gelson market in Sherman oak, California, a group of screaming girls ran towards him and his shopping cart
Blake Sheldon may be a huge country star, but he is far less popular than the future Princess Megan markel
"Teenagers don't care about country stars at all."
"Sheldon was pushed aside by the mad Megan markel fanatics!"



Number  1308
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““It’s kind of funny, so bizarre.”Robbie and Ackerley now have a year of marriage under their belt, but the actress insists that “nothing’s really changed.””
“A post shared by @margotrobbie on Dec 19, 2016 at 7:56pm PST“I’ve seen so many other people on Instagram announce their engagement that way now,” the actress told Vogue Australia.”
“The two later confirmed their nuptials with a sassy picture that was a hit on social media.”
“There is nothing more to it — I simply cannot wear it when I am in costume.”Robbie secretly married her husband, Tom Ackerley, last December in Australia.”
““If your character’s not married, it’s gonna look really weird if you have a wedding ring on.”
““When I’m at work, you can’t wear a wedding ring in costume,” the 27-year-old actress told “Extra” on Monday.”
“The actress dismissed silly speculation by saying the timing is all in the name of work.”
“Margot Robbie recently came under fire after telling Vogue Australia earlier this month that she only wears her wedding ring on weekends.”
“Every time a celebrity takes their wedding ring off, someone somewhere will write that it’s the end of so-and-so’s relationship.”
“Kevin Mazur via Getty Images Margot Robbie and her husband, Tom Ackerley, at the Time 100 Gala on April 25.”


"It's funny, it's weird." Robbie and Ackley have been married for a year now, but the actress insists that "nothing has changed."
"@ margotrobbie shared a post with PST at 7:56 p.m. on December 19, 2016." I saw a lot of people announce their engagement like this on instagram, "the actress told vogue Australia."
"The couple later confirmed their wedding with fashionable photos on social media."
Robbie secretly married her husband Tom Ackley in Australia last December
"If your character isn't married, if you're wearing a wedding ring, it's strange."
"When I'm at work, you can't wear a wedding dress and a wedding ring," the 27 year old actress told superfluous on Monday
"The actress refuted the foolish speculation that time is in the name of work."
"Margot Robbie told Australian Fashion earlier this month that she only wears wedding rings on weekends and has recently come under attack."
"Every time a celebrity takes off his wedding ring, someone will write down somewhere that this is the end of a so and so relationship."
On April 25, Kevin Mazur, through Getty Images, posed with Margot Robbie and his husband Tom ackerley at the time 100 party



Number  1309
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The youngsters appeared to be having the time of their lives as they got stuck into all the action.”
“(Image: Splash)She was accompanied by her son Mason, five, and daughter Penelope, three, as well as niece North West .”
“The mum-of-three - whose ex-boyfriend is believed to be dating the teen model - headed to the Underwood Family Farm for a Halloween-themed activity.”
“This month, Kourtney has been getting on with her life and spending time with her children after photos emerged of Scott relaxing with 18-year-old Lindsay Vrckovnic.”
“A voiceover adds: "This is the end of Scott and Kourtney."”
“"I'm on the verge of a mental breakdown."”
“(Image: FameFlynet)As she cries to sister Kim, she says: "I've worked so hard to keep this family together.”
“In scenes filmed over summer for Keeping Up With The Kardashians - set to air next weekend - Kourtney opens up about the difficult situation for the first time.”
“The reality TV star split from her partner of nearly a decade earlier this year, after she did everything she could to keep her family together.”
“...came to an end...”


"These young people seem to be enjoying the happiest time of their lives because they are trapped in all the activities."
"She was accompanied by her five-year-old son Mason, her three-year-old daughter Penelope, and her niece northwest."
"The mother of three, whose ex boyfriend is believed to be dating the teenage model, went to the Underwood family farm for a halloween themed event."
"After this month's photo of Scott relaxing with 18-year-old Lindsay falcovnik came to light, Courtney began to live his own life with the children."
The voice over added, "this is the end of Scott and Courtney."
"I'm about to break down."
"(photo source: fame flynet) when she cried to sister Kim, she said," I've worked so hard to bring this family together. "
"In the summer scene to catch up with the kardashians - which will be broadcast next weekend - Courtney made this difficult situation public for the first time."
"Earlier this year, the reality TV star broke up with his partner who has been in love for nearly 10 years for family reunion at all costs."
“… It's over... "



Number  1310
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Topics Wedding Inspiration...”
“We'll be impatiently waiting for the broadcast of the royal wedding, and the grand reveal of Meghan Markle's wedding dress!”
“Justin Alexander Style 8905This style's conservative sabrina neckline is elegantly balanced by pearl bearded lace laid across satin and tulle.”
“Justin Alexander Style 8903This style is a bit more unique, with an off the shoulder neckline and elegant sequined lace accents, but maintains the fit and flare design.”
“Justin Alexander 8918The sabrina neckline on this gown allows for a more conservative look that is uniquely accented with chantilly lace accents.”
“Let these suggestions inspire you.”
“Although the above sketch is a custom design, you can still mirror this royal look with gowns featured in our Justin Alexander collection.”
“The floral and heraldry motifs layered over silk tulle and silk charmeuse provide a refined elegance that is appropriate yet untraditional.”
“This Justin Alexander high neck tonal beaded and embroidered lace fit and flare wedding dress is subtly sexy.”
“Since Meghan Markle is marrying into the Royal family, she will likely wear something a bit more conservative with touches that embody her unique and captivating sense of style.”


"Wedding inspiration..."
"We'll be waiting impatiently for the broadcast of the royal wedding and the grand unveiling of Megan markel's wedding dress!"
"Justin Alexander style 8905 this conservative Sabrina neckline is elegantly balanced between satin and tulle by Pearl beard lace."
"Justin Alexander style 8903 is a unique style with off shoulder neckline and elegant Sequin lace decoration, but it keeps the fit and horn design."
"The Sabrina neckline on Justin Alexander 8918 makes you look more conservative and unique with changtilly lace elements."
"Let these suggestions inspire you."
"Although the sketch above is a custom design, you can still use the dresses from our Justin Alexander collection to reflect the royal style."
"The floral and heraldic patterns on silk tulles and satins provide a delicate elegance that is both appropriate and unconventional."
"This Justin Alexander high collar tonal beaded embroidery lace slim flared pants wedding dress is subtle and sexy."
"As Megan markel is about to marry into the royal family, she is likely to wear more conservative clothes with a touch that reflects her unique and charming style."



Number  1311
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Star had earlier reported that the Jenner sister and the Hadid sisters are feuding which was completely made up as well.”
“It has to be noted that the publication has been busted several times in the past for coming up with fake reports.”
“The supermodels have no dispute against each other.”
“Kendall's rep rubbished all the rumours and said the tabloid's report is absolutely 'false'.”
“While the report comes as a shock to all the fans, Gossip Cop did a little investigation and revealed the truth behind the story after checking it with a representative for Kendall Jenner.”
“Not only this, the insider also contended that the duo feels that the other is not good enough to work in high fashion.”
“It was a very tense show," the source added.”
“"She [Kendall] made a show of hanging out with Gigi Hadid and Hailey Baldwin," but intentionally ignored Ratajkowski.”
“They're always up for the same jobs and have become so competitive," the source said.”
“"They can't stand each other.”


"Starry sky reported earlier that the feud between the Jenna sisters and the Hadid sisters was totally fabricated."
"It must be pointed out that the journal has been investigated for false reports many times in the past."
"There is no dispute between supermodels."
"Kendall's representative refuted all the rumors and said that the tabloid report was absolutely" fake. "
"Although the report shocked all fans, gossip police did a little investigation and revealed the truth behind the report after checking with a representative of Kendall Jenner."
"Not only that, the insider also argued that they didn't think each other was good enough to work in high fashion."
"It was a very intense performance," the source added
"She (Kendall) did a show with Gigi Hadid and Haley Baldwin," but deliberately ignored ratakikovsky. "
"They always work for the same job and become very competitive," the source said
"They can't stand each other."



Number  1312
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““Unless they can come to terms with their issues, they’re headed for divorce.””
““Julia and Danny’s marriage is hanging by a thread,” says the insider.”
“When the actress took the part of a worker at a secret government facility on Homecoming, an upcoming political thriller on Amazon, she knew just who she wanted as her co-star: her old pal Dermot Mulroney.”
“She lobbied for him to join the show, and on March 8, it was officially announced that Dermot, 54 — who starred with Julia in My Best Friend’s Wedding and August: Osage County — would play her character’s boyfriend.”
“Julia and Dermot.”
“She was thrilled.”
“Her husband?”
“Furious.”
““Julia’s reunion with Dermot hasn’t gone down well with Danny,” an insider tells Life & Style.”
““Even though Julia’s reminded him that Dermot is happily married with children, Danny’s jealous.”It’s just one of many issues causing problems in Julia and Danny’s marriage.”


"Unless they can accept their problems, they're going to divorce."
"Julia and Denny's marriage is in jeopardy," the person familiar with the matter said
"When the actress plays a member of a secret government agency in Amazon's upcoming political thriller" coming home, "she knows who she wants to be with: her old friend Dermot muroni."
"She lobbied him to join the show and officially announced on March 8 that Dermot, 54, would play her role's boyfriend. Dermot and Julia in my best friend's wedding and August: Osage County（ August:Osage County ）She starred Julia in the movie
"Julia and Dermot."
"She's very excited."
"Her husband?"
"Anger."
"The reunion of Julia and Dermot didn't go well for Denny," one insider told life and fashion
"Although Julia reminded him that Dermot was happy to get married and have children, Denny was jealous." It's just one of many problems in Julia and Denny's marriage



Number  1313
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Since putting their relationship on pause, Bieber, 24, has been spotted spending time with Baskin Champion.”
“In March, Us Weekly announced that the pair were “taking a break” because of Teefy’s unwavering disapproval of the “Baby” crooner.”
“Despite trying to make their revamped relationship work, one person was not convinced that it was a good idea: Gomez’s mother, Mandy Teefey, who reportedly disagreed with her daughter over her decision to give Bieber another chance despite their past tumultuous relationship.”
“Their rekindled romance saw the pair going to church, enjoying candle-lit dinners and embarking on romantic getaways together, including a trip to Jamaica in February, when the pair attended Bieber’s father’s wedding.”
“Us Weekly exclusively revealed that the former flames, who dated from 2011 to 2014, were officially back together after they were spotted reuniting in October 2017.”
“...that many are speculating to have been inspired by Bieber...”
“...was the one who broke it off with Bieber feels like she got it out of her system Helping things is the fact that Gomez 25 has other exciting things to focus on like her new single Back 2 You which will be released on Thursday May 10 a song...”
“She obviously chose happiness and her friends and family and is so thrilled about her decision making process the source continued before adding She feels more empowered than ever and is looking forward to this next chapter Sharing the same sentiment another insider tells Us that the Wolves singer who...”
““Selena started seeing the bigger picture when it came to their relationship, like what was more important: her general happiness and her family and friends approval, or her being together with Justin, where no one really supported their relationship,” a source exclusively tells Us Weekly.”
“Selena Gomez believes she has made the right decision when it comes to on-again, off-again boyfriend Justin Bieber — by choosing not to be with him.”


"Since their relationship was suspended, Bieber, 24, was found with the Baskin champion."
In March this year, American weekly announced that the two were "resting" because of Tiffany's unswerving opposition to the "baby" singer
"In spite of trying to turn their relationship around, some people don't believe it's a good idea: Gomez's mother, Mandy Tiffany, is reported to disagree with her daughter's decision, and despite their past relationship confusion, she has decided to give Bieber another chance."
"Their renewed romance is that they go to church, have a candlelight dinner, and start a romantic trip together, including a trip to Jamaica in February, when they attended Bieber's father's wedding."
"US weekly exclusively disclosed that the pre flame from 2011 to 2014 was found to be reunited in October 2017 and officially recombined."
“… Many people speculate that it was inspired by Bieber... "
“… Who broke it with Bieber feels that she got it from her system to help things is the fact that Gomez 25 has other exciting things, such as her new single back 2, you will release a song on Thursday, May 10... "
"She obviously chose happiness and her friends and family, and she was so excited about her decision-making process that the source went on to say that she felt more powerful than ever and looked forward to sharing the same feelings in the next chapter. Another insider told us, wolf singer who..."
"When it comes to their relationship, Selena starts to see bigger picture, such as what's more important: her general happiness and the recognition of her family and friends, or she's with Justin, and no one really supports their relationship," an exclusive source told us weekly
"Selena Gomez believes that when she broke up with her boyfriend Justin Bieber again, she made the right decision - not to be with him."



Number  1314
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Watch below:Topher Grace Reveals Why He Wasn't At Ashton Kutcher and Mila Kunis' WeddingMore from AOL.com:Ole Miss football player hospitalized in hotel fallKris Jenner panics about potential pregnancy on 'KUWTK'Kourtney Kardashian celebrates sons' birthdays with alien laser tag amid Justin Bieber rumors...”
“"They are both amazing people so the fact that they're together now and have a kid, it's like your two great friends from high school got together after high school," Topher happily told ET at the Hollywood Foreign Press Association's Grants Banquet.”
“Last October, the happy couple welcomed their now one-year-old daughter Wyatt.”
“The superstar couple first met on the set of "That 70's Show" but didn't begin dating until April 2012.”
“Mila when ET caught up with him in August...”
“WATCH Demi Lovato on Rumors Wilmer Valderrama Will Propose in 2016 You Gotta Ask Him Although 37 year old Topher didn t appear to be present at the mini reunion he did have nothing but good things to say about his former co stars particularly the now married Ashton and...”
“The Fox hit also starred Laura Prepon, Mila Kunis, and Topher Grace.”
“Three woes walk into a bar... #Family A photo posted by Wilmer Valderrama (@wilmervalderrama) on Dec 12, 2015 at 9:09am PST"That '70s Show," a comedy about a group of teenage friends growing up in 1970s Wisconsin, ran from 1998-2006.”
“"Three woes walk into a bar... #Family," the 35-year-old actor wrote.”
“Sunday also referring to his former co stars as family...”


"Look at the picture below: toffer grace reveals why he wasn't at Ashton Kutcher's and Mira Kunis's wedding. AOL: falkris Jenner, an old football lady in hospital, panics about the possibility of pregnancy on kuwtk, and Kourtney Kardashian is at Justin Bieber Bieber) is rumored to use alien laser tags to celebrate his son's birthday... "
"They're amazing people, so they're together now and have a child, just like your two good friends in high school got together after high school," toffer told et at the awards banquet of the Hollywood Foreign Press Association
Last October, the happy couple welcomed their one-year-old daughter, Wyatt
"The superstar couple first met on the set of the '70s show, but they didn't start dating until April 2012."
"Mila, when et caught up with him in August..."
"Look at Demi Lovato's rumor that Wilmer waldrama will propose in 2016. You have to ask him that although 37 year old toffer seems not to attend the Mini Party, he didn't say anything except good words to his former partner, especially Ashton, who is now married..."
"This fox hit is also starring Laura plebon, Mira Kunis and toffer grace."
"San Chou walks into the bar... #Wilmer Valderrama (@ wilmervalderama) released a photo "that's 70s show" at 9:09 a.m. on December 12, 2015, a comedy about a group of young friends growing up in Wisconsin in the 1970s, which was broadcast from 1998 to 2006
"San Chou walks into the bar... #"Family," the 35 year old actor wrote
"Sunday also mentioned that his former partner was family..."



Number  1315
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See this week’s best dressed celebrities:”
“A white fold-over CH by Carolina Herrera clutch tied her ensemble together, leaving one hand free to cheer for her favorite players.”
“Where Kate has made straw wedges a staple in her summer wardrobe, Pippa went a different route with practical wood-soled sling-backs with a block heel.”
“Kate also gravitates toward solid colors and off-the-shoulder silhouettes; Pippa’s take on the look featured asymmetric draping at the neck, which lent a playful detail.”
“Like her sister, Pippa has a clear preference for pastels—see the blush pink crochet piece from last week and the light blue frock from this morning.”
“This year, Pippa Middleton appeared to get in on the action, attending the tournament in several looks that seemed to take cues from her sister, particularly the pale blue Tephi dress she wore today.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge is a regular at Wimbledon and always picks the perfect summer dress to stand out in the crowd.”
“As far as spectator fashion goes, few tennis fans can compete with Kate Middleton.”


"See the best dressed celebrities of the week":
Carolina Herrera clutch's white Lapel ties her band together, giving one hand the freedom to cheer for her favorite player
"Kate uses straw wedges as staple food in her summer wardrobe, while Pippa takes a different path, using a practical wooden back with a heel."
"Kate also likes the solid color and off the shoulder silhouette; Pippa's modeling feature is the asymmetrical droop of the neck, giving people a playful detail."
"Like her sister, Pippa has a clear preference for pastels - Pink crochets last week and light blue dresses this morning."
"This year, Pippa Middleton seems to have joined in, and several of her dresses at the world cup seem to have borrowed from her sister's style, especially the light blue tin skirt she is wearing today."
"The Duchess of Cambridge is a frequent visitor to Wimbledon and always chooses the perfect summer dress to stand out from the crowd."
"In terms of audience fashion, few tennis fans can compete with Kate Middleton."



Number  1316
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...email digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk or call us direct on 0207 782 4220We pay for videos too Click here to upload yours.”
“Up With The Kardashians spoiler Kourtney and Scott Disick row about boundaries after she moves new boyfriend into her house Got a story...”
“...live GEM AZING Gemma Collins shows toned stomach in a bikini as she poses with dad in old snap kept me going Kate Garraway red faced after praising her milkman for offering extras CASH CASUALTY Gemma Collins dad gives her an allowance after she blew 50k in TWO MONTHS Keeping...”
“Most Read In TV Showbiz Absolutely gorgeous Big Brother s Kate Lawler gives birth to baby girl after complication DESPICABLE Piers slams Anthea Turner over pic of obese disabled woman with Covid mask on SEAM S WORRYING A Place in the Sun s Laura Hamilton mortified as dress pops open...”
“Situated in Hidden Hills, a gated community in the heart of California close to Calabasas, the development is known to be home to a host of celebrities, including Scott's former in-laws Kris, Kylie, Kendall Jenner and Kim Kardashian.”
“4 The couple had lunch at a posh hotel in Los Angeles Credit: 2018 Coleman-Rayner4 Scott split from Kourtney Kardashian in 2015 Credit: InstagramThe sprawling mansion boasts five bedrooms and a a huge back yard equipped with a huge swimming pool, a spa with fountains and waterfall.”
“And it seems Scott's relationship with Sofia is only set to flourish as the party boy has splashed out on a £2.3million pad.”
“Of course, Scott isn't the only one to have moved on with somebody younger, as Kourtney has found love with 24-year-old model Younes Bendjima.”
“But it seems even Kourtney has given their unlikely romance her seal of approval as Sofia bonded with her brood; Mason, eight, Penelope, five, and Reign, three.”
“4 Kourtney has three kids with Scott Credit: InstagramSofia was even pictured spending time with Scott and his three kids last month, following reports that Kourtney would not let the teen meet their children until she knew her relationship with Scott was the real deal.”


“… E-mail digishowbiz@the-sun.co.uk Or call 0207 782 4220 and we will pay for the video. Please click here to upload your video. "
"On Kardashian, Courtney and Scott Disick quarrel after she moves her new boyfriend into her house. There's a story..."
“… On the spot, gem azing Gemma Collins showed her body-building abdomen in bikini. I blushed when she took a picture with her father in the old snapshot. Kate Garraway praised her milkman for providing extra cash. After Gemma Collins' father gave her pocket money, she blew $50000 in two months to keep it... "
"Most of the absolutely gorgeous big brother Kate Lawler read in the TV show business after giving birth to a baby girl, the complications of the despicable pierce the picture of Anthea Turner, the fat disabled woman with covid mask seam of worry in the sun a place where Laura Hamilton's shameful dress pops up..."
"The development is located in the heart of California, close to the closed community of hidden hills in Calabasas, where many celebrities are known to gather, including Scott's ex husband Chris, Kelly, Kendall Jenner and Kim Kardashian."
"4 the couple had lunch at a luxury hotel in Los Angeles credit: 2018 Coleman rayner4 Scott separated from Kourtney Kardashian credit: instagram this huge mansion has five bedrooms and a huge backyard with a huge swimming pool and a hot spring with fountains and waterfalls."
"It seems that the relationship between Scott and Sophia will only flourish because the party boy has already spent 2.3 million pounds on a cushion."
"Of course, Scott is not the only one with young people, because Courtney has fallen in love with 24-year-old model yones bengima."
"But even Courtney seems to approve of their unlikely relationship, because Sophia and her children are on good terms; Mason is 8, Penelope is 5, and Reeve is 3."
"4 Kourtney and Scott credit have three children: instagram Sofia was even photographed spending time with Scott and his three children last month. It was reported that Kourtney would not let her children see their children until she knew that her relationship with Scott was a real deal."



Number  1317
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s tried and true and exactly what she needs, so they’re hoping he’ll officially become family this summer.” Aww!”
“They can see how committed Blake is to Gwen.”
“We have the exclusive details on why they think so, here.”
“The sun is shining, the birds are chirping, and Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are more in love than ever!”
“So why not get married this summer?”
“Their friends and family are convinced that a summer wedding is actually happening, a source close to Gwen told HollywoodLife EXCLUSIVELY, and they think that the couple have been hinting at it for awhile.”
“HollywoodLife has reached out to Blake and Gwen’s reps for comment.”
““Gwen family and friends are buzzing right now, because she’s been dropping hints that she and Blake have a big announcement coming,” the source told us.”
““She’s been teasing that they have a big secret they’re getting ready to share and everyone’s convinced they’re going to have a surprise wedding this summer.”
“Gwen’s told her family and friends to block off some dates for a big party at Blake’s place in Oklahoma this summer.”


"He's real, and that's what she needs, so they want him to get married this summer."! "
"They can see Blake's loyalty to Gwen."
"We have exclusive details about why they think so."
"The sun is shining, the birds are chirping, Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stephanie are in love more than ever
"Then why not get married this summer?"
"Their friends and family believe that the summer wedding is really going to take place," a source close to Gwen told exclusive Hollywood life. They think the couple have hinted at it for some time
"Hollywood life has contacted representatives of black and Gwen for advice."
"Gwen's family and friends are very busy now because she has been hinting that she and Blake are about to announce a big news," the source told us
"She kept joking that they were going to share a big secret and everyone believed there would be a surprise wedding this summer."
"Gwen told her family and friends that at a big party at the black house in Oklahoma this summer, some of the appointments would be cancelled."



Number  1318
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The bulk of which comes from her many endorsement deals with companies like Smart Water, Emirates airline and Aveeno Skincare.”
“Just last year, Aniston was ranked the second-highest paid actress on Forbes' annual list, earning $25.5 million.”
“We're breaking down Aniston and Theroux's multimillion dollar empire below:Together, the A-list pair is estimated to be worth upwards of $240 million, with Jennifer racking up a net worth of $220 million and Justin falling at a more modest $20 million.”
“So how will the breakup impact the health of their individual assets and overall worth?”
“Publicly at least, Jen and Justin have yet to file divorce documents.”
“In a joint statement released Thursday, the now-exes revealed they split at the conclusion of 2017 following a "mutual" decision to "lovingly" call it quits.”
“Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have separated after less than three years of marriage, leaving many to wonder what's at stake financially as the chips fall where they may.”


"Most of it comes from many endorsement agreements she signed with smart water, Emirates and Aveeno skincare."
"Just last year, Aniston ranked second on the Forbes annual list, earning $25.5 million."
"We're destroying the multi million dollar empire of Aniston and seru. Together, it's estimated that the A-class stars are worth more than 240 million dollars, Jennifer's net worth is 220 million dollars, and Justin's worth is down to 20 million dollars
"So how will the breakup affect the health and overall value of their personal assets?"
"At least in public, Jane and Justin haven't filed their divorce papers."
"In a joint statement released on Thursday, the two current ex boyfriends revealed that they broke up at the end of 2017 after the two sides" jointly "decided to announce their breakup" amicably. "
"Jennifer Aniston and Justin seru separated after less than three years of marriage, which makes many people wonder what their financial situation will be like as the chips go down."



Number  1319
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, are you shocked Anna was the first one to move on from the relationship?”
“He’s still hurting over their marriage going south to date anyone new.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how the actor is so hurt.”
“Wow!”
“Anna Faris, 40, sure didn’t waste any time moving from husband of eight years Chris Pratt, 38.”
“The Mom star is now dating her Overboard reboot cinematographer Michael Barrett, 47, who she worked with last winter.”
“Now the Guardians of the Galaxy superstar is wondering if their romance started building before the Hollywood’s cutest couple announced their separation on Aug. 6.”
““Chris is having a difficult time trying to figure out the timing of Anna’s new relationship with Mike.”
“Chris knows Anna met him a while ago, but when they may have started hooking up, Chris doesn’t really want to think about.”
“It is too painful,” a source close to the actor tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Hollywood stars, Anna is the first person to leave this relationship. Are you shocked?"
"He's still sad about their marriage, going south to date new friends."
"We had an exclusive report on how the actor got hurt."
"Wow
"Anna Faris, 40, has been married to Chris Pratt, 38, for eight years, and she certainly hasn't wasted any time moving."
The "Mom" star is now dating photographer Michael Barrett, 47, who she worked with last winter
"Now, the guardians of the galaxy superstar want to know if their relationship started before Hollywood's loveliest couple announced their break-up on August 6."
"Chris has a hard time figuring out when Anna's new relationship with Mike will be."
"Chris knows Anna met him some time ago, but when they might start dating, Chris really doesn't want to think about it."
"It's too painful," a source close to the actor told reporters



Number  1320
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Brad Pitt’s mum ‘so happy’ he’s back in touch with Jennifer Aniston as pair have ‘secret meeting’”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“It comes as he apparently also enjoyed a ‘secret meeting’ with ex-wife Jennifer Aniston, following her split with Justin Theroux.”
“There’s so much to unpack here.”
“Anyway, according to Entertainment Tonight, Brad has been dating women ‘not in the public eye’ as he tried to keep his private life just that.”
“A source explained to the website He s very private about who he s seeing but he does continue to casually date Angelina and Brad announced their shock separation in 2016 Picture Matt Sayles Invision AP File The insider told Entertainment Tonight the father of six Shiloh 11 Maddox 16”
“Vivienne nine Zahara 13 Pax 14 and Knox nine has made changes in his life since he and Ange parted ways...”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘When they first split he spent a lot of time at home and was often very down about what was going on.”
“He was a homebody for many months, but in the last month or two, he’s been going out more,’ they said.”
“‘He enjoys going out to eat with close friends.’Sounds like a blast.”


"More: Brad Pitt's mother is" very happy "that he has contacted Jennifer Aniston again because of their" secret meeting. "
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"After he broke up with his ex-wife, Jennifer Aniston, he obviously liked to meet her in secret."
"There's too much to open here."
"Anyway, according to entertainment tonight, Brad has been dating women, but" out of the public eye "because he has been trying to keep his private life
"A source explained to the website that he was very secretive about the people he met, but he did continue to date casually. Angelina and Brad announced a shocking picture of their separation in 2016. Matt sels, an associated press source, told entertainment that Shiloh 11 Maddox 16, the father of six children tonight
"Vivienne nine Zahara 13 Pax 14 and Knox nine changed his life after he and ange parted ways..."
"When they broke up for the first time, he stayed at home for a long time and was often frustrated by what happened."
"He's been at home for months, but in the last month or two, he's gone out more often," they said
"He likes to eat out with close friends." It sounds exciting



Number  1321
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Dimitrios Kambouris/Getty Images]”
“Meanwhile, the source claims Katie Holmes is in love with Jame Foxx and hopes to marry him one day.”
“According to a new report Jamie Foxx has been accused of flirting with another woman and when it comes to his dedication to the mother of one an insider claims he treats her like a booty call On July 12 In Touch Weekly magazine shared a report regarding Katie Holmes...”
“...and Jamie Foxx s alleged romance claiming that while they ve been linked since 2013 Holmes reportedly wasn t on Foxx s mind when he celebrated the Fourth of July earlier this month...”
“As an insider explained, Jamie Foxx attended the Red, White and Bootsy Party on July 4 and ran over to a slender brunette.”
“He allegedly started dancing and flirting with the woman right away.”
“According to the report, Foxx appeared to be a real ladies’ man during the event and didn’t care who was watching.”
“Despite being linked to Katie Holmes for years, Jamie Foxx reportedly acts like a frat boy when he goes out, and his rumored relationship with the actress becomes an afterthought.”
““Jamie treats her like a booty call.”
“A post shared by Katie Holmes (@katieholmes212) on Jul 9, 2017 at 4:45am PDTKatie Holmes shares daughter Suri with her ex-husband, Tom Cruise, and Jamie Foxx is the father of two daughters from a previous relationship.”


"[Dimitrios kambouris / Getty Images selected pictures]"
"Meanwhile, sources claim that Katie Holmes is in love with Jamie Fox and hopes to marry him one day."
"According to a new report, Jamie fox is accused of flirting with another woman. When it comes to his dedication to a child's mother, an insider claims that he treats her like he shared a story about Katie Holmes in contact weekly on July 12..."
“…… Jamie fox claims that although they have been in contact since 2013, Sherlock Holmes did not appear in fox's mind when he celebrated July 4 earlier this month... "
"As one insider explained, Jamie Fox went to the red, white and boot party on July 4 and ran to a slim brunette."
"It is said that he immediately began to dance and flirt with the woman."
"It's reported that Fox seems to be a real lady at the event and doesn't care who's watching."
"Despite years of contact with Katie Holmes, it is reported that Jamie fox acted like a fraternity boy when he went out, and his affair with the actress became a hindsight."
"Jamie treated her like a bargain."
"Katie Holmes (@ katieholmes212) shared a post at 4:45 a.m. on July 9, 2017. Katie Holmes shared her daughter Suri with her ex husband Tom Cruise. Jamie Foxx is the father of two daughters, both former lovers."



Number  1322
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Getty 1 of 33 Dakota Johnson puts on very busty in Florence for the Gucci CruiseGETTY Johnson plays Ana SteeleGETTY Jamie Dornan plays Christian Grey...”
““I love Jamie, I trust him and I really couldn’t tell you if I could have done this without him.”Dakota Johnson's sexiest pics Wed, May 31, 2017 Fifty Shades of Grey star Dakota Johnson in pictures.”
““It’s genuinely one of the fastest, closest friendships I’ve ever made in my life, just based on the amount of time we’ve actually known each other,” Johnson told OK!”
“The shots line up perfectly with what Dornan and Johnson each said earlier in the year, when they spoke very highly of one-another.”
“SG Dornan makes Johnson laugh on setSG The pair get on when the cameras stop rollingThe pair are also seen goofing around under an umbrella between takes on another scene - seemingly putting rumours that they despise one-another to rest.”
“In one supermarket-set scene, Johnson even has to try and control her laughter as Dornan fools around in front of her.”
“And by the looks of it - as you can see for yourself below - they really do get on like firm friends.”
“B-roll from Fifty Shades Darker - quick, candid shots from the set of the movie - show them interacting when the cameras stop rolling.”
“Does this footage reveal the truth of their working relationship?”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”


"Slide show Getty 1's 33 Dakota Johnson in a very full Gucci tour in Florence, Getty Johnson as Anna steelgetty, Jamie Donan as Christian gray..."
"I love Jamie, I believe him, and I really can't tell you if I could have done it without him." "The sexiest picture of Johnson, Dakota, May 31, 2017, 50 shadow gray star, Dakota Johnson in the picture."
Johnson told OK: "this is really one of the fastest and closest friendships I've ever built in my life, based only on the time we really knew each other."! "
"These scenes are very consistent with what Donan and Johnson said earlier this year, when they spoke highly of each other."
"SG Dornan makes Johnson laugh on setsg. When the camera stops rotating, the two get on the car. In the interval of shooting another scene, they can also see the two playing under the umbrella - it seems that the rumors that they despise each other have been calmed down."
"In a supermarket scene, when Donan is playing around in front of her, Johnson even has to try to control her laughter."
"On the outside - as you can see with your own eyes below - they do get along well, like firm friends."
"The B-roll in the 50 shadows is darker - the fast, candid shot in the movie scene - showing their interaction when the camera stops scrolling."
"Does this video reveal the truth about their working relationship?"
"You can unsubscribe at any time."



Number  1323
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You also have to commit to living there for at least a decade.”
“There is a catch -- to qualify, you have to be younger than 45, a citizen or permanent resident of Switzerland and you have to buy or build a house that costs at least $200,000.”
“Did rapper Jay-Z really tell his audience at a concert that “only idiots believe in Jesus” and “Satan is our true lord?” Definitely not.”
“A fake article has been circulating around that uses a video to validate it.”
“The video is allegedly of Jay-Z preaching about Satan during his New Orleans concert in November.”
“The video is actually from 2013.”
“There is not a bit of truth to the video, so don’t share it.”
“Was That Fake?”
“Did an Iranian woman undergo fifty plastic surgeries to look like her idol, Angelina Jolie, but instead end up looking like a zombie?”
“The internet is buzzing with reports that Sahar Tabar went under the knife to look like Jolie.”


"You also have to commit to living there for at least 10 years."
"To qualify, you have to be 45 years old, a Swiss citizen or permanent resident, and you have to buy or build a house that costs at least $200000."
Does rapper Jay-Z really tell his audience at the concert that "only idiots believe in Jesus" and "Satan is our true Lord"? "Absolutely not."
"A fake article using video for verification is circulating all over the country."
"This video is said to be Jay-Z promoting Satan's story at a concert in New Orleans in November."
"The video is actually from 2013."
"The video doesn't have a bit of authenticity, so don't share it."
"Is that false?"
An Iranian woman who has had 50 plastic surgeries looks like her idol Angelina Jolie, but turns out to be a zombie? "
"The Internet is full of stories about Sahar Tabar being stabbed and looking like Julie."



Number  1324
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Previously, the website also busted some inaccurate stories about the actress and her married life such as Star once claimed that Kidman and Urban had 'separated' after he was caught hugging a "sexy redhead" at a concert.”
“Neither the actress is taking any pole dancing class nor her sex life with Urban is in a bad state.”
“As usual, Gossip Cop investigated the report and found out that the story has been completely fabricated.”
“Suddenly, he's become very insistent about getting home early."”
“The insider went on, "Keith's eyes almost popped out of his head the first time Nicole showed off her new skills.”
“She convinced Nicole to give it a try and now she's hooked."”
“A source close to the actress told Star, "After a few drinks, one of Nicole's girlfriends confessed that she'd been taking exotic dance classes to spice up her workout and her bedroom routine.”
“Also read: Is Tesla CEO Elon Musk dating model Jessica Hart after split with Amber Heard?”
“According to the report, the Big Little Lies star, who allegedly has some marriage problems with husband Keith Urban, is taking pole dancing lessons from a female dancer in Nashville.”
“A recent report by Star magazine claimed so.”


"Before that, the website also revealed some inaccurate reports about the actress and her marriage life. For example, star once said that Kidman and urban were separated after Kidman was caught hugging a" sexy red haired girl "at a concert."
"The actress didn't take pole dancing lessons, and she didn't have a bad sex life with urban."
"As usual, the gossip police investigated the report and found that the story was completely fabricated."
"All of a sudden, he became very insistent on going home early."
"Insider continues," Keith's eyes almost pop out of his head, and Nicole shows her new skills for the first time
"She convinced Nicole to give it a try, and now she's hooked."
"After a few drinks, one of Nicole's girlfriends admitted that she had been taking exotic dance classes to spice up her exercise and bedroom life," a source close to the actress told sky
Read another: have you heard of Tesla CEO Elon Musk after breaking up with model Jessica Hart? "
"It's reported that the big liar star is learning pole dancing from a female dancer in Nashville, who is said to have some marital problems with her husband Keith Urban."
"A recent report in Star Magazine claimed that it was



Number  1325
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The source added: 'For Sofia, it's a real turn-off when Scott stalks Kourtney online and obsesses about her, there is only so much more Sofia can take.'”
“He explained: 'I guess it's kind of flattering that people care.”
“But the reality star still believes that the 15 year age difference between her ex Scott Disick and his current girlfriend Sofia Richie is way too much.”
“The 39-year-old eldest Kardashian sister sill thinks the 19-year-old model is still 'too young' for her 34-year-old ex according to a source for People on Monday.”
“Not over it Kourtney Kardashian thinks ex Scott Disick s new girlfriend is still too young for him according to a Monday report from People Mind the gap The 39 year old eldest Kardashian sister sill thinks the age gap between 34 year old Scott and 19 year old model...”
“Sofia Richie is still too much according to an insider as they are pictured together in Miami back in December Things seem to be getting serious between Scott and Sofia as they have been spotted together with his three children with Kourtney recently...”
“Despite the age gap, the insider insists that Sofia has had a good influence on Scott and his children: sons Mason, eight, and Reign, three, and five-year-old daughter Penelope.”
“'Sofia is helping Scott be a better, healthier person,' the source said.”
“'Kourtney feels confident that Scott and Sofia takes good care of the kids.”
“Scott is a great dad when he has his life together.'”


"It's a real nuisance for Sophia when Scott follows Courtney online and is infatuated with her. Sophia can only bear so much," the source added
"He explained: 'I think it's flattering that people care."
"But the reality star still thinks that the 15-year-old age gap between her former Scott Disick and her current girlfriend Sophia Ritchie is too big."
"According to people magazine on Monday, 39 year old Kardashian's elder sister, sear, thinks the 19-year-old model is still" too young "for her 34 year old ex girlfriend
"It didn't take long for Courtney Kardashian to think that former Scott Disick's new girlfriend was too young for him. According to a report in people's attention gap on Monday, 39 year old Kardashian's elder sister, sear, thought that there was an age gap between 34 year old Scott and 19-year-old models..."
"According to a person familiar with the matter, Sophie is still too much because they were photographed together in Miami in December last year. It seems that things between Scott and Sophie are getting more and more serious because someone recently found them with his three children and Courtney..."
"Despite the age gap, the insider insists that Sophia has a great influence on Scott and his children: son Mason, 8, Rafe, 3 and daughter Penelope, 5."
Sophia is helping Scott become a better, healthier person, the source said
"Courtney believes Scott and Sophia will take good care of the children."
"Scott was a great father when he had his life together."



Number  1326
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He’s been my lover and my friend for a really long time,” adding that there’s “a lot on this record inspired by our relationship.” But asked if she would be happy if Kinney started dating again, she said, “I’m not going to f - - king throw a party!””
““He’s told her he’s planning to visit her in Philly; maybe as soon as this weekend.”Gaga — whose new album, “Joanne” was released on Friday — said on Howard Stern’s Sirius XM show on Monday, “I’m actually very close to Taylor.”
““Alanna is head over heels,” we’re told.”
“Kinney and DiGiovanni recently visited Austin, Texas, together to attend the Formula One race and Taylor Swift concert, and we’re told DiGiovanni has visited him in Chicago, where he shoots the NBC show.”
“Jefferson University Hospital...”
“Insiders say that Kinney has been quietly dating a 26 year old girl from South Philadelphia Alanna DiGiovanni and unlike his ex s alter ego we re told she s not a Fame Monster DiGiovanni is a former Atlantic City bottle service waitress who now works in radiology at Thomas...”
“But Page Six is told that the “Chicago Fire” actor — who was engaged to Gaga for 18 months until their July split — has already moved on.”
“The singer said on Monday that she still loves ex-fiancé Taylor Kinney and joked she won’t be celebrating when he starts to date again.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)We hate to be the bearer of bad news for Lady Gaga.”


"He's been my lover and friend for a long time," she added. "There's a lot of inspiration on this record from our relationship." But when asked if Ginny would be happy if she started dating again, she said, "I'm not going to f-king for a party!"
"He told her that he planned to visit her in Philadelphia; maybe as soon as this weekend." Gaga's new album "Joanne" was released on Friday and said on Howard Stern's Sirius XM show on Monday, "I'm actually close to Taylor."
We were told, "Alana is a complete human being."
"Ginny and DiGiovanni recently visited Austin, Texas, for Formula One racing and Taylor Swift concerts. We heard that DiGiovanni visited him in Chicago, where he filmed NBC shows."
"Jefferson University Hospital..."
"Insiders say Ginny has been quietly dating Alana digiovani, a 26 year old girl from southern Philadelphia. Unlike her predecessor, we were told that she is not a famous monster. Digiovani is a former bottle maid in Atlantic City and now works in the radiology department in Thomas..."
"But page six was told that the hero of the Chicago Fire - who was engaged to Gaga for 18 months until they broke up in July - had left."
"The singer said Monday that she still loved her ex fiance Tyler Ginny and joked that she would not celebrate when he started dating again."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) and we hate to be the bearer of Lady Gaga's bad news."



Number  1327
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“While Miranda and Anderson made their relationship official a few months later, Blake appears to confirm that this rumored affair may have gone down with his recent post.”
““Gwen has been a rock of support for Blake since they met and he was first going through his divorce,” our source went on to say.”
“A source close to Gwen EXCLUSIVELY told HL how she & Blake are dealing with the scandal!”
“Blake Shelton, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, are discussing his ex Miranda Lambert, 34, and the fact that Miranda allegedly started dating her married tour mate Evan Felker while she was still seeing her ex Anderson East.”
“A source close to Gwen EXCLUSIVELY gave us the deets about how Blake and Gwen are reacting to Miranda’s dating scandal that allegedly broke up a marriage, according to reports.”
““Blake and Gwen have been talking a lot about the latest drama with Blake’s ex Miranda,” our source said.”
““Upon hearing the news that Miranda is involved with someone else yet again, hopping from guy to guy, Blake opened up to Gwen about the darker secrets of his marriage with Miranda.”
“They discussed the doubt the heartache and the mistrust Blake developed for Miranda that led to the end of their marriage When it comes down to it the newest bombshell surrounding Miranda s complicated love life has only brought Blake...”
“...and Gwen closer...”
““Gwen and Blake have bonded over the latest drama with Miranda and his ex’s dating habits have had the strange effect of making Gwen and Blake stronger than ever as a couple.”


"A few months later, Miranda and Anderson officially announced their relationship, and Blake seems to confirm that this rumor may be related to his recent post."
"Gwen has been a supporter of Blake since they met, and he experienced a divorce for the first time," our source continued
"A source close to Gwen told HL exclusively how she and black handled the scandal!"
"Black Sheldon, 41, and Gwen Stefani, 47, are discussing his 34 year old ex boyfriend, Miranda Lambert, and the fact that Miranda is said to have started dating her married travel partner, Ivan felke, while still dating her ex boyfriend Evan felke in the East."
"It is reported that a source close to Gwen exclusively disclosed to us Blake's and Gwen's reaction to Miranda's dating scandal, which is said to have led to the breakdown of their marriage."
"Blake and Gwen have been talking about the latest drama with Blake's former Miranda," our source said
"When he heard that Miranda had another relationship with another man, Blake jumped from one man to another and opened the secret of his marriage to Gwen."
"They discussed Blake's suspicion, heartache and distrust of Miranda, which eventually led to the end of their marriage. In the final analysis, the latest bomb surrounding Miranda's complex love life only brought Blake..."
“… Closer to Gwen... "
"Gwen and Blake got married to Miranda in a recent play. His ex girlfriend's dating habits have had a strange effect, making Gwen and Blake stronger than ever."



Number  1328
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Stop by any time!)”
“(I just gave away the name of dream restaurant, one which I’ll open someday: A Vat of Mashed Potatoes.”
“She’s supposed to be quite tall, quite leggy and even in photos, she just seems like a wisp of a lady.”
“It wouldn’t surprise me at all if she was one of those “I’ve been on a diet since I was 16” people.”
“But just how extreme is her diet?”
“I don’t know.”
“When you think of it, she never really did bandwagon on any popular Hollywood diet, at least publicly.”
“Maybe that’s because this whole time, she was just eating very, very small portions, at least according to Star:Nicole Kidman insists on being served only 50% of her food when she’s out to dinner.”
““No matter what she orders, she asks the waiter to bring only her half of it,” tattles a tipster.”
““It could be a cup of soup – she’ll still ask to have it cut down.”


"You can come any time!"
"I just named the dream restaurant. One day I'll open one: a jar of mashed potatoes."
"She should be tall and have long legs, and even in the picture, she looks like a woman."
"I wouldn't be surprised if she was the kind of person who says," I've been on a diet since I was 16. "
"But how extreme is her diet?"
"I don't know."
"When you think about it, she's never really popular in Hollywood, at least in public."
"Maybe it's because during this time, she's only eating a very, very small portion, at least according to Nicole Kidman, who insists on serving only 50% of the food when she's out eating."
"No matter what she ordered, she asked the waiter to take only half," one informant said
"It could be a cup of soup - she would still ask to cut it off."



Number  1329
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Whether it's recent criticism regarding Kim Kardashian's triggering comments about anorexia, Kourtney and ex boyfriend Scott Disicks on/off relationship, or Kylie's pregnancy being kept out of the media spotlight, this family always has each other's back.”
“This content is imported from {embed-name}.”
“You may be able to find the same content in another format, or you may be able to find more information, at their web site.”
“So we can only imagine the devastation the family felt following Khloé's boyfriend Tristan Thompson's cheating scandal earlier this year.”
“Getty ImagesDays before the reality star welcomed her first child True Thompson with the NBA player in April, the couple were marred by allegations of infidelity by the sportsman.”
“After the news hit the headlines, Kim Kardashian, Kourtney Kardashian and Kris Jenner were spotting flying immediately to Cleveland, Ohio to be with the 34-year-old for her baby's birth.”
“And while Kim and Tristan appear to have made amends following True's birth, that's not to say when she first found out about the scandal she wasn't livid.”
“In an interview with Ryan Seacrest during an On Air With Ryan Seacrest interview on Thursday, the mother-of-three opened up about the tough conversation she had with Khloé when the news broke.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Whether it's recent criticism of Kim Kardashian's anorexia, coultney's off and on romance with her ex boyfriend Scott disix, or criticism of Kelly's pregnancy being out of the media spotlight, the family has always supported each other."
This content was imported from {embedded name}
You can find the same content in other formats on their website, or you can find more information
"So we can only imagine the devastation that the family felt after the affair of Tristan Thompson, Chloe's boyfriend, earlier this year."
In April, the reality TV star and NBA player had their first child, real Thompson, but before that, the couple were completely discredited by the player's infidelity charges
After the news hit the headlines, Kim Kardashian, Courtney Kardashian and Chris Jenner flew to Cleveland, Ohio, to have a baby with their 34 year old daughter
"Although Kim and Tristan seem to have made amends after truer was born, this is not to say that truer was not angry when she first discovered the scandal."
"In an interview with Ryan Seacrest on Thursday, the mother of three admitted that she had a difficult conversation with Heroe when the news came out."



Number  1330
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““You’re so gorgeous.””
“The ultra private couple may finally be ready to make their public debut, though.”
“Taylor Swift and her boyfriend, Joe Alwyn, are “very much in love,” a source exclusively tells Us Weekly.”
““They have quite a low-key relationship, which Taylor likes,” the insider reveals.”
““It’s very normal, and no one really knows about it right now.”
“They just work out, watch movies together and invite friends over.”
“Taylor loves to cook and bake for him.”
“They are still taking it slow.”It is unclear exactly when the “Look What You Made Me Do” singer, 27, and the British actor, 26, began dating, but their relationship first made headlines in May.”
“Prior to Alwyn, she dated Tom Hiddleston from June to September 2016 and Calvin Harris from March 2015 to June 2016.”
““Expect to see them step out together really soon,” a source exclusively told Us in September.”


"You are so beautiful."
"However, this extremely private couple may finally be ready to make a public appearance."
"Taylor swift and her boyfriend Joe Alvin are" very much in love, "an exclusive source told us weekly
"They have a pretty low-key relationship that Tyler likes," people familiar with the matter said
"It's normal. Nobody really knows now."
"They just exercise, watch movies together, invite friends over."
"Tyler likes to cook and bake for him."
It's not clear when the 27 year old singer "see what you ask me to do" and the 26 year old British actor started dating, but their relationship made headlines for the first time in May
"Prior to Alwyn, she dated Tom hiddleston from June to September 2016 and Calvin Harris from March to June 2016."
"They are expected to come together soon," a source told us exclusively in September



Number  1331
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...wedding her real life royal prince...”
“But Meghan is still turning her nose up and turning the part down flat And it was no secret that Meghan was mulling over an historical offer from Prince Harry but the srouce still confirmed Meghan s firmly focused on...”
“Meghan Markle: Royal Copycat Out To Be The New Diana!”
“Said a Hollywood exec as the deals started up: “Producers are dying for Meghan to take the lead — and will give her anything she wants!”
“): The moguls won’t quit bitching and moaning that their first choice, at almost any cost, was Prince Harry’s luscious lady love, Meghan Markle!”
“But here’s the secret scoop our “Twilight” cutie will never know about (unless she reads The National ENQUIRER, of course!”
“Mike Walker reports… Hollywood producers stoked the flames of their red-hot, new “Charlie’s Angels” reboot by flinging big stacks of bucks at Kristen Stewart — who is thisclose to signing on as their star!”


“… To marry her real-life Prince... "
"It's no secret that Megan is still sticking his nose up and flattening out the character. Megan is considering Prince Harry's historic proposal, but sluse still confirms that Megan is firmly focused on..."
Megan markel: the imitator of the royal family will be the new Diana
One Hollywood executive said at the start of the deal: "producers are eager for Megan to be the main character and will give her anything she wants!"
"): tycoons will not stop complaining and groaning. Their first choice, at almost any cost, is Prince Harry's sweet woman's love, Megan mackle
But it's a secret scoop our twilight chick will never know (unless, of course, she's read the National Enquirer)! "
Mike Walker reports Hollywood producers threw a pile of money at Kristen Stewart, lighting the fire of their hot new "Charlie's angel" rebooting - Kristen Stewart is about to sign up to become their star



Number  1332
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"She will not be commenting, and asks that the family be given its privacy at this time."”
“This decision was made for the health of the family.”
“...from Angelina Jolie it has been claimed...”
“Angelina filed for divorce from Brad yesterday, citing irreconcilable differences.”
“As news of the split broke, people turned their attention towards Jennifer, whose marriage to Brad disintegrated shortly after he met Angelina on the set of their movie Mr & Mrs Smith in 2005.”
“"Jennifer always knew this day would come," a source told New York Post's Page Six.”
“"Everyone in Jennifer's inner circle regards Angelina as a crazy master manipultor.”
“(Image: Getty) (Image: Getty)(Image: REUTERS)"But we all presumed the end of their affair would be Angelina leaving Brad for someone else."”
“The source claimed Jen, who is now happily married to Justin Theroux, still wants the best for her ex, but could be quietly marking the end of Brad's marriage with friends.”
“"Jen still cares about Brad and wishes him well.”


"She won't comment and ask for the privacy of the family at this time."
"The decision is for the health of the family."
“…… Angelina Jolie claims
"Angelina filed for divorce with Brad yesterday on the grounds of irreconcilable differences."
"With the news of the break-up, people turned their attention to Jennifer, who broke up with Brad in 2005 shortly after meeting Angelina on the set of the movie Mr. and Mrs. Smith."
"Jennifer always knew that day would come," a source told the New York Post on page 6
"Everyone in Jennifer's inner circle thinks Angelina is a crazy manipulator."
"(picture: Getty) (picture: Getty) (picture: Reuters)" but we all think that the end of their affair will be Angelina leaving Brad to someone else. "
"Jennifer is now happily married to Justin Cyrus, and she still wants to fight for the best life for her ex girlfriend, but it may quietly mark the end of Brad's marriage to a friend," the source said
"Jane still cares about Brad and wishes him all the best."



Number  1333
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There has been too much drama in their relationship already that they have gone through so much, perhaps this is precisely why they both decided it was time to tie the knot and dive into a "happy-ever-after."”
“Thus, a secret wedding may have already happened as Selena takes advantage of the time she decided to stay away from the media.”
“Some reports have claimed that even after everything that happened in their relationship, including the alleged cheating scandal, Selena was still open to marrying Justin if he proposes.”
“Selena Gomez Allegedly Secretly Married Justin Bieber In The Caribbean?”
“They are now even planning to move to Canada or anywhere far from Los Angeles so they can start a life together.”
“Despite Justin being the alleged reason for Selena's meltdown, he continues to pursue her nevertheless.”
“This only means there is definitely a high chance that the two would find their way to each other's arms once more.”
“However, it looks like their marriage has not come as a surprise for everyone since they have been going back and forth with their relationship.”
“Thus, these constant visits have reportedly led to the couple getting back together and even reportedly getting secretly married in the Caribbean.”
“Despite having had a girlfriend and already after breaking up with Selena, Justin still cares for her and even constantly visits her in rehab where she is undergoing treatment for the side effects of lupus.”


"There has been too much drama in their relationship, they have gone through so much, and maybe that's why they all decided it's time to get married and sneak into a 'happy forever.'"
"So when Serena takes advantage of her time away from the media, a secret wedding may have happened."
"Some reports say that even if everything happens in their relationship, including the so-called fraud scandal, Selena is still willing to marry Justin if he proposes."
Serena Gomez is said to have secretly married Justin Bieber in the Caribbean
"They're even planning to move to Canada or anywhere far away from Los Angeles so they can start living together."
"Although Justin is the cause of Selena's collapse, he continues to pursue her."
"It just means there's a good chance that they'll find each other again."
"But their marriage doesn't seem to surprise everyone because they've been running back and forth emotionally."
"As a result, it is reported that these constant visits have led to the couple's reunion, and even to a reported secret marriage in the Caribbean."
"Despite having a girlfriend and breaking up with Selena, Justin is still concerned about her and even often visits her in rehabilitation center because she is receiving treatment for side effects of lupus."



Number  1334
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Kevin Hart's Wife Puts Him On Lifelong Curfew After Cheating Scandal 'He can’t party and let his hair down like he used to,' dishes pal.”
“Accused cheater Kevin Hart is on a lifelong curfew after the bombshell cheating scandal that rocked his marriage this year, RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!”
“Hart, 38, is said to be on “permanent curfew” given by his wife Eniko Parrish and he willingly signed up for it when he got her back.”
““He can’t party and let his hair down like he used to because Eniko tracks his every move and makes him 100 percent accountable for wherever he’s been,” an insider revealed to Radar.”
“The comedian didn’t have much wiggle room in the matter — and the snitch says he’s bound to the agreement for life!”
““It’s a curfew that has no expiration date and he’s signed up for it because he had no choice.”
“Those were her terms for not leaving him.”“He has to check in every two hours when they’re apart, no exceptions.”
“When he does go out she expects him back by 11pm without fail.”As Radar readers know, just a few months ago an alleged cheating and extortion scandal threatened to tear the newlyweds apart.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Kevin Hart's wife imposed a lifelong curfew on him after the fraud scandal broke out." he can't party and relax like he used to, "he said
"Kevin Hart's marriage was rocked by this year's big cheating scandal. The defendant, Kevin Hart, had a lifelong curfew, RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
Hart, 38, is said to be under a "permanent curfew" imposed by his wife Eniko Parrish, and is willing to sign a curfew agreement when he brings her back
"He can't have a party and relax like he used to, because iniko will track his every move and make him 100% responsible for where he's been," an insider told radar
"The comedian doesn't have much leeway in this matter - the informant says he will abide by the agreement for life!"
"It's a curfew with no expiry date, and he signed up because he had no choice."
"That's the condition that she won't leave him." "When they separate, he has to register every two hours, without exception."
"When he goes out, she wants him back by 11 p.m." Radar readers know that just a few months ago, a so-called fraud and blackmail scandal threatened the newlyweds



Number  1335
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo: Getty Images...”
“Get more from Producer Erica taking over for Sisanie here!”
“Way to go Melissa, I'm definitely going to live my life a little more like you.”
“And that's probably due to the fact that she doesn't feed into any of them!”
“If you scroll through Melissa's Instagram comments, there are FAR more positive comments than negative.”
“If you’re having a great day, you don’t walk past someone and yell, ‘Freak!’ If you’re happy, you say, ‘I love your skirt!’"What's really amazing, though, is that her positive outlook definitely affects the way people see her.”
“...say whatever they want:“It’s the same thing I tell my girls, ‘If somebody is being mean, they’re probably really not happy...”
“She talked about raising her daughters in this kind of world, where people can (and will!)”
“That’s not going to fix or help anything."”
““I’m never going to change things by sitting in my living room bawling.”


"Photo: Getty pictures..."
"Get more from producer Erica, take over sisani here!"
"Well done, Melissa. I'll be more like you."
"It's probably because she didn't feed them!"
"If you look at Melissa's comments on instagram, there are more positive comments than negative ones."
"If you had a good time today, you wouldn't go by someone and yell," freak! If you're happy, you say, "I like your skirt! "But what's really amazing is that her positive attitude will definitely influence people's perception of her."
“… Say what you want to say: "my daughters and I say the same thing," if someone is mean, they may be really unhappy... "
"She talked about raising daughters in a world where people can (and will!)"
"It won't solve or help anything."
"I would never sit in the living room and yell to change the status quo."



Number  1336
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1 morning show outright, topping ‘Good Morning America’ in total viewers and all demos last Monday.””
“Messing said that she regretted appearing on the show after an awkward moment during which Kelly asked a superfan audience member Is it true that you became a lawyer and you became gay because of co star Eric McCormack s character Will Another reason that Hollywood flacks are booking clients...”
“While Megyn Kelly’s had a rocky start to her hour of “Today,” co-star Matt Lauer doesn’t seem to be defending her.”
“When an industry insider remarked to Lauer last week that celebrities are being advised to avoid Kelly s Megyn Kelly Today amid ratings struggles and awkward snafus with famous guests a Page Six spy overheard Lauer reply that he gets it adding It s a big problem for them meaning...”
“Kelly s show...”
“Insiders were stunned that the veteran “Today” host didn’t try to defend his new colleague.”
“We’re told publicists have been steering their clients to other shows, partly because of Kelly’s ailing ratings and partly because of the dust-ups with Jane Fonda and Debra Messing.”
“In September — just two days into her run as host of the 9 a.m. hour of “Today” — Kelly upset Fonda by bringing up the actress’ plastic surgery past.”
“...elsewhere is that Kelly is struggling to hang on to viewers...”
“Everyone’s doing just fine at the ‘Today’ show.”NBC crowed this week that “Today” “was the No.”


"One morning show, which topped the" Good Morning America "list in the total audience and all presentations last Monday."
"Messing said she regretted appearing on the show. At an embarrassing moment, Kelly asked a super fan audience if you really became a lawyer and you became gay because the character of CO STAR ERIC McCormack would be another reason, Hollywood bigwigs booking clients..."
"Although Megan Kelly didn't get off to a good start in one hour of today, it seems that her partner Matt Raul didn't defend her."
"Last week, a person in the industry told Raul that celebrities were advised to avoid Kelly's megyn Kelly during low ratings and embarrassing quarrels with famous guests. A spy on page 6 overheard Raul reply that he understood, adding that it was a big problem for them, meaning..."
"Kelly's performance..."
"Industry insiders were shocked that the veteran" today "host did not try to defend his new colleagues."
"We've been told that PR people have been directing their clients to other shows, partly because of Kelly's poor ratings and partly because of the disturbance over Jane Fonda and Debra messing."
In September, Kelly just served as the host of "today" at 9am for two days. She mentioned Fonda's plastic surgery, which made her very unhappy
“… Elsewhere, Kelly is trying to capture the audience... "
"Everyone did well on today." NBC this week said in a high-profile, "today" is the first



Number  1337
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I’m elated with everything that I’ve been doing since I stepped away from America’s Got Talent.”Read more from Yahoo Entertainment:Follow Lyndsey on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, Google+, Amazon, Tumblr, Spotify...”
““And I was like, ‘Yo, that job doesn’t define me.’ … As an artist, that was a self-defining moment, because a lot of people was like, ‘How can you walk away from such an amazing job?”
“Nick Cannon hosted the show for eight seasons, but he quit after Season 12 (and was later replaced by Tyra Banks) after NBC threatened to fire him for ridiculing the network in his Showtime comedy special Stand Up, Don’t Shoot.”
“Speaking to Yahoo Entertainment a year after the scandal, Cannon says he has no regrets and calls the move “probably one of the best decisions” of his career.”
“It was super controversial for some time but it was a freedom of speech process and me standing firm for my own beliefs and culturally who I am and really for all the employees who have been thumb pressed by their bosses Cannon says discussing the importance of adhering to...”
“...his brand...”
““I kind of stood up and said, ‘Yo, I was threatened for some content that I created.’ And they wanted me to shape up and get in line and watch my choice of words or how I speak about the network.”
“… I was threatened to be fired.”
“I told them, ‘You can’t fire a boss.”
“I quit!’”At the time, Cannon’s choosing to walk away from a reported $4.5 million paycheck shocked his fans, and even people in his camp thought Cannon was making a mistake.”


"Since I left America's got talent, I've been happy with what I've done." Read more articles from Yahoo ente note: follow Lindsay on Facebook, twitter, instagram, Google +, Amazon, Tumblr, spotify... "
"I thought, 'Oh, that job doesn't define me'..." As an artist, it was a moment of self definition, because a lot of people were thinking, "how can you leave such a great job?"
"Nick Cannon hosted eight seasons of the show, but he resigned after season 12 (later replaced by Tara banks) because NBC threatened to fire him because he mocked the TV station in his comedy stand up, don't shoot."
In an interview with Yahoo entertainment a year after the scandal, cannon said he did not regret it, saying it was "probably one of the best decisions of his career."
"This has caused great controversy for a period of time, but it's a process of freedom of speech. I have strengthened my belief, my cultural identity, and the position of all employees who have been thumbed by my boss. Cannon said that it's important to discuss persistence..."
“… His brand... "
"I kind of stood up and said," well, some of my content is under threat. " They want me to stand up in line and watch my words or how I talk about the Internet. "
"I was threatened with dismissal."
"I told them, 'you can't fire the boss.'"
"I'll quit! "At that time, Canon chose to leave the reported $4.5 million salary, which shocked his fans, and even his camp thought that Canon had made a mistake."



Number  1338
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If she and Andrew ever split, so many people are going to side with her.”
“So what’s new?”
“Upton and Blanchett met in the 1990s, fell in love immediately and have been together ever since.”
“They have four kids together, three sons and a baby girl, Edith, whom they adopted in 2015.”
“They live together, they raise their children together and they work together consistently on theater projects.”
“They were co-directors of the Sydney Theatre Company for years, and he’s written and directed theater projects for Cate many times over the years.”
“They seemed totally solid, right?”
“Well, last fall, there were some photos of Upton looking and seeming especially friendly and handsy with a 27-year-old actress, a friend who has worked with him and with Cate.”
“The photos were damning, but they weren’t definitive proof of shenanigans.”
“Still, there seemed to be a few tense months, and Cate was even seen without her wedding ring a few times.”


"If she breaks up with Andrew, there will be a lot of people on her side."
"What's new?"
"Upton and Blanchett met in the 1990s, fell in love and have been together ever since."
"They have four children, three sons and a baby girl, Edith, who they adopted in 2015."
"They live together, raise children together, and work together consistently on theater projects."
"They worked as co directors for the Sydney Theatre Company for many years, and over the years he wrote and directed drama projects for Kate many times."
"They look strong, don't they?"
"Well, last fall, there were some pictures showing Upton looking particularly friendly and handsome with a 27 year old actress, a friend who worked with him and Kate."
"These photos are bad, but they're not conclusive evidence of a prank."
"However, it seems that she has been very nervous in recent months. She even saw Kate not wearing her wedding ring several times."



Number  1339
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“BeyoncéOnly Beyoncé can get away with wearing white to a wedding!”
“Rhianna chose a lilac silk kimono wrap dress with orange lotus flowers.”
“Kate MiddletonGetty ImagesWhen Pippa Middleton tied the knot, the guest list was pure royalty.”
“Jennifer LawrenceJennifer Lawrence was summer wedding perfection in the shimmering lilac slip dress she wore to her BFF's wedding in Tuscany.”
“Selena Gomez arrived in a floor-length burgundy gown with a high neckline.”
“Selena GomezIt was a Wizards of Waverly Place reunion at the wedding of actor David Henrie.”
“But it was Emily Blunt on the arm of her hubby, John Krasinski, who scored a gold style star with her embellished blue dress.”
“Celebs like Matt Damon, Bono, Anna Wintour, and Bill Murray all jetted off to Venice for the nuptials.”
“Emily BluntRobino Salvatore/GC Images/Getty ImagesAt Amal and George Clooney's gorgeous Italian wedding, the guest list was obviously star-studded.”
“Take a look below to see the fiercely fashion-forward outfits your favorite celebrities wore to the weddings of their famous friends.”


"Beyonce can only get away with wearing white clothes to attend the wedding!"
"Rhianna chose a Lavender Silk Kimono wrap dress with an orange lotus on it."
"The image of Kate Middleton when Pippa Middleton married, the guest list was purely Royal."
"The glittering lilac casual dress that Jennifer Lawrence wore at her BFF wedding in Tuscany is perfect for a summer wedding."
"Here comes Serena Gomez in a ground Burgundy robe with a high neckline."
"Selena Gomez, a wizard in weaverish square, was reunited at the wedding of actor David Henry."
"But it's Emily Bronte who's on the arm of her husband, John krazinski, who's won a gold star with her embellished blue dress."
Celebrities such as Matt Damon, Bono, Anna Wintour and Bill Murray flew to Venice for the wedding
"Emily Brent Robino Salvatore / GC images / Getty Images at Amal and George Clooney's gorgeous Italian wedding, the guest list is obviously starry."
"Take a look at the fashionable clothes your favorite celebrities wear at the weddings of their famous friends."



Number  1340
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...recent months the insider claimed There would have been fireworks that s for sure For more on this story pick up the latest issue of In Touch Weekly on newsstands now...”
“The source revealed If she holds on to her anger toward Angelina Brad may see her as petty A source previously told In Touch Brad wants and needs Jen in his life And while the pair has kept quiet about the contact they ve had over the years and in...”
“Because things are going so well between her and Brad at the moment!”
“Why?”
“There’d be a lot of small talk.”And although the source said Jen’s friends knew she might regret reaching out to Angelina, she doesn’t want to hold a grudge about it.”
“I imagine Angelina wouldn’t be able to look her straight in the eye after what she did, even though so much time has passed.”
“The source explained, “It would be so awkward.”
“The source explained, “Angelina said she didn’t owe her an apology.”However, if they did end up having a meeting, it would have been even worse having to rehash how Angelina broke up Brad and Jennifer’s relationship.”
“That would be her decision, and I would welcome it.”Now that Jen and Justin Theroux confirmed their split and Angie and Brad’s marriage fell through as well, “Jen thought it was finally time to resolve the past.” But when Angelina dismissed the idea of dinner, things went sour.”
“But not a real sit-down-and-talk kind of meeting.”


“…… In recent months, the insider claimed that there would be fireworks and firecrackers. Now I'm going to select the latest issue of contact weekly from the newsstand
"Sources revealed that if she insists on angering Angelina, Brad may think she is a stingy source before telling in contact Brad wants and needs Jan in his life, while the two have been keeping silent contact with each other for many years and in..."
"Because now she has a good relationship with Brad!"
"Why?"
"There will be a lot of chitchat." Although the source said Jane's friends knew she might regret contacting Angelina, she didn't want to hold a grudge against it
"I don't think Angelina can look her in the eye even after such a long time."
"It's going to be embarrassing," the source explained
"The source explained," Angelina said she didn't owe her an apology. "However, if they do have a meeting, it's even worse, and I have to mention how Angelina broke the relationship between Brad and Jennifer."
"It's her decision and I'll welcome it." Now that Jane and Justin Cyrus have confirmed their breakup, Angie and Brad's marriage has broken up, "Jane thinks it's time to get over it." But when Angelina gave up eating, things got worse
"But it's not really a sitting down meeting."



Number  1341
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““It wasn’t as bad as other areas of Texas.”
“Beyoncé, a Houston native, shared a black-and-white Instagram photo of the state flag with the message: “Texas you are in my prayers.”Meanwhile, Texas native Longoria detailed her recent trip back home to San Antonio.”
“Selena Gomez, 25, has also donated, as well as Demi Lovato, who tweeted that she donated $50,000 to a CrowdRise campaign along with good friend Nick Jonas.”
“...a fellow Oscar winner Sandra Bullock who also donated 1 million to relief efforts on Tuesday...”
“And I hope people understand and can put themselves in those people s shoes and just to know what it feels like to have everything taken away from you The Leonardo DiCaprio Foundation donated 1 million on Wednesday to the United Way Harvey Recovery Fund following in the footsteps of...”
“I am really happy to help in any way I can,” she said.”
““It just really makes me just really upset.”
“On Thursday, Miley Cyrus announced on The Ellen DeGeneres Show that she’s donating $500,000 through her Happy Hippie Foundation.”
“Scooter Braun, Justin Bieber’s manager, is helming the event, the Los Angeles Times reports.”
“Foxx also shared that he would be part of a telethon aimed at raising money for hurricane victims airing Sept. 12.”


"It's not as bad as the rest of Texas."
Beyonce, a Houston native, shared a black-and-white photo of a flag on instagram and left a message: "you're praying for me." Meanwhile, Longoria, a Texan, detailed her recent trip back to San Antonio
"Selena Gomez, 25, also donated, as did Demi Lovato, who tweeted that she and her good friend Nick Jonas contributed $50000 to the crowdfunding campaign."
“…… Oscar winner Sandra Bullock also donated $1 million to disaster relief work on Tuesday. "
"I want people to understand, to put themselves in their shoes, just to know how it feels to take everything away from you - the Leonardo DiCaprio Foundation donated $1 million to the United Way Harvey rehabilitation foundation on Wednesday, following "The pace of the world."
"I'm really happy to help as much as I can," she said
"It really makes me sad."
"On Thursday, on Ellen DeGeneres, Miley Cyrus announced that she would donate $500000 through her happy Hippie foundation."
According to the Los Angeles Times, Justin Bieber's agent, Scott Braun, is hosting the event
"Fox also revealed that he will participate in the September 12 broadcast aimed at raising money for hurricane victims of the television program."



Number  1342
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...amicable way...”
“Their opposite opinions on raising their six children in and out of the spotlight is a big reason behind their divorce and it is why the former power couple are still at war today Advertisement Fans are hoping the pair will work this out away from the spotlight in an...”
“...sees another picture in the press of Angelina and the kids he quietly fumes while and he doubles his energy to provide the children with a quiet peaceful normal life...”
“While Angelina has decided to treat the children like her best friends and takes them on fun dates to her award show appearances Brad is a father who has wants to instill in his children the wholesome humble midwest values he grew up learning The insider said Every time Brad...”
“Angelina continues to drag them to red carpets events, award shows, and extravagant trips around the world while Brad has been doing the opposite.”
“A source told Hollywood Life: “Brad and Angelina have been at war on how to raise their many children.”
“He does get to see them, but it is not nearly as much as he would like and it is always up to Angelina when it happens.”The person went on to say that Angelina is waging war against the father of her children on other fronts.”
“He misses his kids more than ever.”
“An insider claimed: “The holidays are extra hard for Brad.”
“For example, it was reported that Angelina denied him access to the kids for the holidays.”


“… Friendly way... "
"They have opposite views on raising six children in the spotlight, which is an important reason for their divorce. This is also the reason why the former powerful couple are still fighting today. Advertising fans hope that the couple can be separated from the spotlight in a way..."
“… I saw another picture of Angelina and the children in the newspaper. He smoked quietly, and he redoubled his efforts to provide a peaceful and normal life for the children... "
"When Angelina decided to treat the children as her best friends and take them to her awards ceremony, Brad was a father who wanted to instill healthy and humble Midwest values in the children. He learned that from a young age, the insider said every time..."
"Angelina continues to drag them into red carpet events, awards ceremonies and luxury trips around the world, while Brad keeps doing the opposite."
"Brad and Angelina have been arguing about how to raise their children," a source told Hollywood life
"He does have a chance to see them, but it's not as much as he wants. It's always up to Angelina when it happens." The man goes on to say that Angelina is fighting her child's father in other ways
"He missed his children more than ever."
"The holiday was particularly hard for Brad," one insider said
"For example, there are reports that Angelina refused to let him touch the children during the holidays."



Number  1343
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Image sources: Jennifer Aniston before and after surgery.”
“Lip InjectionsIn 2008, Aniston was photographed with her lips looking a bit plumper than usual.”
“She quickly became a household name, even donning a signature haircut otherwise known as "The Rachel."”
“Since her rocket to stardom, Aniston has also made headlines for her love life, marrying and subsequently divorcing Hollywood's leading man, Brad Pitt.”
“Following her divorce, rumors have swirled that Aniston has surgically altered her appearance, including a modest breast enhancement and not-so-modest lip injections.”
“While the actress publicly discusses her tough workout regimens, and declares that she is all-natural, one can't help but wonder: has America's sweetheart undergone cosmetic surgery?”
“Breast AugmentationWhile many have speculated that Aniston has undergone breast enhancement, the actress adamantly denies the rumors, even chalking her fuller breasts up to weight gain and a few too many "cheese boards."”
“The rumors were fueled by celebrity magazines that published photos of Aniston's breasts appearing fuller than ever during an appearance on the 2007 People's Choice Awards.”
“RhinoplastyA quick look at a "then and now" profile of Aniston leads many people to believe that she has undergone not one, but two rhinoplasty surgeries.”
“In photos taken in the early 90s, Aniston's bridge and nostrils appear much wider than they do today.”


"Image source: before and after Jennifer Aniston's operation."
"Lip injections in 2008, Aniston was photographed looking fuller than usual."
She soon became a household name and even had her signature haircut, also known as "Rachel."
Since Aniston became a star, her love life has made headlines. She married and divorced Hollywood actor Brad Pitt
"After the divorce, there were rumors that Aniston had undergone surgery to change her appearance, including moderate breast augmentation and less moderate lip injections."
When the actress openly talks about her tough exercise program and claims that she was born, people can't help asking: has America's sweetheart ever had plastic surgery? "
"Breast enhancement although many people speculate that Aniston has had breast enhancement surgery, the actress firmly denies this rumor, and even attributes her plump chest to weight gain and too many" cheese plates. "
"The rumors were sparked by celebrity magazines that published photos of Aniston's Fuller Breasts than ever when she appeared at the people's Choice Awards in 2007."
"Augmentation rhinoplasty" a quick look at Aniston's "then and now" profile makes many people believe that what she experienced was not once, but twice
"In photos taken in the early 1990s, Aniston's nose bridge and nostrils looked much wider than they are now."



Number  1344
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image Credit: FameFlynet...”
“A lot of fans believe that Kate is secretly struggling with parenthood and that’s why she’s been using the online parenting site for advice.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge recently admitted that she often feels isolated as a young mother to her two children, Prince George and Princess Charlotte.”
“Yet royal observers can’t help but wonder if Kate might be trying to relay a different kind of message with her heartfelt admission.”
“During a Team Heads Together event in London, Kate Middleton said motherhood has often made her feel lonely, too.”
“She was chatting with the fellow mothers who have developed an app to help mothers find friends who are in a similar situation as they are.”
“According to the Independent, the Duchess reportedly told them, “Yes, it is lonely at times and you do feel quite isolated but actually so many other mothers are going through exactly what you are going through.”
“It is being brave enough, like you obviously were, to reach out to those around you.”A lot of people can’t help but wonder just how lonely Kate might be feeling behind closed doors at times.”
“This isn’t the first time that Kate Middleton has made headlines for her personal problems.”
“Recent reports also indicated that Kate might be a secret user of the online chat forum, Mumsnet.”


"Image source: fameflynet..."
"Many fans think Kate is struggling secretly as a parent, which is why she has been seeking advice from online parenting websites."
The Duchess of Cambridge recently admitted that as a young mother, she often feels lonely about her two children, Prince George and Princess Charlotte
"However, Royal observers can't help asking if Kate is trying to convey another message with her sincere acknowledgement."
Kate Middleton said at a team work event in London that being a mother also often makes her feel lonely
"She chats with mothers who have developed an app to help them find friends who are in a similar situation."
According to the independent, the Duchess said to them, "yes, sometimes you feel lonely. You do feel lonely, but in fact many other mothers are experiencing what you are experiencing."
"Obviously, it's a kind of courage, like you, to reach out to the people around you." Many people can't help wondering how lonely Kate sometimes feels when she closes the door
"It's not the first time Kate Middleton has made headlines because of personal problems."
"Recent reports also suggest that Kate may be a secret user of mumsnet, an online chat forum."



Number  1345
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— Tim Plant...”
“She want’s everyone there to make sure they are on the same page.”
“The Momager has instructed all of her daughters as well as Kanye and Bruce to drop what they are doing and help her deal with this crisis.”
“Kris Jenner is a woman who get’s things done, which is exactly why she jumped into action as soon as she saw Rob Kardashian‘s, shocking message on Instagram comparing his sister Kim Kardashian to Rosamund Pike’s sociopathic Gone Girl character.”
“The family matriarch has quickly circled the wagons and ordered a family meeting to strategize how to deal with Rob’s situation.”
“Kris Jenner On Rob Kardashian’s Message: Orders Emergency Family MeetingKris was certainly shocked when she saw Rob’s post with the caption, “This is my sister kim , the bitch from Gone Girl,,,” — but instead of standing around doing nothing the 59-year-old manager started working the phones.”
““Kris ordered Kim, Kanye, Khloe, Bruce and everyone else to her house for an emergency family meeting to figure out how to best handle this situation,” a Kardashian family source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““That’s how Kris handles a family crisis’ with a big family meeting.”
“Part of the meeting will be to brainstorm ways to help Rob, but another part will definitely be so Kris can make sure everyone is on message.”Rob’s recent behavior is definitely scaring the family, so they understand the urgency of Kris’ calls.”
““She has told Rob to apologize to Kim but he has refused which is only getting Kris more heated.”What do you think HollywoodLifers, does Rob need help?”


"- Tim factory..."
"She wants everyone on the same page."
"Mom has instructed all her daughters and Kanye and Bruce to give up what they are doing and help her deal with the crisis."
"Chris Jenner is a woman who does things. That's why when she saw rob Kardashian's shocking message on instagram, she immediately took action and compared his sister, Kim Kardashian, to Rosamond Parker's antisocial role."
"The matriarch soon made a round of the carriage and ordered a family meeting to discuss how to deal with Rob's situation."
"Rob Kardashian's message: an order for an emergency family meeting" Chris Jenner must have been shocked when he saw Rob's post titled "this is my sister Kim, a whore from lost girl",,, "- but instead of standing around doing nothing, the 59 year old manager started to make phone calls
"Chris ordered Kim, Kanye, Chloe, Bruce and everyone else to come to her home for an emergency family meeting to try to best deal with the situation," a source from the Kardashian family told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"That's how Chris handled the family crisis through a big family meeting."
"Part of the meeting will be brainstorming to help rob, but the other part will certainly be that Chris can make sure everyone is on the information." Rob's recent behavior must have scared his family, so they understand the urgency of Chris's call
"She has told rob to apologize to Kim, but he refused, which will only make Chris more angry." Do you think rob, Hollywood stars, needs help? "



Number  1346
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This latest article involving Oxman is equally untrue.”
“We recently busted New Idea for making up a story about Clooney getting Pitt and Jennifer Aniston back together.”
“It’s worth noting, this isn’t the first time Gossip Cop has had to debunk a bogus story about Clooney supposedly playing a role in his friend’s love life.”
“This is just a fabricated story based on a phony premise.”
“In addition to the fact that Pitt and Oxman aren’t a couple, a mutual pal of ours and Clooney tells us on background that the actor’s friend hasn’t turned to him for advice about dating the MIT professor.”
“News, which similarly reported that Pitt and Oxman are “strictly friends.”This article only seems to exist because Woman’s Day came up with a way to drag Clooney into his pal’s imaginary romance.”
“This has been backed up by trusted publications such as People, which recently noted Pitt and Oxman have a “professional friendship,” as while as E!”
“Pitt’s rep has told us on the record several times that the actor isn’t dating Oxman.”
“...circus The seemingly nonexistent tipster further contends that Pitt is very grateful for Amal because he s not used to having a non famous girlfriend and Neri never expected to be in the limelight The tabloid s article however is nothing more than fan fiction...”
“It s sweet payback for all the jokes Brad tossed his way after George started dating Amal The outlet s questionable insider goes on to say that although Clooney has been messing with Pitt Amal has actually been advising Neri on ways to keep calm and grounded amid the media...”


"This latest article about Oxman is equally untrue."
"We've come up with a new idea recently, which is to make up a story about Clooney getting Peter and Jennifer Aniston back together."
"It's worth noting that this is not the first time the gossip police have had to expose a false story about Clooney's role in his friend's love life."
"It's just a fabricated story based on false premises."
"Except that Pete and Oxman are not a couple, a mutual friend of ours and Clooney told us backstage that the actor's friend had not asked him for advice on dating an MIT professor."
It was also reported that Pitt and Oxman were "strictly friends". This article seems to exist because women's day has come up with a way to drag Clooney into the romantic story imagined by his friends
This is supported by reliable publications such as people, which recently pointed out the "professional friendship" between Pitt and Oxman, while e
"Pete's agent has told us publicly several times that the actor didn't date Oxman."
“… The informant, who does not seem to exist in the circus, further argues that Pete is very grateful to Amar because he is not used to having an unknown girlfriend and Neri. He never thought that the tabloid article would be just a fan novel under the spotlight... "
"After George started dating Amar, Brad made a lot of jokes, which is a good reward. An insider with problems in the media went on to say that although Clooney has been playing with Peter, Amar has actually been advising Neri how to keep calm and down-to-earth in the media... "



Number  1347
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He enveloped her and held her until the entire cast moved to say goodbye to Gleb Savchenko and Sasha Pieterse.”
“When it was announced that her husband, Nick Lachey, was not in jeopardy of elimination for the first time in three weeks, she threw herself into Chmerkovskiy’s arms.”
“Despite sources telling PEOPLE that things have been tense in the rehearsal room, Lachey relied on Chmerkovskiy for comfort during Monday’s emotional elimination.”
“...for higher scores...”
“Image zoom PEOPLE s special issue 25 Seasons of Dancing with the Stars is on stands now After they received their scores 24 30 fans continued to comment on their demeanor calling it uncomfortable But when the cameras stopped rolling Chmerkovskiy was seen comforting Lachey who seemingly had been hoping...”
“Chmerkovksiy jokingly slid by a few minutes later, making Lachey giggle before they got into their place as the show picked up after the commercials.”
“After running though the routine, Lachey went back over to her children.”
“During the commercial break before their performance, Lachey and Chmerkovskiy both took time to chat with Lachey’s two older children, who were sitting in the front row before Chmerkovskiy led Lachey to the middle of the ballroom to rehearse their dance.”
“While some fans said you could “cut the tension” between the two, Chmerkovskiy, 37, and Lachey, 36 actually appeared to be a very loving pair behind the scenes during the live show.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”


"He wrapped her up and held her until all the actors left, saying goodbye to Greb safchenko and Sasha petersay."
"When it was announced that her husband, Nick Lachey, was not in danger of being eliminated for the first time in three weeks, she fell into the arms of zimmerkovsky."
"Although a source told people that the atmosphere in the rehearsal room had been tense, rachi still relied on zimmerkovsky for comfort during Monday's emotional relief."
“… The higher the score... "
"Image zoom character special issue" dancing with stars 25 seasons "has been on the shelves since it got the score. 2430 fans continue to comment on their behavior, saying it's very uncomfortable. But when the camera stops rolling, some people see chimmelkovsky comforting rachi, who seems to have been hoping for..."
"A few minutes later, chimmelkovsky jokingly slipped over and made rachi giggle, and then they got into their place, because after the ad, the show started."
"After the routine, rachi went back to her children."
"During the business break before the performance, rachi and chimmelkovsky took time to chat with rachi's two older children, they sat in the front row, and then chimmelkovsky led rachi to the middle of the dance hall to rehearse the dance."
"Although some fans say you can" ease "the tension between the two, in the live performance, the 37 year old chimkovsky and 36 year old rachi seem to be a very loving couple behind the scenes."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc



Number  1348
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He’s skinny… It looks like he’s aged 10 years.””
““He doesn’t look like he did when he was on TV,” this Hamptons resident revealed.”
“More like friends until scandal.”
“Matt Lauer is losing more people close to him following his sexual harassment allegations.”
“According to Radar, the former Today show host is friendless after his old Long Island pals disowned once news of his allegations and subsequent firing broke.”
“Famous pals like rock icon Billy Joel and radio host Howard Stern are cutting all ties to the disgraced anchor.”
““These guys don’t exactly have the best track records in their own married lives, and they also have their careers to protect,” a source tells Radar.”
““Whenever they had get-togethers, Matt would never show up with Annette, and the other wives don’t want their guys anywhere near him.”(Photo Credit: Getty Images)Joel, 68, got married for a fourth time to equestrian Alexis Roderick, 36.”
“While Howard, 64, left his first wife to marry model and actress Beth Ostrosky, 45.”
“Both men admittedly don’t have the best track record when it comes to marriage and they’re not willing to rick their current relationships by being associated with the 60-year-old.”


"He's thin It looks like he's 10 years old
"He doesn't look like he did on TV," the Hampton resident said
"More like a friend before the scandal."
"Matt Raul lost more people close to him after being charged with sexual harassment."
According to radar, the former "today" presenter lost friends after his old friends on Long Island denied their identity as soon as they heard of his accusations and subsequent dismissal
"Famous friends like rock idol Billy Joel and radio host Howard Stern are cutting off all ties with the infamous anchor."
"These people don't have the best record in their marriage life, and they also have their own careers to protect," a source told radar
"When they get together, Matt doesn't show up with Annette, and the other wives don't want their men near him." (photo source: Getty Images) Joel, 68, married Alexis Roderick, a 36 year old equestrian, for the fourth time
Howard, 64, left his first wife and married model and actress Beth Ostrowski, 45
"There's no denying that neither of them has the best record in marriage, and they don't want to ruin their current relationship by associating with a 60 year old."



Number  1349
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Blake.””
““You guys are very lucky that [she’s here],” Blake told the very excited crowd as he spoke about Gwen.”
“Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are taking aim at the constant tabloid rumors claiming that they’re having children.”
“The country star poked fun at the seemingly never-ending speculation that Gwen may be pregnant with the couple’s child (or children) during a recent performance in Oklahoma, where he joked that his girlfriend of over two years had just given birth to twins.”
“Shelton made the joke about his girlfriend – who has three children with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale – while introducing her on stage to perform with him during a recent concert in his home state last week.”
“A video captured by concert goers, and obtained by PopCulture.com this week, shows the two teaming up to perform their 2016 duet “Go Ahead And Break My Heart” as they both stopped by Shelton’s restaurant and events space Ole Red in Tishomingo, Oklahoma, last week.”
“After Blake took the stage to perform a few of his hits, the crowd could then be heard chanting “Gwen!”
“Gwen!”
“Gwen!” as they encouraged the No Doubt singer to join her man on stage.”
“That’s when Blake invited Stefani to join him as he performed for fans, introducing her by joking to the crowd that they were all “lucky” to have her perform because she’d only just given birth to their twins the day before.”


"Black."
"You're lucky (she's here)," Blake told the excited audience of Gwen
"Blake Sheldon and Gwen Stefani are targeting the constant tabloid rumors that they have children."
"At a recent show in Oklahoma, the country star joked about the seemingly endless speculation that Gwen might be pregnant with the couple's children. He joked that his girlfriend of more than two years had just given birth to twins."
"When Sheldon introduced his girlfriend to a concert in his hometown last week, he made a joke about her - she has three children with her ex husband Gavin Rossdale."
This week, the two performed the duet "go, break my heart" in 2016. They both stopped at Sheldon restaurant and activity space ole red in tishomigo, Oklahoma last week
After Blake performed some popular songs on stage, the audience could hear "Gwen!"
"Gwen
"Gwen! "When they encourage this unquestionable singer to join her male singer's stage."
"At that time, Blake invited Stefani to join him in his performance for his fans. When he introduced Stefani to the audience, Blake joked that they were" lucky "to have her perform because she had just given birth to their twins the day before."



Number  1350
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Kanye West 'Touchy Feely' With Candace Owens At Listening Party — And Kim Was There!”
“Rapper and pro-Trump commentator 'looked more than friends,' claims source.”
“While everyone was listening, he was flirting!”
“Kanye West threw a party and invited everybody who was somebody to listen to his new “Ye” album in Jackson Hole, Wyoming last week.”
“And despite wifey Kim Kardashian being in attendance, Kanye’s attention was on a different woman, RadarOnline.com is exclusively reporting.”
“Insider claim Kanye, 40, has a thing for Trump supporter and conservative activist Candace Owens.”
“The “New Slaves” rapper boldly professed how much he loves the way she thinks in a Twitter post on Apr.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Kanye West and Candice Owens are" touching "at the listening party - Kim is there too!"
"Rappers and pro trump commentators" seem more important than friends, "the source said
"Everybody's listening, but he's flirting!"
Last week, Kanye West held a party in Jackson Hole, Wyoming, where all the famous people were invited to listen to his new album "yay."
"Although his wife, Kim Kardashian, was present, Kanye's attention was focused on another woman, RadarOnline.com The website is exclusive. "
"According to insiders, Kanye, 40, has a crush on Candice Owens, a supporter of trump and a conservative activist."
The "new slave" rapper boldly said in a twitter post on April 1 that he loved her way of thinking



Number  1351
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Follow @htshowbiz for more...”
“It’s all about spending quality time together, but still giving each other space during the workday,” the source added.”
“That’s why they’ve been seen out and about more together lately.”
“Part of their therapy is to go on more date nights.”
“According to the newspaper, Rossi’s friends suggested her to seek therapy but the “Nip/Tuck” actress was “resisting help.”“Ellen has been in counselling, both solo and with Portia.”
“When Ellen kisses up to her famous friends, Portia becomes consumed with self-doubt,” the source told National Enquirer newspaper.”
“But it works both ways.”
““Ellen can’t deal when Portia gets attached to anyone else, man or woman.”
“The two are living separately in California.”
“Last week, the couple were believed to be on the verge of divorce and jealousy was the cause of the couple’s problems.”


"Follow @ htshowbiz to learn more..."
"It's all about having a good time together, but making room for each other on weekdays," the source added
"That's why they've been together a lot lately."
"Part of their treatment is going out more."
According to newspaper reports, Rosie's friends suggested she seek treatment, but the "nip / Tuck" actress "refused to help." "Alan has been in counseling, including alone and Portia."
"When Ellen kisses her famous friend, Portia starts to doubt herself," the source told the national inquirer
"But it's two-way."
"When Portia has relationships with other people, whether it's a man or a woman, Ellen can't handle it."
"They live separately in California."
"Last week, it was believed that the couple was about to divorce and jealousy was the cause of the couple's problems."



Number  1352
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“… It still works!””
“I guess I wanted to say, ‘This is my DNA.’ I’m just a girl from Anaheim, CA and I’ve never been anything else… And for a song to be relevant 20 years later?”
“But why?”
“— Check out her latest interview…Did Gwen Stefani, 48, just reveal that she’s quitting music after her Just a Girl Las Vegas residency?”
“Well, not quite.”
“But, she did admit that she’s nearing the end of her music journey, and she’s OK with that!”
““I always think it’s fine if I never do it again,” she told OK magazine about performing.”
““Then when I get on stage, I’m like, ‘Oh my gosh, I love this!’ I love my music, I love being up there.”
“It’s my gift — it’s what I’m here for.”
“I’m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician,” she continued.”


“… Still valid! "
"I think I want to say, 'this is my DNA.' I'm just a girl from Anaheim, California, and I've never done anything else Does a song in 20 years make sense? "
"But why?"
"- look at her latest interview Has Gwen Stephanie, 48, revealed that she's quitting music after working as a girl's intern in Las Vegas? "
"Well, not exactly."
"But she does admit that her musical journey is coming to an end, and she has no problem with it!"
"I always thought it would be nice if I didn't do it again," she told OK magazine about acting
"When I'm on stage, I'll say, 'my God, I love this! "I love my music, I love being there."
"It's my gift - that's why I'm here."
"Obviously, my career as a musician has come to an end," she continued



Number  1353
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Wait.”
“That's what Senator Brian Schatz, of Hawaii, zeroed in on in his response to the situation.”
“While everyone is entitled to their own opinions, I don’t think it’s too much to ask NFL players to respect the Flag and our National Anthem.”
“At a time when so many Americans are inspiring our nation with their courage, resolve, and resilience, now, more than ever, we should rally around our Flag and everything that unites us.”
“Pence followed his tweets with an official statement, which was word-for-word what he tweeted:I left today’s Colts game because President Trump and I will not dignify any event that disrespects our soldiers, our Flag, or our National Anthem.”
“Protests would likely have happened at any game where players weren't encouraged by their owners to link arms or show some other empty form of "unity" in the face of Trump's criticism — but the 49ers connection made it all the more likely.”
“That hasn't stopped his former teammates and others in the league from continuing (or starting) to kneel and display other forms of dissent during the playing of the anthem.”
“Kaepernick is currently not on an NFL roster, which many believe is due to his role in the movement.”
“The 49ers are the former team of Colin Kaepernick, whose protests in 2016 ignited the current controversy.”
“The VP probably knew what he was getting into for the game.”


"Wait a minute."
"That's exactly what Senator Brian Schatz of Hawaii is focusing on when dealing with the situation."
"Although everyone has the right to express their opinions, I don't think it's too much to ask NFL players to respect the national flag and our national anthem."
"At a time when so many Americans inspire our country with their courage, determination and resilience, we should now, more than ever, unite around the flag and everything that unites us."
"Burns made an official statement after his micro blog, which is what he said: I left today's Pony race because President trump and I will not let any activities that do not respect our soldiers, our flag or our national anthem appear dignified."
"Protests are likely to take place in any game. In the face of Trump's criticism, players will not be encouraged by their owners to connect weapons or show other empty forms of" unity "- but the 49 person connection makes it more likely to happen."
"It doesn't stop his former teammates and others in the league from continuing (or starting) to kneel down and show other forms of dissent while playing the national anthem."
"Capenick is not on the NFL list at the moment and many people think it's because of his role in sports."
"The 49 are former members of Colin kaepernick's team, and the 2016 protest triggered the current controversy."
"The vice president may know what game he's playing."



Number  1354
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For me, my family comes first.”
“I constantly work at maintaining balance.”
“(2005)Named #48 in FHM magazine's "100 Sexiest Women in the World 2006" supplement.”
“Met her biological mother in the early 1990sNamed #29 in FHM's "100 Sexiest Women in the World 2005" special supplement.”
“When Tim McGraw proposed, in one of the trailers, he had to go perform, so she wrote her response on the mirror (reportedly with either a lipstick or a marker pen).”
“She will play the role of Sarah Sunderson.”
“At age 19, she left for Nashville where she worked as a gofer for Reba McEntireIs set to make her film debut in a remake of The Stepford Wives (1975) with Nicole Kidman .”
“An older brother drove her to gigs and bought her blue suede boots.”
“She made only enough money to pay the band and buy gas for the car.”
“As a big-haired high school brunette, she scheduled singing gigs at fairs and churches around her duties as prom queen and cheerleader.”


"For me, family comes first."
"I've always been committed to balance."
(2005) was named "48" in FHM magazine's "2006 Global 100 sexiest women" supplement
She met her biological mother in early 1990 and scored 29 points in FHM's "2005 world's 100 sexiest women" special supplement
"When Tim McGraw suggested that he had to perform in a trailer, she wrote her response (said to be lipstick or marker) in the mirror."
"She's going to play Sarah Sanderson."
At the age of 19, she went to Nashville, where she worked as a girl scout for Reba mcentiris, preparing to make her debut with Nicole Kidman in a remake of "the wife of Stamford" (1975)
"A brother drove her to a concert and bought her a pair of blue suede boots."
"She only earns enough to pay for the band and gas for the car."
As a high school brunette with big hair, she arranged concerts at dances and churches, as prom queen and cheerleader



Number  1355
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“The […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“We’re told the story is “made-up.” According to MediaTakeOut, Sabbag is “suggesting that she’s pregnant with Kevin’s baby.” And how did the site come to this conclusion?”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively correct this inaccurate speculation.”
“Montia Sabbag may be pregnant with Kevin Hart ’s baby, alleges a site with a less than stellar track record.”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
“[… ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
We heard that the story was "made up.". According to mediatakeout, Sabbag is "suggestive that she is pregnant with Kevin's baby." How did the website come to this conclusion? "
"The gossip police can completely correct this kind of inaccurate guess."
"Montia SABAG may be pregnant with Kevin Hart's baby, which is claimed by a website, but its record is not so good."



Number  1356
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
““Who knows what might happen during filming?”We pay for juicy info!”
““Kristen never mentions her girlfriend Stella [Maxwell] when Drew is around,” adds the source.”
““(Both) are more than a little flirtatious with each other.”Apparently so much so that Drew has unofficially joined the project as a mentor, and her bubbly personality is helping bring Kristen, “who can be pretty shy,” out of her shell.”
““Everyone has noticed the chemistry between them,” the source revealed.”
“Now, Stewart, who is in talks for the latest reboot of Charlie’s Angels, has turned for guidance to Barrymore, star and producer of the 2000 film and its sequel, an insider tells Radar.”
“The Twilight actress, 28, and the Santa Clarita Diet star, 43, have both openly talked about their bisexuality.”
“Drew Barrymore may be bemoaning her lack of a dating life, but RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively she’s got a welcome distraction in Kristen Stewart.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Who knows what happens in the process of shooting? "We pay for interesting information!"
"When drew was there, Christine never mentioned her girlfriend Stella," the source added
"(both) a little flirting with each other." Apparently, drew has joined the project informally as a mentor, and her lively personality is helping "possibly shy" Christine out of the woods
"Everyone noticed the chemical reaction between them," the source said
"Now, Stewart is negotiating for the latest sequel to Charlie's angel, and he has sought guidance from Barrymore, the star and producer of the 2000 film and its sequel, an insider told radar."
Both the 28 year old Twilight star and the 43 year old Santa Clarita weight loss star have publicly talked about their bisexuality
Drew Barrymore may be lamenting her life without a date, but RadarOnline.com She has a popular distraction with Kristen Stewart



Number  1357
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"So I was like, 'Oh yeah, I could see why you were questioning that.'"”
“News.”
“"My mom called me because I actually really did look pregnant," she told E!”
“She blamed the "baby bump" on some extra cheese she ate during lunch.”
“In May, she shot down pregnancy rumors that had sparked following the publication of paparazzi pics of her in a bikini.”
“It was so funny, the one time they don't say I'm pregnant, I am!"”
“"And then they go, 'Eva's fat!'”
“...the actress joked to In Touch, in comments posted on Wednesday.”
“"I'd have a burger and: 'Eva's pregnant!'"”
“Like many female celebs, Longoria has been the subject of pregnancy rumors for years, and she's maintained her sense of humor about them.”


"So I thought," Oh yes, I know why you question that. "
"News."
"My mother called me because I really looked pregnant," she told e! "
She blamed the "baby lump" on eating some extra cheese at lunch
"In May of this year, she refuted the rumors that paparazzi published pictures of her wearing a bikini and that she was pregnant."
"It's so funny, once they didn't say I was pregnant, I was!"
"And they said," EVA's fat! "
“…… "The actress joked about contact in her comments on Wednesday
"I want a hamburger and say: 'EVA's pregnant!"
"Like many female celebrities, Longoria has been the subject of pregnancy rumors for years, and she has a sense of humor about them."



Number  1358
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“You get me?”
“And we love her for it.”
“Yesterday, People magazine published a story based on quotes from a “source” that said Khloe is happy with her decision to stay in Cleveland with baby True, and that she’s keen to marry Tristan Thompson eventually, despite all that nasty cheating business.”
“Getty Images“Khloe wants to get married eventually, but there are no serious wedding talks yet,” the source said.”
““She does talk about a future with Tristan, though.”
“She believes they can figure things out and have a happy life together.”Two hours after the story was published, Khloe tweeted: “I can’t believe some of the stories people create.”
“Where do they come from and who are these “sources”?”
“Hummmm.”In fairness, Khloe may not have been referring to this story in particular.”
“But she also may very well have been.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Do you understand?"
"So we love her."
Yesterday, people magazine published a report based on a "source" quote that Chloe was happy with her decision to stay in Cleveland with "baby real" and longed to marry Tristan Thompson, despite all the dirty cheating
"Getty pictures" Chloe hopes to get married eventually, but there are no serious wedding negotiations, "the source said
"But she did talk about the future with Tristan."
"She believes they can solve problems and live a happy life together." Two hours after the story was published, Khloe tweeted: "I can't believe some of the stories people create."
"Where do they come from and who are these" sources "
"Well." To be fair, Khloe may not have specifically mentioned the story
"But she's probably the same."



Number  1359
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Right now she is pitching the idea to TV executives and we'll see if she indeed becomes a Lewiston, Idaho resident here in the near future!”
“If Caitlyn moves to Lewiston she wants cameras to follow her every move.”
“She is of course concerned about the conservative views that a lot of Idahoans have, but she also sees the move as an opportunity to make money.”
“According to Radar Online Caitlyn no longer feels welcome in Hollywood and she's has little interaction with the Kardashian clan anymore, so she sees no reason to stay there.”
“That's the biggest reason Caitlyn is considering a move to Idaho, because she wants to be close to her Mom who is in her 90's and not doing well health wise.”
“I didn't even realize this, but Caitlyn's Mom, Esther, has lived in Lewiston for some time.”
“Can you guess which city she plan on moving to?”
“Now Caitlyn Jenner is looking at moving to the Gem State.”
“A lot of celebrities have made Idaho home and its easy to see why.”


"Now she's selling the idea to TV executives, and we'll see if she really becomes a resident of Lewiston, Idaho, in the near future!"
"If Caitlin moves to Lewiston, she wants the camera to track her every move."
"She certainly worries about the conservative views of many Idaho people, but she also thinks it's an opportunity to make money."
According to radar online, Caitlin is no longer popular in Hollywood, and she has little contact with the Kardashian family, so she feels there is no reason to stay there
"That's the biggest reason Caitlin is considering moving to Idaho, because she wants to be close to her mother in her 90s, and she's not in good health."
"I didn't even realize it, but Katherine's mother, Esther, has been living in Lewiston for some time."
"Can you guess which city she is going to move to?"
"Now Caitlin Jenner is thinking about moving to Gem State."
"Many celebrities have made Idaho their home, and it's easy to see why."



Number  1360
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Yes, she has been praised and criticised as “outspoken”, but her style never risks being “aggressive” or “combative”, or any of the other words thrown at women who are deemed insufficiently graceful when they disagree with men.”
“Besides becoming an actor, she became a feminist who worked for UN Women as an advocate for political participation and leadership.”
“This must have happened in the 80s and early 90s when she was a young girl; it still happens in the US to every black woman I know who has a mixed-race child.”
“Prosperous and largely white: Meghan’s mother was regularly mistaken for her nanny there.”
“The family settled in Woodland Hills, a prosperous Los Angeles neighbourhood.”
“This union of white Hollywood and black social-spiritual activism made her the offspring of a modern and ever more varied biracial bourgeoisie.”
“...and yoga instructor who focuses on community mental health...”
“Photograph Chris Jackson AFP Getty Images Rachel Meghan Markle for those who have chosen or somehow managed to miss the ceaseless chronicling of her life thus far is the only daughter of Thomas Markle white an Emmy award winning cinematographer and lighting designer and Doria Ragland black a social worker...”
“Women don’t need to find a voice, they have a voice, and they need to feel empowered to use it, and people need to be encouraged to listen.”Meghan Markle and the Duchess of Cambridge at the Royal Foundation Forum.”
“So did the words “I fundamentally disagree”, as in: “What’s interesting is … when speaking about girls’ and women’s empowerment you’ll often hear people say: ‘Well, you’re helping women find their voices,’ and I fundamentally disagree with that.”


Yes, she is praised and criticized as "outspoken," but her style never risks being "aggressive" or "aggressive," and never throws out any other words to women who are considered less elegant when they disagree with men
"In addition to being an actress, she became a feminist, working for UN women, advocating political participation and leadership."
"It must have happened in the '80s and early' 90s, when she was a little girl; it happens to every black woman I know who has mixed blood children in the United States."
"Prosperous, mostly white: Megan's mother is often mistaken for her nanny."
The family settled in woodland hill, a prosperous neighborhood in Los Angeles
"This combination of white Hollywood and black social spiritual activities makes her a modern and more diversified descendant of the mixed race bourgeoisie."
“… And yoga instructors who focus on community mental health... "
"Photos by Chris Jackson AFP Getty pictures by Rachel Megan markel for those who chose or managed to miss out on the constant record of her life, so far the only daughter of Thomas mark white Emmy award winning photographer and lighting designer and author of Doria Raglan triad..."
Speaking at the Royal foundation forum, Megan markel and the Duchess of Cambridge said: "women don't need to find a voice, they have a voice, they need to feel able to use it, people need to be encouraged to listen."
The same is true of "I don't agree at all," such as: "the funny thing is When it comes to girls and women's empowerment, you often hear people say, "well, you're helping women find their voices." I don't agree with that at all. "



Number  1361
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"I didn't ignore him," the 30-year-old actor said before adding, "Well, whatever, maybe...”
“ET's Ashley Crossan caught up with the actors at the movie's premiere in Los Angeles, California, on Wednesday, and Hunnam explained why he rarely spoke to his co-star when the cameras weren't rolling.”
“"There was something really exciting about the idea of not knowing someone, just letting a relationship exist exclusively on the screen," the 36-year-old actor noted.”
“"So, I had decided that I wanted to do that, but sometimes that can be alienating, and [can] put another actor off of their work and I don't want to be that selfish."”
“WATCH: Kristen Stewart Recalls Dating Twilight Co-Star Robert Pattinson -- 'I Wasn't Hiding Anything'Hunnam added that Pattinson also wasn't super friendly towards him either.”
“"I started playing this game with Rob and he just started playing it right back," he said.”
“"I think we both really understood what we were doing and there was no real contention or beef between us -- we were just playing the game."”
“The Sons of Anarchy star further insisted that he has no ill will towards Pattinson.”
“"It's nice actually to come out of that fog of the production and see that he's a lovely guy," Hunnam continued.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"I didn't ignore him," the 30-year-old actor said, then added, "well, anyway, maybe..."
Et's Ashley Crossan met with the cast at its premiere in Los Angeles, California, on Wednesday, and Hennan explained why he rarely spoke to his partner when the camera was off
The 36 year old actor said: "it's really exciting to think that you don't know someone and just have a relationship on screen."
"So I decided to do it, but sometimes it alienates people and (possibly) makes another actor give up their job, and I don't want to be so selfish."
"Observation: Kristen Stewart recalls her date with twilight co star Robert Pattinson -" I didn't hide anything, "Hennan added, adding that Pattinson wasn't super friendly to him."
"I started playing this game with rob, and he started playing this game," he said
"I think we all know what we're doing. There's no real argument or argument between us - we're just playing games."
"Star, the son of anarchism, further insisted that he had no malice against Pattinson."
"It's great to come out of the fog of production and see that he's a cute guy," Hennan continued



Number  1362
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at 800-344-9598 any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“Cheryl Hines 'In Over Head' With Sex Freak RFK Jr.”
“Marriage Meltdown!”
“Cheryl Hines 'In Over Head' With Sex Freak RFK Jr. 'She wasn't just getting him, she also got his crazy family!'”
“Notorious horndog Robert F. Kennedy Jr.’s two-year marriage to actress Cheryl Hines is already on the rocks — and won’t last!”
“That s the claim of a Kennedy family insider who told RadarOnline com that the bubbly That s the claim of a Kennedy family insider who told RadarOnline com that the bubbly Curb Your Enthusiasm beauty has realized she s in over her head with the unending dramas in the...”
“...serial cheater s family...”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call 800-344-9598 at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"Cheryl Hayes and the little RFK are on top of each other."
"Marriage breaks down!"
"Cheryl Hayes is" together "with little RFK, a pervert. She has not only got him, but also his crazy family!"
The infamous "Bumblebee" Robert F. Kennedy's two-year marriage to actress Cheryl Hayes is on the rocks and won't last
"This is the story of a Kennedy family insider. He told radaronline that bubble gum is the story of a Kennedy family insider. He told radaronline that bubble gum suppresses your enthusiasm. Beauties realize that she is already on her head with endless drama..."
“… Families of serial cheaters... "



Number  1363
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
“…… In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  1364
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Brad will end up taking Maddox and Pax to Coachella next month?”
“23, would definitely be an amazing surprise for Brad’s two sons.”
“Making sure to ‘pull out all the stops,’ HollywoodLife.com has EXCLUSIVELY learned that Brad is anxious to surprise them in any way possible — including taking his sons to music’s biggest festival!”
“Now that Brad Pitt, 53, has been reunited with his & Angelina Jolie‘s, 41, six kids after their trip to London with their mom, the actor is set on being the world’s greatest dad — and we are ALL about it!”
“But in addition to spending as much time as possible with Maddox, 15; Pax, 13; Zahara, 12; Shiloh, 10; and twins Vivienne and Knox, 8, the star wants to surprise them with grand gestures as well.”
“How cute is THAT?”
““Brad’s an amazing dad, he’ll be pulling out all the stops to make those kids happy,” an insider revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““A few people have suggested that he take Maddox and Pax to Coachella for the day.”
“No doubt that’s something that would really thrill them.” Coachella, which starts Apr.”
“14 and goes until Apr.”


"Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you think Brad will take Maddox and parks to cochella next month?"
"At 23, it's definitely a surprise for Brad's two sons."
"Do your best." he learned that Brad was eager to surprise them in any possible way - including taking his son to the music festival
"Now that Brad Pitt, 53, has been reunited with his six children and Angelina Jolie, 41, who have gone to London with their mother, the actor is determined to become the greatest father in the world - we are all working for that!"
"But in addition to spending as much time as possible with 15-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 10-year-old Shiloh and 8-year-old twins Vivian and Knox, the star also wants to surprise them with grand gestures."
"How lovely?"
"Brad is a great dad and will do his best to make those kids happy," a person familiar with the matter told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"A few people suggested that he take Maddox and parks to cochella for a day."
"There's no doubt it's really going to get them excited." Cochella, starting in April
"14 to April."



Number  1365
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: MEGAWhat are your thoughts on the mystery man next to Sarah?”
“So is this guy just a friend… or something more?”
“At one point she was spotted leaning into him as they enjoyed a glass of wine and each other’s company.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAShe looked quite cozy while at lunch with her friends, which included an unknown gentleman who sat right next to her.”
“Source: MEGAThe former Sex and the City star was seen grabbing lunch in Rome, Italy on Saturday, where once again she didn’t have her wedding ring on.”
“Both times… no ring.”
“Article continues below advertisementThe first was at a Wall Street Journal festival back on May 10th, and then at an event for her show Divorce on June 1st.”
“Source: MEGAThen, there’s been the missing wedding ring situation, in which Sarah has shown up to public events without it not once… but twice.”
“They were spotted looking quite annoyed during a joint outing in April.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
"Source: Mega, what do you think of the mysterious man next to Sarah?"
"So this guy is just a friend Or something else? "
"Once, she was found leaning on him, drinking and accompanying each other."
The article continues with the following source of the advertisement: when Mega had lunch with her friends, she looked very comfortable, including an unknown gentleman sitting next to her
"Source: on Saturday, the former sexy City Star megassa was seen having lunch in Rome, Italy, and once again she didn't wear a wedding ring."
"Twice No ring. "
The first was at the Wall Street Journal Film Festival on May 10, and then on a divorce show on June 1
"Source: megathen, there was a time when the wedding ring was lost. Sarah didn't have a ring in public, not once But twice. "
"On a joint trip in April, people found that they looked annoyed."



Number  1366
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“In a post to her blog and app on Tuesday, the Good American designer opened up about watching her younger sister, Kylie Jenner, give birth to daughter Stormi, when Khloe was six months pregnant with her own baby.”
“"I've been so lucky to be in the labor and delivery room for every one of my sisters' deliveries," Khloe wrote, calling Kylie's Feb. 1 delivery the "most significant" experience.”
“"I was six months pregnant, so it was a lot more real because I knew I'd have to do that in three months," she explained.”
“"You don't miss a beat when you know you have to do it soon!"”
“"But having said that ...”
“I don't think it's smart to watch another person give birth when you're pregnant, LOL," Khloe added.”
“Khloe Kardashian Poses in a Sports Bra at 9 Months Pregnant This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"On Tuesday, the great American designer posted a blog post on her blog and app about watching her sister Kelly Jenner give birth to her daughter, Tommy, when she was six months pregnant with her baby."
"I'm very lucky to be able to deliver every one of my sisters in the delivery room," Khloe wrote, adding that Kelly's delivery on February 1 was the "most important" experience
"I'm six months pregnant, so it's more real because I know I have to do it in three months," she explained
"When you know you have to do it right away, you won't miss a beat!"
"But now that I have said that..."
"I don't think it's wise to watch someone give birth when you're pregnant, ha ha," Khloe added
"The video of Khloe Kardashian taking a picture in a sports bra when she was nine months pregnant is not available because we can't load the sponsor's information."



Number  1367
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[email protected]”
“Within the article, the magazine admits that the photo was taken two months before he died, which Gossip Cop says is “likely only done to remove liability and prevent the outlet from getting sued.”[image: The National Enquirer]Have a tip we should know?”
“Instead, the tabloid put together “words from a series of interviews” that he gave long before he died.”
“...by the way it is abnormally featured Additionally the suicide note mentioned on the cover isn t actually a suicide note at all...”
“As a result it appears as if Michael is laying dead when in reality he was upright at a dinner party when the picture was taken Gossip Cop notes that The National Enquirer doesn t explicitly say it is a death photo but that certainly seems to be the implication...”
“In actuality, the publication took a grainy, previously published paparazzi photo of Michael and rotated it 45 degrees.”
“Our cousin site Gossip Cop, who has been busting bad dish for years writes, “This is a blatant manipulation.”
“He looks to be lying down with his eyes, closed, and the cover reads, “George Michael THE LAST PHOTO!” It also says “Pop Icon’s Suicide Note Found.” The problem is that this isn’t actually how the photo was taken.”
“The most recent cover of The National Enquirer features a photograph of George Michael.”


"[email protection]"
"In the article, the magazine admitted that the photo was taken two months before his death, and the gossip police said it was" probably just to exonerate responsibility and prevent the media from being prosecuted. " [image: National inquirer] is there any clue we should know? "
Instead, the tabloid put together "a series of interviews" he had received long before his death
"By the way, the suicide note on the cover is not a suicide note at all."
"As a result, Michael seemed to be dead in bed, and in fact, when the picture was taken, he was straight at a dinner party. The gossip police noticed that the national inquirer did not explicitly say that it was a death photo, but it did seem to imply that... "
"In fact, the magazine took a grainy picture of Michael taken by the paparazzi and rotated it 45 degrees."
"Our cousin's website, the gossip police, has been making trouble for years," he wrote. "It's a blatant manipulation."
"He looks like he's lying down with his eyes closed and it says on the cover," the last photo of George Michael! It also says "the posthumous note of discovering pop idol". The problem is that this photo is not actually how it was taken
The latest cover of the national inquirer carried a picture of George Michael



Number  1368
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“As for Kate, her rumored concern stems from her “respect for Angie and Brad.” The person claimed she “wants to do what she can do to help this couple in distress.””
“Kate said she saw what a fantastic couple they were and, if Angie could find it in her heart to forgive him, it’s worth giving their union another shot.” Apparently, rather than being “resentful,” Angelina was supposedly “genuinely touched” by the advice.”
“But what advice could happily married Kate Middleton possibly give to the actress?”
“Here’s a look inside their unlikely friendship.”
“Angelina Jolie, 43, has found an unlikely friend in Kate Middleton, 36, and it seems that the actress and the duchess have found plenty to talk about.”
“That’s according to a recent report by Us Weekly.”
“It’s claimed that the two women met up while Angelina was in London to film Maleficent 2.”
“It’s not the first time the Oscar winner and the royal have met.”
“Three years ago, the last time they had tea, Angelina was still married to Brad Pitt and, as far as anyone knew, happily so.”
“Obviously a lot’s changed since then.”


As for Kate, the rumored concern stems from her "respect for Angie and Brad.". The man claimed that she "wanted to help the troubled couple as much as she could."
"Kate said she saw what a wonderful couple they were, and if Angie could forgive him in her heart, it would be worth giving them another chance to get together." Obviously, Angelina was not "aggrieved" but "moved" by the suggestion
"But what advice can the happily married Kate Middleton give the actress?"
"Let's see the unlikely friendship between them."
"Angelina Jolie, 43, has found an unlikely friend in Kate Middleton, 36. It seems that the actress and the Duchess have found a lot to talk about."
"This is according to a recent report in American weekly."
"It is said that the two women met when Angelina was filming Evil 2 in London."
"It's not the first time the Oscar winner and the royal family have met."
"Three years ago, the last time they had tea, Angelina married Brad Pitt and, as you know, she was very happy."
"Obviously, a lot has changed since then."



Number  1369
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I didn’t have my own bed but I shared the girl’s bed and the three of us children shared a room together.”
“...breakfast...”
“They went to school, but I wasn’t allowed.”
“When I was little I called the adults mum and dad and thought I was their child, but they treated me differently to their daughter and from the brother when he was born.”
“He didn’t live with us the whole time, but he did live in the family for long periods of time.”
“There was also a boy who I believe was a cousin of the mother.”
“The family was made up of a woman, her husband, their daughter and their son.”
“I lived with a family in London.”
“The first things I remember all happened in the United Kingdom.”
“I only know my date of birth because I found it written down in the house where I grew up in England.”


"I don't have my own bed, but I share the bed with the girl and the three of us share a room."
“… Breakfast... "
"They went to school, but I was not allowed to."
"When I was a child, I called my parents and thought I was their child, but their attitude towards me was not the same as that of their daughter, and also different from that of his brother when he was born."
"He didn't live with us all the time, but he did live at home for a long time."
"There is also a boy who I believe is the cousin of his mother."
"The family consists of a woman, her husband, their daughter and son."
"I live in London with my family."
"The first thing I remember happened in England."
"I only know my date of birth because I found it written in the house where I grew up in England."



Number  1370
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(To see more of their cute moments from throughout the years, click here).”
“That August, the couple tied the knot with an intimate ceremony in their L.A. home.”
“The happy couple later showed off their engagement bling on the Daytime Emmys red carpet that same year.”
“...her talk show DeGeneres announced her plans to wed de Rossi the reveal followed the news that the California Supreme Court had struck down a law banning same sex marriage...”
“I felt weak at the knees and I was overwhelmed with how I felt but then it took me about 10 months to get the courage up to actually do anything about it FROM PEN Jada Pinkett Smith Talks Celebrating 20 Years with Will Smith In a 2008 episode of...”
“...t believe it but she turned around and it was like an arrow was shot through my heart...”
“We did talk a little bit and then over those three years we saw each other at parties or at various things but the one time that was the most significant was during a photoshoot actually She continued I just walked over to say hello to her and I couldn...”
““We actually met socially and I just felt that immediate draw,” she said.”
““Happy anniversary @theellenshow and @portiaderossi.”During an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled about falling for DeGeneres.”
“It’s still one of the most fun things I’ve ever done,” Radin wrote.”


"To learn more about their lovely moments over the years, click here."
"That August, the couple had a close wedding at their home in Los Angeles."
"The happy couple later displayed their engagement ring on the red carpet of the Emmy Awards in the daytime of the same year."
“…… Her talk show "DeGeneres" announced her plans to marry De Rossi. After the news that the Supreme Court of California has repealed the law against same-sex marriage was announced.... "
"My knees felt weak, and I was overwhelmed by my own feelings, but it took me about 10 months to get up the nerve and find a real solution from the 2008 episode of" penjada pinkert Smith celebrating 20 years with Will Smith. "
"I can't believe it, but she turned around like an arrow through my heart..."
"We did talk a little bit, and then in those three years, we saw each other at parties or all kinds of things, but the most important one was when taking pictures. In fact, she continued, I just went over to say hello to her, I can't..."
"We actually met on social occasions, and I just felt the direct attraction," she said
"Happy Anniversary @ theEllenShow and @ portiaderossi." In an interview with Oprah Winfrey, de Rossi recalled falling in love with DeGeneres
"It's still one of the most interesting things I've ever done," Latin wrote



Number  1371
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Dewan Tatum is currently the host of NBC’s “World of Dance,” and Tatum is set to voice the role of Migo in the upcoming animated film, “Smallfoot.”CNN has reached out to their representatives for additional comment.”
“Post has been removed or is no longer public.”
“Just last month, Tatum posted a photo of himself and Dewan Tatum to his Instagram with the caption, “When you fall asleep around a toddler.”Instagram post not found.”
“The couple first met while filming the 2006 movie “Step Up.” They married in 2009 and have a young daughter together.”
“Their announcement also said that there are “no secrets nor salacious events” that led to the split.”
“Absolutely nothing has changed about how much we love one another, but love is a beautiful adventure that is taking us on different paths for now.”Instagram post not found.”
““We fell deeply in love so many years ago and have had a magical journey together.”
““We have lovingly chosen to separate as a couple,” the pair said.”
“The couple posted a joint statement to their respective Instagram pages.”


Dewan Tatum, who is currently the host of NBC's "dance world," will play Migo in the upcoming animated film "little feet.". CNN has contacted their representatives for more comments
"The post has been deleted or is no longer public."
Just last month, Tatum posted a picture of him and Devan Tatum on his instagram, titled "when you're sleeping around a toddler." Instagram post not found
The couple met for the first time when they made the film "step by step" in 2006. They married in 2009 and have a little daughter
"Their announcement also said that there was no 'secret or obscene incident' that led to the breakup."
"There's absolutely no change in how much we love each other, but love is a beautiful adventure that's taking us on different paths right now." Instagram post not found
"We fell in love so many years ago and had a wonderful journey together."
"We chose to be apart in a friendly way," they said
"The couple posted a joint statement on their respective instagram pages."



Number  1372
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Here are eight reasons why Rihanna and Drake could be the next Bey and Jay:”
“And now, we've come back to the world where RiRi and Drizzy are a thing, and if you really take a second to compare these two famous couples, they have a lot in common.”
“...is now stronger than ever...”
“Even Queen B s Lemonade which sparked speculation of infidelity in her high profile marriage didn t just make this pair some serious money and become the center of pop culture news but it also showed her relationship with Hov...”
“Hear us out...From the moment Bey and Jay went public as an item over 10 years ago, they've been the epitome of #relationshipgoals.”
“We're not sure how long this round of Rihanna and Drake will last, but if these two stars choose to really see where this could go, there's a chance they could be the next Beyoncé and Jay Z.”


"Here are eight reasons for Rihanna and Drake to be the next Bei and Jie:
"Now, we're back to the world where RI RI and Drizzy are the same thing, and if you really take the time to compare these two famous couples, they have a lot in common."
“… Now more powerful than ever... "
"Even if queen B's lemonade sparked speculation about her high-profile marital infidelity, it not only made the couple a lot of money and became the center of popular culture news, but also showed her relationship with Hoff..."
"Listen to us From the moment bey and Jay went public as a project more than 10 years ago, they became the epitome of their relationship goals. "
"We're not sure how long the round between Rihanna and Drake will last, but if the two stars choose to really see where this round will go, they may become the next Beyonce and Jay Z."



Number  1373
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“For now, though, it seems like he and Stefani are content to take things slow.”
“Kevin Winter/Getty Images Entertainment/Getty ImagesEventually, that blossomed into a romance.”
“So, it's time to set the record straight: Are Gwen Stefani and Blake Shelton engaged?”
“It's far from the first time such reports have circulated, and when the couple has shut down gossip in the past, they've made clear they're in no rush to tie the knot.”
“"Everything's crazy right now so no, absolutely not," Stefani said in June 2016 during 94.7 Fresh FM's The Tommy Show last summer when asked if she was engaged.”
“"Can you imagine the amount of gossipy, weird stories people make up?”
“To me, it makes me laugh every day.”
“I actually do Google my name just so I can see the next one that's gonna happen, because it's gotten so out of control."”
“That may have been a while ago, but there's been no comment to the contrary from the couple in regards to engagement and marriage.”
“Both Shelton and Stefani have been married before.”


"But for now, he and Stefani are content to take their time."
"Kevin winter / Getty Images entertainment / Getty Images in the 1970s, it became a romance."
"So it's time to clear up: is Gwen Stephanie engaged to Blake Sheldon?"
"This is far from the first time such reports have been circulated. When the couple closed the scandal in the past, they made it clear that they were not in a hurry to get married."
"It's all crazy now, so no, absolutely not," Stefani said when asked if she was engaged on 94.7 fresh FM's "Tommy show" last summer in June 2016
"Can you imagine how many rumors and weird stories people have made up?"
"For me, it makes me laugh every day."
"In fact, I Google my name just to see what's going to happen next, because it's out of control."
"That may have been a long time ago, but the couple didn't comment to the contrary on engagement and marriage."
"Sheldon and Stephanie have been married before."



Number  1374
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VIDEO: The Five Biggest Haircut Trends of 2020”
“...in January...”
“To help you figure out how to wear your hair in the new year we ve rounded up the five biggest haircut trends of 2020 so you ll be sure of what you want before you head to the salon...”
“Or, you can get the look instantly with the help of some clip in extensions.”
“...inspiration...”
“RELATED The 10 Hairstyles You ll See Everywhere This Winter But if you swear that 2020 is going to be the year you finally grow out your hair let Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian s extra long lengths be your...”
“As seen on Kerry Washington, 2020's bob has textured, softer edges, and looks amazing whether you part it down the middle or off to the side.”
“But there will be a few tweaks.”
“For anyone with a blunt bob — the most popular haircut of the past few years — you probably already guessed that the cut will still be going strong into the next decade.”
“This decade's first big hair trends include looks at every length that can be tailored to your hair texture and personal style.”


"Video: five haircut trends in 2020"
“… January... "
"To help you understand how to wear your hair in the new year, we summarize the five major haircut trends in 2020 so that you can determine what you want before you go to the Salon..."
"Or, you can get an immediate look with some plug-in extensions."
“… Inspiration... "
"You can see 10 hairstyles all over the place this winter, but if you swear that 2020 will be the year when your hair finally grows, let the super long hairstyles of Jennifer Lopez and Kim Kardashian become yours..."
"As Kerry Washington saw in 2020, Bob has texture, soft edges and looks amazing, whether you're part down the middle or closed to the side."
"But there will be some adjustments."
"For anyone with straight hair - the most popular hairstyle of the past few years - you may have guessed that it will remain strong for the next decade."
"The number one hairstyle trend of this decade includes hairstyles of every length, which can be customized according to your hair texture and personal style."



Number  1375
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“By now, it’s very much, “Drake who?”Vanity Fair has reached out to Lopez for comment on the album.”
“Almost too Drake, really.”
“Did the photos of them cuddling signify that they were dating, or were they just collaborating on new music?”
“How much could one read into reports that they spent New Year’s together, and he was buying her at least one of the rocks that she got?”
“And how did this all end so that she could embark on a new relationship with fellow New York City treasure Alex Rodriguez?”
“Now, there are some answers: Drake dropped his album More Life on Saturday night, and E.W.”
“...reports that Lopez is all over it, but not on it exactly.”
““Get It Together,” which first “leaked” to the public when TMZ published videos of J.Lo and Drake at a prom-themed party, dancing to the song, sounded as though it featured Lopez’s vocals.”
“British singer Jorja Smith is the one singing on the final version, though.”
“More pointedly still, “Teenage Fever” samples the entire hook from “If You Had My Love,” Lopez’s 1999 hit from her first album, On the 6, but slows it down so it’s more somber.”


"So far, it's serious," Drake said? "Vanity Fair has contacted Lopez to comment on the album."
"Really, it's too monotonous."
"Does the picture of them hugging mean they're on a date, or are they just working on new music?"
"It's reported that they spent the new year together and he bought her at least one stone. How much can you read from it?"
"How did it all end so that she could start a new relationship with Alex Rodriguez, the treasure of New York City?"
"Now, there are some answers: Drake gave up his album more lives, E.W., on Saturday night."
“…… The report says Lopez is all over the body, but not entirely on it
When TMZ released the video of Luo Guancong and Drake at a dance theme party and danced with the song, the song was "leaked" to the public for the first time, which sounded like Lopez's singing
"However, British singer jorja Smith is the singer of the final version."
"More acutely," teen fever "selects all the material from Lopez's 1999 first album" if you have my love ". This album was released on the 6th, but it slows down the release speed, so it's more gloomy."



Number  1376
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“To make his wife happy, to have a wedding that's gonna make her happy."”
“I don't think he cares.”
“"There's classifications, financially, of wealth...Justin Bieber's a big jet category, he's way up there.”
“He's right up there, one or two, whatever you're gonna argue," Daniel said on his show.”
“"Now you're marrying Justin Bieber, arguably the biggest male star in the business, wouldn't you say?”
“The actor-turned-radio host thinks Justin will, and will also spare no expense.”
“Who will foot the bill for the wedding?”
“"The invites will go to the siblings," Daniel said on the Daniel Baldwin Show on ESPN Syracuse.”
“Kim's ex, Ireland's dad and Stephen's brother, Alec Baldwin, is also expected to attend the wedding, as are fellow brothers Billy Baldwin and Daniel Baldwin.”
“Hailey's sister Alaia Baldwin and cousin Ireland Baldwin will be bridesmaids, the latter's mother, Kim Basinger, told Us Weekly on July 17.”


"In order to make his wife happy, in order to make her happy wedding."
"I don't think he cares."
"Financially, wealth is classified Justin Bieber is a big jet category, and he's way ahead there. "
"He's there, one or two, whatever you're going to argue about," Daniel said on his show
"Now you're going to marry Justin Bieber, arguably the biggest actor in business, don't you think?"
"The actor turned radio host thinks Justin will, and will, at all costs."
"Who will pay for the wedding?"
"The invitation will be sent to brothers and sisters," Daniel said on ESPN Syracuse's Daniel Baldwin program
"Kim Jong Il's ex boyfriend, Irish father and Stephen's brother Alec Baldwin, as well as his brothers Billy Baldwin and Daniel Baldwin will also attend the wedding."
Hayley's mother, Kim Basinger, told us weekly on July 17 that Hayley's sister, alea Baldwin, and cousin, Ireland Baldwin, will be bridesmaids



Number  1377
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the full story see this weeks issue of New Idea - out now!”
“‘Harry and Meghan wanted to get a few visits in so that she could get to know the Commonwealth countries and start making a contribution to the royal family,’ revealed a source.”
“‘She’s usually so full of energy and very lively – but she definitely seems tired and withdrawn at the moment,’ says a source.”
“‘Of course, all the baby whispers would explain why she’s not herself and seems so pale.’The exciting development comes just weeks after Meghan described being married as ‘wonderful’, before adding Harry is ‘the best husband ever’.”
“The news was first shared with the Queen the same day, just before Meghan boarded the train to Cheshire.”
“‘It gave the Queen and Meghan a lot to talk about during their journey on the Royal Train together and there was lots of baby talk,’ reveals a source.”
“According to the insider, Harry has always been the Queen’s favourite and she’s taken a definite liking to Meghan – she sees a lot of herself in Meghan’s strength and tenacity.”
“Related: Meghan Markle and Prince Harry 'actively trying' to start a familyRelated: Meghan Markle and Prince Harry reportedly 'having twins'And to hear that they’re to be parents is exciting for Her Majesty.”
“‘We haven’t seen the Queen that happy and that excited in a long time – it was wonderful to see,’ the insider revealed.”
“The source went on to say the mood has really continued throughout the palace since they returned.”


"For a complete story, see this week's new ideas - come out now!"
Harry and Megan hope to get some interviews so that she can get to know the Commonwealth countries and begin to contribute to the royal family, a source said
"She's usually energetic and very lively, but she does look tired and withdrawn now," a source said
"Of course, all the baby whispers can explain why she is not herself and looks so pale." The exciting development came weeks after Megan described her marriage as "beautiful" and then added that Harry was "the best husband ever"
"On the same day Megan boarded the train for Cheshire, the news was shared with the queen for the first time."
"The queen and Megan have a lot to say on their journey on the Royal train, and there are a lot of baby topics," a source said
"According to people familiar with the matter, Harry has always been the Queen's favorite. She has a clear preference for Megan - she sees a lot of herself in Megan's strength and tenacity."
"Related reports: Megan Marcel and Prince Harry are" actively trying "to establish a family relationship: it is reported that Megan Marcel and Prince Harry" have twins ", and it is said that they are going to be parents, which makes her majesty very excited."
"We haven't seen the queen so happy and excited for a long time - it's great to see her," the person familiar with the matter said
"The source went on to say that since they came back, the atmosphere in the palace has really continued."



Number  1378
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He made headlines in August when he was spotted having dinner in Los Angeles with Katy Perry and a group of friends — though a source close to theactor told PEOPLE the two were “just friends.””
““I think they will eventually get back together,” says the source.”
“"It was very recent"Robert Pattinson and FKA twigs Might Get Back Together: 'That’s the Girl He Wants to Marry'Robert Pattinson and FKA twigs have called it quits — for now.”
“The couple, who were engaged in early 2015, have split after more than two years together, a source tells PEOPLE.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““They did break up,” says the source.”
““It was very recent.”According to the source, distance and time apart played a major part in their decision to call it quits.”
““He is on a press tour and she is working on her new album.”
“And I think it’s timing,” says the source.”
““They’ve been all over the place.”


He made headlines in August when he was found in Los Angeles having dinner with Katie Perry and a group of friends - but a source close to the actor told people they were "just friends."
"I think they will get back together in the end," the source said
"That's recent." Robert Pattinson and FKA twigs may get back together: "that's the girl he wants to marry." Robert Pattinson and FKA twigs have announced their separation - so far
"A source told people that the couple were engaged in early 2015 and have separated after more than two years together."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"They did break up," the source said
"That's recent." According to the source, the main reasons for their decision to break up were distance and time
"He's on a press tour and she's making a new album."
"I think this is the time," the source said
"Everywhere."



Number  1379
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“RELATED VIDEO:”
“If you’re not seen and not heard, that’s where dangerous stuff happens.”
“One person who won’t be lucky enough to score a ticket?”
“President Donald Trump.”
““No,” Noma Dumezweni, who plays Hermione, said when asked if Trump should see the show.”
““Anybody else, yes.”Even though the play itself is not overtly political, Harry Potter fans have drawn comparisons between Trump and the Dark Lord, Lord Voldemort, since the 2016 presidential election.”
““I really do believe that’s why it’s resonating at the moment,” Dumezweni said on the red carpet at the Tony Awards.”
““We, all as human beings, are fighting to be connected.”
“That s where people under the radar do very cruel things The two part stage play based on J K Rowling s boy wizard Harry Potter is set 19 years after the events of the seventh book installment Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows That s what this play is...”
“Those things are very important.”“Cursed Child” is up for 10 Tonys, including best play, best performance by an actor, and best performance by an actress.”


Related videos:
"If you don't see or hear, that's where dangerous things happen."
"If you're not lucky, you can't get tickets?"
"President Donald Trump."
"No," noma dumezweni, who plays Hermione, said when asked if trump should watch the show
"Others, yes." Although the show itself is not obviously political, Harry Potter fans have been comparing trump with Voldemort since the 2016 presidential election
"I really believe that's why it resonates now," dumezweini said on the red carpet of the Tony Awards
"We, as humans, are all fighting for connectivity."
"This is where people do very cruel things under the radar. This two-part stage play is based on J.K. Rowling's Harry Potter, the young wizard. The story takes place 19 years after the event of the seventh novel Harry Potter and the Deathly Hallows. This play is like this..."
"Those things are important." "The cursed child" won 10 Tony Awards, including best screenplay, best actor performance and best actress performance



Number  1380
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kylie hadn't even started seeing her baby daddy-to-be, Travis Scott until April ... which is around the time we know she got pregnant.”
“You see what looks like a bump ... thing is ... we did some digging and it was apparently shot at a Golden Globes party they attended 11 months ago.”
“There's this new clip that's been making the rounds showing Kylie and Kendall in their silver and orange dresses.”
“Play video content EXCLUSIVEA video that's surfaced online showing what looks like a very pregnant Kylie Jenner has got to be a fake, 'cause it's from January ... long before she got pregnant.”


"It wasn't until April that Kelly began to see her father to be, Travis Scott... Just when we knew she was pregnant. "
"What do you look like a lump... The thing is... We did some digging, apparently at the Golden Globes party they attended 11 months ago
"There's a new clip that shows Kelly and Kendall in their silver and orange dress rounds."
"Play the video content exclusive video. A video on the Internet shows that Kelly Jenner, who looks very pregnant, must be fake, because it started in January... Long before she got pregnant. "



**Something goes wrong**
“PS so much better than Bachelor parties!””
““I had so much fun!”
““As much as they love them, they’re not close,” the source adds.”
“And while Brody spent time with Kendall and Kylie when they were younger, they’ve grown apart.”
““He didn’t spend a lot of time with his dad when his dad married Kris, so he didn’t see them as much,” the sources says.”
“A source tells PEOPLE that Brody was “never close” with his step-siblings, Kourtney, Kim, Khloe and Rob Kardashian after Caitlyn married Kris Jenner.”
“I resent him for that.”Brody’s strained relationship with Caitlyn also caused a rift in his bond with sisters Kendall and Kylie.”
“I can’t tell you how many birthdays went by where Bruce wasn’t there.”
““Bruce was never around.”
““I grew up with my stepdad,” said Brody, referring to David Foster.”


"PS is better than bachelor party!"
"I had a good time!"
"As much as they love them, they are not close," the source added
"Brody was with Kendall and Kelly when he was young, but they were separated."
"When his father and Chris got married, he didn't spend much time with his father, so he rarely saw them," the source said
According to sources, Brody and his half brothers Courtney, Kim, Chloe and rob Kardashian "have never been close" since Caitlin married Chris Jenner
Brody's strained relationship with Caitlin also led to a rift in his relationship with Kendall and the Kelly sisters
"I don't know how many birthdays Bruce had in his absence."
"Bruce is never around."
"I grew up with my stepfather," Brody said, referring to David Foster



Number  1382
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Tristan and Khloe are having a baby boy or girl?”
“Looks like Tristan truly is trying to make sure everything is in place for when his second child arrives!”
“Find out exact dates here & why she hopes baby comes that week!”
“Khloe Kardashian, 33, is reportedly expecting her first child with boyfriend Tristan Thompson, 26, and she’s rumored to be about five months along in her pregnancy, putting her due date somewhere in February.”
“More specifically though, she’s apparently due in MID February, and she’s hoping her baby’s birthdate falls during NBA All-Star Weekend.”
“Why?”
“Because that way, Tristan, who plays basketball for the Cleveland Cavaliers, doesn’t have to miss out on any court time.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Khloe with her nieces and nephews.”
“But while Tristan will have a nice chunk of time off during All-Star Weekend, he’s also made sure he’ll be able to take a short break when baby Thompson arrives — no matter WHEN it happens.”
““Tristan will be given a few days off from the Cavs when Khloe goes into labor, and everyone is actually hoping it occurs during the NBA All-Star break so he doesn’t miss any time on the court,” a source close to the Cavs revealed to HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Tell us, Hollywood people - do you think Tristan and Chloe gave birth to a boy or a girl?"
"It seems that Tristan is really trying to make sure everything is ready when his second child is born!"
"Find the exact date here & why does she want the child to come that week!"
"Khloe Kardashian, 33, is reported to be pregnant with her 26 year old boyfriend Tristan Thompson, who is said to be about five months pregnant and is due to give birth in February."
"To be more precise, she should be born in mid February, and she wants the baby to be born on NBA all star weekend."
"Why?"
"Because of this, Tristan, who plays basketball for the Cleveland Cavaliers, doesn't have to miss any playing time."
"Click here to see lovely photos of Chloe with her niece and nephew."
"However, although Tristan will have a good rest on the all star weekend, he also ensures that when little Thompson arrives, he can have a rest - at any time."
A source close to the Cavaliers told reporters: "when Chloe is in labor, Tristan will take a few days off from the Cavaliers. In fact, everyone hopes that this is during the NBA all star break, so that he won't miss any playing time." Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  1383
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Blake and Gwen will be together forever?”
“Being the Snapchat lover that she is, the singer will likely be showing off plenty of videos of their end of summer celebrations.”
“Blake Shelton and Gwen Stefani are serious couple goals, and there’s one thing in particular that the country star loves about his lady.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details that he can’t get enough of how she kisses him.”
“Gwen Stefani‘s kiss is on the list of the best things in life for Blake Shelton, 47.”
“He just can’t get enough of the way the 47-year-old plants smooches on him.”
““Blake loves Gwen, they get along, they laugh and they have a very amazing relationship, but what locked him in and still does is the way she kisses him.”
“Blake, like most people, doesn’t like a bad kisser.”
“And if she was bad, it would have been the actual kiss of death because the physical needs to match the emotional and Blake is very happy with both.”
“He loves the way Gwen kisses him, it seals the deal!” a Blake insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"Hollywood stars, do you think Blake and Gwen will be together forever?"
"As a snapchat fan, the singer is likely to show a lot of videos of their late summer celebrations."
"Black Sheldon and Gwen Stephanie are a serious couple, and the country star loves his women in particular."
"We have exclusive details and he can't get enough of how she kisses him."
"Gwen Stephanie's kiss is one of the best things in the life of Blake Shelton, 47."
"He just can't stand the 47 year old plant kissing him."
"Blake egwin, they get along well, they talk and laugh, they have a very amazing relationship, but lock him in, what she is still doing is the way she kisses him."
"Black, like most people, doesn't like people who kiss badly."
"If she is not good, it will be a real kiss of death, because the body needs to match the emotion, and black is very satisfied with both."
"He likes the way Gwen kisses him, and that makes the deal! A black insider told reporters, "exclusive to Hollywood life."



Number  1384
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You’ve got this Dear  — Shelley Watson (@A_tallorder) January 18, 2018Ruby we with you every step of the way, nothing but love for you  — Daniel aka MrNotSoSocial (@antisocialsos) January 18, 2018”
“I truly believe that you were given this mountain to show that it can be moved.”
“It is also beautiful.”
“— Jennifer Kretchmer (@dreamwisp) January 18, 2018Only you could be in medical distress and still look  — Jack Joseph (@Jack_Frodo) January 18, 2018It takes an incredible amount of courage to step forward and show the world your raw form, especially when it gives you so many reasons not to.”
“It means a lot to have people see that assistive devices give folks autonomy and freedom to go about their day!”
“...pic.twitter.com/7nVw5fIk3k — Ruby Rose (@RubyRose) January 18, 2018Rose’s fans responded with an outpouring of affection and support, as expressed in tweets such as these:Hey, as one of many disabled folks who sometimes wears braces or needs other assistive devices, thanks for being open about this.”
“I am now recovering from a back procedure, but I do need to stay active, so before I get seen with my cane and wheel chair in public, I’d rather put it out there that I’m fine and going to be fine.”
“...decade I ve been dealing with a spine issue...”
“I am now recovering from a back procedure but I do need to stay active so before I get seen with my cane and wheel chair in public I d rather put it out there that I m fine and going to be fine So For the past few years...”
“RELATED: Ruby Rose Slams Reporters, Admits She Broke Down Over Acne And Weight Loss Stories“So..For the past few years (decade) I’ve been dealing with a spine issue,” writes Rose, 31.”


"You've got this dear Shelley Watson (@ A / u tallorder) January 18, 2018 ruby, and we've gone through every step with you, except for the love for you - Daniel aka mrnotsocial (@ antisocialsos) January 18, 2018"
"I really believe you got this mountain to prove that it can move."
"It's beautiful, too."
"- Jennifer Kretchmer (@ dreamwisp) January 18, 2018 only you can keep your face in medical difficulties - Jack Joseph (@ Jack ï Frodo) January 18, 2018 it takes great courage to take a step forward and show the world your original state, especially when it gives you so many reasons not to do so."
"It's of great significance to let people see that assistive devices give people autonomy and freedom of life."
“... pic.twitter.com/7nVw5fIk3k -Ruby Rose (@ rubyrose) on January 18, 2018, rose fans expressed their enthusiasm and support on Twitter: Hey, as one of many disabled people who sometimes wear braces or need other assistive devices, thank you for being open to this. "
"I'm recovering from back surgery now, but I do need to stay active, so when the public sees me with crutches and a wheelchair, I'd rather say I'm good and will be good."
"I've been dealing with a spinal problem for ten years..."
"I'm recovering from back surgery now, but I really need to stay active, so before I'm seen with crutches and a wheelchair in public, I'd rather say my body, I'm fine and will be fine, so in the past few years..."
Related report: 31 year old rose wrote: "Ruby Rose attacked reporters and admitted that she collapsed because of acne and weight loss stories. So I've been dealing with the spine for the past few years (10 years)



Number  1385
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She doesn’t seem in any rush to get back to a more public life.””
“ADAD“She very much enjoys being out of the spotlight and can’t wait to spend quiet time with the baby,” a “source” told People, adding Kylie does not plan to sell any photos of her child.”
“Pregnant Kylie Jenner.”
“Yet — Kylie Jenner, 20, has not actually confirmed she is pregnant.”
“For some celebrities, this would not be a big deal — some stars get pregnant and do not say a word, even as “sources” and “insiders” dish to the tabloids, as illustrated above.”
“For someone in the Kardashian-Jenner family, this is especially confusing.”
“ADAfter all, these family members have become international superstars because they share nearly every detail of their lives, even the painful or uncomfortable moments.”
“As a result, people have become inexplicably fascinated by all of them (Kris Jenner, Caitlyn Jenner, Kim Kardashian West, Kourtney Kardashian, Khloe Kardashian and Rob Kardashian), which has fueled their multimillion-dollar franchise of reality shows and sponsorships.”
“ADSo the decision to keep Kylie’s apparent pregnancy under wraps is very off-brand for the family.”


"She doesn't seem to be in a hurry to return to a more open life."
"ADAD" she loves to stay away from the spotlight and can't wait to be quiet with her children, "a" source "told people, adding that Kelly doesn't plan to sell any pictures of her children
"Pregnant Kelly Jenner."
"However - Kelly Jenner, 20, has yet to confirm that she is pregnant."
"For some celebrities, it's not a big deal - some stars are pregnant and don't say a word, even as mentioned above, when 'sources' and' insiders' criticize tabloids."
"For the Kardashian Jenner family, this is particularly confusing."
"After all, these family members have become international stars because they share almost every detail of their lives, even painful or uncomfortable moments."
"As a result, people are inexplicably fascinated by them (Chris Jenner, Caitlin Jenner, Kim Kardashian West, Courtney Kardashian, Chloe Kardashian and rob Kardashian), which has powered their multi million dollar reality shows and sponsorship."
"Adso decided to keep Kelly's apparent pregnancy secret, which is very inappropriate for the family."



Number  1386
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“· Joshua Jackson's latest film, Bobby, is out now...”
“Love takes much longer to develop, and it's constantly renewing.”
“Katie [Holmes], at the beginning of Dawson's Creek was so natural - she'd never really worked before, so the words would go in her ear and come out her mouth with no filter and it was beautiful to watch.”
“I've worked with some brilliant actresses who teach by doing, not by saying, and through working on a TV show for six years I actually grew up with some amazing women.”
“Everyone goes back to paying their bills and looking after their babies, and the film is just this little memory of sunlight.”
“That's one of the bizarre aspects of our business - you build these incredibly intense relationships with people and then when the film's finished you all part ways and never see each other again.”
“When you're playing those parts, you have to open yourself up to someone in the way you would to a lover, so you do emotionally connect.”
“As an actor, it's always an odd occasion when you're building that false romance with someone, because the only way I've learnt to do it is to actually fall in love a bit.”
“I only believe in lust at first sight.”
“I have to.”


"Joshua Jackson's latest movie" Bobby "is on now..."
"Love takes longer to develop, and it's constantly updated."
"Katie (Holmes), at the beginning of Dawson Creek, was so natural - she never really worked, so words would go into her ears and come out of her mouth without a filter, which was beautiful to watch."
"I've worked with some brilliant actresses who have taught by doing, not by saying, and by working on TV for six years, I've actually grown up with some amazing women."
"Everyone goes back to pay the bills and take care of the children. The movie is just a little memory in the sun."
"It's a strange aspect of our business - you build this incredible intimacy with people, and then when the movie ends, you go your separate ways and never see each other again."
"When you play these roles, you have to be as open to others as you are to your loved one, so that you can connect emotionally."
"As an actor, it's always a strange occasion when you have a fake romantic relationship with someone, because the only way I've learned is to really fall in love."
"I only believe in love at first sight."
"I have to."



Number  1387
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Straight Shuter’s Rob Shuter has all the latest gossip.”
“Let us know in the comments below.”
“Do you think Vladimir Putin will ever accept to fight Mike Tyson?”
“The award-winning boxer has yet to comment on the matter of the fight.”
“As Radar readers know, Putin has recently been busted for having a bizarre Hollywood the list filled with dirty secretes on Tinseltown’s biggest stars – all of which he is reportedly prepared to expose if they crusade against Russian outrages.”
“Investors have even offered to fly him to the powerful country and translate his book into Russian if he accepts to participate in the fight.”
“He has also been offered a small fortune to do a convention in New York City, backed of course, by the Russians.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Rob Shuter of straight Shuter has all the latest gossip."
"Please let us know in the comments below."
"Do you think Vladimir Putin will accept fighting Mike Tyson?"
"The winner hasn't commented on the match yet."
"As readers of radar know, Putin was arrested recently for having a strange Hollywood, and the list is full of dirty secrets of the biggest star in seychelltown - it is reported that if they attack the atrocities in Russia, he is ready to reveal all these secrets."
"Investors even offered to fly him to a powerful country and translate his book into Russian if he accepted to fight."
"He also got a small fortune, holding a convention in New York City, and of course he got the support of the Russians."



Number  1388
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The 7-episode season 2 of "Big Little Lies" reportedly will arrive in 2019.”
“The news about the alleged tension between Witherspoon and Streep is a bit bizarre though, as the former previously expressed her excitement to have the three-time Academy Award-winning actress starring on "Big Little Lies".”
“May 29, 2018AceShowbiz - A real drama is reportedly brewing on the set of "Big Little Lies".”
“As filming on the show's second season is underway, tension is mounting between Reese Witherspoon and Meryl Streep, according to In Touch (via Life&Style).”
“There's allegedly a power struggle between Witherspoon, who also executive produces the show, and Streep, who just joins the cast for season 2.”
“The 42-year-old star is said acting like she was the star of the show and it causes the situation awkward with her other co-stars.”
“"I could tell Reese thinks she wears the pants," says a so-called insider.”
“"There's definitely a power struggle between them."”
“Recently, Witherspoon and Streep along with their co-stars Nicole Kidman, Zoe Kravitz and Laura Dern were seen having dinner together.”
“The eyewitness says Reese was "really unfriendly" to everyone at the table during the dinner outing.”


"It's reported that seven episodes of the second season of big and small lies will be released in 2019."
"The news about the so-called tension between Witherspoon and Streep is a bit bizarre, because the former expressed her excitement for the three time Oscar winning actress to star in" big and small lies. "
"Aceshowbiz, May 29, 2008 - a real drama is reported to be brewing on the set of" big lies. "
"The relationship between Reese Witherspoon and Meryl Streep is getting more and more tense as the second season of the show is being filmed."
"It is said that there is a power struggle between Witherspoon and Streep, who is also the executive producer of the show and Streep has just joined the cast of the second season."
"The 42 year old star is said to act like a star in the show, which puts her and her other partners in an embarrassing situation."
"I can tell Reese what pants she thinks she's wearing," said a so-called insider
"There must be a power struggle between them."
Recently, Witherspoon and Streep were seen eating with their partners Nicole Kidman, Zoe Kravitz and Laura Dean
Witnesses said Reese was "very unfriendly" to everyone at the table when eating out



Number  1389
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Give us your best guesses!”
““Everyone who has met the babies are already saying both kids look just like their father!”
“Jay Z is on top of the world after wife Beyonce gave birth to their twins.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how he was especially moved to tears when he held his newborn son for the first time.”
“Daddy’s boy!”
“Jay Z finally has the son he’s longed for after wife Beyonce, 35, gave birth to their twins, a boy and a girl.”
““Jay was brought to tears when he held his new son for the first time.”
“He is already making plans for all the things he wants to teach the boy, places he wants to take the twins and all the wonderful things they will do,” a source close to the rapper tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Jay, 47, grew up without a father, so it must be so emotional to know his son will never have that same fate.”
“His boy will always have the guidance of a loving and caring dad at all times.”


"Give us your best guess!"
"Everyone who has seen children says that both children look like their father!"
"After his wife Beyonce gave birth to their twins, jay z was at the top of the list."
"We had an exclusive report on the details of his tears when he held his newborn son for the first time."
"Father's child!"
"His wife, Beyonce, 35, gave birth to twins, a man and a woman, and Jay finally has his dream son."
"The first time Jay Chou held his new son, he cried."
"He's already making plans for everything he wants to teach the boys, where he wants to take the twins and all the wonderful things they're going to do," a source close to the rapper told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"Jay Chou is 47 years old. He has no father since childhood. It must be very touching to know that his son will never have such a fate."
"His son will always be guided by a loving and loving father."



Number  1390
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Us Weekly has reached out to Beyoncé’s rep for comment.”
“They pointed out that Beyoncé and Jay-Z’s favorite number is four, which could mean that they’d love to welcome a fourth child.”
“Fans are speculating that Beyoncé might be pregnant again.”
“The 22-time Grammy winner, 36, appeared to have a bit of a bump while performing in Rome on Sunday, July 8, as part of her On the Run II stadium tour with her husband, Jay-Z.”
“Concertgoers shared videos of Beyoncé dancing on stage to “‘03 Bonnie & Clyde” in a formfitting silver minidress.”
“At the end of the song, she rubbed her stomach and smiled at the audience before walking away.”
“The couple already share daughter Blue Ivy, 6, and twins Rumi and Sir, 12 months.”
““Beyoncé is really pregnant again.. and she’s about to be a mother of 4 WOW,” one Twitter user speculated.”
“Another fan quipped, “SHE’S CREATING THE NEXT DESTINY’S CHILD BEFORE OUR EYES.”Some members of the Beyhive argued that the speculation may not be totally far-fetched.”
“After all, Queen Bey was born on September 4 and Hov’s birthday is December 4; they married on April 4, 2008; and Blue Ivy’s middle name comes from the roman numeral IV.”


"US Weekly has contacted Beyonce's representative for comments."
"They point out that Beyonce and Jay-Z's favorite number is 4, which may mean they want to welcome their fourth child."
"Fans speculated that Beyonce might be pregnant again."
"The 36 year old 22-year-old Grammy winner was a bit bumpy when she performed in Rome on Sunday as part of her tour with her husband Jay-Z at run II stadium."
The audience of the concert shared a video of Beyonce dancing for "03 Bonnie and Clyde" on stage in a silver mini skirt
"At the end of the song, she rubbed her stomach, laughed at the audience and walked away."
"The couple already have their six-year-old daughter, blue ivy, and their 12-month-old twin, Rumi and Mr
"Beyonce is really pregnant again.. "She's going to be a mother of four," one twitter user speculated
Another fan quipped: "she creates the next child in front of our eyes." Some members of Mr beshev believe that such speculation may not be entirely far fetched
"After all, Queen Bay was born on September 4, Hoff's birthday is December 4; they got married on April 4, 2008; the middle name of blue Ivy comes from the Roman numeral IV."



Number  1391
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Keep rocking like you’ve always done, you will forever be my inspiration and I love you.””
““JLo, watching your performance and then your speech made me even prouder than I already was,” said one heartfelt tweet.”
“(@kylzuur) August 21, 2018Kylie get your sorry ass up to pay respects to the queen JLO #VMAs — FRC (@fannyyrc) August 21, 2018Maybe Kylie and Travis didn’t enjoy themselves as much as they should have, but plenty of other fans were beyond thrilled about the performance.”
“Kylie can show some damn respect to JLo #VMAs — Alex Murillo (@Alextacy21) August 21, 2018if @KylieJenner doesn't get her billion dollar ass up from that chair -_- #VMAs — kyle.”
“Suffice it to say, fans were offended by the #disrespect.”
“Meanwhile, everyone around them was up out of their chairs dancing the night away, as you do.”
“And yet, when the cameras cut to the audience, they caught Kylie and Travis just sitting there, staring off into space without so much as a smile.”
“To make it more epic, she brought out Ja Rule, DJ Khaled, and more stars to perform with her.”
““Get Right,” “Jenny From The Block,” “Get On The Floor,” “Ain’t Yo Momma,” “Love Don’t Cost A Thing,” seriously, all the faves.”
“JLo was honored with the annual Video Vanguard award, but before she accepted it she performed a medley of basically every song you can think of.”


"Continue to rock as usual, you will always be my inspiration, I love you."
A heartfelt microblog said, "JLO, I saw your performance, and then your speech made me more proud than before."
"(@ kylzuur) 2018august 21, Kylie get your sorry ass up to payment to the queen jlo#vmas FRC (@ fannyyrc) 2018may Kylie and Travis have done not enjoy themselves as that they should, but many other fans are doing the performance."
"If Kylie Jenner can't lift her billion dollar ass from her chair, Kylie can pay tribute to jlo#vmas Alex Murillo (@ alexacy21)."
"Just to say that, fans are offended by this disrespect."
"At the same time, everyone around them gets up from their chairs and dances, just like you do."
"However, when the camera cuts to the audience, they find Kelly and Travis sitting there, staring into space without a smile."
"To make the film more epic, she brought Ja Rule, DJ Khaled and more stars to perform with her."
"That's right," "Jennie of the block," "lying on the floor," "not your mother," "love doesn't cost a cent," "seriously, all lovers."
"JLO won the video pioneer of the year award, but before she accepted it, she mixed every song you could think of."



Number  1392
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He also narrated an ad for President Obama’s reelection campaign in 2012.”
“...voice heard on a biographical video shown at the Democratic National Convention...”
“Clinton s campaign has also featured ads from the Shonda Rhimes produced shows Scandal How to Get Away With Murder and Grey s Anatomy as well as one featuring the cast of Empire Freeman narrated an ad for Clinton that aired before the South Carolina primary and also was the...”
“The one-minute ad, below, will air as part of an existing ad buy in Florida, Iowa, Nevada, New Hampshire, North Carolina, Ohio and Pennsylvania, as well as on with national cable.”
“Titled “Example,” the spot contrasts Clinton’s career with that of Donald Trump, positioning it as a choice of “who will we entrust our country and their future to.” For example, the ad presents Clinton as knowledgable and steady, and Trump as unprepared and reckless.”
“Hillary Clinton’s campaign is debuting some of her closing arguments in her campaign ads, including a spot that is narrated by Morgan Freeman.”


"He also talked about the advertisement for Obama's re-election campaign in 2012."
“… Voices heard in biographical videos broadcast at the Democratic National Convention... "
"Clinton's campaign also includes commercials for" how scandal escapes murder "and" Gray's Anatomy "produced by seanda Reims, as well as Clinton's commercials broadcast by the" empire free men "crew before the South Carolina primary, as well..."
"The next one minute ad will be broadcast as part of an existing ad in Florida, Iowa, Nevada, New Hampshire, North Carolina, Ohio and Pennsylvania, as well as on national cable TV."
The ad, titled "role models," contrasts Clinton's career with Donald Trump's, positioning it as a choice of "to whom we will entrust our country and their future.". For example, the ad portrays Clinton as knowledgeable and steady, while trump as unprepared and reckless
"For the first time, Hillary Clinton's campaign showed some of her closing statements in her campaign ad, including a place that Morgan Freeman told us."



Number  1393
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Keeping with tradition, Kourtney shared a photo of each of her sons' birthday cakes before showing fans photos of theme park...”
“Before heading out on their big adventure, the boys were surprised by aunt Khloe Kardashian with massive balloon FerrarisOriginal: The bright red balloon Ferrari featured each boys' name written on the license platesHey Mickey!”
“So it comes as no surprise Kim and Kourtney Kardashian went all-out to toast Saint West, two, and Reign Disick, three, as they enjoyed a joint birthday bash at the elder sister's home in Calabasas, California.”
“The reality star, 38, shared photos from the fun-filled family day on her blog as she and Kim, 37, threw their boys a Monsters Inc. themed party, complete with an ice skating rink and snow sledding hill.”
“Scroll down for video Birthday boy Kim Kardashian planted a sweet kiss on son Saint two as they celebrated his big day with a joint Monsters Inc themed birthday party with cousin Reign three Her little monster Kourtney took to her blog to share adorable snaps from the bash with...”
“...little Reign looking positively adorable while dressed in a blue monster costume with purple spots Kourtney wrote This year I hosted a Monsters Inc themed birthday party with a holiday twist for Reign and Saint since it s one of their favorite movies...”
“'We had an ice skating rink, a sledding hill (with snow!”
“), cupcake decorating stations, and lots of snacks and activities for the kids.'”
“In one sweet photo, Kourtney could be seen cozying up to her young son - who she raises with ex Scott Disick, 34 - as he wore an adorable blue monster costume with bright purple spots.”
“'Whenever we have parties for the little kids, I always make sure we do low tables with small chairs so there's a place they can sit down and have a snack,' Kourtney added.”


"Traditionally, Courtney would share a picture of his son's birthday cake before showing his fans a picture of the theme park..."
"Before embarking on their big adventure, the boys were startled by aunt Khloe Kardashian's giant balloon Ferrari: the bright red balloon Ferrari had every boy's name on the license plate, shey Mickey!"
"So it's not surprising that Kim and kurtany Kardashian are doing their best to drink to two-year-old St. West and three-year-old RAF Disick as they celebrate their birthday together at their sister's home in Calabasas, California."
The 38 year old reality TV star shared photos of the fun filled family day on her blog when she and Kim, 37, hosted a monsters Inc. - themed party for their children, as well as a skating rink and ski hill
"Roll down the video of birthday boy Kim Kardashian planting a sweet kiss on son Saint II as they celebrate his big day, rule three with cousin, and her little monster Courtney goes to her blog to share lovely snapshots from carnival with..."
“… Little Ruijin is wearing a blue monster costume with purple spots on it. It looks very cute. Courtney wrote, "this year I had a monster company themed birthday party for regent and saints because it was one of their favorite movies..."
"We have a skating rink, a sled mountain (with snow!"
Cupcake decoration station, there are many snacks and children's activities
In a sweet photo, Courtney is wearing a lovely blue monster costume with bright purple spots. She raised her youngest son with former Scott Disick, 34
"Whenever we have a party for kids, I always make sure that we arrange low tables and small chairs so they can sit down and eat," Courtney added



Number  1394
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Additionally, while the magazine asserts there’s concerns Pitt is on the verge of a relapse, it was just reliably reported last week that he is feeling “better than ever” and has embraced a “healthier lifestyle.” It’s apparent this story is entirely inaccurate.”
“That means this article is based on a false premise.”
“Gossip Cop can debunk this report.”
“Pitt is committed to his sobriety, and was never dating Oxman in the first place.”
“But the Globe wants readers to believe Pitt has suffered a painful blow to the heart after Oxman jilted him for a billionaire The magazine contends that friends now fear losing at love will send the actor into a destructive abuse binge The narrative was sparked by Oxman being seen...”
“...with her boyfriend Bill Ackman in Paris last month...”
““Brad still thought things would work out with Neri.”
“So it was a shock when he saw she’s back with Bill,” a so-called “source” is quoted as saying.”
“Maintains the outlet, “Now sources worry the Allied star could fall off the wagon… Insiders worry the stress of romantic disappointment and his custody war [with Angelina Jolie] could trigger an issue.” Of course, none of these untraceable “sources” or “insiders” are named.”
“Gossip Cop can’t help but wonder if they’re the same ones that led this publication to falsely allege last month that Pitt and Jolie were “calling off” their divorce.”


Moreover, despite the magazine's claim that people are worried about Pitt's imminent relapse, it was reliably reported that last week he felt "better than ever" and accepted a "healthier lifestyle.". Obviously, this report is totally inaccurate
"It means the article is based on a wrong premise."
"The gossip police can expose this report."
"Pete is committed to staying awake and has never dated Oxman from the beginning."
"But the globe wants readers to believe that after Oxman abandoned Pitt to become a billionaire, Pitt's heart has suffered a painful blow. According to the magazine, friends now worry that losing love will lead Pete into a devastating wave of abuse. The cause of the story is that Oxman was seen... "
“… Last month in Paris with her boyfriend bill Ackerman... "
"Brad still thinks things with Neri will work out."
"So when he saw her coming back with bill, he was shocked," said a so-called "source."
"Keep the exit," now sources worry that League stars may fall out of the carriage Insiders worry that the pressure of romantic disappointment and his custody War (with Angelina Jolie) could cause a problem. "Of course, none of these untraceable" sources "or" insiders "has been named."
"The scandal police can't help asking if they are the people who caused the publication to falsely claim that Pitt and Julie" cancelled "their divorce last month."



Number  1395
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“As for her, she hasn't officially been with anybody since dating Darren Aronofsky.”
“Maybe the best thing for him would be Jen?”
“Rob has been turning his life around recently, with a dramatic weight transformation and completely cutting Chyna out of his life so he can be a good dad to baby Dream.”
“"He's always gone for the bad girls, so Jen is a complete breath of fresh air," the insider revealed.”
“Naturally, Rob is "totally smitten" with Jen.”
“"After a few long phone calls and coffee dates and lunches, Jen is pleasantly surprised!"”
“...an insider said to the mag.”
“"So when Kris approached her about taking Rob out, Jen figured, 'Why not?'"”
“According to OK Magazine, the two met in passing, and Jen thought he was "sort of cute."”
“AND IT'S WORKING.”


"As for her, she has never been in a formal relationship since she dated Darren Aronofsky."
"Maybe the best thing for him is Jane?"
"Rob has recently turned his life around. His weight has changed dramatically. He has completely removed Zina from his life so that he can become a good father with a baby dream."
"He always likes bad girls, so Jane is a totally fresh air breathing," the inside revealed
"Naturally, rob is" totally obsessed "with Jane
"After a few phone calls, a few coffee drinks and a few lunches, Jen was so surprised!"
“…… An insider told the magazine
"So when Chris approached her to take rob out, Jane thought," why not? "
According to OK magazine, the two met by chance, and Jane thought he was "a little cute"
"It's working."



Number  1396
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“MORE : Selena Gomez ‘suffered from depression’ after life-saving kidney transplant...”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“Got a showbiz story?”
“At one point, the emotional star could be seen covering his face with his hands – in a possible bid to hide his tears – while waiting in the car for his dad.”
“Well – it’s good to see Justin in high spirits as he was pictured looking pretty emotional last week when he was out and about with dad, Jeremy.”
“‘They have their own issues and are always on and off.’Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez recently reunited (Picture: WireImage)‘She wouldn’t base her relationship off of what her mum thinks,’ they added.”
“‘They’re not on a break because of her relationship with her mum,’ they explained.”
“However, a source later told People magazine this could not be further from the truth.”
“...together for some time now adding fuel to the break up rumours and now these images of Justin looking comfy with another woman have pretty much started a blaze of speculation...”
“Selena has tried to convince her family that Justin has changed but her family just isn t budging right now Justin looked in high spirits Picture Backgrid Of course nothing has been heard from the horse s mouth but Biebs and the 25 year old singer have not been pictured...”


"More: Serena Gomez 'suffers from depression' after life-saving kidney transplantation..."
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"Is there a story about the show business?"
"Once, when people saw this emotional star waiting for his father in the car, they covered his face with their hands - probably to hide their tears."
"Well, it's great to see Justin in high spirits, because when he went out with his father Jeremy last week, he looked very emotional in the picture."
Justin Bieber and Serena Gomez recently met (image source: WireImage), and they also said: "they have their own problems, always intermittent, and she won't base her relationship on her mother's ideas."
"They didn't rest because of her relationship with her mother," they explained
"However, a source later told people that this was far from the truth."
“…… For some time, Justin and another woman looked very comfortable together, which added fuel to the rumor of breaking up. Now these photos almost triggered a speculation... "
"Selena tries to convince her family that Justin has changed, but her family hasn't given up yet. Justin is looking at the background happily. Of course, she doesn't hear the sound of muzzle, but Bibbs and the 25-year-old singer haven't been photographed yet..."



Number  1397
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Like us on Facebook.”
“Want more stuff like this?”
“Maybe the next rumor will be that the studio offered Nolan two hundred meeellliion dollars to return.”
“His "Dark Knight" trilogy with director Christopher Nolan was a commercial and critical success.”
“Even though Christian Bale would almost certainly never even entertain the idea of returning as Batman, you can't blame anyone who wishes he would.”
“Jake Gyllenhaal's name just got thrown in the mix for Matt Reeves' "The Batman" standalone movie, and we're OK with that idea.”
“Batman replacement rumors have been running rampant lately, after the general disappointment of "Justice League" and Ben Affleck saying he was looking for a graceful way to exit.”
“(Besides, Christian Bale isn't exactly ready to fit back in the Batsuit any time soon.)”
“A spokesman for Warner Bros. told Gossip Cop the magazine's entire story was "categorically false."”
“But it should be pretty easy to say no if it didn't happen.”


"It's like we're on Facebook."
"Want more of this?"
"Maybe the next rumor is that the studio gave Nolan two hundred dollars to get him back."
"He and director Christopher Nolan's" the Dark Knight "trilogy have been successful both in business and in the critical world."
"While Christian bell will almost certainly not consider returning as Batman, you can't blame anyone who wants him back."
"Jack Gyllenhaal's name just appeared in the mix of Matt Reeves' Batman indie movie, and we agree with that."
"Batman substitution rumors have been rampant recently, and Justice League has been generally disappointed before. Ben Affleck said that he is looking for an elegant way to exit."
"(besides, Christian bell is not quite ready to put on his baseball uniform in a short time.)
A Warner Bros. spokesman told gossip police that the magazine's entire story was "absolutely false."
"But if it doesn't happen, it should be easy to say no."



Number  1398
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“In June, a report surfaced that Foxx and Holmes had been planning a wedding but had split amid “trust issues.” Holmes’ rep Leslie Sloane told PEOPLE at the time, the “story is 100 percent untrue.””
“Last month, Foxx and the Dawson’s Creek alum dined at Tao together in N.Y.C.”
“They kissed on a beach towel and cuddled in front of a volleyball net.”
“They often go to restaurants for dinner dates, or to hang out with friends.”RELATED VIDEO: Katie Holmes Steps Out in NYC After Speaking Out Against Online Gossip Site ReportFoxx and Holmes packed on the PDA at the beach earlier this month.”
““But this year, they have been more social together.”
““After the beach pictures, they only spent time together at home and got extra careful,” the source commented.”
““Everyone knows they are dating, but they still want to keep it private.”The source said that getting spotted by photographers in Malibu in 2017 made them more cautious.”
““Katie and Jamie are still careful about being photographed together,” the source said.”
“A source explained to PEOPLE in May why Foxx and Holmes tend to leave places at different times.”
“The two were seen separately leaving a location in the city.”


In June, it was reported that Fox and Sherlock Holmes had been planning a wedding, but broke up because of "trust problems". Leslie Sloane, a representative of Sherlock Holmes, told people at the time, "this story is 100 percent untrue."
"Last month, fox had dinner with alum from Dawson Creek in Tao, New York."
"They kiss on the beach towel and hug in front of the volleyball net."
"They often go to restaurants for dinner, date, or go out with friends." Related video: Katie Holmes walked out of New York earlier this month after rowing with Internet gossip sites reportfoxx and Holmes on the beach's PDA
"But this year, they're more social together."
"After taking photos of the beach, they only stay at home together and are very careful," the source commented
"Everyone knows they're dating, but they want to keep it a secret." The source said that being discovered by photographers in Malibu in 2017 made them more cautious
"Katie and Jamie are still very careful to be photographed together," the source said
"A source explained to people in May why Fox and Holmes left at different times."
"They were seen leaving a place in the city."



Number  1399
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“Mehera Bonner Contributor Mehera Bonner is a news writer who focuses on celebrities and royals— follow her on InstagramThis content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“And now that Pippa Middleton's wedding to James Matthews is approaching, gossip magazines (in particular, The Sun) are reporting that she has the royal equivalent of *beef* with Prince Harry's girlfriend Meghan Markle.”
“The specifics?”
“Apparently, Markle won't be invited to Pippa's wedding thanks to a "no ring, no bring" policy—with a source noting, "It's clear Pippa doesn't want to be outshone by any TV babes on her big day."”
“Pippa Middleton and James Matthews attend Wimbledon in 2016.”
“Getty ImagesInterestingly, Pippa's future brother-in-law Spencer Matthews is also reportedly not allowed to bring his girlfriend, reality television star Vogue Williams.”
“"Pippa's view is that Vogue's relationship with Spencer is still very new.”
“It wouldn't be appropriate for her to be there after just a few months of dating," the source says.”
“"But some people in the circle are pretty shocked because this is her future brother-in-law who's going to end up attending on his own.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
"Mehera Bonner writer Mehera Bonner is a news writer who follows celebrities and royalty - follows her on instagram. This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported into this page to help users provide their email addresses."
"Now that Pippa Middleton and James Matthews are getting married, gossip magazines (especially the sun) report that she has a royal beef relationship with Prince Harry's girlfriend Megan markel."
"What's the situation?"
"Obviously, because of the" no ring, no gift "policy, markel will not be invited to Pippa's wedding. A source pointed out," it's obvious that Pippa doesn't want to be surpassed by any TV beauty on her big day. "
"Pippa Middleton and James Matthews will be at Wimbledon in 2016."
According to reports, Pippa's future brother-in-law Spencer Matthews is also not allowed to bring his girlfriend, reality TV star vogue Williams
"Pippa's view is that Vogue's relationship with Spencer is still very new."
"It's not appropriate for her to be there after a few months of dating," the source said
"But some people in the circle are quite shocked, because this is her future brother-in-law, and they have to participate in it in the end."



Number  1400
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It calls to mind a trashy and inconsequential romance novel, which, when punctuated with the film’s moments of violence, wounds, and blood, feels more hilarious than horrifying.”
“So lest we take things too seriously, Coppola employs a pink cursive script for the title card, embellished with flourishes and compressed slightly from both ends.”
“But they re best taken with the historical context in mind and what the characters are experiencing from their secluded vantage point the dismay of knowing their social order is disappearing and the dreariness of living from day to day with nothing to do but keep at the embroidery practice...”
“Those elements are in The Beguiled, for sure.”
“In that film, the girls are hungry for male interaction, partly because they want to have sex and partly because they’re just desperate for an outlet and an escape from their intense loneliness.”
“The Beguiled takes place late in the Civil War, when ennui has set inThe sister to The Beguiled in Coppola’s oeuvre is certainly The Virgin Suicides, another film about a house full of young women held captive for their own good (and in which Kirsten Dunst also starred).”
“In The Beguiled, much of the fun (and suspense) comes from trying to guess which is the case.”
“Years of that kind of thing can make you crazy, or it can be a clarifying force.”
“They’re reduced to praying for the soldiers, hiding their cow so nobody steals it, and trying to keep away from the gaze of the men who march by, lest they be tempted.”
“But society requires them to remain civilized, embroidering in the drawing room to the sound of booming cannon fire on the battlefield beyond the seminary’s gates.”


"It reminds me of a meaningless, meaningless romantic novel. When it is interspersed with moments of violence, trauma and blood in the film, it makes people feel funny rather than terrible."
"To prevent us from taking things too seriously, Coppola used a pink cursive on his business card, decorated with flowers, slightly compressed from both ends."
"However, it's better for them to consider the historical background and the experiences of the characters, and from the perspective of their isolation from the world, to know the depression that their social order is disappearing and the boredom of living in embroidery practice with nothing to do every day..."
"Of course, these elements are cheated."
"In that movie, girls are eager to interact with men, on the one hand because they want to have sex, on the other hand because they are very eager for an exit and get rid of strong loneliness."
"The deceived" takes place in the late civil war. In Coppola's "suicide of a virgin", the sister of the deceived is tired. This is another film about a room full of young women being imprisoned for their own benefit (Kirsten Dunst also stars in this film)
"In being cheated, most of the fun (and suspense) comes from guessing what's going on."
"Years of this kind of thing can drive you crazy, or it can be a power of clarification."
"They are reduced to praying for the soldiers, hiding the cattle so that no one steals them, and trying to avoid the eyes of those who pass by so that they won't be tempted."
"But society requires them to be civilized, embroidered in the living room with the sound of guns on the battlefield outside the gate of the seminary."



Number  1401
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“AdvertisementFortunately, the producers and staff were able to “choreograph” everything in such a way that both stars could feel comfortable on the morning show.”
““Katie got out of the religion and knows everything, and she wants nothing to do with Scientology,” the insider explained about the awkward situation between the two guests on Good Morning America.”
“...was considered to be a suppressive person and shunned by the Scientology community after her divorce from Tom Cruise the messiah of Scientology and the most iconic star involved with the cult...”
“One former Scientologist revealed that the woman confronted her when she found out about the decision to leave Scientology and It was one of the ugliest and nastiest things I ve ever seen a human being do and to this day I just can t stand her Besides Katie Holmes...”
“As fans may already know, in the past, Elfman was known for attacking those who left the faith.”
““She was literally hiding from her and she seemed scared.”Not to mention, the staff even had to change Katie’s dressing room just because she wanted to be nowhere near the Scientologist.”
“[media-credit name=”Source: radar.com” align=”aligncenter” width=”594″] [/media-credit]In fact, the source revealed that Katie, who was on the show to talk about her role as Jacqueline Kennedy was “terrified” backstage.”
“However, despite all of that, it turns out that the other scheduled guest was not too happy to see her.”
““She was happy and charming and the audience loved her,” the insider added.”
““Jenna was doing the show live to promote her new ABC show,” one on-set source stated.”


Fortunately, the producers and staff were able to "choreograph" everything so that both stars could feel comfortable on the morning show
"Katie is divorced from religion and knows everything. She doesn't want to have anything to do with Scientology," the insider explained the embarrassing situation between the two guests on the Good Morning America show
“… Considered a repressive person and shunned after her divorce from the Scientology Messiah and the most iconic star involved in the cult Tom Cruise community
"A former Scientology believer revealed that this woman confronted her when she learned of her decision to leave Scientology. This is one of the ugliest and dirtiest things that human beings have ever done. Up to now, except Katie Holmes, I really can't stand her..."
"Fans may already know that in the past, Elfman was known for attacking people who left their faith."
"She's avoiding her. She seems scared." Not to mention, the staff even had to change Katie's dressing room just because she didn't want to be close to Scientology
"[media credit name =" source: radar network "align =" aligncenter "width =" 594 "] [/ media credit] in fact, sources revealed that Katie, who talked about her role as Jacqueline Kennedy on the show, was" scared "backstage
"Nevertheless, it turned out that another scheduled guest was not very happy to see her."
"She's very happy and charming, and the audience likes her," the person said
A live source said: "Jenna is on the show to promote her new ABC program."



Number  1402
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And then this crept up on me,” she told the publication.”
“Robbie’s brother Cameron teased that he was “on holiday,” and another photo surfaced of him with four women believed to be friends of his sister.”
“Australia’s The Daily Telegraph claims the couple wed in Byron Bay over the weekend, although they never announced an engagement.”
“The actress was given away by her mother and her three siblings were in attendance, according to U.K.’s The Telegraph.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“A rep for the actress has not responded to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“Suspicions of the 26 year old Suicide Squad star s secret wedding arose when Robbie arrived at an airport in her home country last week wearing a T shirt that read Say I Do Down Under Although no photos of the supposed ceremony have surfaced online a couple of posts...”
“...hint at a special occasion involving several of the couple s family members...”
“The picture was captioned, “The calm before the Summer storm.”In addition, Ackerley’s brother James posted an image on Instagram with the location tagged as Harvest Newrybar, a popular wedding venue in Byron Bay, on Sunday.”
“The idea of relationships made me want to vomit.”


"Then it happened to me quietly," she told the magazine
Robbie's brother, Cameron, joked that he was "on holiday," and another picture of him and four women believed to be his sister's friends surfaced
Australia's Daily Telegraph said the couple married in Byron Bay over the weekend, but never announced their engagement
The actress was abandoned by her mother and three brothers and sisters attended the meeting, the Telegraph reported.
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"A representative of the actress did not respond to requests for comment."
"People suspect the 26 year old suicide team star's secret wedding because Robbie came to an airport in her motherland last week wearing a T-shirt with the words" I'd like to come down ". Although there are no photos of the so-called wedding on the Internet, there are several posts..."
“… Suggesting a special occasion involving family members of several couples... "
The title of this photo is "calm before the summer storm.". In addition, Ackley's brother James posted a photo on instagram on Sunday, marked as harvest newrybar, a popular wedding venue in Byron Bay
"The thought of falling in love makes me sick."



Number  1403
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In related news, tickets to Katy Perry’s Friday show in New Orleans are currently starting at $23.”
“...week...”
“Now for the same seats I have to pay about 500 G O Media may get a commission Up To 85 Off Lelo Valentine s Day Sale Click Here To Have Your Mind Blown Get discounts on vibrators rings and cutting edge sex tech now through the end of the...”
““I paid $150 for my ticket with amazing seats for the 1989 tour,” one fan wrote.”
“People willing to drop $50 on merch, the Post reports, could “improve [their] position in line to purchase tickets.” And, once accessible, the tickets are often too expensive for many fans.”
“AdvertisementThe company’s “Verified Fan” program, which they would like you to believe is all about rewarding music lovers, appears to be nothing but a cash grab that takes advantage of Swift-obsessed teens with easy access to their parents’ credit card numbers.”
“It does, however, highlight the problems with unpredictable pricing, scalpers, and Ticketmaster in general.”
“Reputation was the biggest-selling album of 2017 and the tour is shaping up to be far from ill-attended, so the Post’s headline, “Taylor Swift’s Reputation tour shaping up to be a disaster,” is a little much.”
“...has sold out...”
“Last month her longtime tour promoter told Billboard By the time all the tickets are sold next week I ll be celebrating Taylor s birthday with a cocktail in my hand and sold out concerts all over the world But her birthday has come and gone and not one date...”


"In related news, tickets for Katie Perry's performance in New Orleans on Friday currently start at $23."
“… Week... "
"Now I have to pay about 500 go for the same seat, and media may get as much as 85% commission from the Lelo Valentine's day sale. Click here to get your head warmed up and get discounts on vibrator rings and cutting-edge technology now through the end of the year..."
One fan wrote: "I paid $150 for a ticket to the 1989 tour, and the seats were great."
People willing to spend $50 on merch can "improve their standing in line to buy tickets," the Post reported. Moreover, once tickets are available, they are often too expensive for many fans
The advertising company's "fan verification" program, which they want you to believe is a program to reward music lovers, seems to be nothing more than a cash grab, using fast obsessed teenagers to easily get their parents' credit card numbers
"However, it does highlight unpredictable pricing, scalpers and ticket executives."
"Reputation is the biggest selling album in 2017, and the attendance of the tour is far from decreasing, so the post's title" Taylor Swift's reputation tour is going to be a disaster "is a bit excessive."
“… It's sold out... "
"Last month, her longtime tour promoter told the billboard that all tickets were sold out next week, and I would celebrate Taylor's birthday with my cocktail. Concerts all over the world were sold out, but her birthday came and went, and there was no date..."



Number  1404
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“@carolinephinney...”
“And on Rihanna's 30th birthday he even posted an Instagram celebrating her.”
“The source said that although she probably won't get back together with him at this moment, "she is thinking about meeting up with Chris for dinner.”This report comes after multiple reports last week that Rihanna and Chris Brown still talk "all the time."”
“"What made the list was to make peace with some things in her past, including her history with Chris Brown,” a source close to the singer told Hollywood Life, adding that she feels like her story with Chris is "not done yet."”
“The site reported that upon turning 30, Rihanna made a list of things she wanted to do for herself, however it might not be with who we think.”
“However, according to Hollywood Life, the "Work" singer “wants to get together” with Brown, because she "has a special place in her heart for him," and feels like they still have some "unfinished business."”
“The ex couple's relationship ended when Brown attacked her on the way to the Grammy's Awards party in 2009, to which he pled guilty.”
“Apparently Rihanna is having a (slightly more than) quarter life c(h)risis, and reconsidering whether or not she wants to stay with her billionaire boyfriend, or get back together with Chris Brown.”


"@ Caroline fini..."
"On Rihanna's 30th birthday, he even launched an instagram to celebrate her."
"The source said that although she may not be with him now, she is considering having dinner with Chris." There were several reports last week that Rihanna and Chris Brown were still "talking all the time."
A source close to the singer told Hollywood Life: "the reason she's on the list is to reconcile with some of her past events, including her history with Chris Brown," adding that she feels her story with Chris "is not over."
"At the age of 30, Rihanna listed what she wanted to do for herself, but it might not be what we thought," the website reported
"However, according to Hollywood life, the" work "singer" wants to be "with brown" because she "has a special place in her heart" and thinks they still have some "unfinished business."
"In 2009, brown attacked her on the way to the Grammy Awards party, and the relationship between the former couple ended. Brown pleaded guilty to this."
"It's clear that Rihanna is (slightly more than) a quarter at risk, and she's Rethinking whether she wants to be with her billionaire boyfriend or with Chris Brown."



Number  1405
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“A source tells ET that the 54-year-old actor is “in a great place personally and professionally” as he heads back to the set of his upcoming movie, Once Upon a Time in Hollywood, after recently spending time with his six kids in London.”
““He’s happy to be back in Los Angeles filming,” the source says.”
““He’s good-natured and professional on set.”
“He is warm and authentic with everyone around.”
“When he isn’t filming, he spends most of his time away in his trailer.”The source notes that Pitt’s children with Angelina Jolie -- Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, and the twins Knox and Vivienne -- have not visited their father during the film's production.”
“In August, when Pitt was filming Ad Astra, a source told ET, “He's a movie star in the best way, prepared, on time and friendly.”
“All the things you want a person to be… he is that.”
“He's always ready to work.”The Real Story Behind Brad Pitt's Relationship With MIT Professor Neri Oxman This video is unavailable because we were unable to load a message from our sponsors.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
A source told et that the 54 year old actor, who recently spent some time in London with his six children, was preparing to return to the set of the upcoming film "former Hollywood."
"He's happy to be back in Los Angeles to shoot," the source said
"He has a good temper on the set and is very professional."
"He was warm and sincere to the people around him."
"When he's not filming, he spends most of his time on trailers." According to sources, none of Pitt's and Angelina Jolie's children - Maddox, parks, Zahara, Shiloh, and twins Knox and Vivian - visited their father during the production
"He's a movie star with the best way, preparation, punctuality and friendliness," a source told ET in August when Pitt was filming "the Astra commercial."
"What kind of person do you want to be That's what he is
The true story behind Brad Pitt's relationship with MIT professor nery Oxman is not available because we can't load the sponsor information



Number  1406
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“10+ pictures inside of Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez at a wedding…”
“September at Planet Hollywood...”
“PHOTOS Check out the latest pics of Jennifer Lopez Jen has been in the Big Apple this summer while shooting the upcoming third season of her hit NBC series Shades of Blue though she ll be heading back to Las Vegas soon as her All I Have residency continues in...”
“Jennifer chose a teal gown while Alex was classic in a black tuxedo.”
“The hot couple looked like a million bucks together in their fancy black tie outfits.”
“Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez hold hands while heading into Cipriani’s Wall Street for a friend’s wedding on Sunday night (August 6) in New York City.”


"More than 10 photos of Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez at the wedding..."
"September on Hollywood..."
"Photo check out the latest photo taken by Jennifer Lopez Jen at big apple this summer while filming the upcoming third season of the NBC hit series shadows of blue, but once her all I have The right of abode continues in Las Vegas, and she will soon return to Las Vegas... "
"Jennifer chose a turquoise dress and Alex a classic black tuxedo."
"This hot couple is wearing a beautiful black tie and looks like they've made a million dollars together."
"Jennifer Lopez and Alex Rodriguez are holding hands on Sunday (August 6) night in New York City as they head to Cipriani's Wall Street for a friend's wedding."



Number  1407
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We’ll be on the lookout to see where things go from here!”
“With how close Kylie and Travis have been in the past few months, we wouldn’t be surprised if they decided to get married soon.”
“We’d say she’s living the life right now so props to her!”
“She’s also been embracing motherhood with her five-month-old daughter Stormi.”
“She was recently the cover girl for the latest issue of Forbes Magazine due to the wealthy fortune she’s created with Kylie Cosmetics and more.”
“In addition to her amazing love life, Kylie has a lot to be happy about.”
“Until Kylie or Travis confirm that they’re getting hitched, we think it’s safe to say that the new mom just likes wearing extravagant jewelry from time to time and since she’s almost a billionaire, why not?!”
“Kylie wore the ring back in April when she rented out a Six Flags amusement park to celebrate Travis’ birthday and just like now, the engagement rumors began to flow.”
“Although Kylie’s diamond ring is definitely a reason to suspect, this isn’t the first time the makeup mogul has made headlines for wearing it.”
““First Ferdi,” Travis captioned the eye-catching pic.”


"We will pay attention to the development of the situation!"
"Given Kelly's close relationship with Travis over the past few months, we wouldn't be surprised if they decided to get married soon."
"We'll say she's living like this now, so give her props!"
"She's also been hugging her five month old daughter, Tommy, as a mother."
"She recently became the cover girl of the latest issue of Forbes magazine because she created a lot of wealth with Kelly cosmetics and so on."
"In addition to her amazing love life, Kelly has a lot to be happy about."
"Before Kelly or Travis confirms that they are going to get married, we think it's certain that the new mother just likes to wear luxury jewelry from time to time. Now that she's almost a billionaire, why not?"
"Kelly wore this ring when she rented a six flag amusement park in April to celebrate Travis's birthday. As now, rumors of engagement are spreading."
"Although Kelly's diamond ring is definitely a cause for doubt, this is not the first time that the make-up tycoon has made headlines for wearing a diamond ring."
"The first feddy," Travis added a title to the eye-catching photo



Number  1408
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“According to Vulture, ICM Partners publishing agent Esther Newberg discussed the project on Variety's Strictly Business podcast this week, announcing that she expected the book to be available in time for the 2018 holiday shopping season.”
“RELATED: Books becoming movies in 2018Prince's memoir to be released by the end of the year After months of delay, it seems the world may actually get a Prince memoir by the end of the year.”
“Other people's opinions are usually more distractive than informative.”
“"You have the best ideas.”
“It's better than any movie," he offered on Wednesday, April 18.”
“Just be still and enjoy your own imagination.”
“"When you first wake up don't hop right on the phone or the internet or even speak to anyone for even up to an hour if possible.”
“Midway through a stream of posts similar to the "sometimes you have to get rid of everything" tweet Kim and Chrissy Teigen went to town on earlier this week, Kanye announced his stream-of-consciousness had a greater, literary purpose.”
“It turns out Yeezy's writing a philosophy book "in real time" on the social media platform.”
“RELATED: Beyonce's best looksKanye West is writing a philosophy book 'in real time' on Twitter Troll-worthy or not, Kim Kardashian West better get used seeing to her husband's deep thoughts on Twitter.”


"According to vultures, Esther Newberg, ICM partner publishing agent, discussed the project this week on variety's rigorous business podcast, announcing that she expects the book to be available in time for the 2018 holiday shopping season."
"Related reports: in 2018, the book in the prince's memoir will become a film, and it will be released at the end of the year after a few months' delay. It seems that the world may really get a prince's memoir at the end of the year."
"Other people's opinions are usually distracting rather than informative."
"You have the best idea."
"It's better than any movie," he said on Wednesday, April 18
"Enjoy your imagination quietly."
"When you wake up for the first time, if possible, don't call or surf the Internet directly, or even talk to anyone for an hour."
Earlier this week, Kim Jong Un and Chris tygan posted a series of posts on a microblog similar to "sometimes you have to get rid of everything." halfway through, Kanye announced that his stream of consciousness had a greater literary purpose
"It turns out that Yates wrote philosophy books" in real time "on the social media platform."
"Related report: Kanye West, Beyonce's most handsome man, is writing a philosophy book on twitter in" real time ". Whether it's worth it or not, Kim Kardashian West had better get used to seeing her husband's deep thoughts on twitter."



Number  1409
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Although most have managed it better than scaredy cat Drake!”
“But it has drawn many celebrities and rock stars over the years.”
“My head hurts.Of course, the house in Laurel Canyon only has a tenuous connection to Houdini, as I covered in this 2012 post.”
“Fake news creating fake news to debunk it as fake news?”
“But as I can't seem to find the original story at, I'm wondering if Gossip Cop invented the story just so they could debunk it.”
“...the tabloid reports:However, the website Gossip Cop doubts the story, citing the "suspicious language" of the tipster.”
“Under the headline, "Drake Hits The Brakes At Haunted Houdini House!"”
“A story in thesays that rapper Drake was "scared away" from the fabled Houdini Esate in Laural Canyon while shooting a promotional video.”
“...car at a er dead run...”
“Totally terrified twitching at every creepy creak or chilly draft on his cheek distraught Drizzy saying he felt like he was burning in the hotline to hell finally performed his own magic abruptly disappearing down the path back to his...”


"Although most people do better than Drake, the coward cat!"
"But it has attracted a lot of celebrities and rock stars over the years."
"My head hurts. Of course, the house in Laurel Canyon has a weak connection with Houdini, as I said in my article in 2012. "
"False news makes false news and exposes false news?"
"But as I can't seem to find the original story on the Internet, I want to know if the gossip police fabricated the story in order to expose it."
“… Tabloid report: however, the gossip website "police" to the informant's "suspicious language" as an excuse to doubt the matter
The title is "Drake braked at Houdini's haunted home!"
This is the story of a rapper, Drake, who was "scared away" by the legendary Houdini esart of the laural Canyon while filming a promotional video
“… The car is in an emergency... "
"Every squeak or cold wind on his cheek made him twitch. He felt like he was burned in the hot line of hell. Finally, he performed his magic and suddenly disappeared on the way back home..."



Number  1410
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"The pair also appear together in an hour-long roundtable video interview with The Hollywood Reporter:This article originally appeared in news.com.au.”
“He s very similar to David Miscavige they could be twins This isn t the first time Remini s spoken publicly about the most famous Scientologist in the world in an interview with Larry King late last year she said she suspected Cruise thought she was the devil for leaving...”
“Aftermath...”
“In a Reddit AMA to promote the second season of the show, Remini was asked if she thought Tom Cruise, a Scientologist since 1990, was a “good person."”
“Her response was blunt.”
““No!”
“Just going to get straight to it, no!”
“There is a public persona of the guy who looks at you directly in the eye and shakes your hand and hugs you and is an attentive person to you and there’s the person behind the mask who is a completely different person,” she wrote.”
““Someone could say we all have that — what we are to the public and who we are behind the scenes, but the people who are around Tom and work for Tom, not even people who are Scientologists, they will say he is diabolical,” she continued.”
““People who’ve worked with me will say I can be an a-----e — all actors can be.”


"They also appeared together in an hour long round table video interview on Hollywood TV. Reporter: This article first appeared on the news network."
"He's very similar to David misevici, they could be twins. This is not the first time ramini has talked publicly about the world's most famous Scientology scholar. In an interview with Larry King at the end of last year, she said that she suspected that cruise thought she was the devil to leave... "
"Consequences..."
In promoting the second season of the show, ramini was asked if he thought Tom Cruise was a "good man.". Tom Cruise has been a Scientologist since 1990
"Her answer was straightforward."
"No!"
"I'm going straight to the point, no!"
"There is a public image of a man who looks you in the eye, holds your hand and hugs you. He is a careful person to you, and the person behind the mask is a completely different person," she wrote
"One might say that we all have these - who we are in public, who we are behind the scenes, but those who work for Tom around him, not even Scientologists, would say he's the devil," she continued
"People who have worked with me will say that I can be a good actor, all the actors can be."



Number  1411
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s just become a problem.'”
“'I was boozing too much.”
“There were rumours the divorce was being called off, but that's not the case.'”
“'The key thing is that they agree to custody sharing, with Brad having access and working with Angelina on logistic issues about work and travel.”
“Both decided it was crucial for the children that they had a respectful relationship.”
“'It's a huge turnaround from where the marriage ended, especially given the claims Angelina made against Brad, but they are now on pretty good terms.”
“They are being finalised by both legal teams, but will be filed within weeks.”
“...and nine year old twins Vivienne and Knox whom she has with the Hollywood star 54 to London while she shoots her sequel Maleficent 2 Pictured in 2017 A source told The Sun in April The terms of the divorce are now agreed...”
“Embattled However The Tourist star s has reportedly been told she can t take the children across to the UK until she and Brad pictured have sorted their divorce Tough The 42 year old actress was planning to take her six kids Maddox 16 Pax 15 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11”
“Despite the furore, it is reported that the pair are weeks away from finalising the details of their divorce.”


"It's just a problem."
"I drink too much."
"There are rumors that the divorce has been cancelled, but that's not the case."
"The key is that they agree to share custody, Brad has the right to contact Angelina and work with Angelina on logistical issues of work and travel."
"Both believe it's important for children to have a respectful relationship," he said
"It's a huge turn from the end of the marriage there, especially given Angelina's claim against Brad, but they are now in pretty good condition."
"The two legal groups are in the process of finalizing, but will submit it in a few weeks."
“… There are also nine year old twins Vivian and Knox, who went to London with Hollywood star 54 to shoot the sequel maleficent 2 in April 2017. A source told the sun that the divorce terms have now been agreed.... "
"However, travel star s is reported to have been told that she can't take her children to the UK until she and Brad resolve their divorce. The 42 year old actress plans to take her six children to Maddox 16 people 15 Zahara 13 Shiloh 11
"Despite their anger, the two are reported to be weeks away from finalizing the details of their divorce."



Number  1412
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Battle of the Sexes hits theaters Friday.”
“King chatted it up with both Carell and Stone at Saturday's afterparty, which was sponsored by FIJI.”
“Fox Searchlight on Saturday night rolled out the green carpet for a tennis-themed Battle of the Sexes premiere with stars Steve Carell and Emma Stone.”
“Also in attendance was the real Billie Jean King, who is played by Stone in the film.”
“"Emma, thanks for making me look so good," King quipped about Stone when introducing the film, which follows her life as both a professional tennis player and a pioneer for equality for women.”
“As for the actress, Battle of the Sexes marks the first time in her career that she's had to play a real-life character.”
“"I've never played a real person before and it's, like, this person is an icon and an absolute badass that I could never even hope to be exactly like," Stone told The Hollywood Reporter.”
“She added, "Capturing the essence was very important to us.”
“It was super challenging, but [King] was so warm and welcoming and open to all of it.”
“She was generous with her story that it made it much easier than if she was like, 'Please don't make this movie about me, good night.'"”


"The battle of the sexes" opens on Friday
"At a party sponsored by Fiji on Saturday, King chatted with Karel and stone."
"Fox Searchlight launched a tennis themed men's and women's game on Saturday night with stars Steve Carell and Emma stone premiering on the green carpet."
"There's also the real Billy Jean King that stone plays in the movie."
"Emma, thank you for making me look so good," Kim quipped at stone when introducing the film, which tells her life as a professional tennis player and a pioneer of women's equality
"As for the actress," battle of the sexes "marks the first time in her career that she has to play a real-life role."
"I've never played a real person before, just like this man is an idol, an absolute villain, and I never want to be exactly like him," stone told the Hollywood Reporter
She added: "capturing the essence is very important to us."
"It's a very challenging game, but [King] is very enthusiastic, enthusiastic and open to everyone."
"She's generous with her story, which is much easier than saying 'please don't make this movie about me, good night.'



Number  1413
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(Photo by Spencer Platt/Getty Images)”
“On Monday the federal government announced that they will add as many as 50 different types of cancers to health issues to be covered by the Zadroga 9/11 Health and Compensation Act for first responders.”
“New York City and the nation are preparing to commemorate the event which lead to two wars and the deaths of thousands.”
“NEW YORK, NY - SEPTEMBER 10: Germano Riviera walks with the 'Flag of Honor,' which displays the names of all of the victims of the September 11 terrorist attacks, across from Ground Zero on the eve of the 11th anniversary of September 11 on September 10, 2012 in New York City.”


(Photo by Spencer Platt / Getty)
"On Monday, the federal government announced that it would include up to 50 different types of cancer in the health issues of the zadeloga 9 / 11 emergency personnel health and Compensation Act."
"People in New York City and across the country are preparing to commemorate this event that led to two wars and thousands of deaths."
"New York, New York - September 10, 2012: on September 10, 2012, on the eve of New York City's 11th anniversary on September 11, 2012, German Riviera walked across from ground zero with a flag of honor showing the names of all the victims of the September 11 terrorist attacks."



Number  1414
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“So, then, here are the seven signs that suggest David Beckham is in the grip of a midlife crisis.”
“Perhaps now, at the age of 42, he's no longer sure who he wants to be any more... but he's so devishly handsome that he seems to be getting away with it with absolute panache.”
“Harper...”
“It s all come to a head this week when Beckham posted pictures on Instagram of him indulging his childish fantasies by taking six days off to build a 4 000 piece Lego castle for his six year old daughter...”
“The midlife crisis can be clearly seen in former footballer and now semi-retired celebrity David Beckham, who appears to be tapping into his teenage spirit, growing his hair out and looking increasingly like Kurt Cobain.”
“This period comes a close second in the awkwardness scale to adolescence - which, as you will all know, is very uncomfortable.”
“For the uninitiated a midlife crisis is roughly defined as a transition of identity as you reach those awkward middle aged years.”


"Well, here are seven signs that David is in a middle-aged crisis
"Maybe now, at 42, he's not sure what he wants to be... However, he is so handsome that he seems to have succeeded with great style. "
"Harper..."
"This week, on instagram, he released a picture of his six-day holiday, building a 4000 piece LEGO Castle for his six-year-old daughter, indulging in childish fantasy. All this has reached its peak..."
"The middle-aged crisis is clearly visible in the former football player and now semi retired celebrity David Beckham. He seems to be digging out the spirit of his youth, growing his hair and becoming more and more like Kurt Coburn."
"This period is close to the second most embarrassing stage of adolescence - you know, adolescence is very uncomfortable."
"For laymen, midlife crisis is roughly defined as a change of identity when you reach an awkward middle age."



Number  1415
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“VF.com has reached out to representatives for Gosling and Mendes and will update this story when more information becomes available.”
“We’re content with this report from Us Weekly about the mere idea that he and Mendes might be married right now, because Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are working towards the legal dissolution of theirs.”
“The original post continues below.”
“When one celebrity marriage ends, another begins (that’s how that saying goes, right?).”
“Fresh off the news that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are getting divorced—which you might have heard; it was written up in a few periodicals yesterday and will possibly be covered today as well—Us Weekly is reporting that notoriously private couple Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes are married.”
“Not only did they allegedly tie the knot, they may have done so earlier this year.”
“They’re newlyweds, and have been for quite some time.”
“Multiple sources reveal in the new issue of Us Weekly that Gosling and his love of five years Eva Mendes quietly tied the knot earlier this year among a small group of family and friends Another source goes on to say that Eva and Ryan have always felt like a...”
“...married couple...”
“.”


“ VF.com The website has contacted representatives of gosling and Mendes and will update this report when more information is available. "
"We're happy with this US weekly report because Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are trying to break their marriage through legal means, just the idea that he and Mendes might get married now."
"The original post is as follows."
"When a celebrity marriage ends, another begins (that's the saying, right?)."
"You may have heard of the news that Brad Pitt and Angelina Jolie are going to divorce. It was reported in several journals yesterday, and it may be reported today. American Weekly reported the marriage of infamous illegitimate children Ryan Gosling and Eva Mendes."
"Not only are they said to be married, they may have been earlier this year."
"They are newlyweds and have been married for a long time."
"Several sources revealed in the new issue of American weekly that Gosling and his five-year lover Eva Mendes quietly married in a small group of friends and relatives earlier this year. Another source went on to say that EVA and Ryan always feel like a..."
“… Married couple... "
“.”



Number  1416
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...support plus another 5 million for herself Luckily for the couple this month marks five years since her divorce...”
“She s allowed to date but she cannot do so in a public fashion and she s not supposed to let any boyfriend near their daughter Suri The insider added Katie wanted out of the marriage so badly she agreed to the terms and got 4 8 million in child...”
“Jamie Foxx was spotted paying a visit to his not-so-secret girlfriend Katie Holmes — and he brought some treats for her daughter Suri Cruise.”
“The Oscar-winning actor pulled up to her house with some frozen yogurt, which the girls definitely enjoyed.”
“Earlier in the day, Katie, 38, and her 11-year-old daughter with Tom Cruise spent the day back-to-school shopping in Calabasas.”
“Wearing a red plaid shirt, faded blue jeans, and oversized sunglasses, Katie kept it casual alongside Suri, who looked like she was ready to attend a dance class.”
“MORE: Jamie Foxx Complains About His Dating Life — Still Won’t Confirm Relationship With Katie Holmes!”
“According to the Daily Mail, onlookers saw Jamie, 49, making his way through the same area shortly after and stopping at Menchie’s for the cool treats.”
“He then proceeded to make his way to her gated mansion in his Mercedes Benz SUV.”
“Getty Images, SplashDespite being photographed in public multiple times, the couple has yet to confirm rumors they are dating.”


“…… Alimony plus another 5 million for herself - fortunately, the couple divorced her five years ago this month... "
"She's allowed to date, but she can't do it in public. She shouldn't let any boyfriends get close to their daughter Suri. People familiar with the matter added that Katie wanted to quit the marriage very much. She agreed to the terms and got 4.8 million children.... "
"Jamie fox was found visiting his less secretive girlfriend Katie Holmes - he brought some hospitality to his daughter Suri cruise."
"The Oscar actress drove to her house and took some frozen yogurt. The girls must like it very much."
Earlier in the day, Katie, 38, went shopping with her 11 year old daughter and Tom Cruise in Calabasas
Katie is wearing a red plaid shirt, faded blue jeans, and a pair of oversized sunglasses. She looks casual with Suri, who seems ready for dance class
More: Jamie fox complains about his dating life - still won't confirm his relationship with Katie Holmes! "
Onlookers saw Jamie, 49, passing through the same area shortly after, stopping for cold food at the Munchie store, the Daily Mail reported
"Then he drove his Mercedes SUV to her mansion with a gate."
"Getty Images, despite being photographed many times in public, the couple have yet to confirm rumors that they are dating."



Number  1417
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ever since it her employer was revealed, Dourif has gone dark, removing all of her social media presences and refusing to respond to interview requests from any source.”
““This stinks more than Malia Obama’s dorm room after one of her reefer parties.”What exactly is going on?”
“...by someone who is running for public office someone of the opposing party Johnson writes...”
“This information was uncovered by Gateway Pundit s Charles C Johnson who notes in his report that Dourif is paid extremely well according to public documents which report a 250 783 33 annual salary for Dourif Why would Barack and Michelle Obama s housekeeper suddenly remember that she was molested...”
“One piece of information Dourif failed to mention is that she is currently employed as a housekeeper for Michelle Obama at the D.C. mansion “she” and her “husband” Barack share.”
“...and wealth than he did when this allegedly happened...”
“Maddow then interviewed Dourif s parents who said that they knew of the alleged abuse but didn t say anything until he was running for Senator because they feared for their lives Of course if that was the case they would not have waited until he had more political power...”
““Roy Moore definitely did all of those things and more,” she said looking into the camera, dry-eyed.”
“She then described the series of events that allegedly happened, including the obviously false allegation that he baited her into the alley with candy.”
““It was the most horrifying moment of my life,” she told MSNBC’s Rachel Maddow on Friday night.”


"Since her employer was exposed, durif has been in the dark, removed all social media and refused to respond to requests for interviews from any source."
"It stinks more than Maria Obama's dorm after a cold party." What happened? "
“… Johnson, who ran for office, wrote that
"This information was discovered by portal website expert Charles C. Johnson. In his report, he pointed out that durif's salary is very high. According to public documents, durif's annual salary is 250 783 33. Why did Barack Obama and Michelle Obama's housekeeper suddenly think that she was molested..."
One of the messages that durif didn't mention is that she is currently the housekeeper of Michelle Obama in the shared house of "she" and her "husband" Barack Obama in Washington, D.C
“… Richer than he said... "
"Mado then interviewed durif's parents. They said that they knew that durif was suspected of abusing, but they didn't say anything before he ran for the Senate because they were worried about their lives. Of course, if that was the case, they wouldn't wait for him to have more political power..."
"Roy Moore must have done all these things, and more," she said, looking at the camera, her eyes dry
"She then described a series of alleged incidents, including apparently false charges that he lured her into the alley with candy."
"It was the most terrifying moment of my life," she told MSNBC's Rachel maddo on Friday night



Number  1418
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“War viralipy com putin says dang Facebook bit ly 2u6ngAU Blog bit ly 2u5WtVp...”
“President Putin has slammed Pope Francis for pushing a political ideology instead of running a church and warned that the leader of the Catholic Church is not a man of God Putin Says Dangerous Soros For Driving America Into Civil...”
“...warned that the leader of the Catholic Church is not a man of God Putin Says Dangerous Soros For Driving America Into Civil War www youtube com watch Putin says Pope Francis Is Not A Man Of God Must See...”
“President Putin has slammed Pope Francis for pushing a political ideology instead of running a church and warned that the leader of More President Putin has slammed Pope Francis for pushing a political ideology instead of running a church and...”
“Putin says: ‘Pope Francis Is Not A Man Of God’ | Must-See !!”


"War viralipy com Putin said," Facebook bit ly 2u6ngau blog bit ly 2u5wtvp... "
"President Putin criticized Pope Francis for promoting political ideology rather than running the church, and warned that the leader of the Catholic Church is not a God. Putin said that it is dangerous for Soros to push the United States into civilian society..."
“…… He warned that the leader of the Catholic Church is not a God. Putin said that it is dangerous for Soros to push the United States into civil war. Putin said that Pope Francis is not a God. We must see that... "
"President Putin criticized Pope Francis for promoting political ideology rather than running churches, and warned that President Putin's leaders criticized Pope Francis for promoting political ideology rather than running churches, and that..."
"Putin said: 'Pope Francis is not a man of God'; we have to see it!"



Number  1419
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Jamaican envoy also took the opportunity to invite President Trump to visit Jamaica in his official capacity.”
“Ms Marks further noted the mutual benefit and alignment of interest for the continued stability and economic growth of the Caribbean which she described as the United States’ ‘third border’.”
“This, she said, placed the region ahead of U.S. exports to comparatively larger economies such as Russia and India combined.”
“She highlighted the fact that the region is the United States’ seventh largest trading partner, importing non-oil goods and services valued over US$50 billion.”
“The Ambassador, in noting the President’s agenda of providing more trading opportunities for US companies, called attention to the significant trade surplus the North American country enjoys in the Caribbean.”
“Ms Marks said she looked forward to working with the President in the interest of both countries, and highlighted the synergies of the US-Caribbean nexus cementing the relationship between the nations.”
“During their discourse, Mr Trump and Ambassador Marks underscored the strong longstanding bond of friendship between the people Jamaica and the United States of America, while noting the island’s contribution in many spheres of American life.”
“The President made the comment during a courtesy call paid on him by Jamaica’s Ambassador to the United States, Her Excellency Audrey Marks, at the Oval Office in the White House.”
“Andrew Holness, on bilateral and regional issues.”
“United States President, Donald Trump, says he looks forward to working with the administration of Prime Minister, the Most Hon.”


"The special envoy of Jamaica also takes this opportunity to invite President trump to visit Jamaica in his official capacity."
"Ms. Marquez further pointed out that the sustained stability and economic growth in the Caribbean region are mutually beneficial and have the same interests. She called it the" third border "of the United States."
This, she said, makes the region's exports exceed the total U.S. exports to larger economies such as Russia and India
She stressed that the region is the seventh largest trading partner of the United States, importing more than $50 billion worth of non oil products and services
"Noting the president's agenda to provide more trade opportunities for American companies, the ambassador called attention to the huge trade surplus that this North American country enjoys in the Caribbean."
"Marquez said she looked forward to working with the president for the interests of the two countries and stressed the synergy of US Canada relations in consolidating bilateral relations."
"In their talk, Ambassador trump and Ambassador Marquez emphasized the strong ties of friendship between the Jamaican people and the United States of America, while pointing out the island's contribution to many areas of American life."
"The president made the comments when her Excellency Audrey marks, the ambassador of Jamaica to the United States, called him from the Oval Office of the White House."
"Andrew Hornes, on bilateral and regional issues."
"US President Donald Trump has said he looks forward to working with the most respected prime minister's government."



Number  1420
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Source:”
“You know gall darn well what I mean.”
“PHEEEEEWWWW, that would have been too much to handle.”
“Houston – It seems new National Rifle Association President (NRA) president Jim Porter may have found himself in a bit of hot water.”
“Not long ago he made his feelings about the Civil War known when he referred to it as the War of Northern Aggression In that same speech he referred to President Obama as a fake president and Attorney General Eric Holder as rabidly un American However none of those remarks...”
“...that anyone could deem as racist compare to his remarks made at a recent press conference discussing his new leadership role at the NRA”
““I’m very proud to be taking the lead here at the NRA.”
“We need to really buckle down and strap on our best arguments to defend what is our God-given rights.”
“No more northern folk tryin’ take away what is rightfully ours.”
“I will not stand by and let some liberal-elitists try to ruin what has made this country great, especially a liberal of, you know, a different breed.”When asked to clarify Porter said,-- ADVERTISEMENT --“I don’t have to clarify.”


Source:
"You know what I mean."
"Oh, that's too hard to deal with."
"Houston - it seems that Jim Porter, the new NRA president, may have been in trouble."
"Not long ago, when he called the civil war the northern invasion war, he expressed his feelings about the civil war. In the same speech, he called President Obama a fake president and Attorney General Eric Holder a crazy non American, but none of these words... "
“…… Anyone can think of him as racist, compared to what he said at a recent press conference when he discussed his new leadership role in the NRA. "
"I'm proud to be leading here at the NRA."
"We really need to go all out and come up with the best arguments to defend the rights that God has given us."
"No more northerners want to take what we deserve."
"I will not stand by and let some liberal elites try to destroy the glory of this country, especially a liberal of different races." When asked for clarification, Porter said - Advertising - "I don't have to clarify."



Number  1421
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That s why the President called for Congress to investigate this matter and why the Department of Justice and Intelligence Community are doing all they can to stamp out this dangerous trend that undermines our national security Nunes was forced to step aside from running the Russia investigation amid a...”
““We’ve seen illegal leaking of classified materials, including the identities of American citizens unmasked in intelligence reports,” Sanders told CNN.”
“A secret meeting in the Seychelles But the Trump Tower meeting came shortly before the UAE brokered a meeting to open lines of communications with the United States and Russia with a clandestine January meeting in the Seychelles Islands in the Indian Ocean according to reports in CNN and The...”
“Still, the fact that the New York meeting occurred prior to the Seychelles session and that the UAE did not notify the Obama administration about why the crown prince was coming to the United States has raised questions in the eyes of investigators on Capitol Hill.”
“The three-hour discussion focused on a range of issues, including Iran, Yemen and the Mideast peace process, according to two sources who insisted that opening up a back-channel with Russia was not a topic of discussion.”
“But multiple sources have confirmed to CNN that Zayed met at the time with Flynn, Kushner and Bannon.”
“It’s unclear precisely which Trump officials Rice discussed at the House meeting.”
“Nunes refused to answer questions when asked about Rice Tuesday evening.”
“Through a spokeswoman, Rice declined to comment about her testimony.”
“He declined to discuss any of the contents of her classified remarks.”


"That's why the president called on Congress to investigate, and why the Department of justice and the intelligence services are doing everything they can to eliminate this dangerous trend that threatens our national security, while the nuns are forced to fight in a war
"We've seen incidents of illegal disclosure of confidential materials, including undisguised U.S. citizenship in intelligence reports," Sanders told CNN
"A secret meeting was held in Seychelles, but not long before the trump building meeting, the UAE mediated a meeting to open communication lines with the United States and Russia. According to CNN and the world daily, a secret meeting was held in the Seychelles islands in the Indian Ocean in January..."
"Nevertheless, the fact that the New York meeting took place before the Seychelles meeting and the UAE did not inform the Obama administration why the crown prince came to the United States has aroused doubts from congressional investigators."
"The three hour discussion focused on a range of issues, including Iran, Yemen and the Middle East peace process. According to two sources, they insisted that opening up a back channel with Russia was not the topic of discussion."
"But several sources confirmed to CNN that Zayed had met Flynn, Kushner and Bannon at that time."
"It's not clear which trump officials rice discussed at the house meeting."
"When asked about the rice on Tuesday night, the nuns refused to answer the question."
Rice declined to comment on her testimony through a spokeswoman
"He refused to discuss anything about her confidential conversation."



Number  1422
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“He and Pete were on the moon for two days - November 19 and 20, 1969.”
“Also on the Apollo 12 mission, was Alan Bean.”
“Aldrin, the second man on the moon, and four others gave accounts of their sightings under strict lab conditions.”
“4 Apollo 11 astronaut Buzz Aldrin, pictured, passed a lie detector test over claims he saw a UFO Credit: NASAHe, Al Worden, Edgar Mitchell and Gordon Cooper all took part in the study conducted by the Institute of BioAcoustic Biology in Albany, Ohio.”
“Aldrin, 88, claimed he was a spaceship on his way to the moon, adding: "There was something out there that was close enough to be observed... sort of L-shaped."”
“The tests, reportedly more reliable than standard lie detector tests, showed he was telling the truth, the Daily Star reported.”
“Apollo 15 pilot Worden, 85, and Apollo 14's Mitchel also claimed to have seen UFOs while Cooper says he actually tried to chase a cluster of objects.”
“4 Aldrin the second man on the moon is reported to have said he saw an L shaped object Credit Getty Contributor Buzz Aldrin gives a confused look as Donald Trump talks about space security Tests analysing their voice patterns suggested they were also telling the truth about their strange...”
“...encounters...”
“Aldrin answered questions about his alleged encounter with alien life on a Reddit Q&A with fans last week.”


"He and Pete were on the moon for two days - November 19 and 20, 1969."
"Along with the Apollo 12 mission is Alan bean."
"Aldrin, the second man to land on the moon, and four other people talked about their findings under strict laboratory conditions."
"4 Apollo 11 astronaut Buzz Aldrin passed a lie detector test for claiming to have seen a UFO: nassah, Al Walden, Edgar Mitchell and Gordon Cooper all participated in the research conducted by the Albany Institute of Bioelectronics in Ohio."
Aldrin, 88, who claims to be a spacecraft on its way to the moon, added: "there is something very close to the moon that can be observed... It's a little L-shaped
The tests are reported to be more reliable than standard polygraph tests, showing that he is telling the truth, the Daily Star reported
"The 85 year old Apollo 15 pilot Walden and the Apollo 14 pilot Mitchell also claimed to have seen UFOs, and Cooper said he was actually chasing a bunch of objects."
"Aldrin, the second man to land on the moon, is reported to have seen an L-shaped object. Getty's writer, Buzz Aldrin, watched in bewilderment as Donald Trump talked about space safety tests, analyzed their voice patterns, and showed that they were also saying the truth about their strange things.... "
“… Encounter... "
"Aldrin answered questions about his encounter with aliens in reddit's Q & A with fans last week."



Number  1423
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“It s nothing new for Trump to appeal to his core base and presumably his War on Christmas obsession shores up his status with evangelicals even as it flies in the face of the sentiments of the majority of Americans who seem happy to celebrate any holiday and don t...”
“...property...”
“...toys for their children...”
“Mike Huckabee invoked Christian belief during her briefing on December 7 with a tale designed to shine a spotlight on seasonal generosity She related the story of St Matthew s Episcopal Church in Wheeling West Virginia which follows a century old tradition of helping families who can t afford Christmas...”
“White House Press Secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders, the daughter of evangelical leader and former Gov.”
“There were a few warning signs earlier this month, though.”
“But despite all the hoopla, there has been little explicitly Christian content crossing the church-state line in the Trump era that could truly upset non-Christians.”
“That I can tell you.”In his 2016 post-election victory lap around the country, his travels were officially dubbed the “Merry Christmas USA 2016 Victory Tour.” A year later, at a rally in Pensacola, Florida, “Merry Christmas” was front and center once again.”
“Analysis In November 2015 Trump made headlines by proposing a boycott of Starbucks as punishment for manufacturing a red and white holiday cup that wasn t explicitly Christmassy enough promising a booing audience If I become president we re all going to be saying Merry Christmas again...”
“In part of his effort to rally evangelical Christians to his camp Trump made the issue a running theme during his 2016 presidential election campaign repeatedly promising at his rallies that he would bring back the phrase Merry Christmas The Palestinians just gave Netanyahu what he always wanted for Christmas...”


"It's nothing new for trump to attract his core base. Presumably his obsession with Christmas has strengthened his position in the Evangelical Church. Although it's contrary to the mood of most Americans, they seem to be happy to celebrate any festival, but they don't..."
“… Properties
“… Toys for children... "
"In her December 7 briefing, Mike Huckabee cites Christian faith and tells a story that highlights seasonal generosity. She tells the story of St. Matthew's Episcopal Church in Wellington, West Virginia, which follows a century old tradition of helping families who can't afford Christmas..."
White House press secretary Sarah Huckabee Sanders, daughter of evangelical leader and former governor
"However, there were some warning signs earlier this month."
"However, despite all the noise, in the era of trump, there was very little explicit Christian content that crossed the church state line and really upset non Christians."
"I can tell you." In his victory tour across the country after the 2016 election, his tour was officially named "happy Christmas to America 2016 Victory Tour". A year later, at a rally in Pensacola, Florida, "Merry Christmas" again became the focus of attention
"In November 2015, Trump's analysis made the headlines. He proposed to boycott Starbucks as a punishment for creating a red and white Festival cup, which has no clear Christmas atmosphere. He promised that if I became president, the audience would boo and we would all say Merry Christmas again..."
"During the 2016 presidential election campaign, trump repeatedly promised at rallies that he would bring back the words" Merry Christmas ". The Palestinian just gave Netanyahu the Christmas gift he always wanted..." Trump tried to bring evangelical Christians together in his own camp and made this issue an ongoing theme



Number  1424
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Another young man, with a swastika tattoo on his chest and blood on his forehead, told photographers: “If you take my picture, I’ll cut you.”
“One of them, who declined to give his name, was bleeding from the head, and claimed to have been struck with an iron bar.”
“I urge all people of good will – go home.”Speaking at a press conference on Saturday evening, the governor of Virginia, Terry McAuliffe, who had earlier declared a state of emergency, told the white supremacists: “Go home … Shame on you.”
“The driver, who people later described as a skinny white guy with a straggly beard, reversed out of there and drove off, the front end of his car all smashed up.”Charlottesville mayor Mike Signer tweeted: “I am heartbroken that a life has been lost here.”
“Those closest to it said it was definitely a violent attack.”
“People were terrified and screaming.”
“Bodies flew.”
“Play Video 1:34 Virginia governor says 'go home' to white supremacists and nazis – videoCharlottesville: far-right crowd with torches encircles counter-protest group Read moreThe photographer Pat Jarrett, who witnessed the incident, said: “A gray Dodge Charger plowed into a sedan and then into a minivan.”
“Witnesses said those hit by the car were peacefully protesting against the white supremacist rally and footage showed the vehicle crashing into another car, throwing people over the top of it.”
“The deaths came at the end of a day marked by violent clashes between far-right nationalists and people who had come to protest against their occupation of a downtown park containing a statue of the Confederate general Robert E Lee.”


Another young man, with a Nazi mark on his chest and blood on his forehead, said to the photographer, "if you take my picture, I'll cut you off."
One of them, who refused to be named, bled in the head and claimed to have been hit by an iron bar
"I urge all good people to go home." Virginia Governor Terry McAuliffe said at a news conference on Saturday night that he had earlier declared a state of emergency and told White supremacists: "go home You're a disgrace
"The driver was later described as a thin white man with a scattered beard. He backed away and the front end of the car was smashed." "I'm sad that a life has been lost here," Charlottesville mayor Mike siegna tweeted
"The closest person said it was definitely a violent attack."
"People are scared and screaming."
"The body's gone."
"Video 1:34 Virginia governor says' go home 'to white supremacists and Nazis Jarrett, who witnessed the incident, said: "a gray Dodge Charger hit a car and then a van."
"The witness said that the person who was knocked down by the car was a peaceful protest meeting of white supremacists. The video shows that this car crashed into another car and threw people on the roof of the car."
"The death came at the end of a day of violent clashes between far right nationalists and people who came to protest their occupation of the Central Park, where there is a statue of Confederate general Robert Lee."



Number  1425
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Women in this country really need to learn to either keep their legs closed or their other orifices open,” the governor concluded.”
“...but having sex before marriage in the first place...”
“John Kasich vetoed the so-called “heartbeat bill,” a measure that would have banned all abortions after about six weeks of pregnancy, or before many women even know that they are pregnant.”
“At the same time Kasich signed a bill banning abortion after 20 weeks of pregnancy with exceptions only for saving a pregnant woman s life or preventing the substantial and irreversible impairment of a major bodily function At the risk...”
“...of sounding discriminatory which is not at all my goal here but at the risk of sounding like that there is no way women should be allowed control over whether or not they are going to have abortions Kasich told...”
“...the Ohio Daily Star...”
“Women are wonderful beings they are kind loving incredible and a whole other plethora of adjectives could be used to describe them but at the end of the day I m sorry to have to say this but the honest...”
“...truth is that women used to be all those things...”
“The women of today are mainly opportunists and gold diggers who typically get pregnant due to unsafe sex or to get their partners to marry them He continued Our mothers and women of the old times were the women every...”
“...man deserved and was blessed to have...”


"Women in this country really need to learn to either close their legs or open other openings," the governor concluded
“…… But premarital sex first... "
John Kasich vetoed the so-called "heartbeat act," which would ban all abortions after six weeks of pregnancy, or before many women even knew they were pregnant
"At the same time, Kasich signed a bill to ban abortion after 20 weeks of pregnancy, with the exception of saving pregnant women's lives or preventing significant and irreversible physical impairment..."
“…… It sounds discriminatory, which is not my goal at all, but it may sound like women should not be allowed to control whether they want to have an abortion, Kasich told me
“… The Ohio Daily Star
"Women are beautiful. They are kind, lovely and incredible. There are many adjectives to describe them, but I'm sorry to have to say that in the end, but to be honest..."
“… The fact is that women used to be all these things... "
"Today's women are mainly opportunists and gold diggers. They are usually pregnant because of unsafe sex, or in order to get their partners to marry them," he continued. "Our mothers and women of the old age are everyone..."
“… What human beings deserve and are fortunate to have... "



Number  1426
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Around April 2016, as this phishing campaign increasingly began to target Democrats, material was also taken from the DNC.”
“Another interesting detail, per the AP, is that more than 95 percent of the malicious links were created between the hours of 9 am and 6 pm, Monday to Friday — Moscow time.”
“To understand what happened in 2016, we have to understand the hackings.”
“Mueller is now overseeing the probe.”
“And the Daily Beast wrote that investigators have identified a specific Russian intelligence officer behind “Guccifer 2.0,” a leading figure in the hacks.”
“The Wall Street Journal has reported that the US has identified “more than six members of the Russian government” involved in the DNC hacks.”
“But some are likely coming.”
“No charges have been filed in the matter — yet.”
“It wasn’t just emails stolen, either — posted material ranged from Democratic Party turnout data that a Republican operative thought was “probably worth millions of dollars” to even a purported picture of Michelle Obama’s passport.”
“The operation was more wide-ranging than many remember, targeting not just John Podesta and the DNC but many other people and groups.”


"Around April 2016, as this phishing campaign increasingly began to target Democrats, relevant materials were also taken from the Democratic National Committee (DNC)."
According to the associated press, another interesting detail is that more than 95% of malicious links are created between 9 a.m. and 6 p.m. Moscow time from Monday to Friday
"To understand what happened in 2016, we have to understand hacking."
"Muller is now overseeing the investigation."
The Daily Beast wrote that investigators have identified a Russian intelligence official behind "gussife 2.0" as the number one hacker attack
The Wall Street Journal reported that the United States has confirmed that "more than six members of the Russian government" participated in the DNC hacking attack
"But some may come."
"There are no charges against this at this time."
"It's not just emails that have been stolen, materials that have been released range from democratic turnout data to what a Republican agent thinks" could be worth millions of dollars, "and even a photo that is said to be Michelle Obama's passport."
"The scope of this operation is wider than many people remember, not only for John Podesta and the Norwegian National Committee, but also for many other people and groups."



Number  1427
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“On July 28, 2015, the White House has rejected a “We the People” petition of nearly 168,000 signatories, to pardon him.”
““Osama Bin Laden was one of the CIA’s most efficient operatives for a long time,” claims the famous whistleblower.”
“Snowden, who lives as a fugitive in Russia after leaking documents about the NSA’s surveillance programs has made some previously unreported allegations about the famous terrorist, Osama Bin Laden, during an interview with the Moscow Tribune.”
“According to him, not only is Bin Laden still alive, but he is living a lavish lifestyle in the Bahamas, thanks to regular payments from the CIA.”
““I have documents showing that Bin Laden is still on the CIA’s payroll,” claims Edward Snowden.”
““He is still receiving more than $100,000 a month, which are being transferred through some front businesses and organizations, directly to his Nassau bank account.”
“I am not certain where he is now but in 2016 he was living quietly in his villa with five of his wives and many children Mr Snowden says the CIA orchestrated the fake death of the former leader of...”
“Al Qaeda while he was actually transported with his family to an undisclosed location in the Bahamas...”
““What kind of message would it send their other operatives if they were to let the SEALs kill him?”
“He has been living under asylum in Moscow, after fleeing the US for Hong Kong in the wake of the leaks.”


"On July 28, 2015, the White House rejected a petition from nearly 168000 signers for" we the people "to pardon him."
"Osama bin Laden was one of the most efficient CIA agents for a long time," the famous informant claimed
"Snowden lived as a fugitive in Russia after divulging the documents of the national security agency's surveillance plan. In an interview with the Moscow Tribune, he made some previously unreported charges against the famous terrorist bin Laden."
"According to him, bin Laden is not only alive, but also living a luxurious life in the Bahamas due to regular payments from the CIA."
"I have documents showing that bin Laden is still on the CIA payroll," Edward Snowden said
"He still receives more than $100000 a month, which is being transferred directly to his Nassau bank account through some front-line businesses and organizations."
"I'm not sure where he is now, but in 2016, he lived quietly in a villa with his five wives and many children, Snowden said, and the CIA orchestrated the former leader's suspended animation..."
"When he and his family were transported to a secret location in the Bahamas, Al Qaeda
"If they let the seals kill him, what kind of information will they bring to their other agents?"
"After the leak, he fled to the United States in Moscow and has been living under the protection of Hong Kong."



Number  1428
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...talking about kids with handicap problems at an Easter egg hunt at the governors living quarters going too slow and she said Get these retards out of here...”
“...case anything happens to him Read More Hillary Caught On Tape Laughing About Irma â Wiping Out All Of Those Florida Hillbilliesâ Patriots Voice My Thoughts Wouldn t surprise me there was a video of her when Bill was governor...”
“NOT WITHOUT MAKING ME A VERY RICH MAN The engineer who refused to be named says he will hold onto the footage until he needs it to either save the country or himself He says he s made arrangements in...”
“THERE AINT NO WAY SHES GONNA RUN NOW.”
“SHE WAS TALKING TO PEOPLE BACKSTAGE ABOUT RUNNING FOR PRESIDENT AGAIN IN 2020.”
“UP REAL BAD”
“NOT EVERYTHING IS POLITICS Maddow cancelled the interview and agreed to bury the footage but one sound engineer who is a true patriot managed to keep a copy AS SOON AS I HEARD HER SAY IT I KNEW SHE SCREWED”
“YOUVE BEEN POISONED.”
“THAT WAS CALLOUS AND WRONG.”
“THERE ARE 37 MILLION PEOPLE IN THE PATH OF THE WORST STORM OUR COUNTRY HAS SEEN SINCE KATRINA AND IT WILL PROBABLY DO MORE DAMAGE.”


“… Talking about disabled children at the Easter egg hunt in the governor's neighborhood is too slow. She said, "let the mentally handicapped get out of here..."
“…… If something happened to him and Hillary read more, she said with a smile on the tape, "Elma wiped out all the Florida Hicks and patriots. My idea won't surprise me. There's a video of her when bill was governor..."
"I can't help being a very rich man. The engineer who refused to be named said that he would keep the video until he needed it to save the country or himself. He said that he had arranged it..."
"She can't run now."
"She's backstage talking to people about running for president again in 2020."
"Very bad"
"It's not all politics. Mado canceled the interview and agreed to bury the camera, but a real patriot sound engineer managed to keep a copy after I heard her say I knew she messed up."
"You're poisoned."
"That's callous and wrong."
"Thirty seven million people are suffering from the worst storm in our country since Hurricane Katrina, which is likely to cause more damage."



Number  1429
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It said it disagreed with the charges filed by the Los Angeles District Attorney's Office and that it was "exploring all options with respect to those charges."”
“San Diego-based Bumble Bee said in a statement that "we remain devastated by the loss of our colleague Jose Melena in the tragic accident."”
“Prosecutions of workplace violations are uncommon — even in fatalities.”
“Bumble Bee Foods faces a maximum fine of $1.5 million.”
“Rodriguez, 63, of Riverside, and Florez, 42, of Whittier, could face up to three years in prison and fines up to $250,000 if convicted of all charges, prosecutors said.”
“The charges specify that the company and the two men willfully violated rules that require implementing a safety plan, rules for workers entering confined spaces, and a procedure to keep machinery or equipment turned off if someone's working on it.”
“The company, its plant Operations Director Angel Rodriguez and former safety manager Saul Florez were each charged with three counts of violating Occupational Safety & Health Administration rules that caused a death.”
“His body was found two hours later after the pressure cooker, which reached a temperature of 270 degrees, was turned off and opened.”
“When a supervisor noticed Melena, 62, was missing, an announcement was made on the intercom and employees searched for him in the facility and parking lot, according to a report by the California Division of Occupational Safety and Health.”
“...turned on...”


"It said it disagreed with the charges made by the Los Angeles District Attorney's office and that it was" exploring all options for these charges. "
"We are still shocked by the tragic death of our colleague Jose melena," the San Diego based hornet company said in a statement
"Prosecution of workplace violations is not common - even in fatal accidents."
"Bumblebee food faces a maximum fine of 1.5 million yuan."
"Rodriguez, 63, from riverside, and Flores, 42, from Whittier, face three years in prison and a $250000 fine if all charges are found," prosecutors said
"The allegation clearly states that the company and the two men intentionally violated the requirements for the implementation of safety plans, the requirements for workers to enter confined spaces and the procedures for shutting down machinery or equipment when it is being operated."
The company, plant operations director Angel Rodriguez and former Safety Manager sol Flores were charged with three counts of death for violating occupational safety and health regulations
"His body was found two hours later when the pressure cooker reached 270 degrees and was turned off and on."
A report from the California Department of occupational safety and Health said that when a supervisor found meilena, 62, missing, a notice was sent on the walkie talkie and employees searched the factory and parking lot for him
“… Open



Number  1430
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“All three men are currently being held without bail at the Vernal Heights Municipal Jail.”
“As of Tuesday afternoon, police and detectives are still conducting a search at the residence located at 3845 Toolson Lane.”
“According to Vernal Heights Chief of Police, Gregory Moore, the 3-men were arrested when officers responded to what they assumed would be a routine noise complaint.”
“Police arrived at 3845 Toolson Lane (the home of William Provost) at approximately 7:45 PM on Sunday evening in response to a neighbor complaining of strange sounds coming from the home.”
“Responding officers told reporters that they assumed their visit to the house would be a quick one and that they would simply be asking the residents to keep the noise down.”
“When the officers arrived at 3845 Toolson Lane they repeatedly knocked on the door and rang the doorbell however nothing could be heard over the sound a stereo inside the house repeatedly playing the same song which was later identified...”
“...as Enya s Who Can Say...”
“After attempting to get the attention of the homeowner via knocking and ringing the doorbell for approximately 5-minutes, police entered the home through an unlocked door located at the rear of the house.”
“The responding officers told reporters that the house had been extremely dark, cluttered, and an overwhelming smell (which was later identified as decomposing flesh) filled the home.”
“Upon clearing the first-floor of the home, the responding officers realized that the blaring music was coming from the home’s basement.”


"All three men are currently in prison in the city of weinar heights without bail."
"As of Tuesday afternoon, police and detectives were still searching the house at 3845 tulsen lane."
"The three were arrested in response to what they considered to be routine noise complaints, according to Gregory Moore, chief of Funer heights police
"At about 7:45 p.m. on Sunday, the police arrived at 3845 tulsen Lane (William Prost's home) in response to a neighbor's complaint that there was a strange noise coming from his home."
"The officer in charge of the reply told reporters that they thought they would visit the house soon. They just asked the residents to reduce the noise."
"When the police arrived at 3845 Tucson lane, they repeatedly knocked on the door and rang the doorbell, but no sound was heard from the sound. A stereo in the house played the same song repeatedly, which was later confirmed to be..."
“… As Enya said... "
"About five minutes after trying to get the owner's attention by knocking and ringing the doorbell, the police entered through an unlocked door at the back of the house."
"The responding police officer told reporters that the house was already very dark and disorderly, and a bad smell (later confirmed to be rotten meat) permeated the house."
"While cleaning up the first floor, the police found that the harsh music came from the basement of the house."



Number  1431
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This isn’t the first time that Muslims have ripped off Americans with fraud, and with the hordes of migrants that liberals keep fighting to bring into our country, stories like this will sadly become the new norm if the American people do not wake the hell up soon!”
“[Jim Quinn - PO Box 1520 Kulpsville, PA 19443] or PaypalMuslims continually prove that they have little intentions into assimilating into western civilization or adhering to our nation’s laws after arriving to America from their third world countries.”
“The U.S. Justice Department is calling this prescription drug and health care fraud scheme the largest operation of its kind in American history, naming several Michigan Muslim doctors responsible for orchestrating this huge criminal enterprise to rip off Medicare.”
“Additionally, the drugs often wind of on the streets as part of a huge back-alley drug operation.”
“These drugs never land in the hands of patients however, as the Muslims will them make fraudulent claims to Medicaid and pocket the money.”
“The scam involves a scheme where Muslim doctors will write massive quantities of prescriptions for opioids.”
“States Department of Justice has ever seen...”
“In yet another case of blatant disregard for for our nation s laws a group of Muslim doctors in Detroit have just been busted as the masterminds behind a 1 3 billion dollar fraudulent scheme leading to the arrests of 412 people overnight in the largest scam that the United...”
“Our generosity to these savages is frequently repaid by insolence, as many Muslims are constantly busted at the center of welfare fraud rings, as they seek to scam the very country who has given them so much.”
“If you get value from this site, please keep it running with a donation.”


"This is not the first time that Muslims use fraud to blackmail Americans. With liberals constantly striving to bring large numbers of immigrants into our country, if the American people do not wake up as soon as possible, such stories will sadly become the new normal!"
"[Jim Quinn - P.O. Box 1520 kulpsville, PA 19443] or PayPal Muslims constantly prove that they have little intention to assimilate Western civilization or abide by the laws of our country after coming to the United States from the third world countries."
"The U.S. Department of justice called the prescription drug and medical fraud program the largest such operation in U.S. history, and named several Muslim doctors in Michigan to plan this huge criminal enterprise to extort medical insurance."
"In addition, drugs are often rampant in the streets, which is part of a large-scale secret drug operation."
"However, these drugs will never fall into the hands of patients, because Muslims will let them cheat them out of Medicaid."
"The scam involves a plan for Muslim doctors to prescribe large quantities of opioids."
"The U.S. Department of justice has seen..."
"In another case of blatant disregard of our laws, a group of Muslim doctors in Detroit have just been arrested. They are behind a $1.3 billion fraud plan, resulting in the arrest of 412 people overnight. This is the biggest scam in the United States..."
"Our generosity to these barbarians is often rewarded with arrogance, because many Muslims are constantly caught in the center of welfare fraud gangs, because they try to deceive countries that give them so much."
"If you get value from this site, please keep it running through donation."



Number  1432
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“They are the President’s own and shall remain as such.” President Trump explained.”
““The Marines have dedicated their lives to the service of this country and have served at the pleasure of the President for many, many years and it’s about time they be recognized as a separate department.”
“The move is mainly sentimental since the President has a clear love of The Marines and their traditions.”
“...in Asia Sgt Major Garrett explained...”
“The Marine Corps is a competitive place we have no room or respect for weak bitches that can t get in there fast kill everyone and get back to the ships in time to get to make the port calls...”
“Marine units that don’t accomplish the mission within the 2 month window will be reassigned by the Marine Corps, and will have to watch as another unit finishes the job.”
“The Marines will have an entirely new ROE and mission.”
“The Marines will improve their amphibious attack readiness, and will continue to use the Navy for transportation to be the “First to Fight”.”
“In 1834 Congress passed the Act for the Better Organization of the Marine Corps, stipulating that the Corps was part of the Department of the Navy as a sister service.”
“This has always been a thorn in the side of Marines and naturally a source of ridicule from other branches.”


"They are the president's own and will continue to be the same," President trump explained
"The Marines have given their lives to this country and have served under the president's welcome for many, many years. Now it's time to recognize that they are an independent department."
"It's mainly emotional because the president clearly loves the Marine Corps and its traditions."
“… In Asia, major Garrett explained that
"The Marine Corps is a place with fierce competition. We don't have space and respect for the weak female dogs. They can't get in there quickly, kill everyone, and return to the ship in time to call the port..."
"If the Marine Corps is unable to complete the task within two months, it will be reassigned by the Marine Corps and observed when another unit completes the task."
"The Marine Corps will have a whole new mission."
The Marines will improve their amphibious attack readiness and will continue to use naval transport as the "first battle"
In 1834, Congress passed the organic law of the Marine Corps, stipulating that the Marine Corps is a part of the Department of the Navy and a sister force of the Navy
"This has always been a thorn in the eye of the Marine Corps, and it will naturally attract ridicule from other departments."



Number  1433
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...during the Civil War...”
“Robicheaux attempted to explain to Trump that Col Sanders was born 25 years after the end of the war that The Donald seemed to be confusing the food incident with a Biblical story about Jesus feeding the multitudes and that Valley Forge was neither an encampment nor a battle site...”
“Trump, a noted fan of Kentucky Fried Chicken, explained how Col. Sanders took five loaves of Evangeline Maid bread and two chickens, added his secret blend of 11 herbs and spices, and turned these humble ingredients into delicious meals that lasted an entire winter.”
“Speaking to our intern Dave Robicheaux, who is paid in Facebook likes, Trump insisted Col. Harland Sanders, whom he called a “tremendous Civil War hero,” once saved an entire army at Valley Forge from certain starvation.”


“… During the civil war
"Robichu tries to explain to trump that Colonel Sanders was born 25 years after the end of the war. Donald seems to have confused the food incident with the biblical story of Jesus feeding the masses. Valley Forge is neither a camp nor a battlefield..."
"Trump is a famous fan of Kentucky Fried Chicken. He explains how Colonel Sanders took five pieces of Evangeline girls' bread and two chickens, added 11 herbs and spices that he secretly prepared, and turned these crude ingredients into delicious meals for a whole winter."
"In an interview with our intern, Dave robichoux, trump insisted that Colonel Harland Sanders（ Col.Harland  Sanders, who saved an army in Valley Forge from starvation, called Sanders a "great civil war hero."



Number  1434
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...show...”
“Andrew McCabe Andrew George McCabeCarter Page sues over surveillance related to Russia probe McCabe defends investigation of Trump before Senate committee We had many reasons The Hill s 12 30 Report What to know about the Pfizer vaccine announcement MORE now the deputy FBI director under Trump Justice Department documents...”
“And none of that evidence got aired before the Obama administration made those decisions,” a person who worked on the case told The Hill, speaking on condition of anonymity for fear of retribution by U.S. or Russian officials.”
““The Russians were compromising American contractors in the nuclear industry with kickbacks and extortion threats, all of which raised legitimate national security concerns.”
“...weapons under the 1990s Megatons to Megawatts peace program...”
“In 2011 the administration gave approval for Rosatom s Tenex subsidiary to sell commercial uranium to U S nuclear power plants in a partnership with the United States Enrichment Corp Before then Tenex had been limited to selling U S nuclear power plants reprocessed uranium recovered from dismantled Soviet nuclear...”
“When this sale was used by Trump on the campaign trail last year Hillary Clinton s spokesman said she was not involved in the committee review and noted the State Department official who handled it said she never intervened on any Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States matter...”
“America s uranium supply...”
“The first decision occurred in October 2010 when the State Department and government agencies on the Committee on Foreign Investment in the United States unanimously approved the partial sale of Canadian mining company Uranium One to the Russian nuclear giant Rosatom giving Moscow control of more than 20 percent of...”
“...major decisions benefiting Putin s commercial nuclear ambitions...”


“… Show
"Andrew McCabe Andrew George McCabe Carter page sued Russia related surveillance investigation. McCabe defended Trump's investigation before the Senate committee. We have many reasons. Hill's 1230 reports know more about Pfizer's vaccine announcement. Now the deputy director of FBI, according to trump's Department of justice documents..."
"None of the evidence was made public until the Obama administration made these decisions," a person involved in the case told hill, who declined to be named for fear of retaliation by U.S. or Russian officials
"The Russians use kickbacks and blackmail threats to harm the interests of US nuclear industry contractors, all of which raise reasonable national security concerns."
“… In the 1990s, weapons under the million tons to million watts peace plan... "
"In 2011, the U.S. government approved the cooperation between Rosatom's tenex subsidiary and uranium enrichment company to sell commercial uranium to U.S. nuclear power plants. Before that, tenex was limited to selling reprocessed uranium recovered from the nuclear facilities of the disintegration of the Soviet Union..."
"Last year, when trump used the deal during the campaign, Hillary Clinton's spokesman said she did not participate in the committee's review, noting that the U.S. State Department official responsible for handling the matter said she had never interfered in any foreign investment committee's affairs in the United States..."
"U.S. uranium supply..."
"The first decision took place in October 2010, when the State Department and the government agencies of the Committee on foreign investment unanimously approved the partial sale of uranium I, a Canadian mining company, to Rosatom, a Russian nuclear giant, to let Moscow control more than 20% of the nuclear power
“…… A major decision in favor of Putin's commercial nuclear ambitions.... "



Number  1435
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This article has been updated to alter the spelling of the last name of Sheila Brazile, which was misspelled as Brazioutlanle by another media outlet.”
“She told the host about her critics: "They don't know what it was like to be over the DNC during this hacking.”
“But the provocative points start even before the first chapter, as Brazile reportedly dedicated the book in part to Seth Rich, the DNC staffer whose murder launched a conspiracy theory.”
“Axios reported on Sunday that the book s dedication reads In loving memory of my father Lionel Brazile Sr my beloved sister Sheila Brazile my fearless uncles Nat Floyd and Douglas Harlem s finest my aunt Lucille my friend and mentor David Kaufmann my DNC colleague and patriot Seth Rich...”
“...and my beloved Pomeranian Chip Joshua Marvin Brazile Booty Wipes...”
“I miss y'all."”
“Related: TV Ad With Russian Subtitles Questions Seth Rich's MurderRich, 27, was fatally shot in July 2016 while walking home late at night in Washington, D.C.”
“The police believe the shooting was a robbery gone wrong.”
“But Rich worked for the DNC, and WikiLeaks published thousands of emails from the committee two weeks after his death.”
“That timeline provoked theories that Rich had given the materials to WikiLeaks and that his death was an attempt to stop him from doing so, or to punish him for it.”


"This article has been updated to change the spelling of Sheila brazier's surname, which was misspelled as brazioutlanle by another media."
She told the host about her critics: "they don't know what DNC feels like in this hacking."
"But the provocative point of view started even before the first chapter, when brazier was reported to have dedicated part of the book to Seth Ritchie, a DNC staff member whose murder sparked conspiracy theories."
"Axios reported on Sunday that the dedication of this book is in memory of my father Lionel brazier Sr., my dear sister Sheila brazier, my intrepid uncles NAT Freud and Douglas Harlin, my best aunt Lucille, my friend and mentor David Kaufman, my DNC colleague and patriot Seth Ritchie..."
“… And my beloved Pomeranian chip, Joshua Marvin, Brazilian booty wipes... "
"I miss you."
"Related report: in July 2016, Seth rich, 27, was shot dead when he walked home late at night in Washington, D.C., with Russian subtitles in the TV advertisement."
"The police think the shooting is a robbery."
"But rich worked for DNC, and WikiLeaks published thousands of committee emails two weeks after his death."
"This timeline has led to theories that rich gave the material to WikiLeaks and that his death was to prevent him from doing so, or to punish him."



Number  1436
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Clinton has hit Trump on the issue several times in the past, and her campaign released an ad earlier this month highlighting past remarks by the GOP nominee saying he would release his returns.”
“Democrats have seized on Donald Trump's refusal to release the documents.”
“...release his tax returns saying doing so would be foolish...”
“ADVERTISEMENT“You would have a bunch of people who know nothing about taxes trying to look through and trying to come up with assumptions on things they know nothing about,” Eric Trump said Wednesday on CNBC.”
““It would be foolish to do.”
“I’m actually the biggest proponent of not doing it.”Donald Trump, the Republican presidential nominee, has faced criticism for refusing to release his tax returns.”
“He has repeatedly pushed back against calls to release the documents, saying he is under audit by the Internal Revenue Service (IRS).”
“The IRS has said nothing prevents Trump from releasing his tax returns.”
“Eric Trump said on Wednesday that there is "no tax attorney in the world who will tell you to release your tax returns while you're under a standard routine audit."”
“He added, "You don't learn that much from a tax return.”


"Clinton has played trump on this issue many times in the past, and her campaign published an advertisement earlier this month, highlighting the Republican candidate's remarks in the past that he would announce a return."
"The democratic party seized on Donald Trump's refusal to publish these documents."
“… Publish his tax return and say it's stupid... "
"Advertising" will have a group of people who don't know anything about taxes, trying to study them carefully, trying to make assumptions about what they don't know, "Eric trump said on CNBC on Wednesday
"It's stupid to do that."
"Actually, I'm the biggest supporter of not doing it." Republican presidential candidate Donald Trump has been criticized for refusing to publish tax returns
"He has repeatedly refused to publish the documents, saying he is being audited by the IRS."
"The IRS said there was nothing to stop trump from publishing his tax returns."
"No tax lawyer in the world will tell you to publish your tax return when you are subject to a standard routine audit," Eric trump said on Wednesday
"You don't learn much from your tax returns," he added



Number  1437
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“— Dan Bongino (@dbongino) January 31, 2018TRENDING: THEY GOT CAUGHT: Dominion Owned Machines Removed 6% of Votes from Each Windham, New Hampshire GOP Candidate - Same Machines Used in 85% of Towns (VIDEO REPORT FROM NEW HAMPSHIRE)Awful.”
“Unreal.”
“They just booed the parents of a murdered child & they sat on their butts for the portion of the speech about respecting the National Anthem.”
“The #SOTU has exposed the Democrats for what they are.”
“This was a shocking display – even for today’s Democrats.”
“On Tuesday night when the President honored the parents of Kayla and Nisa and the victims of illegal immigrant violence the Democrats groaned and booed.”
“They are the parents of Nisa Mickens and Kayla Cuevas, who had been close friends since elementary school, but in September 2016, the two girls were chased down and brutally murdered by MS-13.”
“President Trump invited Elizabeth Alvarado, Robert Mickens, Evelyn Rodriguez, and Freddy Cuevas to his State of the Union Address.”


"Dan bongino (@ dbongino) January 31, 2018 trend: they got caught: the machines owned by the dominion removed 6% of the votes from every Republican candidate in Windham, New Hampshire - the machines used in 85% of the towns (video coverage in New Hampshire) were bad."
"It's not true."
"They're just booing the parents of a murdered child & they're sitting on their ass listening to a speech about respecting the national anthem."
"Sotu has exposed the true nature of the Democrats."
"It's a stunning display - even for Democrats today."
"On Tuesday night, Democrats booed and groaned as the president commemorated Kayla and nissa's parents and victims of illegal immigrant violence."
"They are the parents of Nisa Mickens and Kayla Cuevas, who have been close friends since primary school, but in September 2016, the two girls were chased and brutally killed by MS-13."
"President trump invited Elizabeth Alvarado, Robert mikens, Evelyn Rodriguez and Freddie quevas to deliver the state of the Union address."



Number  1438
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Testicles...”
“Fitzgerald is still in the hospital and his condition has been downgraded from critical to serious Our thoughts are with the victim Find the entire Boston Leader article here Boston Man Tries To Fill Scuba Tank With Weed Smoke Loses...”
“However, the company that built the tank is unlikely to cover an insurance claim due to the victim’s use of the tank as a smoking device.”
“The tank in question was fashioned in the early 90’s with a type of aluminum that is known for its capacity to rupture.”
“None of his friends were injured in the accident.”
“While attempting to attach the air compressor to the tank, the victim knocked over the tank causing an explosion that would send shrapnel into his groin, severing his balls clean off.”
“According to multiple reports, Fitzpatrick invited his buddies over to check out the ‘Scuba Bong,’ a name that is both inaccurate and sounds much too much like ‘Scuba Bomb,’ when the accident occurred.”
“The process included using an air compressor to put pot smoke into the tank before using a regulator to inhale.”
“...scuba tank...”
“Related Colorado Trail Closed After Tourists Refuse to Stop Taking bearselfies In a recent report by the Boston Leader 27 year old Michael Fitzpatrick lost his testicles after trying to create a home made smoking device out of an old...”


"Testicles..."
"Fitzgerald is still in the hospital. His condition has dropped from critical to severe. Our idea is to find the article of the leader of the whole Boston with the victims, where Bostonians are trying to fill the water lung tank and the loss of weed smoke..."
"However, because the victim used the tank as a smoking device, the company that made the tank is unlikely to cover the insurance claim."
"The tanks in question were made in the early 1990s out of an aluminum known for its cracking ability."
"None of his friends were injured in the accident."
While trying to connect the air compressor to the tank, the victim overturned the tank, causing an explosion, and shrapnel would enter his groin and cut off his ball completely
"According to a number of reports, Fitzpatrick invited his friends to check the name of 'scuba Bang' at the time of the accident, which is neither accurate nor too much like 'scuba bomb'
"This process involves using the air compressor to put the smoke in the pot before using the regulator to inhale."
“… Scuba... "
"Recently, Boston leader Michael Fitzpatrick, 27, said in a report that a related trail in Colorado was closed because tourists refused to stop taking self portraits because he tried to use an old one



Number  1439
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I forget, what were we talking about?”[Satire]”
““Help build a house for those that need one and peace and sex above all else.”
“Have you ever eaten a peanut… on weed?”With legal weed available in Colorado and Washington State and several states likely to pass the legalization next November during the Presidential elections, Carter will help support the cause in California, Oregon, and Massachusetts.”
“It also revived my love for peanuts.”
““I was never of big fan of alcohol but weed is the medicine I need.”
“Don’t be a pothead but also be aware of the potential benefits of cannabis when used in moderation with the right music.”
““There is the right place and the right time to spark up a bowl.”
“I find indica is better than sativa, but there are plenty of good hybrids.“Carter wasn’t endorsing pot smoking for everyone.”
““Marijuana is God’s medicine.”
“Carter has resumed his house building for Habitat for Humanity and continues his weekly prayer service.”


"I forgot. What are we talking about? "[sarcasm]"
"Help build a house for those who need peace and sex."
"Have you ever eaten peanuts On weeds? "With legal marijuana in Colorado and Washington, as well as some states that may be legalized during the presidential election next November, Carter will help California, Oregon and Massachusetts support the cause."
"It also helped me regain my love for peanuts."
"I never like drinking, but marijuana is the medicine I need."
"Don't be an addict, but also be aware of the potential benefits of marijuana when using the right amount of music."
"There's the right place and the right time to light a bowl."
"I found that indica is better than sativa, but there are many good hybrids." Carter didn't support everyone smoking marijuana
"Marijuana is God's medicine."
"Carter has restored the house he built for the human homeland and continued his weekly prayer service."



Number  1440
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Canada's Prime Minister Justin Trudeau and other Commonwealth leaders are expected to receive invitations to the wedding because of their nations' ties to the British Empire.”
“Instead of a state visit, Trump's trip to the U.K., scheduled for early 2018, has been cast as a "working trip" where he will not meet the queen.”
“But a former U.S. president might make the list, due to his friendship with the young British royal: Barack Obama and his wife, former first lady Michelle, who appear to have amiable relations with Harry and his elder brother and future king, Prince William, the Duke of Cambridge.”
“Asked about the potential guest list, Kensington Palace spokeswoman Julie Barley told Newsweek, "We're focusing on the happy announcement of their engagement," adding that invitations "will be announced in due course."”
“When the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge were married, in 2011, the Obamas were left off the guest list because of the added security costs of protecting the president.”
“The day of the wedding, thousands of Britons took the day off, and about 1,900 guests attended the ceremony in Westminster Abbey in central London.”
“The Obamas traveled to the U.K. less than a month later for an official state visit.”
“Since Obama is no longer president, he doesn't require as extensive a security detail as he once did.”
“If Trump were to appear at Prince Harry's wedding in spring 2018, it would likely spark protests.”
“When Prime Minister Theresa May offered Trump a state visit early this year, polls showed that 2 million people intended to take part in a protest against him.”


"Due to Canada's relationship with the British Empire, it is expected that Canadian Prime Minister Trudeau and other Commonwealth leaders will receive wedding invitation."
Instead of a state visit, trump arranged a trip to the UK in early 2018, a "work trip" where he would not see the queen.
"But because of Obama's friendship with this young member of the British royal family, a former US president is likely to be on the list: Barack Obama and his wife, former first lady Michelle, seem to have an amiable relationship with Harry and his brother, the future king, Prince William, Duke of Cambridge."
When asked about the list of potential guests, "we are concerned about the good news of their engagement," Kensington Palace spokesman Julie Barry told Newsweek, adding that the invitation "will be announced in due course."
"When the Duke and Duchess of Cambridge married in 2011, the Obamas were excluded from the guest list because of the increased security costs of protecting the president."
On the wedding day, thousands of Britons took a day off, and about 1900 guests attended the wedding at Westminster Abbey in central London
Less than a month later, President Obama went to Britain for an official state visit.
"Because Obama is no longer president, he no longer needs as much security detail as he used to."
"If trump appears at Prince Harry's wedding in the spring of 2018, it is likely to trigger a protest."
"When British Prime Minister Theresa May proposed a state visit to trump earlier this year, polls showed that 2 million people planned to take part in the protests against him."



Number  1441
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This week, 38 White House conservatives say they would pass the bill if given the opportunity to do so – all 38 of them are women.”
“The petition needs 100,000 signatures before it is reviewed and responded by the White House.”
“Save the sperm, save the children!” A petition on Change.org to stop the ‘needless wasting of sperm through self gratification’ has already received 85,000 signatures in less than three weeks.”
“We have got to put a stop to this as a human race.”
““Millions upon millions of innocent lives are wasted every day while men have lustful thoughts or watch those sick pornos on PornHub.”
“Ejaculation is murder and every sperm cell is a life!”Stratt and her group of protesters are calling for a law that will make ejaculating for self gratification illegal in every state across the country.”
“Every time you do, you are literally killing thousands of babies!”
““God made men’s semen for a purpose, and you can just “waste” that purpose by gratifying yourself whenever you want to.”
“This is why the Catholics do not believe in birth control,” said Rachel Stratt, pro-life activist.”
““Life begins BEFORE conception.”


"This week, 38 White House conservatives said they would pass the bill if they had the chance - 38 of them are women."
"The petition needs 100000 signatures before it can be reviewed and responded to by the White House."
"Save the sperm, save the child! "Petition to change. Org" to stop 'unnecessary waste of sperm through self gratification', 85000 signatures have been received in less than three weeks. "
"As a human, we have to stop this."
"Millions of innocent lives are wasted every day, while people have lustful thoughts or watch disgusting porn on pornographic websites."
"Ejaculation is murder, every sperm cell is life! "Strat and her protest group called for a law to outlaw ejaculation for self satisfaction in all States of the country."
"Every time you do that, you're killing thousands of babies!"
"The semen that God created human beings has a purpose. As long as you want to satisfy yourself, you can" waste "this purpose."
"That's why Catholics don't believe in birth control," says life support activist Rachel stratt
"Life begins with conception."



Number  1442
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“To learn more, check out the provided video below.”
“We’ll have to see.”
“Now, as an American citizen, it is a bit tricky to remove him, but when Trump takes office, it may completely change.”
“Although it took years, Russia’s president Vladimir Putin officially issued an international arrest warrant for George Soros for his role in collapsing Russia’s currency and the resulting financial meltdown.”
“Ever since then Russia has held a grudge against Soros.”
“The results of which pushed Russia into a financial depression which ultimately benefitted the billionaire in his deep, greedy pockets.”
“Investors immediately panicked and dumped the Russian currency.”
“Back in the ‘90’s he wrote a letter that besmirched the Russian currency and said it was overvalued.”
“Russia was once a victim of his demented financial upheaval.”
“Basically, he causes massive financial chaos in a country, cashes in on it, and moves to the next one.”


"To learn more, check out the video provided below."
"We have to see."
"Now, as an American citizen, it's a bit tricky to get rid of him, but after trump takes office, things may change completely."
"Although it took several years, Russian President Vladimir Putin officially issued an international arrest warrant for George Soros because of his role in the collapse of the Russian currency and the resulting financial crisis."
"Since then, Russia has had a grudge against Soros."
As a result, Russia was pushed into a financial depression, which eventually benefited the wealthy billionaire
"Investors immediately panicked and sold the Russian currency."
"As early as the 1990s, he wrote a letter that defiled the Russian currency and said it was overvalued."
"Russia used to be the victim of his crazy financial turmoil."
"Basically, he created a huge financial mess in one country, profited from it and moved on to the next."



Number  1443
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“0Commentscomments...”
“...before the place was shut down...”
“It was a full massive operation No one from Walmart s corporate office was available for comment but an unofficial spokesperson did say that they were disappointed that they weren t able to use their company discount to get meth...”
““Apparently, every employee in the store was a part of it, from working with and gathering materials, to cooking, to selling it outside of the store.”
““The thing was massive, and contained enough materials to make hundreds, if not thousands, of pounds of crystal meth,” said Chief Garner.”
“When an officer was sent to investigate, the store was instantly shut down as he discovered a meth lab that took up the entire back room.”
“Police Chief Robert Garner said that an anonymous tip was left on their drug hotline, expressing concern about a horrible burning smell that was coming from the back of the Decatur WalMart facility.”
“0DECATUR, Alabama –Police were recently tipped off to a reported meth lab that was being run by Walmart employees in what they are calling one of the biggest busts in decades.”


"0 comments..."
“… Before this place is closed... "
"This is a comprehensive and large-scale operation, and no one in Wal Mart's office commented on it, but an unofficial spokesman did say that they were disappointed that they could not use the company's discount to get methamphetamine..."
"Obviously, every employee in the store is one of them, from working and collecting materials, to cooking, to selling outside the store."
"It's big enough to make hundreds of pounds of ice," said the Ghanaian chief
"When a police officer was sent to investigate, he found that an ice lab occupied the whole back room, and the shop was immediately closed."
Police chief Robert garner said an anonymous lead had been left on their drug hotline expressing concern about the terrible burning smell coming from behind the Decatur Wal Mart factory
"Decatur, Alabama - police recently received a report that Wal Mart employees are running an ice lab, which they call the biggest case in decades."



Number  1444
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.2595356550580431
Correct number is  313
Total number is  1206
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
